
User Name: =
Date and Time: = 2024-04-15
Job Number: = 221951650

Documents (500)
Client/Matter: -None-
Search Terms:
Search Type: nat
Content Type	Narrowed by
news	Sources:  Sources: Irish Daily Mail Content type: urn:pct:85

1. 'Buzzing' Toland says Group of Death holds no fears for Ireland 'I'M LOOKING TO THE FUTURE NOW, THE PAST IS IN THE PAST'

2. 'We're worried that it's going to turn into a frightening situation here' Locals call refugee centre 'inhumane'

3. An own goal that may turn allies against Israel COMMENTARY

4. ARMAGH IN THE SHOP WINDOW Driven Orange county captain McCambridge out to make history in decider

5. BOOTROOM ¦ ¦ YOUR GUIDE TO TONIGHT'S ACTION

6. Boyfriend charged with Sarah murder Witnesses claim Longford woman's partner just walked into pub and stabbed her then turned knife on himself

7. BRIDGE MASTERCLASS

8. Bring teachers back home Union says efforts to lure educators from abroad are 'feeble and pitiable'

9. C A R Trading Company Ltd is [...] RECRUITMENT

10. Calls to tackle 'mayhem' on roads as 2,600 caught speeding

11. CHILDREN DON'T HAVE TO RUIN YOUR SEX LIFE Here's how it can survive and even be better than ever

12. Chocs away: Sweet news as shoppers spend (EURO)25m on eggs

13. COD NUGGETS AND WEDGES Serves 4 FAMILY FRIENDLY

14. COVENEY COULDN'T BRING HIMSELF TO BACK HARRIS WHEN LEADERSHIP RACE BEGAN... AND IT WAS THEN THAT HIS FATE WAS SEALED

15. Design masters? Calling in this lot would be a costly catastrophe

16. Dom ends his drought as careless Toon pay the penalty

17. DUBUN CITY COUNCIL Sean and [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

18. Even I now believe that mental health culture has gone too far

19. Fireman who sits on council in court bid to run for election

20. FRESH CRISIS IN FG AS COVENEY QUITS Incoming taoiseach Simon Harris facing into election with as many as 15 TDs out of the running amid plans to create 'new look' party FG in need of new faces, new ideas

21. Gen Z - yes, I mean my grandkids - are the rudest ever!

22. Gibbs-White runs show to avenge Forest's five-goal horror r at Cottage

23. Here's how you CAN go hell for leather

24. History is crucial to understanding conflict in Gaza LET TERS

25. Horner saga takes toll on 'upset, angry' complainant FORMULA ONE

26. How volunteers became targets Following approved roads, they were picked off ruthlessly one by one

27. How we identified Banksy as a nice middle-class boy called Robin 16 years ago.....but the art world refuses to accept it because the 'mystery' is such a cash cow

28. I feel lonely and need therapy, says Raye

29. I'm 37, but already feel invisible. I seem to be ageing faster ... because I haven't had any Botox

30. IN discussing road deaths, the [...]

31. IN THE MATTER OF COMFANIES [...] LEGAL NOTICES

32. It could take average earners 89 years to save a house deposit

33. JK inspires us to speak the truth in an age where being a gender critic is like practising witchcraft...

34. JK ROWLING 'IN THE CLEAR ON HATE CRIME' Author hopes all women will be able to speak up in favour of biological sex - as police clear her of any criminality

35. Kate's facing debts of (EURO)2 million Things got so bad she had to turn off the heating She's shown extraordinary compassion and resilience. So, it's shocking to hear what caring for her husband's done to her...

36. McStay recalls Big Apple fright ahead of visit

37. My twins? I let them eat cake! After SJP's own mother banned her from eating sugar as a child...

38. Pep relishes using Keane's barbs as fuel for title charge comment

39. PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV

40. PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV

41. Psychic agony aunt and angel therapist Soul Guide

42. Return to substance over style best bet for FG revival

43. RORY URGED TO BLOCK OUT DISTRACTIONS Two-time US Open champion Strange says Texas will keep McIlroy's mind off Augusta

44. Semenyo off his sick bed to save the day

45. Shambolic FAI need another shake-up

46. Sky high: (EURO)2.2bn terminal plan for Dublin

47. Switch off: E-car sales fall by 40%

48. Taylor's swift to join record number of billionaires

49. TELEVISION

50. TELEVISION

51. The best ways to spring clean your skin this April

52. The shaming of MrPerfect He's the Stanford professor with one of the world's top health podcasts who looks like Hercules and counsels millions of men about self-discipline. So how does he explain being caught cheating on his girlfriend with FIVE lovers?

53. The Spanish chef behind charity feeding the people of Gaza

54. TIGHT SQUEEZE Monaghan boss wary of crammed schedule

55. Time running out for Clarets to escape drop

56. We're being led by people we didn't vote for - so let's get back to ballot box

57. Why I believe it was wrong to be 'body positive' about my plus-size figure... There are health implications of being overweight - and it's wildly unhelpful to tell people otherwise I was not happily overweight, I was wrecking my h...

58. Why the Queen Mum kept mum ANSWERS TO CORRESPONDENTS

59. WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL Arc Design [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

60. WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL. Giles and [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

61. Zouma rises highest for Moyes to rain on the Spurs parade PREMIER LEAGUE

62. 'Wine mums' who drink [...]

63. 30-SECOND CHALLENGE

64. 89 years to save for a deposit on first house

65. ACCEPTING an Icon award over [...]

66. AS the balsa wood prop [...]

67. AT the risk of succumbing [...]

68. Bey's cowboy night as Cher and Meryl reunite

69. BLOSSOMING NAIL SHADES

70. Body found in hunt for missing woman

71. Boy, 12, shoots dead classmate at Finnish school

72. Calvert-Lewin finally ends his drought to rescue point for Toffees

73. CANYON CAFTTAL INVESTMENT UPTON DESIGNATED [...] LEGAL NOTICES

74. Catterick

75. Chef De Parfe required to [...] RECRUITMENT

76. Clarifications & corrections

77. Club's defibrillator targeted by vandals

78. COSMETIC CRAVING

79. DESIGN DOUBLES This week DOUBLE HEART EARRINGS

80. DR MAX PRESCRIBES... KIWI FRUIT

81. DUBUN CITY COUNCIL - Jennifer [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

82. DUBUN CITY COUNCIL Paul Begley [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

83. Duff is doing a great job

84. Enis Takeaway Limited , UNFT 6, [...] RECRUITMENT

85. FINGAL COUNTY COUNCIL Planning permission [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

86. Following persons have applied for [...] PUBLIC NOTICES

87. GET YOUR BRILLIANT DIGITAL EDITION [...]

88. Heading for the escape pod! Tommy and friends call time on online show

89. Health Care Assistants required at [...] RECRUITMENT

90. Healthcare Assistant - Larissa Lodge [...] RECRUITMENT

91. Healthcare Assistant - Lodge Nursing [...] RECRUITMENT

92. Healthcare Assistant - Tinnypark Nursing [...] RECRUITMENT

93. Healthcare Assistant- Oaklodge Nursing Home, [...] RECRUITMENT

94. Healthcare Assistant- Sllvergrove Nursing Home, [...] RECRUITMENT

95. HIP-HOP DISH OF THE NIGHT: [...]

96. Horticulture Workers wanted to work [...] RECRUITMENT

97. hotspots

98. I'm begging you, please skip Beyoncé's Jolene

99. In the Matter of the [...] LEGAL NOTICES

100. IN THE MATTER OFTHE COMFANIES [...] LEGAL NOTICES

101. IN THE MATTER OFTHE COMPANIES [...] LEGAL NOTICES

102. Itoje fit for Sarries' French showdown RUGBY UNION

103. Keep children safe from predators by not giving them phones

104. KEMPTON RTV

105. Life's LITTLE luxuries LUGGAGE LABELS

106. Meaning of friendship LET TERS

107. Murphy to miss Craven Meeting over whip rule

108. Nesbitt's Northern thriller gets bullet after two seasons

109. NIGELLA LAWSON THE TV [...]

110. No need to Shout... Why Lulu never speaks before midday

111. No reprieve from the rain but temperatures to start rising

112. PEP SLAMS KEANE City manager hits back at Roy over his Haaland digs

113. PICK OF TODAY'S RADIO

114. PICK OF TODAY'S TV

115. PICK OF TODAY'S TV

116. Race you to it!

117. SEE ALL YOUR FAVOURITE CARTOONS [...]

118. SINCE the inception of the [...]

119. SOUTH DUBLIN COUNTY COUNCIL Denise [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

120. SOUTH DUBUN COUNTY COUNCIL I [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

121. Stauntons Operations Limited T/A Stauntons [...] RECRUITMENT

122. Straight to the POINT

123. Suspended Egan out of marquee meeting

124. Terex MDS (T/A Murray Design [...] RECRUITMENT

125. The House of Nails is [...] RECRUITMENT

126. The last laugh for this talented trio of jokers

127. THE lucky punter who turned [...]

128. THE outpouring of goodwill towards [...]

129. To provide creditors with the [...] LEGAL NOTICES

130. TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: [...]

131. TRACK FACTS: PRINCIPAL & JACKPOT [...]

132. Trolls should leave Kate alone

133. Two (02) Welders required to [...] RECRUITMENT

134. Wayne's world LET TERS

135. What can I do to fix my bingo wings? Shh! Anti-agers no one but you need know about

136. WHY DID PEP FEEL NEED TO LECTURE GREALISH?

137. ' UL must explain multi-million debt'

138. 'Auld' ways are the best! Dublin pub will keep the price of a pint at under a fiver despite relentless hikes

139. 'Christians' not practising what Jesus preached LET TERS

140. 'GAME-CHANGER' HRT ALTERNATIVE AVAILABLE IN IRELAND

141. 'Trans women' Rowling dared to label as 'men'

142. 'We'll see return to fuel tourism' after excise duty restored

143. 1,000-year-old oak tree brings whiskey distiller back to its roots

144. 6,000 refugees granted asylum stuck in State accommodation

145. A spiffing escapade full of Nazis, biscuits and lashings of ginger beer

146. American Embassy summoned Ryan over Dublin Airport row Fears passenger cap could damage US - Ireland dealings

147. AN INTENSE FEELING I had huge confidence in Raffles - Gibney

148. ARREST ME! Defiance of JK Rowling as she dares police over new Scottish hate crime law Michael McDowell backs author's right to free speech after she makes a series of posts labelling trans women as men 'Unacceptable' if we follow...

149. Bedding down a great idea ANSWERS TO CORRESPONDENTS

150. C.A. F. Trading Company Ltd is [...] RECRUITMENT

151. Camp that gives childhood back to sick children As Barretstown turns 30, a new report highlights its value to the health service

152. Chloe got three more years with her family thanks to a heart transplant from Alex. Now, after HER tragic death, their mothers have found solace in their unique bond EXCLUSIVE

153. Come off it, Roy, his link-up play is not 'League Two' … and it's not even his role under Pep Roy Keane: The level of Haaland's general play is so poor. He's almost like a League Two player. He has to improve

154. Could staring at flashing lights help to delay the progress of dementia? New study finds it could flush out proteins in the brain

155. Don't call them bird brains... feathered friends are getting MORE intelligent

156. Duff's Shels make a point Leaders overcome illness in camp

157. Expert tips on how to banish WIND Is it really bad to hold it in? How many times a day is normal? Can I train my body to stop doing it?

158. FAI dragging its heels on funding 'risks finance crisis'

159. From sorbet to Spam - ten surprising ways to load up on vitamin C

160. Gentlemen's Joely gives tweedy look a hippy shake-up

161. Hate law is anti-women, no matter how you dress it up

162. HOW HAITI TURNED INTO THE LAWLESS DYSTOPIA FROM MAD MAX Corpses rotting in the streets. Gangs ruling by terror and police so impotent they've had to team up with ruthless vigilantes

163. How MI5 and the FBI were behind the 60s drugs raid that saw Jagger jailed and started those rumours about Marianne Faithfull and the Mars

164. How to cope with a serious diagnosis that comes out of the blue viewpoint

165. Howard out to improve Premier strike rate

166. I didn't think it was illegal ... but I am haunted by what was lost Jailed crypto king's remorse over firm's $8BILLION losses

167. I spent (EURO)10,000 in Turkey to have saggy skin removed after weight-loss op - and it's left me in total agony Risk of dire complications from overseas procedures

168. If you feed Erling he will thrive (just like City's bonsai tree in the treatment room)

169. iranian general killed by suspected israeli airstrike on syria consulate

170. Jail time awaiting Sutton after going on run

171. Jessie ready to answer Gleeson's call

172. ONWARDS TO SUMMER WITH A SPRING IN OUR STEP Five lessons we should learn from the climax to the National Leagues...

173. Pair charged over stabbing of teen boy are freed on bail

174. Patient passports for gynaecological oncology rolled out at St James's

175. Patten in line to make her debut against France

176. PEPPER PASTA TRAYBAKE

177. PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV

178. PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV GREATEST HEISTS WITH PIERCE BROSNAN, 9PM, BLAZE

179. PUBLIC URGED NOT TO IGNORE SYMPTOMS OF BOWEL CANCER

180. Ramsdale set to reunite with mentor Howe

181. Russian sonic beams blamed for 'Havana syndrome'

182. Sacks appeal: Bin bags and glad rags as racing ladies chase clouds away

183. Shatter eyes Europe seat, saying 'truth matters'

184. TD denies he 'promised' more money to fund special school Staff paid late at centre facing (EURO)1.7m crisis

185. TELEVISION

186. TELEVISION

187. Tomb with a view.. like a building site OPW criticised for state of vandalised cairn

188. Tractor Boys dig deep and remain top of the table

189. Tragic Sarah stabbed to death by her boyfriend, say US police Man brought 2 knives into bar, says witness

190. TRUST IN O'SHEA Let interim Irish manager carry on, insists Duff 'Future and quality of Irish side will depend on LOI'

191. Two drivers an hour stopped by gardaí in Easter crackdown

192. Underdog tag will be to our advantage Carusa backs Irish in tough group

193. Waiting lists discouraging those with cancer symptoms People urged to avail of BowelScreen or visit GP if any signs of disease materialise

194. We look like April fools Irish football a laughing stock as sorry saga drags on COMMENT

195. What DID they do to my boy? Mail writer Christopher Stevens' son David is so severely autistic he had to go into residential care at 13. But after his home was taken over by private equity, standards went through the floor. Soon h...

196. Why Geri's pool plans have sent some locals off at the deep end They try to keep villagers onside with Fortnum & Mason hampers, but the Horners' latest grand design is ruffling feathers

197. WHY YOU STILL HAVE nightmares about exams EVEN LONG AFTER YOU'VE LEFT SCHOOL …and the trick to interpreting your most troubling dreams - as revealed by an eminent brain surgeon

198. 'Remarkable': Leo hails 75th anniversary of the Republic

199. 30-SECOND CHALLENGE

200. After Derry defeat, Farrell may [...]

201. Bacharacn International Limited, having ceased [...] LEGAL NOTICES

202. BRAINTEASER OF THE NIGHT: With [...]

203. BRIDGE MASTERCLASS

204. Cannabis is now legal in Germany

205. Chef De PartJe required to [...] RECRUITMENT

206. Choc full of health benefits

207. Clarifications & corrections

208. DO THIS...

209. DUBLIN CITY COUNCIL We Dublin [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

210. DUN LAOGHAIRE RATHDOWN COUNTY COUNCIL [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

211. Enis Takeaway Limited , UNfT 6, [...] RECRUITMENT

212. Expert tips on how to [...]

213. Expert tips on how to [...]

214. FRED BASSET

215. GET YOUR BRILLIANT DIGITAL EDITION [...]

216. Health Cars Assistants required at [...] RECRUITMENT

217. Horticulture Workers wanted to work [...] RECRUITMENT

218. HOTSPOTS

219. Injury woes to ponder for Leo RUGBY

220. IT'S ALL KICKING off!

221. Kinahan's crimes against writing

222. Lisnagarvey in Euro win

223. LUDLOW RTV

224. Media targeted at dissidents' Rising march

225. Mescal's normal days are over

226. Money bags! Ben and Jen step out with luxury luggage worth up to (EURO)93,000

227. Mullins picks up a quiet treble on final day By EOGHAN O'BRIEN

228. O'Connor Software Development Services Limited, [...] LEGAL NOTICES

229. PICK OF TODAY'S RADIO

230. PICK OF TODAY'S TV

231. PICK OF TODAY'S TV CÚRAMÓIRÍ, 7.30PM, TG4

232. PLUS: OSCAR CAINER'S HOROSCOPES

233. PONTEFRACT RTV

234. Protect our freedoms LET TERS

235. Raffles is a National treasure!

236. Stauntons Qpurattons Limited T/A Stauntons [...] RECRUITMENT

237. Straight to the POINT

238. Surprising foods full of vitamin [...]

239. Teach your old dog some new tricks... and help it live longer!

240. Terex MDS (TM Murray Design [...] RECRUITMENT

241. The benefits of living alone

242. The House of Nails is [...] RECRUITMENT

243. Two (02) Welders required to [...] RECRUITMENT

244. Well said, Mary LET TERS

245. Were you April fooled?

246. What do YOU think?

247. WHY DID PEP FEEL NEED [...]

248. WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL We, Bray [...] PLANNING APPLICATIONS

249. WOLVERHAMPTON SSR

250. ...and good news for parents applying for school places

251. A big effect of our possessions

252. A day full of memories... including the 1916 Proclamation off by heart

253. America 's pastime faces battle with a familiar foe... ON THE BOX

254. AN CAN train yourself to turn your night mares happy dreams Those terrors that wake you in the early hours with heart pounding could have been passed down to you by previous generations of your family. But as an engrossing new boo...

255. AROUND THE GROUNDS: ALL YOU NEED TO KNOW ABOUT SATURDAY'S ACTION

256. Arteta: We've shown we can take the heat

257. Bang-average Blues too reliant on Palmer power

258. Can a walk in the woods CURE ALL YOUR ILLS? Well it can't hurt - and Dr Mark Rowe insists forest bathing and other nature-based immersion could be the key to living longer The little spring buds are making me feel true joy

259. Crackdown on shoplifters selling stolen goods online

260. Crime dining Cartel boss Christy Kinahan posted hundreds of restaurant reviews while on the run with $5m bounty on head

261. De Zerbi warns Brighton to match his ambition

262. Does March 19 hold the clue?

263. Driven to drink by prices letters

264. England on fire as Scots put it up to the French

265. Geri and husband all hugs and smiles at the races

266. Gritty Gunners show they have finally escaped Pep's psychological stranglehold

267. Harris boost for students who work while at college Parting gift from Higher Education Minister before taking the top job

268. Harris has a tough task proving he is a new broom

269. Harte puts Dubs on spot Derry can now dream big as veteran manager inger inspires brilliant win

270. If this is what the 1980s were really like, maybe they're best forgotten!

271. Ireland blow a golden chance More positive signs from Bemand's team bm but errors allow Italians to take command

272. Ireland rue missed chances after Italy defeat 'We're honest... if we're not winning, we're learning'

273. It's a Mac Allister MASTERCLASS as Liverpool take top spot

274. Johnson warming to his supersub role for slow-starting Spurs

275. Judge lambasts using the courts to 'threaten or intimidate people' Man's case against high-profile figures called 'an abuse'

276. KENNY SETS OUT GOALS FOR YEAR On-loan Rovers striker's tally hope

277. Looks like Simon thinks Kate Moss has the X factor to launch a singing career

278. Maanum scare mars Arsenal joy Midfielder stable after collapsing as Hayes and Eidevall clash WOMEN'S LEAGUE CUP FINAL

279. MAKE IT COUNT! Derry need to build on thrilling victory over Dubs - Harte We will come back stronger for this experience, vows s Dublin boss

280. McGuinness makes his mark as Donegal seal thrilling victory

281. Minister, your version of 'polluter pays' is just piffle

282. miserable monday! Fuel price hike across Ireland from today

283. Mortified Paul caught out in his smalls by A-lister Nicole

284. NAME GAME

285. No joking... scientists say chocolate could help you lose weight!

286. North's leaders urged to keep it 'business as usual' Shockwaves still being felt in wake of Donaldson's exit as DUP chief

287. O'Donnell starting to feel the heat

288. PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV

289. PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV

290. PICK OF TODAY'S TV

291. PICK OF TODAY'S TV

292. PLAYER RATINGS

293. Police blamed Claudia by saying she had a 'complex and mysterious' love life. It wasn't true and it drained public sympathy In a notorious and baffling unsolved crime, chef Claudia Lawrence vanished without trace on her way to wor...

294. Proud Bradford stagnating under a trigger-happy owner who is still giving fans false promises

295. Rice and Rodri is a battle royal Title tussle lit up by two midfield heavyweights at the top of their game

296. SF 'misinformation' 'Go back and study Junior Cycle CSPE' says senator as SF calls for election of taoiseach

297. Teen killed 1km away from scene of triple road tragedy

298. TELEVISION

299. TELEVISION

300. Ten Hag in peril after his United side down tools

301. TERIYAKI TOFU RICE BOWL

302. The Government's all-or-nothing approach to sustainable energy will cost the taxpayer dearly

303. Thousands of Israelis say Netanyahu must go

304. Toon know they dodged a bullet with Phillips

305. Vecchini's brace of tries seal it for Italy

306. We cannot keep ignoring cruelty of factory farms letters

307. we will not be a cashless society Government moves to shore up rural support - and votes - by subsidising private providers of ATMs and cash-in-transit vans exclusive Banks face fines if there are not enough ATMs in a given area

308. Welcome to the Easter feast of bread and butter with a drizzle of common sense and plain speaking

309. What are the odds? (EURO)40 bet nets (EURO)331,452 at Fairyhouse

310. what to watch this week...

311. 1 THE number of clean sheets [...]

312. 30-SECOND CHALLENGE Sudoku SVG generator

313. Ali's shorts from 1975 fight set to sell for $6m

314. BRIDGE MASTERCLASS

315. came from behind to win [...]

316. CESARE CASADEI turned his back [...]

317. CHEPSTOW SSR

318. Clarifications & corrections

319. CORK

320. EVERY league match is significant, [...]

321. exclusive dreams series You can train [...]

322. FAIRYHOUSE

323. FAKENHAM RTV

324. Falkirk up with games to spare

325. Hop on board! Nicola joins Posh's yacht party

326. hotspots

327. HUNTINGDON RTV

328. Hurdle star Hill suffers colic scare

329. Irish Mail Digital Edition

330. KEMPTON RTV 2.55, itv 3.30, 4.05, 4.40

331. Laois really turn up heat after the break

332. MASTERQUIZ

333. Menopause drug a 'game-changer'

334. MINDBENDER

335. Monorail may be better letters

336. NIGHT VISION OF THE WEEKEND: [...]

337. NO GO, ROBERTO?

338. ONE KISS AND 300 WINS FOR KLOPP

339. Photographer reveals more strangeness from the night of Andrew's car-crash BBC interview

340. PICK OF TODAY'S RADIO

341. PITCHERWITSTM

342. Please save our at-risk birds

343. PLENTY of silverware has adorned [...]

344. PLUMPTON SSR itv 2.25

345. Pope uses his Easter message to call for a ceasefire in Gaza

346. QUICK QUIZ

347. REDCAR RTV

348. SSE AIRTRICITY LEAGUE PREMIER DIVISION PREVIEWS

349. Straight to the POINT

350. Sudoku 1/8/24, 12:57 PM

351. THE rancour of recent Manchester [...]

352. The REAL winners on Super Sunday! DIAZ, MO AND CO TAKE ADVANTAGE OF ETIHAD DRAW TO GO TOP OF TABLE

353. THERE was plenty of good [...]

354. THREE shots on target were [...]

355. TRACK FACTS: JACKPOT & PRINCIPAL [...]

356. TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: [...]

357. TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: [...]

358. TRACK FACTS: L-H Tapeta course. [...]

359. TRACK FACTS: R-H course. GOING: [...]

360. WOLVERHAMPTON SSR

361. WORD WHEEL

362. Young man left fighting for life after attack

363. Youths suffer 'withdrawal' when phones taken away

364. 'I think McGuinness will climb the mountain again' Gaelic football is woven into the fabric of Paul McGinley's life and career, from his own time on the pitch to picking the brains of the 'the two Jims'

365. 'We are here to do a job of work, to add value to what they are very good at' Harte's impact on Derry is most obvious when you lou look at squad's increased depth

366. 5 MOVIE highlights

367. Across 1 A violin manufactured [...]

368. ADIOS STEVE! As Tracy leaves him for her lover in Spain Jaci Stephen is away SOAP WATCH with STEVEN MURPHY

369. Alarming rise in illegal taxi drivers since Covid Black-market 'boom' sees convictions against unlicenced operators up 70%

370. Amy deserves every chance to realise her Olympic dream by mark gallagher #justsayin...

371. ANATOMY OF A SCANDAL A new drama reveals the untold story behind UK's Prince Andrew's bombshell Newsnight interview...

372. Angelina and Brad's Heartburn over the kids

373. Arsenal were easy prey for City. But Arteta fixed inferiority complex and built a winning machine

374. As always, Harris will make zero difference

375. At best Israel 's actions in Gaza are war crimes - at worst genocide MARCH 31 ? 2024 The Irish Mail on Sunday COMMENT 23 Ger Colleran

376. BEES STING TING UNITED Ajer's last-gasp leveller punishes Ten Hag's men

377. big MISTAKE How even the tiniest speck of pollen can be a killer's one... Forensic ecologist Patricia Wiltshire has tracked down hundreds of criminals, including Soham murderer Ian Huntley - who had cleaned every inch of his car, ...

378. Block fresh hikes with a few savvy switches! Why prices are going up tomorrow (and how you can escape the pain)

379. Bradley Walsh? 'So-so comedian' Sarah Millican? 'Vulgar' Frank Skinner? 'Too explicit' Rowan Atkinson? Michael McIntyre?'Funny as a kick in the balls' An outspoken and irreverent Jimmy Tarbuck gives his uncensored views on today's...

380. Buy less, buy better, by Helen Helen McAlinden's minimalistic style has entranced women for two decades and now she has a new Dublin shop to visit

381. Cava fizz… and a whizz round historic Cadiz

382. Code Cracker N0.909[...]

383. Corruption, bribery... and Michael Lynn's Faustian pact with a Chechen gangster Book reveals disgraced solicitor's dishonest Balkan deals By Michael O'Farrell investigations editor

384. Cost of each child in care is (EURO)330k a year or nearly (EURO)7k a week Foster care bill rises to (EURO)350m as Tusla warns costs are set to increase

385. crowley stars Munster on the up but Ulster just edged out

386. De Zerbi's Brighton future is uncertain

387. Derry boy's girls Jonathan Anderson's top designs have crowned him the e king of the red carpet .. and here are six of JW's finest creations worn by the stars, as picked out by our top stylist LAURA JORDON - EXPERT VIEW

388. Derry Girl's new show is a bit of a misfire? so far 53 more Section Philip Nolan He's watching what you're watching!

389. Djokovic undecided about coach

390. Early election likely despite Harris's plan to see out full term as new taoiseach Cabinet colleagues doubt Dáil discipline can be kept up, saying 'natural causes' will finish off Government

391. Easter is a time to think about the challenges of migration

392. EGG-CELLENT EASTER TABLE Set the stage for a special dinner with gorgeous pastels and lots of cheerfulaccessories, with flowers, candles, eggs and bunnies to embrace the fun

393. EMILY AND HER NEWSHOUND! New film reveals Maitlis took her whippet to work

394. FIVE TRULY SCANDALOUS SHOWS

395. For peat's sake Farmers braced for British boycott of Irish mushrooms ASNATIONALTRUSTTAKESTHEM off menus over climate fears

396. Get your green this Easter Get your five-a-day with the help of these nutritious and easy recipes for all the family

397. Glimmers of hope as O'Shea steadies Ireland ship but some familiar issues remain

398. HAIRDRESSER CALLS FOR BACKSTREET BEAUTICIANS CRACKDOWN

399. HORROR WOOD Up-and-coming Dubliner filmmaker Lee Cronin reveals plans to shoot future thrillers here and turn Ireland into...

400. HOT LIST CLAIRE HYLAND ON WHAT'S TRENDING IN GREAT NEW READS

401. How to avoid being taken n in by fake illegal cosmetics

402. How to keep grey at bay - without hitting the hair dye Many of us are happy to grey gracefully. But if you want to hang on to your natural colour as long as possible, a top expert tells you how (it's bad news for vegans!)

403. I admire Mikel for having the courage of his convictions

404. I arrived at the five-star hotel in old undies thanks to Victoria's hidden secret

405. I can't be a teenage protest singer for ever Declan McKenna started out as the voice of a generation but now he's doing his own thing

406. I'm a poor tennis player, but I couldn't miss the chance to play (and be beaten) at Wimbledon Ryan Tubridy ryan@mailonsunday.ie london diary

407. Improved set-piece can boost Irish hopes

408. Independents follow 'Verona template' to win over disgruntled Coalition supporters

409. It's a MAN's world in the Constitution Study finds that men are mentioned 109 times while women are referred to just seven times and 'she' not at all

410. Joan's pain at learning of mother's death by post while in US

411. Konsa's on a roll as nervy Villa claim vital l win in battle for top four

412. Lamptastic Aladdin may be a 'panto with pretensions' but its spellbinding Genie is utterly?

413. Laurel River eases to Dubai World Cup win

414. Leaders pledge stability after Donaldson's sex charges

415. League final is a huge game - and I think Clare will edge it Michael Duignan THE VOICE OF HURLING

416. Light at the end of the tunnel? Paula Fitzpatrick was part of Ireland 's golden generation who blazed a trail for the women's game. Now, after years of decline, she believes the national team could be turning a corner

417. Lipstick lift: make-up really does boost mental wellness

418. Lynam impresses in Westmeath triumph

419. Marathon man Son the saviour for Spurs again

420. Mayhem and mistakes as Toon win thriller Barnes the hero, Phillips the villain in tale of two subs

421. McEntee'hiding a ng asylum reality' Minister accused of releasing obscure and incomprehensible figures for deportation of bogus applicants

422. My jumbo love for elephants The late Paul O'Grady's final TV series sees him helping to save these gentle 'soulful' animals

423. New anti-ageing solutions to add moisture to dry and thirsty skin

424. New building for refugees may be halted by legal battle

425. New Dublin are just the same in all the ways that matter

426. No need to be coy, Roy offers something few can match

427. Old hand Brady hasn't hit the wall yet

428. Parental alienation expert found unfit to practise in UK now advising family courts She lacked 'the moral qualities of sincerity, integrity, competence and wisdom to which ALL practitioners are strongly urged to aspire,' yet...

429. Pick of the Day

430. Pick of the Day

431. PICK OF THE DAY

432. Pick of the Day

433. Pick of the Day

434. Pick of the Day

435. Pick of the Day

436. Poch's frustration as Chelsea held to draw

437. POYET PASSES Yet another blow for FAI as manager hunt drags on

438. Public good is not served by Army's silence on court-martialled Ranger

439. Quotes OF THE WEEK

440. Radio Week The picks of the best of this week's radio

441. Scam celebrity crypto ads aim to steal your cash… so don't take the bait A QUESTION OF MONEY

442. skylights

443. Soldier who abused two women now top advisor to global security firms Women of Honour blast Defence Forces for 'circling wagons' around elite Ranger after Army fails to respond to MOS questions

444. State's agencies's homeless and refugees compete for housing

445. TDs are quitting because they're not appreciated PICTURE OF THE WEEK

446. That's what you call a PUMPKIN! Growing the fruit couldn't be simpler - just don't expect all your efforts to emulate this Travis Gienger 2,749lb monster

447. The great Aldi vs Lidl challenge

448. The Hate Speech Bill is a charter for cancel culture

449. THE INSIDE STORY ON... RIPLEY STYLISH THRILLER

450. The school that Ashling built More than 30 Irish builders travelled to The Gambia to construct cct classrooms in memory of teacher murdered while jogging

451. The scientists are right... I rejoice in its two-minute transformative powers

452. THE T V HOT LIST TV Editor Mike Mulvihill's pick of the most exciting shows across all platforms this week

453. the week ahead with... Oscar Cainer

454. These housewives are not desperate, just dull

455. Time to hit the diving range? Golf courses, shops, farmers and builders hit by record rainfall

456. Tipp's long wait to reach final ends after victory

457. Today's Previews

458. Tragic family will be buried this week

459. TVON DEMAND Your must-see shows this week What to watch and where to find it. Your essential guide starts here?

460. Two long-awaited reports into RTÉ are delayed yet again

461. VIRGIN WANTS SLICE OF RTE'S LICENCE FEE PIE Rival broadcaster writes to minister seeking (EURO)30m share Commercial broadcaster asks media minister for public cash to fund nd station's current affairs, sports and documentary progr...

462. What a riot A hot young band, anarchy on the streets, racial tensions - and Downton's Lady Mary. It's the new 80s-set series from the man behind Peaky Blinders

463. What could be causing a constant ache near my cheek at night? Ask Dr Ellie THE GP WHO'S ALWAYS HERE FOR YOU

464. Why Jacko's children are still trapped in a Neverland of toxic family feuds over his $1.2bn legacy

465. Young mum was given the all-clear from rare breast cancer... only to get different type in her other breast weeks later

466. 'A semi-pro GAA looks inevitable to me'

467. 'I'd love to see Ireland [...]

468. 'VICTIMS DESERVE JUSTICE' Deputy First Minister backs judicial process as PSNI warns against social media speculation

469. 'We're here to add value [...]

470. A Little Princess 2.15pm Family [...]

471. A Matter Of Life And [...]

472. A real red flag opera

473. Anton & Giovanni's Adventures in [...]

474. Apocalypse Now 10pm I love [...]

475. Are you protected against measles? Ask Dr Ellie THE GP WHO'S ALWAYS HERE FOR YOU

476. Avoidance 9.30pm Shock: Jonathan (Romesh [...]

477. Beat The Chasers 8pm Highstakes: [...]

478. Beauty And The Beast 2.40pm [...]

479. Bees sting United with late leveller

480. Blankety Blank 7.10pm Filling in [...]

481. Bradley Walsh: The Laugh's On [...]

482. BRAIN TRAIN

483. Celebrity Catchphrase 8pm Game show: [...]

484. CHESS Here all White's pieces are [...]

485. CORRECTIONS & CLARIFICATIONS

486. Creed 9.30pm Following in the [...]

487. don't forget the fantastic four-page [...]

488. Don't Go 10.30pm Back from [...]

489. Dubliner Marie-Louise wins Gladiators

490. First Dates Ireland 10.35pm Love [...]

491. FREE INSIDE 8-page children's pullout [...]

492. FREE INSIDE 8-page children's pullout Dinosaur [...]

493. free MAGAZINE DON'T MISS NEXT [...]

494. Fried Green Tomatoes 2.55pm The [...]

495. FUNDING ALONE WON'T FIX CARE

496. Gambian school built in Ashling's [...]

497. GARDEN GURU

498. Gordon, Gino & Fred: Viva [...]

499. Great British Railway Journeys 6.30pm [...]

500. Heartbeat 7.55pm Gruesome: Gina is [...]





'Buzzing' Toland says Group of Death holds no fears for Ireland; 'I'M LOOKING TO THE FUTURE NOW, THE PAST IS IN THE PAST'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56,51
Length: 485 words
Byline: MARK GALLAGHER
Body


IRELAND midfielder Tyler Toland says she is 'buzzing' about the prospect of facing three of the world's best teams in the Euro 2025 qualifying 'Group of Death'.
Eileen Gleeson's side begin their Group A3 campaign with a daunting trip to Metz on Friday to face France, ranked third in the world, before they welcome England, the defending European champions, to Lansdowne Road next Tuesday. They will also meet Sweden, who finished third at last summer's World Cup, later this year. However, the Blackburn midfielder insists that she is excited by the six stern tests that face Ireland and that it can only benefit the team, as this is where they want to be.
'I was buzzing, really, really excited,' the Donegal native said of her reaction to the draw.
'Obviously, they are three of the best teams in the world and that is who we want to play against, we want to play the best in the world. That is what we want to be ourselves. They are good tests and can only do us good.
'It is a great buzz being in camp when you are playing two of the best teams in the world. As a team, we want to put on a performance for everyone and just be really hard to beat, like we are known for. Once we cross that white line, we will give everything we can.' Ireland suffered a blow yesterday as Liverpool captain Niamh Fahey was forced to withdraw from the squad with a calf www.strain.No player
TURN TO PAGE 51, COL 4
From Back Page has been called up to replace the experienced centre-half, a key defensive cog.
Toland has also proved to be an integral part of the team since Gleeson put her straight into midfield for last September's Nations League opener against Northern Ireland, ending the four-year international exile she had suffered under previous manager Vera Pauw. The 22-year-old is keen to move on from being frozen out by the previous regime. 'Thankfully, everything is in the past now. I have been in four camps now and am just looking to the future and push on. The past is in the past,' said Toland, who made her senior Ireland debut at 16 under Colin Bell. Since February's international camp, Toland has played five full matches for Blackburn in the Championship, including last weekend's 4-1 win over Reading, that had international teammate Jessie Stapleton in midfield.
When she has been fit, Toland has been an ever-present in the Blackburn team that are safely sitting mid-table in England's second tier, with a plan to push for promotion to the WSL next season.
'Well, one of my personal ambitions [for the season] was to get myself back in the Ireland fold and I am sitting here today, so obviously that has happened. Club football, I was looking for consistent game-time and that is exactly what I got,' said Toland. 'Before I signed, the club told me their ambitions were to make a name for themselves this year as a team that was hard to beat with the intention of next season looking for promotion to the WSL.'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



'We're worried that it's going to turn into a frightening situation here'; Locals call refugee centre 'inhumane'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 5
Length: 695 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


PROTESTERS have mounted a three-week long demonstration over a potential refugee centre in Wicklow, saying that the site for over 100 people is 'inhumane' and 'unworkable'.
Locals at the site near Trudder House in Newtownmountkennedy have vowed to stay there for the foreseeable future.
In a statement, the Department of Integration said the protest had stalled its works.
The site is located close to an exclusive wedding venue, Trudder Lodge, a 19th-century country house.
The department has confirmed that the HSE offered the vacant property of Trudder House - also known as River Lodge - and its surrounding lands for this purpose in what they say is an 'urgent nationwide situation' due to the volume of refugees and asylum seekers now in Ireland.
The protesters have since set up small shelters complete with toilet and kitchen facilities to allow them to remain there overnight and have vowed not to move until the issue is resolved. The site at Trudder House is down a narrow, rural road, just yards from the local GAA club.
Locals told the Irish Daily Mail they have also rebuffed attempts by wellknown far-right agitators to take over the demonstration and stressed they are 'in no way political' but believe that over 100 people will be 'dumped here'.
Kevin Haig, one of the main organisers of the demonstration, said the village in north Wicklow does not have enough suitable amenities for its fastgrowing population.
He told the Mail: 'We have tried hard to keep politics out of it. It is a concerned community - dumping people in a cold, wet field in Wicklow is immoral. We don't have a library, bank, dentist, just one small playground and the school is bursting at the seams. There's very little there.
'It just beggars belief that they will be dumped where there are no street lights, even.'
Mr Haig said the protest came together 'very quickly' and is made up solely of people from the small village's community, adding: 'There were a few attempts to politicise it and we said "no, no". We have general concerns for the welfare of the people going in there.
'We're not shouting and screaming saying they shouldn't be here... There is nothing to do in the village and the nearest bus stop is over 2km away. These people are coming from different places. Where are they going to get medical or mental health supports?'
But keeping the far-right social media agitators from politicising the protest has proved difficult said Mr Haig. 'We made the mistake of having an open WhatsApp group and anyone who was concerned could comment and very quickly there were people amongst us who were shouting abuse. We changed it to an inviteonly WhatsApp group. That has kept things on a community level. We've had the odd politician, and I use that word loosely, down here with a megaphone screaming "Ireland for the Irish" but we know their politics are all over the place. We're not interested in politics.'
Another protester, Mags Lally, a mother from the area, echoed Mr Haig's opinions but said there are people who might be afraid to walk down here at night knowing there are over 100 people living there.
She told the Mail: 'In the beginning we were just not told anything... we are led to believe that they're going to put people, we've heard 150 or more young men in pods, tents, we don't know.
There's no clarity. That's what we're worried about. We think it's inhumane, what they are going to do all day? I don't think integration works that way... We don't have a fulltime Garda station or amenities. It's a struggle. We don't have a secondary school.
'We're just worried that it's going to turn into a frightening situation. Apart from the fact we think it's very inhumane, we are concerned for our safety. There's a lot of women up there and we all have kids and daughters and walk up that road and we would no longer do that.'
A department spokesman said that works on the site have stalled due to the protest, adding: 'A Community Engagement Team has been established to engage directly with elected representatives, relevant local authorities, local development companies, and other entities and individuals.'
garreth.macnamee@dailymail.ie
'Dumping people here is immoral'

Graphic


United: Campaigners outside the entrance to Trudder Lodge and, right, Mags Lallye veal fran Pictures:

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



An own goal that may turn allies against Israel; COMMENTARY
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 15
Length: 814 words
Byline: Mark Almond
Body


THE deadly air strike which killed three British people and four other aid workers in Gaza on Monday has shattered any assumption the West will continue to support Israel indefinitely in its war against Hamas terrorists.
The carnage unleashed by the Israeli drones is as shocking as it is bewildering. How could the Israeli air force possibly have launched it when the aid convoy was so clearly marked, and the Israelis were informed of its whereabouts?
Israel's prime minister, Benjamin Netanyahu, described the strike as 'a tragic case of our forces unintentionally hitting innocent people in the Gaza Strip', before adding complacently: 'This happens in wartime.'
But that is not good enough. The optics of this - the needless slaughter of wellintentioned young people trying to help the disadvantaged in the most perilous place on Earth - could not be worse.
The war between Israel and Hamas, has dragged on for seven months since the slaughter of 1,200 Israelis by terrorists on October 7. Hamas, of course, provoked the terrible human cost to Palestinian civilians in Gaza by their rampage.
But the worldwide sympathy Israel benefited from after the attack is dissipating rapidly. Against a background of the relentless destruction of Gaza, the everrising death toll and the hunger that stalks the benighted territory, this terrible error will only fuel claims that Israel is bent on trigger-happy revenge, whatever the consequences.
The fact at least two of the three British killed are former marines, and the other fatalities come from the U.S. and Australia - both stalwart allies of Israel - only makes things worse.
As I say, we have to keep things in perspective. None of this would have happened had not the monstrous terrorists of Hamas embarked on their grotesque attack on Israel.
But Israel has to take heed of the fact that its Western allies are increasingly warning Netanyahu's government to reduce the civilian harm caused by its war to crush terrorists there.
Yet humanitarian concerns are not alone in unsettling Israel's Western allies. They are deeply worried about being dragged into a bigger war. There is a palpable fear that the Gaza conflict threatens peace and stability far beyond Israel.
Also on Monday, Israeli F-35 stealth bombers struck a conclave of the Jewish state's deadly enemies in the Iranian consulate in the Syrian capital, Damascus.
Senior Iranian commanders of the Islamic Republic's Revolutionary Guards, who co-ordinate anti-Israeli activities with Palestinian jihadists and Lebanese Shi'ite Hezbollah militants, were www.killed.No need to mourn them, but we cannot ignore the truth that killing bad guys can have bad consequences.
The Israelis wanted to disrupt the likelihood of Iran co-ordinating actions against them along their northern borders with Lebanon and Syria. Rockets launched from those two countries could cause serious damage to Israel because Iran sends its proxies serious hardware.
But does Israel risk inflaming the whole Middle East by daring the Iranian ayatollahs to retaliate?
Already, the conflict has spread. Egypt and the vital Suez Canal have faced disruption as the Yemeni Houthis attack Western shipping in support of Hamas.
Neutral Jordan could be dragged in, too. The Israeli F-35s flew over Jordan to attack Syria's capital by surprise. They achieved that, but their violation of Jordanian neutrality puts its pro-Western government under pressure because so many of its people are Palestinians who are sympathetic to their kin in Gaza.
One reason for the roundabout flight path of the Israeli bombers was to avoid Russian-manned anti-aircraft defences based to the west and north of Damascus. The presence of thousands of Russian military personnel in Syria in areas where Iranian and Hezbollah forces also operate means a clash between Putin's troops and Israel cannot be ruled out.
MERICAN troops are also present in eastern Syria and Iraq. They have already faced sporadic drone strikes by local pro-Iranian militias.
A
The risk of an Israeli-Iranian war dragging in the superpowers, already at odds over Ukraine, cannot be ignored. Iran might aspire to go nuclear as Israel fears, but does not yet have the Bomb.
Israel, Russia and the U.S. are nuclear powers - and many fear Netanyahu is playing with fire and gambling recklessly to save his political skin.
Before the war broke out, he was facing calls to resign over corruption charges. The Hamas attacks in October punctured his reputation as Israel's 'Mr Security', although, ironically, the war has saved his political career for now.
If Netanyahu's instinct for political survival leads him to widen the Gaza war, he will find he has few friends left among Israel's traditional allies.
For it would not only be bad for his own country - but could plunge the rest of us into conflagration as well.
? MARK ALMOND is director of the Crisis Research Institute, Oxford

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



ARMAGH IN THE SHOP WINDOW; Driven Orange county captain McCambridge out to make history in decider
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 568 words
Byline: PHILIP LANIGAN
Body


AS a qualified actuary who works with VHI, the day job of Armagh ladies senior football captain Clodagh McCambridge revolves around the measurement and management of risk and uncertainty.
If the historical figures say one thing about Sunday's Lidl National Football League Division 1 final with Kerry chasing a 13th title success and Armagh appearing in their first final, well, the most recent set of results tighten the odds considerably.
When they met in the group stage early last month, Armagh won a high-scoring thriller by 3-14 to 1-13. They have cut a swathe through Division 1, apart from a dead rubber blow-out against Dublin in the last round when a place in the final had already been secured.
Then there's the fact that Ulster football is riding the crest of a wave just now, in both men's and ladies codes, with Derry beating All-Ireland champions Dublin at Croke Park last Sunday in the corresponding Division 1 men's final.
Just like Derry, this Armagh team are hoping to come straight up from Division 2 to win the top league prize.
'Hopefully we can keep it going. We would take a lot of confidence from the success of the Ulster teams. Any opportunity to win silverware is massive. A Division 1 title is really special, something that no Armagh team has done before. We have never been to a final before, so to get over the line would really end the season on a high,' says McCambridge.
And she says that sense of history is something that the squad have embraced, rather than avoided. 'We have talked about it. Even just getting to the final. Good teams have gone before us and didn't get to our position. It's not something to shy away from. It's something to be really proud of. I think that will be another motivating factor going into the match as we try to make history. It would give us a lot of confidence going into the championship. We are capable of pushing on.'
Before this year, 2017 was the last time Armagh played in Division 1.
But the manner in which both Meath and Kerry were able to make the leap from Division 2 finalists to being All-Ireland contenders is another source of encouragement for the Armagh full-back.
'We believe we are able to compete with the top teams. There's probably not that much of a difference between Division 1 and 2. We saw Kerry last year who'd won Division 2 the year before and went straight to a Division 1 final, it's probably just using that momentum,' adds McCambridge. 'You get in the habit of winning games and then bring that into Division 1.
'It's that element of confidence, it's having no fear.'
Her sporting pedigree is a varied one. Her mother was a decorated netball international and Clodagh played underage for Northern Ireland, having grown up in Lurgan. She's also attached to a rich Antrim hurling heritage via her father - Conor McCambridge is an uncle - and her club Clann Eireann have been a dominant force in Armagh ladies football.
This fixture is a repeat of the 2022 Lidl NFL Division 2 final between the counties, won by Kerry, while Armagh returned to Croke Park last year and won the second-tier title final against Laois to gain promotion to the top flight.
'We have had great battles with Kerry over the years, just haven't got over the line,' she adds, explaining the importance of the recent group-stage win.
'I think that's something that will give girls a lot of confidence, having that experience of getting over the line.'

Graphic


Proud: Clodagh McCambridge

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



BOOTROOM; ¦ ¦ YOUR GUIDE TO TONIGHT'S ACTION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 51
Length: 240 words
Body


ARSENAL v LUTON 7.30pm, Emirates. TNT Sports 2 & talkSPORT (4-3-3) Raya Saliba Gabriel White Zinchenko Partey Rice Odegaard Trossard Jesus Havertz Morris Woodrow Townsend Clark Barkley Mpanzu Johnson Kabore Hashioka Mengi Kaminski (4-3-2-1)
ARSENAL Out: Timber (knee). Doubt: Saka (fatigue) and Martinelli (foot). LUTON Out: C Ogbene, A Bell, E Adebayo, Potts (all hamstring), J Brown, Nakamba (both knee). Doubt: G Osho knee), T Chong, A Doughty (knocks). Mail Sport prediction: Arsenal win.
BRENTFORD v BRIGHTON 7.30pm, Gtech Community Stadium. TNT Sports 3 (3-5-2) Flekken Zanka Ajer Collins Roerslev Lewis-Potter Onyeka Janelt Jensen Toney Wissa Ferguson Fati Adingra Lallana Gilmour Gross Lamptey Veltman Dunk Van Hecke Verbruggen (4-2-3-1)
BRENTFORD Out: R Henry, J Dasilva (both knee), B Mee (ankle), E Pinnock (ankle). Doubt: C Norgaard (back), BRIGHTON Out: S March (knee), K Mitoma (back), J Hinshelwood (ankle), B Gilmour (knee), J Milner (thigh).
Mail Sport prediction: Draw.
MAN CITY v ASTON VILLA 8.15pm, Etihad Stadium. TNT Sports 1 (4-1-4-1) Ortega Dias Akanji Lewis Gvardiol Rodri De Bruyne Silva Foden Grealish Haaland Duran Diaby Rogers Bailey Luiz Tielemans Moreno Konsa Torres Lenglet Martinez (4-2-3-1)
MAN CITY Out: K Walker (hamstring), Ederson (thigh), N Ake (calf).
ASTON VILLA Out: O Watkins (thigh), J McGinn (ban), E Buendia, B Kamara (both knee), M Cash (hamstring), J Ramsey (foot).
Mail Sport prediction: Man City win.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Boyfriend charged with Sarah murder; Witnesses claim Longford woman's partner just walked into pub and stabbed her then turned knife on himself
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 19
Length: 627 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


US POLICE investigating the stabbing of Longford woman Sarah McNally in a New York bar, have charged a man with murder.
Ms McNally, 41, had been living in the Queens area of the city for nearly a decade.
She was allegedly set upon by her boyfriend who was brandishing two knives at the Céilí House bar in the New York borough on Saturday at around 6.30pm.
It's believed Ms McNally was stabbed in the neck and died from her injuries. Her attacker then turned the blade on himself.
Marcin Pieciak, 36, with an address in Queens has been charged with murder and criminal possession of a weapon.
Pieciak was arrested and charged in the confines of the 104 Precinct on Monday at 12.38pm, a spokesperson for the NYPD's Deputy Commissioner of Public Information said.
The NYPD has said it had no further update on when Pieciak was due in court.
Ms McNally's heartbroken mother has travelled to the US where she will formally identify Sarah's body. It is understood that it is planned that her remains will be repatriated to Longford for her funeral and burial.
One eyewitness at the New York pub described the incident to local news: 'She was just standing there talking. Her boyfriend came in... and he just walked right in and stabbed her.
'Then he started trying to stab himself. Horrible. Just horrible.'
Mike Lambe, 62, a landlord who has lived two blocks away from the bar for two decades, told the New York Post on Sunday that McNally was a 'sweet, innocent girl from Longford'.
She had been working at the bar less than a year, he said. 'She was an innocent,' he added.
The resident said the street has its issues, including drug users and their dealers.
'It's been getting worse and worse,' he said.
Pub regular Mike Green, 51, said he was stunned by the attack and knew the couple well.
He told The New York Daily News: 'I can't even picture it. I know them, and I still can't believe it. Sarah is good people. She helps people. Everybody owes her money.'
Mike said Sarah, who was known as 'M', often hung out at the bar with her partner. He added: 'They was always together. M is cool. Both of them. That's why it blew my mind a little bit.'
Ms McNally's aunt, Mary McNally wrote a touching post on Facebook acknowledging her death.
'Rest in peace my beautiful niece Sarah, we are heart broken, love you always.'
Another aunt, Margaret Gaffey, wrote: 'My beautiful niece taken too soon.'
Longford Municipal District Cathaoirleach, Councillor Martin Monahan said: 'The people of Longford will be saddened and shocked by the sudden demise of a young life, someone who has made a life for herself in New York.
'For such a young life to be so tragically ended in such violent circumstances... our thoughts and prayers go out to the people in the Queens area of New York who knew her and her mother and father in Longford, as well as her extended family.
'Her mother and her father would be Longford-based in a small tight-knit community here. The O'Connors and McNallys would be really decent Longford people.
'It comes as a huge shock to the family to get this news over a Bank Holiday weekend.'
Fianna Fáil TD for Longford- Westmeath Joe Flaherty described Ms McNally as a 'wonderful young woman, bright, vivacious, witty and charismatic' who went to the US 'full of hope'.
'By all accounts, it was a very happy life and everything was going well for her in New York, which makes this news all the more harrowing and upsetting for people who know her.
'I can not imagine a worse call for a parent to get. It's truly traumatic and I understand her heartbroken mother is flying out to be with Sarah this morning.
'And that's a journey that no parent wants to have to undertake,' he told RTÉ.
garreth.macnamee@dailymail.ie
'I can not imagine a worse call' 'Sweet, innocent girl from Longford'

Graphic


Tragedy: Sarah McNally was killed while working in The Céilí House bar in New York

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



BRIDGE MASTERCLASS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 215 words
Byline: PETER DONOVAN
Body


South ?AQ83 ? 74 ?J92 ? A 10 9 8
Pairs Dealer North N-S Vulnerable NES W 1. 2. 3. 4. 4NT5? ?
WHAT action would you take now?
I can only recall this situation arising twice in my bridge lifetime and, on both occasions, I couldn't be sure what counter-measures my partner and I were using. So it's not a matter we need to lose any sleep about, but there are 'gadgets' for dealing with the problem of non-vulnerable opponents who are bidding like this.
4NT is, of course, Blackwood asking about your ace-holding. You would normally have bid 5?, but now that the opponent has taken that position, you need to have another means of response. The original method is to use that opponent's bid as the base to show your aces on the same step principle as over 4NT; pass would show none, the next suit up would show one, and in this case you bid 6? to show the two. Nowadays, the popular method is to use either DOPI (Double=0, Pass=1), and bid the next suit up with two ? here, 5? ? or DOPE (Double with an odd number and Pass with even), so here you'd pass and let partner work out whether you have 0 or 2!
The one advantage of the old method is that you were left with the double to take penalties. If you are playing in tournaments, this is yet another thing you need to agree with partner.
PETER DONOVAN

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Bring teachers back home; Union says efforts to lure educators from abroad are 'feeble and pitiable'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 18
Length: 390 words
Byline: Aisling Moloney
Body


THE Education Minister needs to attract teachers back to Ireland from the United Arab Emirates, but the incentives offered have been 'feeble and pitiable' a teacher's conference heard yesterday.
The Association of Secondary Teachers in Ireland annual conference heard about the 'chronic teacher shortage' faced by post-primary schools.
There are 788 posts for secondary school teachers advertised online of which just 27 are permanent posts.
ASTI president Geraldine O'Brien said the union is 'very disappointed' that the Department of Education did not seek any extra funding in the Budget to attract Irish teachers home from countries like the UAE. She said: 'In the midst of a chronic teacher shortage, the question must be asked - why are our teacher graduates going abroad? Is it because they do not feel valued?'
ASTI general secretary Kieran
Christie said Minister Norma Foley has had a 'minimalist approach' to tackling the teacher shortage: 'This minister hasn't really taken grasp of the nettle by any means. The efforts to entice people back from abroad who work in Canada and Australia, has been feeble and pitiable, quite frankly.'
When teachers return to work in Ireland after teaching in non-EU countries like the UAE, they come back on the bottom of the teachers' pay scale.
Ms O'Brien has called for returning teachers to be awarded full incremental credit for their service abroad. She said: 'They literally cannot afford to live here when they are put back to the point on the salary scale they were appointed to years ago.'
The ASTI president also called for teachers to have access to full-time permanent positions rather than coming back to parttime or short-term contracts, and for the 25-year pay scale to be shortened.
However, Minister Foley said she does not want to make it 'overly attractive' to Irish teachers to work abroad. 'There's a fine line we walk here in terms of the push and pull factors,' she said. 'We have to be cognisant of making it overly attractive, for those going abroad and ensuring that there is a fairness to the 75,000 who are actually currently working here at home as well.'
The minister said that the shortage of staff 'is not unique to the education sector' and said it is an issue for the whole country which is near full employment.
aisling.moloney@dailymail.ie
Country is near full employment

Graphic


'Fine line': Norma Foley

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



C A R Trading Company Ltd is [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 247 words
Body


C A R Trading Company Ltd is an Irish-based bean sprout grower, vegetable wholesaler, and distributor. Our bean sprouts supply Tesco, Asian Market Dublin, the Vegetable market in Smithfield Dublin, and various restaurants in Ireland. Currently, we are seeking a full-time Merchant Assistant (Chinese) to join our team and source products in China.
Duties: • Communicating effectively with Chinese suppliers to negotiate terms, resolve issues, and maintain positive relationships between China and Ireland.
• Processing orders efficiently and accurately, ensuring timely delivery between China and Ireland.
• Coordinating with internal teams to ensure seamless logistics and inventory management between China and Ireland.
• Managing import/export documentation, including customs clearance and compliance with regulations between China and Ireland.
• Providing quality control to support the purchasing team between China and Ireland • Proficient in Chinese and English Jin fruit and vegetable merchandising, adept at communication, management, and coordinating business activities between China and Ireland Desirable: • Permanent full time Contract and working hours 39 hours per week; • Annual remuneration is (EURO)34,000.00 • Working location at Unit13, Cherry Orchard Industrial Estate, Ballyfermot, DubiiniO, D10VE89 Contact: C A R Trading Company Ltd Address: Unit13, Cherry Orchard Industrial Estate, Ballyfermot, DubiiniO, D10VE89 Tel: +353-1-6267791 Email: derekluk@caf-ireland.com

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Calls to tackle 'mayhem' on roads as 2,600 caught speeding
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 18
Length: 292 words
Byline: Ian Begley
Body


THE GOVERNMENT has been urged to tackle the 'mayhem' on our roads as over 170 people were arrested for drug or drink driving over the Easter bank holiday weekend and more than 2,600 motorists were detected speeding.
Three people died in road incidents over the weekend, while 13 serious collisions resulting in people receiving serious or life-threatening injuries were recorded between Thursday morning and 7am yesterday.
Fifty-eight people have died on Irish roads so far this year, 16 more than in the same period in 2023.
Chief Superintendent Jane Humphries, of the Garda National Roads Policing Bureau, said gardaí are seeing 'extremely dangerous driving behaviour that must be stopped'. She said: 'Gardaí nationwide continue do all they can to ensure road users are safe and that those who break road traffic laws are detected, but the issues on our roads at present require the attention of every single person.
'Every driver is responsible for their own driving behaviour - there is no excuse whatsoever to get behind the wheel of a car under the influence of alcohol and/or drugs.'
She also advised drivers to 'keep your eyes always on the road'.
Incoming Taoiseach Simon Harris warned this week that the progress on safety made in recent years is in danger of being reversed. He intends to meet gardaí and the Road Safety Authority in the coming weeks in a bid to reduce the carnage.
Vakaris Gudaitis, 17, was among those who died on our roads at the weekend. He lost his life on Saturday after he was hit by a car on the N17 in Co. Mayo. Also, on Friday, pregnant mother-of-one Claire Kavanagh, 37, died after a crash on the N24 in Co. Tipperary, while Gar Fennelly, in his 60s, lost his life after he was knocked off his bike in Co. Kildare on Sunday.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



CHILDREN DON'T HAVE TO RUIN YOUR SEX LIFE; Here's how it can survive and even be better than ever
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 32,33
Length: 1969 words
Byline: Karen Gurney
Body


HOW ironic that the very act that leads to having children in the first place is often ruined by their presence later on. You're too exhausted to bother, for a start.
Then there's the years of chores and childcare, when sex can feel like just another item on the to-do list. And finally, just as you get time back to yourselves, you have a teen up at all hours, dulling your passion as it's, well, just too embarrassing for everyone.
But your sex life can survive kids, and may even, dare I say, end up being better for it.
I'm a clinical psychologist and psychosexologist known online as The Sex Doctor, with 20 years' experience helping couples navigate the storms and lulls of long-term relationships.
My new book, How Not to Let Having Kids Ruin Your Sex Life, arose from my online workshops for parents, which teach that they shouldn't expect the same sex life they had before children, when lie-ins were ten-a-penny - but yes, they can be as satisfied as ever.
The good news is: it doesn't take much to turn it around.
A handful of changes, like those suggested here, can have an enormous impact on a couple's intimate experiences.
But before we set to work re-floating your boat, I want you to take the sex-life quiz, below. This will help identify some of the reasons that you might be running aground.
Get your partner to do it too.
Don't worry about how often others do it FREQUENCY is usually a red herring. The desire for lots of sex is often not about missing the regularity of sex itself, but its benefits - wanting to feel wanted, special, connected, a close couple, alive. (When we satisfy these psychological needs - and I'll show you how - we often end up having more sex anyway.)
I often say: having sex once a year that blows your socks off and makes you feel great about yourself and your relationship is better than weekly sex without pleasure and a true connection.
Kiss passionately while unloading the shopping I COINED the term 'sexual currency' as a way to refer to the amount of erotic charge between us outside of actual sex.
It could be a brief but suggestive touch as you pass your partner in the kitchen, a hot kiss before heading off to work, or just spending time naked in bed together without sex.
The litmus test is: would you do it with your aunt? If not, and it doesn't involve a sexual act of some kind, it's sexual currency.
In the early stages of a relationship, we have high levels, but it wanes the longer we live together. Some couples sustain it better than others, no matter how often they have sex. They're the ones who find the transition from putting the weekly shop away to kissing passionately against the fridge an easy one to make.
For others, the absence of sexual currency makes it hard to see their relationship as sexual at all.
Compliments, touches and suggestive looks are so often absent that, even when tried, feel awkward, or like a clumsy initiation of sex. This is the start of a drift towards living not as sexual partners but as housemates.
If that's you, try an experiment.
Perhaps decide to turn the peck on the lips when one of you leaves the house into a lingering, longer kiss. Do it for a month and see what difference it makes.
You might also agree to be flirtier, compliment each other's looks, send sex texts, share sexual thoughts, touch each other in a more sexual way while watching TV - anything you can think of. Aim to be more sexual by doing as much of this as you can.
Is talking about sex hard? Congratulations! YOU'VE already identified an area that, if you work on it together, will have huge implications for sexual satisfaction.
Talking about sex includes being able to talk about what you like, don't like, your fantasies and desires, and your evolving wants, needs and preferences. Sounds simple - yet so many of us find this painfully embarrassing. I see it all the time in sex therapy, even in the most confident and outspoken of people.
Getting (back) into practice talking about sex can be especially hard if we find speaking and listening to each other difficult, even outside of sex. It can also be hard if we have grown defensive about our sexual relationship.
First consider how you communicate about any topic, not just sex. Do you feel listened to?
Taken seriously? Are difficult topics easy or hard to bring up? Does one of you use humour in a way the other finds dismissive?
Spend five to ten minutes sitting down without distractions and really listen to each other talk about the day, its highs and lows, and how you both feel.
Re-discovering emotional closeness is often an important foundation for feeling like sex with a partner and these deeper, minutes-long conversations are worth weeks of ordinary chat about what's for dinner and how the kids are doing.
What if one of us doesn't feel like it? OUR DESIRE for our partners will ebb and flow over time, and at different rates from each other. It's perfectly fine not to feel like it - but let them down gently!
Research tells us that 'rejecting' a partner in a reassuring way when they ask for sex ('I'd really like to and am really attracted to you but I just have all this work to do') leads to higher levels of couple satisfaction long term. This is in stark contrast to when it is done in a critical way ('Why are you so sex mad all the time? I wish you'd stop nagging me about it, I've got enough on my plate').
Don't let resentment build SO MANY women tell me that when they first began living with a man, household chores were split evenly, but when a child came along, it all changed.
Yes, men have stepped up in comparison with their fathers, but there is still a gross inequality in the amount of domestic labour women do compared to men. When resentment over household chores seeps into a sexual relationship, it can seriously compromise desire.
Sharing the load equally is a very practical and effective change you can make to improve your sex lives as parents.
Make sex a buffet not a three-course meal
THINKING of sex as a buffet means you can have whatever you want in any order. It doesn't need to include the same things every time or end with the same dish.
Imagine how much more novel and exciting that would be? It could be an intense all-night kissing session. It could be lots of touching without penetration. It could be unusually slow/passionate/frenzied/sensual. Mix it up.
Help, we can't have sex with teens in the house AT LEAST when the kids were little you knew you'd get a few hours to yourselves in the evening. Sadly, teenagers are likely to go to bed at the same time or later than you, and for some, having a teen awake in the house is a paralysing prospect.
If that's you, having sex in the morning might be easier. But don't let a teen's presence mute the sexual currency in your relationship. Showing your teens in subtle ways that you still have a sexual connection teaches them valuable lessons - including that everyone has a right to privacy, which should be a family rule.
Second, sex is not something shameful, furtive or to be kept a secret. Yes, they think you're past it, but you're showing them even oldies can have a satisfying physical relationship. Parents who pass on this message are giving their child a gift that will benefit them in years to come.
Make sure sex is good for both of you WHEN your to-do list is as long as your arm, the benefits of sex have to be felt strongly for us to even think about taking time away from another activity that also seems a priority.
We've all grown up in a patriarchal society that sees the sexual act as culminating in penetrative sex and male orgasm, but that's unlikely to do it for most women.
Beware: those who allow their sex lives to benefit one person's pleasure over another's should expect desire to decrease over time. Making sex mutually satisfying is a goal in reach of all couples.
But equally…
Don't dismiss the quickie SOMETIMES as time-poor parents, it's the only option we've got. This is the one time sex can be one-sided, with one of you concentrating on the other's body so they can get the touch they need (just ensure the other gets their turn next time).
You might need to spend time ahead of a quickie getting yourself in the mood and feeling turned on - for example, by fantasising on the way home from work or listening to audio erotica in the bath.
? ADAPTED from How Not to Let Having Kids Ruin Your Sex Life by Dr Karen Gurney (Headline, (EURO)19.90). © Dr Karen Gurney 2024.
FIRST, TAKE OUR QUIZ
DO YOU still kiss passionately other than when you're having sex?
A Every chance we get! B Often C Hardly ever D It's extinct! DOES one of you regularly have more pleasure than the other when having sex?
A No, it's equal B Sometimes, but it's fine C More often than not D Yes, it's totally one-sided
HOW easy is it to talk about sex together? For example, to ask for what you'd like?
A Really easy B Mostly easy C Mostly awkward D Really hard
DOES one of you feel the responsibility for most of the household tasks/childcare?
A It's shared equally B One of us does more than our fair share of visible and invisible* household labour, but it's negotiated fairly in relation to our working hours C One of us does more than our fair share of the visible and invisible household labour and it doesn't feel negotiated fairly/feels unequal D I do it all * 'Invisible' household work includes remembering birthdays, replying to school Whatsapp chats etc.
DOES sex often follow a predictable pattern (e.g. who does what, in what order) A Sex is different every time B Mostly does C Mostly doesn't D I can predict what we'll end up doing before we've done it, every time
DO YOU plan any time in your week/ month to nurture your sex life or be physically intimate?
A Yes, we try and make time for it B Yes, but not as much as we would like C We do, but somehow don't seem to make it happen D No, we just hope it will happen
HOW connected do you feel as sexual partners outside of sex (e.g. flirting, sexts, suggestion, compliments about your appearance) A Very connected, it defines us
B We usually feel connected, but there are brief lulls where we don't C We have periods of connection, then long stretches of no connection D Not at all, we feel like flatmates
DO YOU make time to have fun together away from the kids?
A As much as we can, circumstances permitting B We don't prioritise us, really C We have good intentions, but it just doesn't happen D What is 'time' away from the kids??!
If you scored mostly As, hooray - your relationship currently includes many of the aspects we know predict a great sex life and will help you maintain sexual satisfaction over the long term.
You prioritise your sex life and nurture it through conversation, making sure sex is working for both of you. Keep doing what you're doing!
If you scored mostly Bs and Cs, perhaps you've been together a little while now, sex has become hard to talk about and things have slid a little from where you want them to be. Perhaps it would have been mostly As before kids came along?
If you don't change anything, the trajectory you're on might well end at a place neither of you would choose.
Use the answers to the questions to work out which of my tips can help make your sex life as fulfilling and pleasurable as it used to be.
If you scored mostly Ds, your sex life may be almost sunk! But do not fear - there's much you can do to get things back on track.
You may have fallen into a pattern of prioritising one person's pleasure and not relating to each other sexually unless actually having sex.
Perhaps one or both of you is experiencing a drop in desire and finding it hard to initiate sex. This is normal, and a real risk for parents, but it can be fixed.
It is absolutely possible to maintain high levels of sexual satisfaction and desire while having sex with the same person time and time again. See right for my top tips.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Chocs away: Sweet news as shoppers spend (EURO)25m on eggs
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 549 words
Byline: Helen Bruce
Body


WE all need a little treat, and Irish shoppers made sure they weren't in short supply as we spent almost (EURO)25million on Easter eggs this year.
The mammoth (EURO)24.6million figure is up (EURO)9.3million on last year.
Sales of hot cross buns were also up, by 28% to (EURO)1.1million.
Retailers bumped up promotional activity during the Easter period with over 51% of value sales of Easter eggs sold on promotion.
The latest figures from market research firm Kantar also showed grocery sales rose 4.5% in the four weeks to mid-March, with (EURO)1.1billion running through the tills.
Shoppers spent an additional (EURO)47.8million on take-home grocery versus the same time last year.
However, although value sales are up, Kantar said grocery price inflation was the main factor behind this, rather than more spending.
Grocery inflation rose 3.7% in the 12 weeks to March 17, 2024, but inflation levels are falling, with the rate of increase down significantly from the 16% figure in March 2023.
Emer Healy, business development director at Kantar, commented: 'While it's the lowest inflation level we have seen for two years, shoppers are still on the hunt for value with over 25% of value sales coming from promotions.
'During the month of March, nearly half of all households purchased Easter eggs, which is up 13.1 percentage points versus last year.'
Alongside promotions, retailers are placing an emphasis on ownlabel lines to get shoppers through the doors. Own-label sales grew by 5.5% year-on-year, with shoppers spending an additional (EURO)80.5million compared to last year.
Premium own-label ranges also continued to perform well, with shoppers spending an additional (EURO)172million on these lines. By contrast, brands saw a rate of growth of 3.8%, behind the total market.
Online sales were up 16.7% yearon-year at (EURO)26.5million compared with a year ago.
Kantar reported Dunnes holds 24% of the market share, with growth of 7.7% year-on-year.
This growth stems from more frequent shopper trips, up 5.4%, which contributed an additional (EURO)38.2million to its overall performance. Tesco holds 22.8% of the market, with growth of 7.5% year-onyear. SuperValu holds 20.4% of the market with growth of 3.1%, and its shoppers make the most trips instore when compared to all retailers - 21.3 on average over the month.
Lidl holds a 13.5% share with growth of 5.4% year-on-year, while Aldi holds 11.5% market share.
New figures from the Central Statistics Office show that prices in Ireland are estimated to have risen by 1.7% in the year to March 2024.
While this means inflation is much lower today than it was this time last year, for many people, this drop is yet to hit home.
Kerrie Collins, director of financial services PR agency Business Talk, said: 'Irish households will be feeling the impact of the record-high inflation of recent years for some time yet. So it's still important Irish people do what they can to improve household finances.
'Shopping around so that you're not paying more than you need to for something has never been more important. While the cost of many goods and services is still high, retailers and providers are competing for business and consumers need to leverage this competition and make it work for them.'
helen.bruce@dailymail.ie
'Shopping around is important'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



COD NUGGETS AND WEDGES Serves 4; FAMILY FRIENDLY
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 38
Length: 202 words
Body


For the wedges 1 tbsp oil 4 large rooster potatoes, peeled and cut into wedges Salt and black pepper 1 tsp smoked paprika For the nuggets 50g oats 120g breadcrumbs 100g plain flour 2 eggs, beaten 300g skinless cod fillet, cut into chunks Spray oil To serve Frozen peas, cooked 1Preheat the oven to 200°C/180°C fan/ gas mark 6.
2 Add the oil to the roasting tray and allow to heat in the oven for five minutes.
3 Remove from the oven and add the potato wedges, season with salt and pepper, and sprinkle with paprika. Bake for 20-25 minutes until golden brown.
4 To make the nuggets, pulse the rolled oats in a food processor until fine. Combine with the breadcrumbs and set to one side. 5 Add the breadcrumbs to one bowl, flour to another and the eggs to a third. Season the flour with salt and pepper.
6 Dip the cod chunks in the flour and shake off any excess. Dip in the egg next, and then in the breadcrumb and oat mix. 7 Place the coated cod chunks on a lined baking tray and spray with oil.
Bake for 15 minutes turning halfway, until the outside is golden and firm to the touch.
8 Serve with peas. Per serving 635kcals, 9.8g fat (1.9g saturated), 100.5g carbs, 6.9g sugars, 39.2g protein, 10.3g fibre, 0.353g sodium

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



COVENEY COULDN'T BRING HIMSELF TO BACK HARRIS WHEN LEADERSHIP RACE BEGAN... AND IT WAS THEN THAT HIS FATE WAS SEALED
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 7
Length: 793 words
Byline: Craig Hughes
Body


LOYALTY is important in the paranoiaengulfing world of politics. It needs to be rewarded, and is often tested.
Departing Minister for Enterprise Simon Coveney, two weeks ago, failed to remember the loyalty once shown to him by Taoiseach-inwaiting Simon Harris.
What seems a political lifetime ago, when Leo Varadkar made the shock announcement that he was quitting as Taoiseach, the starting gun was fired on the contest to find a successor - but the race was over a day later.
As streams of TDs and senators rushed to endorse the Minister for Higher Education, it was clear that he would be the next leader of Fine Gael and the next taoiseach.
Those considering a punt at the leadership - namely Mr Coveney, Minister for Public Expenditure Paschal Donohoe and junior minister Jennifer Carroll MacNeill - knew it was too late to make a move. For Mr Coveney is was clear he did not have a chance of winning when two senators perceived as being closest to him, Garret Ahearn (his former driver) and Cork-based Tim Lombard, both declared for Mr Harris.
Now let's return to 2017, when Mr Harris backed Mr Coveney in his ill-fated race for the leadership of Fine Gael.
He is the only current Cabinet minister to have done so.
Yet, when Mr Coveney announced he would not be seeking to contest the leadership again, he crucially did not endorse Mr Harris.
'He couldn't even bring himself to back Harris. If he can't bring himself to support him now, how can he be trusted to be there when the chips are down?' said one source close to Mr Harris.
The new leader will want to place his own stamp on Cabinet, given he only has at most one year before a general election has to be called.
The departure of Mr Varadkar meant he had at least one place to play with, but two would be ideal.
The Cabinet is already fractured by the nature of a tripartite coalition and Mr Harris needs to know that his Fine Gael ministers are loyal to him.
While there would have been a large question mark over whether Mr Coveney was retained or not, his decision not to declare his support for Mr Harris ultimately sealed his political fate. However, it seems that this may not have been immediately clear to the veteran Mr Coveney.
After all, he has been at the Cabinet table for 13 years and has been a giant of the party, holding ministries including Foreign Affairs, Agriculture, Housing and Enterprise. He has also been deputy leader of the party. So how could a new Fine Gael leader not want him in their Cabinet?
Speaking at Mr Harris's coronation in Athlone last week, Mr Coveney was asked whether he would step aside to allow the new leader to inject new blood into the Cabinet.
He said: 'I'll talk to Simon about that when we meet later on this week, just to understand his thinking.
'You know, we had a good conversation yesterday.
'I think Simon's focus really is to try to use the talent that's in the party to the maximum extent possible. There's a lot of talent in Fine Gael. But really, this is his call and, you know, I respect that, as I think other people will, too.'
His words indicated he still felt he was in the fold. After all, 'stability' is important in politics. In the intervening time, it seems it was made known to him that he could walk the plank of his own accord or be thrown overboard.
The confirmation that Mr Coveney's special adviser and former Newstalk presenter Chris Donoghue was departing after seven years to be Government press secretary for Mr Harris showed that the writing was on the wall.
Yesterday's announcement was therefore unsurprising to those of us observing politics. The King is dead and a new King is about to take the throne. New loyalties will be formed, old ones buried in the political graveyard.
SPEAKING on RTÉ's Today With Claire Byrne, Mr Coveney said that 'renewal' was important in all walks of life, be it politics or sport. He may well have once been regarded in Fine Gael, while at the peak of his powers, as a thoroughbred capable of scaling great heights and bringing the rest of the chasing pack along with him.
There was an 'adrenaline rush', as he put it, when Mr Varadkar told him he was departing as Taoiseach.
Now though, while Mr Coveney has been around the track countless times, he is no longer a contender to lead but rather someone who blends into the pack as he jockeys to maintain his position.
There remains one final question of loyalty for Mr Coveney: will he stay on for Fine Gael in a time of crisis when so many of its TDs are walking away?
He said yesterday it was a question for another day, but those in Fine Gael who put in the hard yards to ensure Mr Coveney and his colleagues were re-elected year after year, helping him to enjoy the trappings of high office, will also be wondering if their loyalty was soon forgotten.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Design masters? Calling in this lot would be a costly catastrophe
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 467 words
Byline: CHRISTOPHER STEVENS
Body


WHO puts it right, that's what I'd like to know - and who foots the bill? When reality contest makeovers go wrong, tears and hugs aren't enough to mend the damage.
Bickering amateurs Francesca and Domnall left a tea-room all but unusable, on Interior Design Masters (BBC1). Sent to Swansea and charged with dolling up a chic cafe on the Mumbles seafront, they took the chairs and screwed them to the wall - upside-down.
Then they installed tiny wooden seats taken from a primary school that looked like they'd been rescued from a skip. Since these were made for six-yearolds, Domnall screwed cheap metal extenders, like flimsy prosthetic feet, into the legs.
Francesca built banquette seating all the way round the room, basing its height on guesswork instead of taking measurements. The result was like Alice In Wonderland - half the customers squatting at floor level, the rest perched on a shelf with their feet dangling off the ground.
All that will doubtless have to be ripped out before the cafe can function properly. Does the Beeb send in a team of sympathetic demolition men, or is it up to the owners to make repairs at their own expense?
We were told the three design duos had a budget of just £3,000 to transform their cafes. Untransforming them is likely to cost considerably more.
Head judge Michelle Ogundehin seemed to set up the teams for catastrophe when she urged them to take liberties with the owners' instructions: 'You are the designers, give them what they don't know they want.'
That isn't 'creative'. It's reckless.
It must be a deliberate ploy to provoke idiotic mistakes for the sake of entertainment, because in the real world no interior design business can survive by dumping disasters on their clients.
What the cameras really want is eccentricity, not competence. Screentime was mostly hogged by the excitable Francesca and by Ben, who is even more wildly flamboyant, with his gigantic floppy beret above a perfectly tonsured beard.
He also favours a wrap-around tartan skirt, barely held together with a safety pin. His inspiration, he declared, was 'Mrs Doubtfire goes to Wales,' though he looked more like 'Pablo Picasso tries cross-dressing'.
Presenter Alan Carr attempted a joke about the headgear. When bossy Ben called himself 'a dictator in a beret', Alan dubbed him 'Franco Spencer'. It was a game try at a lame gag, let down by the fact no one remembered Some Mothers Do Have 'Em.
By far the best part of Interior Design Masters is the judging at the end. Alan sits on his hands, frightened to speak, like a schoolboy whose mates are getting a drubbing from the head teacher.
Domnall made things worse for himself by trying to blame Francesca. That never works, for children or adults, and he ended up with an expulsion. Clearly, he wasn't paying attention in primary school.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Dom ends his drought as careless Toon pay the penalty
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 52,53
Length: 830 words
Byline: CRAIG HOPE
Body


NEWCASTLE Isak 15 1
EVERTON Calvert-Lewin 88 (pen)
1
THEY still haven't won since Christmas but snatching a draw from a game they should have lost - and a first goal since October for Dominic Calvert-Lewin - well feel like a victory on some level for Everton and Sean Dyche.
The Toffees boss was even smiling when Calvert-Lewin slipped and cleaned him out on the touchline moments after the substitute's 88th-minute equaliser from the penalty spot. Dyche refrained from a playful slap on the head this time, for a pat on the back was what the striker deserved.
Dropped here after a run of 23 matches without a goal, Calvert-Lewin kept his nerve to smash through Martin Dubravka and end a three-game losing sequence that has Everton looking over their shoulder. It is only a point, but it felt like one was also made on a night when they were second best for the majority yet refused to cave in amid home pressure.
Trailing to Alexander Isak's first-half strike and with just one shot on target, Dyche responded with a treble change on the hour and it turned the game. Everton still needed a helping hand - quite literally - from another substitute, Newcastle defender
Paul Dummett. He wrestled with Ashley Young in attempting to stop his fellow veteran from getting on the end of a cross and, while it needed a VAR intervention, the right decision of penalty was eventually reached.
But until the arrival of Calvert-Lewin and Co it looked like Everton, up against a wounded and depleted opponent, would simply help nurse them back to health.
Newcastle could have named an absent XI stronger than the starters. The hour before kick-off brought news of three more injuries, with Tino Livramento and Miguel Almiron set to miss all of April and Kieran Trippier the bulk of it. Newcastle are down to the bare bones and clinging to the marrow.
But St James' was still bouncing from the off. A continuation of the noise from Saturday's come-frombehind win over West Ham? Or an atmosphere stoked by the incendiary presence of Jordan Pickford? It was more so the latter.
The former Sunderland keeper had the first laugh - and eventually the last - when he made a brave and brilliant block from Harvey Barnes inside two minutes. But come the 15th the smile had been wiped from his face.
If Newcastle see Jarrad Branthwaite as a summer target, at least Isak shaved £5million off his asking price in scoring the opener.
Freed by Barnes in the area and still with work to do, Isak sat down Branthwaite as if plonking a kid on the carpet for story time. And this was a schooling, Isak feigning to shoot before stepping beyond his seated opponent and rolling into the bottom corner past Pickford. 'Who put the ball in the Mackem's net?' chorused the Toon Army.
Howe said this week that the club will not listen to offers for the Sweden striker. They might need ear defenders if he continues in this form. This was his fifth goal on the spin at St James' and, while Branthwaite's value was perhaps trimmed, Isak's worth was multiplied. He nearly had another in first-half stoppage time when slamming narrowly over the bar after a jinking run.
There was a break in play in the 20th minute to allow Everton trio Amadou Onana, Abdoulaye Doucoure and Idrissa Gueye to break their fast for Ramadan. They might well have felt like praying at the same time, such was their team's continued struggle for goals away from home. It was three in eight games before this and, in Newcastle, they could not wish to meet a more welcoming defence. The Magpies have brought relief to many an opposition drought this season.
Come half-time, though, Everton had managed one shot on goal, and even that was nothing more than catching practice for Dubravka.
By the hour, Dyche had seen enough and responded with that treble swap. One of those, James Garner, soon cracked the post with a measured curler when half of the away dugout had already emptied in celebration.
Newcastle's lead, then, was precarious. Their best bet was another goal and they would have had it if not for Vitalii Mykolenko clearing on the line from Isak's close-range stab.
Barnes slammed wide moments later and Pickford saved well from Bruno Guimaraes.
They were misses Newcastle would come to regret.
NEWCASTLE (4-3-3): Dubravka 6; Krafth 6.5, Schar 7, Burn 7, Hall 6.5 (Dummett 79min); Longstaff 6.5, Guimaraes 7, ANDERSON 8 (Willock 71, 6); Murphy 6.5, Isak 7.5, Barnes 7.
Scorer: Isak 15. Booked: None. Manager: Eddie Howe 6.5. EVERTON (4-4-1-1): Pickford 7; Godfrey 6 (Coleman 90), Tarkowski 6, Branthwaite 5.5, Mykolenko 6; Young 6, Onana 5.5 (Garner 61, 6.5), Gueye 6 (Chermiti 82), McNeil 6; Doucoure 5 (Gomes 61, 5.5); Beto 4.5 (Calvert-Lewin 61, 7).
Scorer: Calvert-Lewin 88 (pen). Booked: Tarkowski, Chermiti, McNeil. Manager: Sean Dyche 6.
Referee: Tony Harrington 7. Attendance: 52,135.
156 NUMBER of days since Dominic Calvert-Lewin had last scored. The penalty was his first goal in any competition for Everton since October 29 and ended a 23-match drought.

Graphic


Moment of madness: Young is hauled down by Dummett and (inset) Calvert-Lewin scores from the penalty spot GETTY IMAGES

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



DUBUN CITY COUNCIL Sean and [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 243 words
Body


DUBUN CITY COUNCIL Sean and Emily Moran intend to apply for planning permission for the demolition of a single storey converted garage to the side, a single storey kitchen extension, bay window and shed to the rear, the removal of 2 No chimneys, block up a window and form a new window at ground floor and a new window with hosted glass to an en-suite at first floor level all on the side (south east elevation), a new window to a bathroom at first floor level on the rear (south west) elevation, the widening of the front door and the construction of new 2 storey and single storey extensions to the side and rear to extend the kitchen/ dining/Family room, living room and form a utility/plant room at ground floor level and extend a bedroom and form a robes/en-suite at first floor level together with 2 No rooflights on the existing rear roof elevation and also including the moving and widening of the existing vehicular entrance to form a new pedestrian entrance to the existing driveway all at No 5 Rathdown Crescent, Terenure, Dublin 6W The planning application may be inspected or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy at the offices of Dubjin City Council during its public opening hours and a submission or observation in relation to the application may be made to the authority in writing on payment of the prescribed tee within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the authority of the application.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Even I now believe that mental health culture has gone too far
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 35
Length: 738 words
Byline: Max Pemberton transform your life
Body


AFTER decades of mental illness being shrouded in secrecy and shame, ignored, ridiculed or feared, there has been something of a revolution in the past couple of years. Now we have gone quite the other way. Mental health makes the news almost every day, with not a week going past without some celebrity 'baring all' and admitting to having, or having had, a mental health problem.
There are literally hundreds of podcasts, hashtags and Facebook pages devoted to the discussion of it all.
This, we are unequivocally told, is A Good Thing. It must be, right? After all, we know the silence that used to surround poor mental health compounded people's distress and feelings of isolation.
Talking more openly about mental illness helps to tackle stigma and ignorance, challenges prejudices and misconceptions, and demystifies a group of conditions that have historically been met with suspicion and fear.
Yet recently there has been talk that our approach to mental health has gone 'too far' in the other direction with a 'real risk that we are now labelling the normal ups and downs of human life as medical conditions'.
'Wine who drink more heart has found. Have a glass and then. But the rise in have drinking realise
I have to agree. Suddenly mental health is in vogue. For someone like me, who works in this area, the sea change has been quite startling. For years people would pull a face and ask why I'd gone into this area of medicine.
I remember one of my professors at medical school looking at me with a mixture of bewilderment and horror when I explained to him at my graduation ceremony that I intended to specialise in psychiatry.
'You've done so well, why on earth would you want to do that?', he said, the implication being that mental health was only an area you went into if you had no other www.choice.No one in his or her right mind would actually want to work in it.
Yet suddenly I am fashionable, and in demand in other areas of medicine. I've been asked to talk to dermatologists, endocrinologists and rheumatologists about mental health at their annual conferences. Once dismissed as the Cinderella of medicine, now doctors of all kinds want to learn about it.
You would think that we psychiatrists would welcome this. The more campaigns and awareness-raising the better, surely? But, alas, it's not that simple.
mums' daily are to get a study no killjoy. of wine now worry about women who daily and don't health
I know how disingenuous it sounds for a doctor like me, who has spent years writing about and campaigning for better understanding around mental illness, to suddenly perform such a volte face and say, actually, can we please all stop for a moment. But that's what I'm doing.
Put bluntly, the rise in public understanding around mental health problems has been a double-edged sword. We are inundated with referrals. More and more people are self-diagnosing.
The epidemic of mental health problems has resulted in people giving up work.
Increasingly, we've seen normal emotional problems and difficulties - inevitable parts of life - portrayed as some form of disorder or illness.
And the fact is, thanks to the huge number of people who now believe they have a mental health problem, services are straining under the pressure.
My concern is that while on the one hand it's good to get people talking about how they feel and to challenge the taboo that surrounds mental illness, in reality it risks wrongly labelling everyday feelings as abnormal.
I'm far from alone in being wary about the fallout from this sudden surge in interest in mental health.
Professor Simon Wessely, former president of the Royal College of Psychiatrists, has said 'every time we have a mental health campaign, my heart sinks'. This was met with bewilderment by those outside the profession, but to those on frontline, it resonated hugely.
The majority of people having a difficult time aren't mentally ill. They're just experiencing life. The idea that good mental health means we never suffer any emotional distress at all creates the unrealistic expectation that life should be a bed of roses all the time. And of course it's not. Life can be difficult, frustrating, disappointing, scary and uncertain.
It's normal to feel overwhelmed, lost and upset sometimes.
We should be talking about the realities of life and making sure people have the tools to meet them with resilience, not making them think there is something wrong when there isn't.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Fireman who sits on council in court bid to run for election
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 8
Length: 437 words
Byline: Craig Hughes
Body


A FIREMAN who sits on a local council is preparing to fight a court battle after being told he cannot contest the local election.
Independent Kerry County Councillor Martin Grady, who was co-opted to the council last July to replace his father Donal, has been told by officials he is ineligible to contest the elections on June 7.
Mr Grady, a retained firefighter, has been told a 20-year-old circular from the Department of Housing and Local Government means he is not eligible to contest the election.
The circular states local authority employees earning a salary equivalent to, or above a clerical level role are not entitled to run for election.
Mr Grady's salary as a retained firefighter and as a councillor are both drawn from the local authority.
Speaking to the Irish Daily Mail yesterday, Mr Grady said he is being punished for being a firefighter. 'They [the council] could have notified me sooner - this was always there, since 2004,' he said.
'I'm being penalised for doing my duty as a firefighter. I'm being penalised because I'm a firefighter.'
Mr Grady said his guaranteed salary is 'half' of that of a clerical officer, which ranges from (EURO)53,482 -
(EURO)85,981, with the remainder based on the probability of emergency call-outs which may not happen.
A note sent out in December last year by the department clarifies that in relation to retained firefighters, who received a pay increase last year, all income earned in the previous year must be calculated, which includes their base pay in addition to payments they received for attending emergency callouts.
Mr Grady said he is aware of six other councillors around the country who are firefighters and are impacted by the issue.
Mr Grady's court case is due to take place tomorrow in Killarney.
Former Sinn Féin councillor and firefighter Damien Quigg is seeking to join the case. Mr Quigg is the SF local elections candidate in the Kenmare Electoral Area.
Mr Quigg, a councillor from 2014 to 2019, did not respond to queries from the Mail yesterday, but told the Kerryman newspaper he is seeking to contest the local elections and will quit his job as a firefighter if necessary to do so.
'I have been 16 years in the fire service and I feel I want to represent the community... If it means giving up my job in the fire service to run for election, I will do that, but I shouldn't have to,' he said.
A spokesman for the Department of Local Government said that 'it would not be appropriate for the department to comment on an individual case, and the department never comments on live or active cases'.
craig.hughes@dailymail.ie
Punished for being a firefighter

Graphic


Dynasty: Councillor Martin Grady and his father Donal

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



FRESH CRISIS IN FG AS COVENEY QUITS; Incoming taoiseach Simon Harris facing into election with as many as 15 TDs out of the running amid plans to create 'new look' party FG in need of new faces, new ideas
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1,6,7
Length: 1852 words
Byline: Craig Hughes ; Brian Mahon
Body


THE crisis in Fine Gael has deepened as Simon Coveney announced he is leaving the Cabinet table - with taoiseachin-waiting Simon Harris intent on creating a 'new look' party.
Fine Gael sources now fear they will be facing a general election without at least 12 TDs, and potentially as many as 15, who were elected in 2020.
Just two weeks ago, Mr Coveney insisted that he was running again in the next election, in a nod to his desire to remain in Cabinet, a spot he has held for 13 years.
But confirming his departure as a minister yesterday, Mr Coveney said that his plans for the next general election are 'not for this week'.
There is also growing expectation within the party that the Minister for Public Expenditure and Reform Paschal Donohoe will announce after the summer that he will not be standing in the next general election.
And there are question marks over the future of sitting TDs Michael Ring Turn to Page 6
Continued from Page One and Damien English. Mr Coveney's supporters in Munster are said to be 'furious', feeling that the Minister For Enterprise, Trade and Employment has 'been shafted' as Mr Harris embarks on his Cabinet reshuffle.
Sources told the Irish Daily Mail: 'They feel very upset today, whether it's right or wrong, they feel he has been pushed out.
'They are very loyal to Coveney as he represents their values. When we have strayed away from core Fine Gael values, he has kept them in tune within Fine Gael.'
Outgoing Taoiseach Leo Varadkar has also been reluctant to say definitively whether he will run again, with Fine Gael set to face a reckoning with a new leader, new dynamics and a host of well-known TDs departing.
Mr Donohoe has consistently said that it is his 'intention' to run again, but there is a mounting belief within the party that he will have 'found another job before then' or decide to seek a new career.
'Who is Paschal staying for? He doesn't get on with Harris,' said a source.
'He will have to make a decision by August or September ahead of the selection conventions, don't be surprised if he has a sudden moment of reflection during this time and changes the tune he has been saying publicly.
'If he does run it's not certain that he would even hold his seat, it's a very tough constituency,' the source added. 'Ring will wait until the last minute, but he won't run.'
However, Mr Donohoe's spokeswoman insisted last night that the Minster would be running. Mr Varadkar has pointed to a natural churn as the reason for the mass exodus of TDs from his party ranks with Fine Gael remaining in power for three terms.
The departure of Mr Coveney opens up another Cabinet position to allow Mr Harris to conduct a wider reshuffle. Peter Burke and Jennifer Carroll MacNeill are seen as the two leading contenders from the junior ministerial ranks to ascend to a Cabinet position.
Mr Burke is being tipped for the Justice portfolio, with current Justice Minister Helen McEntee set to move sideways, likely to Higher Education or Enterprise.
If both Mr Burke and Ms Carroll MacNeill become full Cabinet ministers, Mr Harris will have three junior ministerial portfolios to fill with Josepha Madigan also announcing her resignation two weeks ago as a junior minister.
Alan Dillon, a first-time TD from Mayo, is widely tipped to secure a portfolio with Colm Burke a surprise candidate after Mr Coveney's departure left Fine Gael without a minister in
Cork. Emer Higgins, another first-time TD who also worked with Frances Fitzgerald, much like
Mr Harris, is also seen as a strong contender to be a junior minister. It is now expected among Fine Gael TDs and senators that Mr Coveney will step away from electoral politics.
Yesterday, he told Claire Byrne on RTÉ's Radio 1, that he was stepping down from Cabinet but refused to say if he would contest the next election.
The Minister for Enterprise, Trade and Employment said he told incoming Mr Harris of his decision on Monday night.
Mr Harris is due to take up the role of taoiseach when the Dáil sits next week. Mr Coveney said that the time was right to step aside as a Fine Gael minister.
He said Mr Harris has made it clear he wants to create a 'newlook Fine Gael' and to promote new talent in the party.
'I know he was struggling with the decision in relation to who would be in and who'd be out [of Cabinet],' Mr Coveney said. 'I felt that the time was right both from his point of view and from mine to give them, him, space to create a new opportunity in the party in government. He thanked me and respected that. I think one of the most difficult things actually as an incoming party leader and incoming taoiseach is to form a team that can slot into government well, particularly in an election year. I totally respect that that is a really difficult decision for Simon.'
Mr Coveney added: 'I think for me, I don't know whether he was going to ask me to be in Cabinet as part of that team or not. I know he was weighing that up and we spoke about that both last week and again this week. But I think it makes life easier for him and I think it's also a recognition by me too that Fine Gael needs renewal. We're going to go into the next general election hoping to be in government for a fourth term, and I think a party needs to find a way of renewing itself, refreshing itself, bringing forward new faces, new voices, new ideas.
'In many ways, when Leo Varadkar decided to step down a couple of weeks ago, he started that process and obviously, my initial reaction to that was to steady the ship, to work within the party to make sure that we could manage to transition to a new leader quickly and efficiently and professionally because the country needs that right now.'
Mr Varadkar has not yet clarified his intentions for the next general election but is not expected to run again, with Senator Emer Currie facing an uphill battle in order to retain the seat in the Dublin West constituency.
Senior party sources last night said they will struggle to hold at least eight of the vacated seats.
Mr Coveney was yesterday unable to answer whether he would be running in the next election.
There is now worry within the parliamentary party about Mr Harris's plans for the party in Munster. A source said: 'He will have to go back to Brendan Griffin and make him the chief whip and he will be the Munster cabinet minister.' Another said: 'Has he cut a deal with Michael Creed? Or Brendan Griffin? And that they go back into the Cabinet. It's all planned, but what about Munster? I assume he has a plan and has it mapped out or he wouldn't have taken Coveney's head.'
Mr Coveney said of his decision not to run for the leadership of Fine Gael was a 'family personal decision', made a number of years ago, remarking: 'I've got three daughters that are entering their teenage years. And for me, I had a go at the leadership in terms of a contest with Leo.'
He added: 'I was very lucky to be the deputy leader of the party, to be tánaiste for a number of years, and to be right at the centre of decision making in government for many years. That for me was the most rewarding job I could ever have had in politics.
'I have no regrets on that and as I said, I'm at peace with that decision.'
craig.hughes@dailymail.ie
HARRIS'S NEW CABINET MOVERS AND SHAKERS
With Simon Coveney's decision to stand down from Cabinet, the incoming taoiseach Simon Harris is now looking at a wider reshuffle of his senior and junior ranks. There will be at least two new cabinet ministers, with potentially three new junior ministers. Below we set out who the runners and riders are to fill these positions.
PETER BURKE Currently the European Affairs minister, Mr Burke is a darling of the grassroots and described as a 'shoo in' by many to graduate to being a full cabinet minister.
Based in Mullingar, the two-term TD would mean a Cabinet seat for Fine Gael in the midlands.
Several sources indicate he is likely to take over the justice portfolio from Helen McEntee, who looks set to be moved sideways. Mr Burke would be expected to put a more traditional 'law and order' FG stamp on the justice department. JENNIFER CARROLL MacNEILL A former adviser to Frances Fitzgerald, the first-time TD is seen as one of the party's strongest performers in the media. She was considered an outside shot at the leadership but held off once it became clear Mr Harris had the race sewn up.
Currently a junior minister in Finance, she is a hard worker who does not lack ambition. From south Dublin, she is considered - alongside Mr Burke - to be a key figure who is set to be named a Cabinet minister for the first time.
Elevation: Jennifer Carroll MacNeill
BRENDAN GRIFFIN A dark horse, Mr Griffin has repeatedly made clear he is not for turning on his decision not to run in the next election. However, with Mr Coveney standing down, there is no obvious Munster TD to serve in cabinet outside of, perhaps, Patrick O'Donovan, from Limerick. Mr Griffin, a Kerry TD, is well respected and liked within the parliamentary party and could be tempted back with the promise of a full Cabinet position.
TO SERVE AS JUNIOR MINISTER ALAN DILLON Another 'shoo in' to be elevated, Mr Dillon, a first-time TD and former Mayo GAA star looks set to see his star continue to rise within the party. As the Dáil term has progressed, he has performed well at committee hearings, particularly on RTÉ and is now chair of the parliamentary party. Crucially, he is also from the west. It would be a surprise if he was not promoted. COLM BURKE Colm Burke may yet get a surprise promotion to the junior minister ranks after Mr Coveney's departure. Quiet and with a focus on healthcare, Mr Burke's ascension would be an attempt by Mr Harris to ensure the FG faithful in Munster are kept happy. A former MEP, Mr Burke would be a safe pair of hands, but would not set the world on fire.
EMER HIGGINS Another first-time TD, Ms Higgins may be appointed minister before the month is out. Based in Dublin West, she is one of the younger cohort who will front FG for the next number of years.
Simon says: How Minister changed tune
HOURS after Leo Varadkar stepped down from the top job in Fine Gael his number two, Simon Coveney, said he would not contest the leadership, after a previous challenge to be leader. Here is what Minister Simon Coveney said before and after Simon Harris' coronation as the new leader. MARCH 24th Speaking at a Fine Gael European selection convention in Athlone, Mr Coveney confirmed that he would be contesting the next election.
However, when asked if his Cabinet role was in jeopardy he said: 'This is a decision for Simon.
'He's going to have a lot on his mind over the next few weeks. He needs to be given the space to do that.'
AND YESTERDAY ON CLAIRE BYRNE'S RTÉ RADIO ONE SHOW Mr Coveney said told RTÉ Radio One that he was stepping away from his Cabinet role, where he has been for 13 years, and he refused to confirm if he would seek re-election for Fine Gael.
'I felt that the time was right both from his point of view and from mine to give them, him, space to create a new opportunity in the party in government,' he told Ms Byrne.
'I know he was struggling with the decision'

Graphic


Elevation: Jennifer Carroll MacNeillSomething blue: Simon Coveney with his wife Ruth, with former taoiseach Enda Kenny and wife Fionnuala at Simon Harris's wedding in 2017

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Gen Z - yes, I mean my grandkids - are the rudest ever!
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 22
Length: 758 words
Byline: Anonymous
Body


IS Generation Z, those now aged 12 to 27, the rudest generation ever known? I think it must be. They are casual, uncaring and never imagine that arrangements they make are to be honoured.
As a case in point, my eldest grandson, aged 23, contacted me a couple of weeks ago to ask if he could come to lunch on Sunday. We get on well and always have interesting conversations, so I said yes, I would be delighted. Could he please confirm, and I would book a nearby restaurant.
As I hadn't seen or heard from him since Christmas, I was thrilled that he had got in touch of his own accord.
I heard no more, so on the appointed day I messaged him three ways, by email, text and www.phone.No reply. Should I start cooking, book the restaurant, or what? 12 o'clock came, 1pm, 2pm, 3pm. www.Nothing.No grandson, no messages.
Finally, at 8pm and after prompting by his father, I had a brief text saying that he was out late the night before and sorry he didn't let me know he wouldn't be coming.
THAT meant a whole day, as far as I was concerned, was wasted. Don't I matter? Don't I count? It appears not. I could perhaps excuse this behaviour in a 14-yearold, but for somebody who is supposedly adult and holding down a responsible job, it is unforgiveable and rude.
Nor is this an isolated example; just the latest. Vague promises to visit are rarely kept. Admittedly, seeing your old granny or great aunt for lunch may not be the most exciting of adventures, but in our day, we viewed such visits as our bounden duty, knowing that the lonely elderly folk would be greatly cheered by the lively presence of young people. And it's not as though we are particularly demanding. Just seeing them once or twice a year is all we ask.
But even that, it seems, is too much. It didn't occur to any of them, for instance, to wonder if I might be all on my own over Easter or think to cheer me up with a phone call or card.
And I know that it is not just my particular family who behaves like this. Such lack of consideration is endemic among Gen Z.
A friend has several nieces and nephews in their teens and 20s. They say they are coming over, she gets in pizzas or other takeaway and looks forward to their visit.
Then, if something more exciting turns up, as it often does, they just don't arrive, hardly ever bothering to let her know.
And 'thank you', it appears, is not in this generation's vocabulary. It never occurs to my five grandchildren, now all adult, to write or phone to say thank you for presents or for money sent for their gap years, driving lessons, new computers or guitars.
We shower largesse on them in the hope of a scrap of regard in return, which hardly ever comes.
Last year, I sent a special book about the Brontes to the teenage granddaughter of a friend who was studying Jane Eyre at school. I bought the book in Haworth where the Brontes had lived and enclosed some postcards of the sisters as well. Did I ever get any sort of acknowledgement? Did I heck!
These youngsters are the princelings of today, leading the lives they choose and never mind about anybody else. The fact that somebody might be waiting in all day for a visit that never materialises, does not enter their heads.
And even when they do deign to pay a visit, usually turning up late, they spend the time just staring at their phones.
WHY are Gen Z so negligent and indifferent? My own take on this is that they have been spoilt to death from day one. They have never been disciplined and believe the world revolves around them.
Schools, it seems, are not allowed to put anything negative on end of term reports, but must always offer the utmost encouragement, however low the standard.
The days of teachers putting pupils in their place with a cutting remark are long over. Parents would complain that their little darlings had been upset and needed counselling and the teacher would probably get the sack.
Another factor is that their electronic devices have become more important to them than people. Whenever you see a gaggle of teenagers in the street, their heads will be down looking at their phones, rather than interacting with each other. Their whole lives, it seems, are conducted online.
And whereas my generation (I'm now 80), and also their parents, were independent and out in the world in our early 20s, at the latest, this lot are still living at home, not paying rent and having their washing done and meals cooked for them on demand.
This prolonged indulgence means that they never really grow up. So is it any wonder that they don't give a minute's thought to anybody else?

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Gibbs-White runs show to avenge Forest's five-goal horror r at Cottage
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 52,53
Length: 577 words
Byline: JOE BERNSTEIN
Body


NOTT'M FOREST 3 FULHAM 1
MORGAN GIBBS-WHITE was the inspiration as Nottingham Forest equalled their biggest win of the season - turning the form on its head to climb away from the bottom three.
Gibbs-White assisted and scored in a rampant first half for Forest who had been thrashed 5-0 by Fulham earlier in the season. Starting the evening out of the relegation zone only on goal difference, Forest made a mockery of their recent run of one victory in 13 matches in all competitions, against opponents who had scored 10 times in four games. As the normally reserved Nuno Espirito Santo hugged his staff, his Portuguese compatriot Marco Silva had a face like thunder and hooked three of his players after half-an-hour when Fulham were 2-0 behind. The breakthrough arrived on nine minutes when Gibbs-White turned cleverly in the middle of the park and released a perfectly weighted pass to Callum Hudson-Odoi with the outside of his boot. The winger showed composure to cut inside Kenny Tete and drill a low finish into the bottom corner of Bernd Leno's goal.
A raucous City Ground had lift-off and the second goal was not long in coming. Murillo stepped out of defence after 19 minutes and slipped a pass to Chris Wood. Leno expected the striker to play in Anthony Elanga, who was darting forward, but instead Wood hit an early shot that completely fooled the goalkeeper. He was rooted to the spot as the ball found the net. It was Wood's ninth goal in 12 games - a vital contribution in the absence of injured Taiwo Awoniyi.
Silva took the unusual step of making a triple change on 33 minutes, introducing Willian, Tom Cairney and Adama Traore for Sasa Lukic, Alex Iwobi and Harry Wilson, the latter being taunted as a 'Derby reject' by Forest fans as he trudged off. Any subsequent uptick from Fulham was undone in first-half stoppage time.
Again, Gibbs-White was involved with a driving run from midfield and pass into Danilo. This time the midfielder kept moving and became the beneficiary of Danilo's return pass, which allowed him to slip a low finish past Leno. Fulham's forlorn players must have got a rollicking from Silva during the interval and there was clear improvement in the second period, perhaps buoyed by the knowledge they had fought back from 3-1 down at Sheffield United on Saturday to draw. Sure enough, Tosin Adarabioyo got in front of Gibbs-White to head in Andreas Pereira's corner and Fulham applied serious pressure for the rest of the evening, with Forest keeper Matz Sels making blinding saves from Willian and Adarabioyo. The tension was evident on Forest's bench and sub keeper Matt Turner was booked for dissent after a challenge by Antonee Robinson on Neco
Williams did not result in a penalty. Williams also thundered a shot against the bar - the 15th time Forest have hit the woodwork this season. NOTTINGHAM FOREST (4-2-3-1): Sels 7.5; Williams 7.5, Omobamidele 6, Murilllo 7, Aina 7 (Toffolo 83min); Yates 6.5, Danilo 7; Elanga 6.5 (Dominguez 83), Gibbs-White 8 (Reyna 76), Hudson-Odoi 7 (Origi 69 6); Wood 7. Scorers: Hudson-Odoi 9, Wood 19, Gibbs-White 45.
Booked: Turner. Manager: Nuno Espirito Santo 8. FULHAM (4-2-3-1): Leno 5; Tete 5, Bassey 6, Adarabioyo 7, Robinson 6; Palhinha 6 (Reed 71, 6), Lukic 5.5 (Cairney 33, 7); Wilson 6 (Willian 33, 6), Pereira 7 (De Cordova-Reid 71, 6), Iwobi 5.5 (Traore 33, 6); Muniz 5.5.
Scorer: Adarabioyo 49. Booked: None. Manager: Marco Silva 7.
Referee: Michael Oliver 7. Attendance: 28,997.

Graphic


Slide away: Hudson-Odoi (right) and Gibbs-White GETTY IMAGES

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Here's how you CAN go hell for leather
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 26,31
Length: 561 words
Byline: Camilla Ridley-Day
Body


THINK leather, think tight, tacky ? and a look best left to the teen agers. For ever associ ated with 1990s thigh skimming miniskirts and spray on trou sers that restrict breathing, hinder movement and make you perspire, leather can be more vulgar than va va voom. Even celebrities can struggle to carry off the look ? Victoria Beckham is said to be haunted by the unflatter ing skin tight matching black leather bomber jackets she and David posed in back in 1999.
But breathe easy, the spring collec tions are full of clever leather pieces that are colourful, cut to flatter and feature none of the dated styles you might wince at. Grown up, under stated and versatile, these are pieces you can wear at any age.
Opt for flattering wide-fit
UNLESS you are nearing 6ft and with ultra-toned pins, leather leggings are unforgiving.
This season, choose a loose cut of trousers in an exaggerated shape that will look like you're wearing a skirt and bring some real luxe to your workwear wardrobe.
If you're on the petite side, remember to opt for a cut that reveals a hint of ankle so the shape doesn't overwhelm you.
This wide-leg version from Me + Em is free from fussy back pockets, too, for a more flattering look from any angle.
Coat couture WHEN it comes to the leather coat, think large lapels and a defined silhouette as demonstrated beautifully by Kate Moss at Paris Fashion Week.
Kate wore her coat open for a relaxed vibe that shows off her dress but you can also do collars up and cinch your belt in tight like French Vogue Editor Corine Roitfeld, who takes the business of fashion ? and leather ? very seriously.
Soften the look by wearing something tactile and feminine underneath like sheer chiffon or delicate lace.
If you want to try a colour, Oxblood can be an expensivelooking alternative to default black, as seen on the runway at Hermes.
But whatever you do, don't be tempted to go for a fulllength leather trench in other strong colours. Choose muted hues instead.
Green Kylie
Matte v Shiny
LEATHER says 'look at me', but shiny tips you into 'for the wrong reasons'.
Matte leather typically looks more expensive, and good places to start are Wyse's buttery soft navy shirt and Whistles' leather jacket, also in dark blue, which is supple for a more aged feel.
If you want to dabble with the glossy leather look then Zara's Studio versions are sure to be a sellout. Pair with some Mary Janes (flat or heeled) for a simple finish.
Bring biker-chic up to speed NOTHING will date you quicker than a Nineties-style, spray-on black leather biker jacket.
The more modern way to wear one is with a looser fit or to ride in style with a Formula One inspired look.
Reiss has its own McLaren F1 collection featuring colour block jackets but for those who just want to flirt with the look, this putty version is a great buy.
Stars such as Bella Hadid have worn bolder versions, meanwhile, Louis Vuitton sent a patchwork piece down the catwalk for its 2024 collection.
Switch mini for midi FORGET acres of exposed thigh topped with a band of blink-and-you'llmiss-it leather. That ship has sailed.
The far more sophisticated midi is your instant spring upgrade.
Infinitely more wearable, it's versatile enough to work for any occasion. It looks pared-back polished with trainers and a jersey top, or tuck in a smarter white shirt and add a pair of kitten heels for more grownup glamour.

Graphic


Too tight: Cat DeeleyAGES Pictures: PETER CADE / GETTY IMGreen for no: Kylie MinogueThe muted trench: Kate MossF1 style: Leather jacket, ?545, www.reiss.comThigh high: Kim Kardashian in

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



History is crucial to understanding conflict in Gaza; LET TERS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 348 words
Body


HISTORY is central to what is happening in Gaza today.
The area attacked by the Palestinian militants on October 7 was once the land where Arabs lived and farmed for generations before being herded into Gaza by those who laid siege.
This continues today in the same fashion and cruelty.
There were 11 known Palestinian villages inland from the site of the recent armed events, prior to 1948. The indigenous Arab people of this huge area were driven out by the mainly European Jewish incomers. There are people living today in Gaza who have the legal deeds to this occupied land, and many retain the keys to their front doors following on from that wretched injustice.
Palestinian natives today have been abandoned by all to their fate of subjugation and expediency. There are now only individual defenders of sanity who take to the streets, while EU governments imply this could also be anti-Semitic. Make your own mind up, but be aware the truth is not for the faint-hearted when the powers-that-be are themselves cowardly.
ROBERT SULLIVAN, Bantry, Co. Cork...A REPORT in The Washington Post states that US president Joe Biden recently approved the transfer to Israel of '1,800 MK84 2,000-pound bombs and 500 MK82 500-pound bombs'.
One of these 2,000-pound bombs is capable of destroying a large multi-storey apartment building; 1,800 such bombs would destroy a whole town and most of its people. The Washington Post also said the US State Department approved the transfer of 25 F-35A fighter jets and engines to Israel.
This makes the US a significant participant in the genocide against the Palestinian people. Since no aircraft associated with the US military are ever searched at Shannon Airport, there is no way of knowing whether some of these deadly munitions are transiting through Irish airspace.
Such cooperation with the US military makes the Irish Government complicit in the genocide against the Palestinians. Our politicians and the people of Ireland must now take urgent actions to prevent any further complicity in such crimes against humanity.
EDWARD HORGAN, Castletroy, Limerick.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Horner saga takes toll on 'upset, angry' complainant; FORMULA ONE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 47
Length: 251 words
Byline: Jonathan McEvoy
Body


THE woman at the centre of the Red Bull scandal has said that she is 'very upset, angry, scared, intimidated and lonely', amid the ongoing saga.
A 'friend' of the complainant has told the BBC she 'struggled to understand' how the team dismissed her allegations into her boss Christian Horner. Horner, 50, has always denied charges of controlling behaviour and was cleared by an internal inquiry.
The 'friend' said: 'It's impossible for people to understand what it's like for her. Every time I have asked her something, she breaks down in tears and says she's got no one to talk to because she's not allowed to talk. She is very upset, very angry, very scared, very intimidated, very lonely.' A spokesman for Red Bull said: 'Both parties signed a confidentiality agreement on it so they both can't discuss it.'
The employee has since been suspended on full pay.
After Horner was exonerated a cache of leaked documents was sent to some 150 F1 personnel, allegedly documenting intimate exchanges between Horner and the employee. Horner has never confirmed if the correspondence is genuine. He called the emails 'anonymous and speculative'. The 'friend' added: 'Anybody can come to their own conclusion whether that was an appropriate relationship. 'As Christian has said, he wants to draw a line under this. Well, if this has been a fair and independent process and there has been no wrongdoing, then why isn't that being brought forward in a transparent way and why isn't Christian denying those WhatsApps are real?'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



How volunteers became targets; Following approved roads, they were picked off ruthlessly one by one
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 14,15
Length: 1039 words
Byline: Andy Jehring; Mark Nicol; David Averre
Body


WORLD Central Kitchen, a food charity founded by celebrity chef José Andrés, has stopped its work in the Gaza Strip after seven of its workers, mostly foreigners, were killed in an apparent Israeli strike. The group - which will decide its longer-term plans in the region soon - has been bringing desperately needed food to Gazans facing widespread hunger and pioneered the recently launched effort to deliver aid by sea from Cyprus. Founded in 2010, the group says it has provided more than 43 million meals to Palestinians. The suspension of its work means tens of thousands of meals a day won't be handed out as the UN warns famine is imminent.
LATE on Monday night three cars from the World Central Kitchen pulled out of the organisation's warehouse in Gaza to distribute aid to Palestinians.
Each vehicle was clearly marked as working for the humanitarian organisation, followed an Israeli Defence Forces-approved route and had GPS trackers and SOS beacons broadcasting their positions.
But despite taking every precaution, the seven brave volunteers inside the cars were being watched - and were soon deemed hostile targets and eliminated.
Among the doomed passengers were former Royal Marine James Henderson, 33; former UK soldier John Chapman, 57; as well as a British military veteran named last night by the BBC as James Kirby.
Each were well-versed in operating in the most hostile environments on the planet and would have briefed the IDF of their exact movements and plans that night.
They were accompanying Polish aid worker Damian Sobol and his Australian colleague Lalzawmi Frankcom, as well as a U.S.-Canadian dual national and a local driver, Saif Abu Taha.
Israeli forces had seen the volunteers entering the main distribution hub in Deir al-Balah, central Gaza, with a larger convoy to collect the aid. A member of the IDF unit had identified an armed man as a potential threat on one of the trucks that had accompanied the three humanitarian vehicles, a security source told Israeli newspaper Haaretz.
While neither the suspect nor the truck left with the World Central Kitchen (WCK) cars, a Hermes 450 drone was scrambled to follow them. Two of the cars had some form of armour plating, while the third was a 'soft-skinned' 4x4, and all of them had clear WCK markings on the roof and doors.
Despite this, the IDF unit responsible for securing the area ordered UAV (unmanned aerial vehicle) operators to attack one of the vehicles shortly before midnight.
It deployed a precision R9X Hellfire missile which smashed into one of the armoured cars. Passengers were seen scrambling from the wreckage and jumping into the other two vehicles.
They informed authorities monitoring their movements that they had been hit and sped off.
After travelling just 900 metres the Hermes 450 fired once more. The second armoured car was hit, leaving just the soft-skinned 4x4 remaining. Surviving passengers loaded the wounded into the final vehicle and pulled away.
But having made it 1.5km further along the coastal road the UAV fired for a third time - blasting the remaining vehicle to bits.
Local Nael Eliyan, living in a tent yards away, sprinted to the wreckage. 'Their injuries were serious and they died quickly,' he said.
Harrowing pictures showed how a huge hole had been blown in the roof of one car, with its interior torn to shreds. Another vehicle was missing most of its rear end.
By 1am local time images were being shared on social media showing the bloodied corpses of the seven victims laid out in a nearby building. There were also images of their passports.
As news of the 'unforgivable' disaster spread, loved ones around the world began to pay tribute. Relatives of Mr Henderson in Cornwall, heard of his death on Tuesday morning. A friend told the Mail: 'He hadn't been out there long, only a couple of weeks. He was a lovely lad.' Mr Henderson had served in the Royal Marines for six years before going to work for security contractors. He and the other two British men were reportedly working for Solace Global, a security firm based in Dorset.
Mr Chapman, a former Royal Marine and Special Boat Service soldier, lived nearby with his wife and two children. Mrs Chapman was too upset to talk last night. A former comrade said: 'He was a very well liked guy, a very popular bloke.'
Hundreds gathered in Gaza to mourn the driver, Saif Abu Taha, whose body was transported to Rafah, his home town. A close friend who gave his name as Hassan said: 'Our hearts are broken by your death, Saif. You have hurt us with your passing, and we will not forget you.'
Lalzawmi Frankcom died 'doing the work she loves', her family said in a statement. The aid worker, from Melbourne, was described as 'kind, selfless and an outstanding human [who] travelled the world helping others in their time of need'.
Damian Sobol, from Przemysl in Poland, was described in a Facebook post as a 'fantastic boy' by the city's mayor, who said words could not describe how those who had known him were feeling.
More than 196 aid workers have been killed in Gaza since October, according to the U.S.-funded Aid Worker Security Database, which records major incidents of violence against aid personnel.
THE DRONE THAT RAINED DEATH FROM THE SKY 1
IDF forces reportedly suspect terrorist was on one of the trucks accompanying the World Central Kitchen aid vehicles to the aid warehouse at Deir al-Balah 2
The three cars left the warehouse without the truck suspected of harbouring a terrorist. The armed man did not leave the warehouse. The three cars, two of which were armoured, followed an IDF approved route in co-ordination with the army.
3
Shortly before midnight the IDF fired a precision R9X Hellfire missile which smashed into one of the cars. Passengers were seen scrambling from the wreckage and jumping into the other two vehicles. They tell the IDF that they had been hit.
4
The two remaining aid vehicles speed off but after just 1,000 yards another missile struck another of the cars. The third car approached and they began to transfer the wounded into it.
5
But having made it a mile further along the coastal road the drone fired for a third time - blasting the remaining vehicle to bits killing all seven of the volunteers.
Informed them they had been hit

Graphic


Selfless: Aid worker Lalzawmi Frankcom, leftVolunteer: Damian Sobol, left, in his WCK giletIdentity: British, Polish and Australian passports of victimsDriver: Saif Abu Taha

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



How we identified Banksy as a nice middle-class boy called Robin 16 years ago.....but the art world refuses to accept it because the 'mystery' is such a cash cow
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 20,37
Length: 1918 words
Byline: Claudia Joseph; Simon Trump
Body


HAD Banksy, the millionaire graffiti artist, been finally unmasked? There were plenty who thought so just last week, when, amid feverish excitement, a bulky grey-haired man in shades was pictured working on a new piece of street art in north London.
The mural in question, a tree design in vivid green to mark the first day of spring, was undoubtedly by Banksy. And this was the clearest picture of the 'artist' yet.
Alas, the suspect turned out to be a 67-year-old builder called George Georgiou, a man who boasts that he is without a creative bone in his body.
Which means the 'mystery', if that's what it is, lives on - although for us, the real puzzle is why anyone should think there's a single drop of intrigue left to be squeezed from the famous 'guerrilla' artist.
Because it is now 16 years since he was comprehensively outed in The Mail on Sunday thanks to a year-long investigation.
We were clear then that Banksy is neither riddle nor enigma but a 50-year-old man called Robin Gunningham. We are just as clear today - and have a mountain of evidence saying so.
We know, for example, that the privately educated artist grew up in the Bristol suburbs, went to the Cathedral School and is married to a former UK Labour Party researcher called Joy Millward.
We know that, for decades, Banksy's every movement has followed that of Gunningham.
The evidence continues to accumulate, including, we can now reveal, graffiti signed by Banksy which has been found in the garage of his parents' former home - the home of Mr and Mrs Peter Gunningham.
Yet a quarter of a century since the first work appeared in his home city, the weary myth persists that no one truly knows who he might be.
A torrent of intrigue and speculation greets each new work.
Viewed as a cross between the Scarlet Pimpernel and Robin Hood, Banksy has acquired near cult status, lauded for holding the mighty to account with spray paint before retreating back into the urban undergrowth.
Who else could command £18.5million ((EURO)21.6million) at Sotheby's for a half-shredded artwork, Love Is In The Bin?
'Guerrilla' art turns out to be lucrative, by the way - today
Banksy's overall fortune stands at an estimated £50million ((EURO)58million). Yet he's had important help along the way, from parts of the art world and a media that seems determined to ignore the inconvenient facts - not least that we have known exactly who he is for a decade and a half.
But who cares about evidence when there's money to be made - and so much of it?
We first started assembling the Banksy jigsaw when a photograph of a man with a spray-can appeared suddenly and without explanation on the internet.
Claiming to show him at work in Jamaica, it had been taken by a known associate of the artist. We were intrigued.
This was 2008 and Banksy had already made his name spraying humorously anti-establishment art on walls across Britain and elsewhere.
Keen to suggest a political 'edge', he'd won global plaudits for paintings on the wall dividing Israel and the West Bank, including nontrademark images such as Rage, The Flower Thrower - featuring a masked man hurling a bouquet - and Flying Balloon Girl. In 2006, Banksy left an inflatable doll dressed as a Guantanamo prisoner in Disneyland, California.
Another time, he hung a version of the Mona Lisa - but with a smiley face - in the Louvre, seeming to revel in a game of cat-andmouse with press and public.
It quickly emerged, however, that Banksy had an unexpected advantage when it came to preserving his anonymity.
Because he'd adopted his alter ego at the early age of 14, fiction had already merged with fact, and we found that most people who knew him from more recent times had no clue about his real identity. He was just 'Banksy'.
The breakthrough came when someone from the Bristol art scene finally gave us a name: Robin Gunningham. Armed with this, we found the public records showing that Gunningham's father, Peter, had been a contracts manager and that his mother, Pamela, had been a company director's secretary who later worked in a nursing home.
The couple had married on April 25, 1970, at Kingswood Wesley Methodist Church, and moved into a semi-detached house in the Bristol suburbs.
They had two children, Sarah, in 1972, and Robin, in 1973.
Next, we tracked down a former neighbour, the late Anthony Halwe lett, who confirmed to us that the figure in the photograph from Jamaica was indeed Robin Gunningham. 'I think Robin was working as a graffiti artist,' he told The Mail on Sunday.
'He worked for other people and would disappear for months on end.
'He was quite nomadic. I would not go as far as to say he went off the rails, but there was some sort of rift in the family. He just disappeared after he left home.' When approached Gunningham's parents for confirmation, however, their response was disconcerting. 'I can't help you really,' said Peter Gunningham, who claimed not to recognise the man in the original picture and refused to help us with the whereabouts of Robin.
There was none of the surprise you might expect from a father confronted with an outlandish claim about his son.
His wife, meanwhile, stated that, bewilderingly, she was not Pamela Ann Gunningham and that she didn't have a son called Robin.
We traced Gunningham's fellow pupils at the £9,240 ((EURO)10,805)-ayear Bristol Cathedral School.
Some might be surprised to think of Banksy the iconoclast, wandering the 17th-century former monastery with its upper and lower quadrangles or on his knees for morning prayers in the gloom of the ancient cathedral.
Scott Nurse, an insurance broker from Robin's class, said: 'He was one of three people in my year who were extremely talented at art.
'He did lots of illustrations. I am not at all surprised if he is Banksy.' The coincidences mounted.
We found a school photograph of a bespectacled Gunningham from 1989 which shows a discernible resemblance to the man in the Jamaica photograph.
Time and again we found that his movements shadowed those of
Banksy and vice versa.
In 1988, for example, Gunningham was living in Bristol with a man called Luke Egan.
Egan was a friend of Banksy who had collaborated with the artist on the Santa's Ghetto exhibition in London's West End in Christmas 2001.
At first, Egan denied knowing either Banksy or Gunningham - although he had exhibited with the former and was shown as having lived with the latter on the UK electoral roll.
He eventually admitted knowing Gunningham but not Banksy.
The same Easton property was later bought by Camilla Stacey, a curator at Bristol's Here Gallery.
When we spoke to her, she was completely certain that Banksy and Gunningham were one and the same. She found Banksy artwork had been left behind in the house - yet, for a while, she continued to receive post in the name of Robin Gunningham.
'When I moved in, the place had been covered in graffiti and stuff like that,' she explained. 'I threw things in the bin. At that point Banksy was just another artist who had graffitied around Bristol.
'It keeps me awake at night sometimes thinking about it.'
When, at the turn of the Millennium, Banksy moved to London, so did Robin Gunningham, who took up residence in a flat in Hackney. Gunningham's flatmate was a man called Jamie Eastman who worked for Bristol's Hombre records, a label for which Banksy designed a number of album covers.
In 2016, scientists at London's
Queen Mary University employed 'geographic profiling' - normally used to catch criminals or track the spread of disease - to say that Gunningham was 'the only serious suspect'.
They plotted the locations of 192 of Banksy's presumed artworks and found 'hot spots' which correlated to a pub, playing fields and homes closely linked to Gunningham, his friends and family.
Then, that same year, Banksy's then agent, Steve Lazarides, released a series of early photographs of the artist, which bore an extraordinary similarity to Gunningham. Lazarides had been a picture editor when he discovered Banksy on a 2001 photoshoot in Bristol.
In 2017, we discovered a photo of the artist wearing a high-vis jacket at work on a piece featuring a giant white rat daubed on Liverpool's derelict White Horse pub in 2004.
The photographer, Christopher Wilson, said: 'There is no way that anybody can ignore the evidence now.'
He was wrong, of course. The year 2018 brought another curious overlap. Two artworks - cassette sleeves on albums by Bristol band Mother Samosa and signed by Gunningham - appeared on an internet auction site with an estimate of £4,000 ((EURO)4,700). The albums had been recorded at studios in Bristol by sound engineer Martin Smith.
'I remember him [Gunningham] going out on a bicycle with a basket on the front with stencils in it,' said Smith.
'He said to me, "I'm going to change my name to Robin Banks. What do you think?"' Then there was the graffiti at Gunningham's childhood home.
Although the revelation came too late for The Mail on Sunday, we spoke to the family that moved in after Peter and Pamela Gunningham separated and sold up.
'We bought the house from the Gunninghams and had this graffiti in the garage,' they told us.
'But it was only after buying The
Mail on Sunday that we thought: "My God." We went back out to the garage and found a signature on the wall saying "Banksy Art".'
In the 16 years since we first named him, neither Gunningham nor his wife have once come forward to say that we are wrong.
His alter-ego Banksy has failed to deny the story, either, simply saying: 'I'm unable to comment on who may or may not be Banksy but anyone described as good at drawing doesn't sound like Banksy to me.'
If the facts are so clear and well established, why the strange omerta? Why, all these years later do people insist on claiming there is any doubt at all that Banksy and Robin Gunningham are the same?
Simple, says Michel Boersma, curator of exhibition The Art of Banksy, in London's Regent Street. 'The art world maintains the conspiracy because it is a gravy train,' he explains.
'The public don't want the mystery to stop because it's a lovely fairytale.
'The art world doesn't want his identity to be known because it would take away from the mystique - and mystique makes money.' There's a chance they'll soon be disappointed, however.
However determinedly the publicists have turned their face against the evidence, the courts will be harder to ignore.
Banksy has found himself fighting a £1.3million ((EURO)1.5million) legal battle over the commercialisation of his artwork - and he is, on the face of it, a key witness.
When, in 2022, the Guess fashion brand featured an image of his Flower Bomber on its clothes, Banksy lashed out on Twitter, now X, urging 'all shoplifters' to go to an outlet on London's Regent Street. 'They've helped themselves to my artwork without asking,' he wrote. 'How can it be wrong for you to do the same to their clothes?' Now art licensing company Full Colour Black, which supplied Guess with the image, is suing Banksy for libel and damages in the London High Court.
They say there was a legitimate agreement in place. He denies it.
We will see. A hearing has yet to be scheduled.
Could Banksy's anonymity really survive such a high-profile case? Would he, God forbid, appear in person to give evidence?
Or perhaps Robin Gunningham will simply make this awkward matter disappear.
A quiet settlement behind closed doors to the satisfaction of all? From what we've seen these past 16 years, we wouldn't bet against it.
'The public don't want the mystery to stop' 'No way anyone can ignore the evidence now'

Graphic


Mural: Banksy's latest artwork on the side of London flatsUnveiled: Robin Gunningham, who is believed to be Banksy after the MoS named him in 2008

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



I feel lonely and need therapy, says Raye
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 312 words
Byline: Jennifer Ruby
Body


SHE swept the board at last month's Brit Awards with a record-breaking six wins.
But Raye said she has to battle to find positives in her stratospheric rise to fame - and plans to start therapy to help her cope.
The London-born singer, 26, admitted to struggling, even though her career is finally taking off after years of hard work.
'I feel lonely,' she said. 'I don't mean that in the sense of wanting a partner or wanting to be in love. It's not that.
'I need to do some therapy, get some practices in place to let the negatives fall away and soak up all the positive things that life is offering me right now.'
The Escapism singer - whose real name is Rachel Keen - said she struggles with confidence and feels 'out of place' when not writing music or performing.
'I'm not the most confident in my appearance, it's something I still struggle with,' she said. 'I feel confident when I write, when I sing.'
She has been deeply affected by negative comments about her weight and appearance on social media, and believes trolling is worse for women in the industry, whose looks are regularly 'critiqued'.
'You can see thousands of people's opinions. When you let those opinions in, you start to loathe yourself or pick yourself apart,' she told Elle Magazine.
'People have been saying I don't look like a woman; really nasty comments that go round and round in your head.' Raye, who has spoken out about her experience of sexual assault in the industry, has no desire to be 'famous' or an 'influencer', and just wants 'millions and millions of ears' listening to her music.
She signed with record company Polydor as a teenager, but claims it refused to release her debut album after seven years. The album, My 21st Century Blues, was released independently and became one of the biggest records of 2023.
The May issue of Elle UK goes on sale tomorrow.
'You start to pick yourself apart'

Graphic


Pressure: Raye told Elle Magazine she finds fame hardFreeman Brendan UK/ ELLE Picture:

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



I'm 37, but already feel invisible. I seem to be ageing faster ... because I haven't had any Botox
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 34
Length: 1225 words
Byline: Holly Bourne
Body


IFIRST noticed it a few summers ago when I was 34. It was a blazing hot day, the kind where they urge you to take water bottles on public transport, and I threw on some clothes before I went into the city.
I stepped into a pair of short denim cut-offs and a strappy top. But, as I took in my reflection in the hallway mirror, and the large amounts of skin on show, I stopped. 'That's weird,' I told my husband. 'I've just realised I've not been catcalled all summer.'
'Isn't that a good thing?' he replied. I thought about it. 'Yes, and no,' I said. 'I don't think it's because the war on sexual harassment is won, just that I'm now too old to be harassed…' A decade previously, there's no way I would've thrown together a 'revealing' outfit so easily. When I moved to London, aged 25, I was shocked by the relentless sexual harassment whenever I left the house. Especially as I've never been the 'pretty' one in my friendship group.
Yet, during summer, each morning I had to choose between the physical comfort of less clothing, knowing I'd get catcalled, whistled at and sometimes even followed home, or the emotional comfort of a longer hem or sleeve. Now as this year's winter stubbornly hangs on, I feel no relief as I pull my puffy coat around me.
As a bestselling author of young adult novels, I often work with teenage girls who complain about how they can't walk to school without older men bothering them. They say their uniform is basically a giant target for honking horns, wolf whistles, and pervy comments. Sexual harassment definitely hasn't gone away.
So, I realised my newfound superpower to wear a short skirt and remain unbothered wasn't a feminist win, rather a new invisibility. Somehow, I'd grown out of one type of sexism and into another. I'm only 37 and yet feel I'm grieving the beginning of the end of something. My being-seenness, the peak of my supposed attractiveness. And it will only get worse.
ACTRESSES, pop stars, models, influencers - I notice they're either much younger than me, or seem younger due to what I'm assuming is cosmetic interventions. As plastic surgery and 'tweakments' become increasingly popular and societally acceptable, sold as 'empowering' even, our perception of another woman's age is shifting.
I see famous women in their 40s and 50s who look younger than me. I didn't think I'd worry about ageing until I was at least in my late 40s, but those of us not using surgery are technically ageing faster due to the vast amount of people who do. I look and feel older because they've made themselves look younger.
So, how do I, as a feminist woman, navigate my ageing and how it skewers the way society sees me? The only older women I see in the media are the ones who are lauded and celebrated for defying the scientific inevitability of age - with surgery, expensive facelifts and creams, and a honed P.Volve body resembling a teenager's.
While it seems insane to already feel invisible aged only 37, the way women frantically chase the perfect skincare regime, or get 'preventative Botox', shows we know the consequences of ageing. I'm clearly not the only one feeling concerned if women a decade younger than me are chucking so much money and time to stay visible. In fact maybe I'm a late bloomer, as I've only started to worry about it recently.
Will it be unfeminist of me to get Botox? Or is it an empowering choice that makes me feel better? It's a question that's so much harder to answer as it becomes more personally relevant. I've tried to draw lines in the sand as the lines deepen on my forehead.
I've succumbed to performing an increasingly complicated skincare regime, using retinol now, but I have so far resisted plastic surgery.
A childhood friend I shared a birthday with died unexpectedly when I was 24 which changed my attitude towards ageing. Every year, as my phone pings with happy birthday messages, his still-open Facebook page floods with RIP messages of 'I miss you'. It's a devastating, acute reminder of the number of extra days of life I've had compared to him. It truly does contextualise each wrinkle as the ultimate privilege. On every birthday, I reflect on the sunsets I've seen, delicious meals I've eaten, laughs I've laughed, loves I've loved, the juice of life that I've drunk, and see them all etched on my face.
I try to see it for the beauty that it is - like my ageing face is a passport, collecting the stamps of life experiences. It's a quieter type of issue - the diminishing visibility of older women - one that's hard to put a precise finger on.
BUT, as I edge towards 40, I feel its gentle grip. I think none of us really imagine we'll get older. And it hurts more than I thought it would, in fact I feel a mild panic. The invisibility is less explicit than the sexism I've experienced, and more of a feeling.
There's a growing sense that I'm lesser-than now I crumple when I laugh, now my hair is speckled with grey. Society generally feels less bothered with me - in positive and negative ways. I feel it when I go to clothes stores that used to be my favourites, try something on. Nobody is telling me I can't wear the current trends, but there's a deep knowingness that I look just 'wrong' in these clothes now. When hit 35, I remember there was a craze on TikTok where Generation Z girls mocked the fashion choices of Millenial women - our side partings and our skinny jeans.
'Hang on,' I thought, 'Women my age are now old enough to get ridiculed for our frumpy fashion.' And, as I felt for my middlepart and smoothed down my skinny jeans in shame, I had to remind myself this is, depressingly, how it works.
Last year, I became a mother for the first time, and this feeling of invisibility intensified again. I felt like a haggard nuisance pushing my buggy down the street.
And, no matter how carefully I tried to steer my baby around narrow pavements, I couldn't believe how many people actively bumped into me, then flicked me a look of disgust for taking up space. Now I am a mother, I see mothers everywhere, but nobody sees me because I have become one.
The other day, I failed to even recognise myself. I caught a glimpse in a shop window, and there was a moment of total disconnect before I realised that the hunched, exhausted-looking, woman pushing a buggy, was me. I practically flinched in shock.
I guess I'm lucky in that I live two lives with my job.
I'm the Holly who is just another woman in the world. However, I'm also a writer. A job where your appearance is (mostly) irrelevant, and there's a tremendous, powerful, visibility in having words published.
You can't address beauty issues without acknowledging ageing, and how society still condemns women who dare to visibly do it by, well, making them invisible. It's a cliche in storytelling, how mothers (or evil stepmothers) resent their daughter's beauty and youth, and I wanted to explore the painful reasons why we strive to remain the fairest of them all in my latest teen novel, You Could Be So Pretty.
Whether that's a poisonous apple, or freezing your forehead with injectible poison, it's not pathetic that we chase youth. We know the consequences of losing it. And, sadly, women perpetuate this age discrimination as much as men can, severing the bonds where the wisdom and experience of age could be passed down to younger generations. ? You Could Be So Pretty is published by Usborne

Graphic


Grieving: Holly Bourne says she is past her prime

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



IN discussing road deaths, the [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 12
Length: 260 words
Byline: SHANE MCGRATH
Body


IN discussing road deaths, the word carnage is instinctively deployed. It's understandable, given the need to reflect the dreadful consequences of serious road traffic accidents.
But those who attend such scenes insist the devastation can scarcely be imagined. There are the convulsive after-effects to consider, too, from the life-altering grief inflicted on many families, to the physical impacts on survivors.
It's no coincidence that the most powerful road safety advert aired in this country featured the first-person testimonies of the parents of little Ciarán Treacy, a beautiful four-year-old killed by a drunk driver.
The Road Safety Authority ad also included contributions from emergency services staff who attended Ciarán, and calls for a similarly effective publicity campaign have followed the sharp rise in road deaths so far this year.
That could be one part of an approach that must, though, have enforcement at its core.
There was the now-familiar reports from the gardaí of high detection rates for speeding, and drink and drug-driving following the bank holiday weekend.
Driving under the influence had, for a time, become a taboo in Irish society, and the best way of guaranteeing it remains so is by levying severe punishments on those caught drink or drug-driving.
The same goes for speeding, but in all cases, there can be no consequences until wrongdoers are apprehended.
And that requires more gardaí, and a much more visible Garda presence on the roads.
Until that happens, the carnage will go on. The heartbreak will spread like an ugly virus.

Graphic


Road tragedy: Ciarán Treacy with his mother Gillian

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



IN THE MATTER OF COMFANIES [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 249 words
Body


IN THE MATTER OF COMFANIES ACT 2014 AND IN THE MATTER OF ABSOLUTELY CLEVER HEATING LIMITED NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN pursuant to Section 587 of the Companies Act, 2014 that a Meeting of the Creditors of the above Company will be held remotely at 14:00 on the 17th Day of April 2024 for the purposes mentioned in Sections 587 588 and 667 of the said Act In order to provide creditors with the opportunity to participate in the meeting and request any additional information, the meeting will be held remotely by telephone and/or video conferencing facilities.
The Company shall nominate James Anderson and Andrew Byrne of Deloitte Ireland LLP, 29 Earisfort Terrace, Dublin 2 as joint liquidators of the Company.
Dated this 3rd day of April 2024 BY ORDER OFTHE BOARD Proxies to be used at the meeting must be lodged with Company by email to irrfo@ac-heating.cz no later than 4:00 p.m. on 16th April 2024. All creditors wishing ID attend the meeting are requested to submit their proxy form in advance of the meeting and indicate what email address the remote meeting invite should be sent to.
A creditor may at any time prior to the holding of the meeting A) having given the company 24 hours' notice in writing of his or her intention to do so inspect during business hours a list of creditors of the company at the registered office of the company, or B) request the company in writing to deliver a list of creditors of the company to him or her and such a request will be complied with by the company.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



It could take average earners 89 years to save a house deposit
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 603 words
Byline: Helen Bruce
Body


IT COULD take a first-time buyer anywhere between twoand-a- half years and almost 89 years to save for a deposit on a home depending on where in the country they want to live and if they are buying alone.
A survey by mortgage comparison website www.Switcher.ie has found a massive difference in the affordability of houses, for both joint buyers and sole buyers.
The research showed that the most affordable places for first-time buyers were not necessarily in the areas with the lowest house prices.
'Although cheaper property prices help, having a comparably higher income makes your mortgage more affordable and deposits take less time to save,' a spokesperson said.
Leitrim, Longford, Roscommon,
Sligo and Mayo were the top five most affordable places for joint buyers and took the least amount of time to save for a minimum 10% deposit.
If both buyers were earning the average amount for their county, they could expect to spend 2.5 years saving for a property in Leitrim.
Cavan, Clare, Limerick, Tipperary and Offaly were also described as affordable, taking, on average, 2.9 years to save for a deposit.
www.Switcher.ie suggested that as Ireland introduces laws to support more flexible working arrangements, cheaper rural locations could become increasingly popular for young families and couples who are seeking to buy their first home.
Unsurprisingly, areas in and around Dublin were the most out of reach for joint buyers, with Dún Laoghaire earning the title of least affordable place for both joint and sole buyers. It would take an eyewatering 27.9 years for two people to save for a deposit for a home in Dún Laoghaire, and 13.5 years for a home in Wicklow. Kildare, South Dublin, Fingal, Dublin City, Galway
City, Meath and Louth were the other areas to be ranked as least affordable for joint buyers, taking couples, on average, 9.8 years to save for a deposit.
Dún Laoghaire, Dublin, Wicklow, Galway, Kildare were also most out of reach for sole buyers.
With the price of an apartment in Dún Laoghaire averaging (EURO)523,288, it could take a resident on the average salary for that area up to 88.5 years to save for a deposit.
Despite mortgage activity declining during 2023, firsttime buyer mortgages remained buoyant, accounting for around 63% of the market. Eoin Clarke, commercial director of www.Switcher.ie, said: 'First-time buyer mortgage activity is historically high despite rising interest rates, high house prices and cost-of-living pressures.
'Where people live and work dramatically impacts earnings, savings and how long it takes to gather a deposit, so www.Switcher.ie has developed the affordability index to help anyone who wants to get a foothold on the property ladder.
He added: 'Buying with someone else... in many circumstances, is the only way to get on the housing ladder.'
helen.bruce@dailymail.ie
Where is affordable... and where isn't
Top 5 most affordable places for joint buyers on average income for county RANK REGION PROPERTY MEDIAN INCOME YEARS PRICE JOINT TO HOUSE TO SAVE INCOME PRICE 1 Leitrim (EURO)184,000 (EURO)75,408 2/5 2.5 2 Longford (EURO)179,500 (EURO)72,356 2/5 2.6 3 Roscommon (EURO)201,500 (EURO)78,096 2/5 2.7 4 Sligo (EURO)210,000 (EURO)78,886 3/8 2.8 5 Mayo (EURO)210,500 (EURO)75,496 3/8 2.9 Top 5 least affordable places RANK REGION PROPERTY MEDIAN INCOME YEARS PRICE JOINT TO HOUSE TO SAVE INCOME PRICE 1 Dún Laoghaire (EURO)560,000 (EURO)92,272 1/6 27.9 2 Wicklow (EURO)415,000 (EURO)86,280 1/5 13.5 3 Dublin (EURO)415,000 (EURO)92,272 2/9 9.9 4 Kildare (EURO)395,000 (EURO)90,346 2/9 8.4 5 South Dublin (EURO)403,000 (EURO)92,272 2/9 8.4
'Cost-of-living pressures'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



JK inspires us to speak the truth in an age where being a gender critic is like practising witchcraft...
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 11
Length: 1208 words
Byline: Sarah Vine
Body


JK Rowling has chosen her hill to die on, and it's fair to say it's becoming more crowded by the minute.
What used to be an unspoken taboo - the notion that biological males, with their meat and two veg and their bodies shaped by testosterone, are not the same as biological women - is no longer something that women (or men) are afraid of pointing out, on pain of cancellation.
For years now, a powerful, passionate and vocal trans lobby, led predominately by trans women (for some reason trans men aren't quite so aggressive and territorial: I wonder why?) has attempted to impose its ideological belief that a human male can become a human female, using - somewhat ironically - the tactics traditionally deployed by male aggressors: intimidation, threats of violence, overt misogyny.
What began as a legitimate movement designed to fight back against the prejudice traditionally experienced by trans people, and especially trans women, has spiralled into a vicious culture war.
In their determination to eliminate anyone who stands in their path, campaigners have trampled over the lives - and livelihoods - of many who have dared to argue with them.
W
OMEN like Maya Forstater, a business studies and international development researcher who was fired for her gender critical views and had to fight for years to clear her name; Sharron Davies, the former Olympic swimmer who stands up for women's rights in sports; the journalist and writer Suzanne Moore, who was hounded out of her job at the scrupulously woke Guardian newspaper (also somewhat ironically edited by a woman).
And let us not forget the men, such as Graham Linehan, the writer and creator of Father Ted, who was not so much cancelled as obliterated.
Even prominent trans women such as Caitlyn Jenner and Debbie Hayton who have voiced their concerns have taken a metaphorical beating, accused of being traitors to their kind.
Not to mention the rest of us who, to a greater or lesser extent, have been branded Terfs (transexclusionary radical feminists) or bigots merely for expressing the slightest batsqueak of concern at the way affording trans women open and unfettered access to shared spaces with biological women (or girls) might affect the rights and safety of the latter.
Concern about how, for examopenly ple, it might affect a young girl if she finds herself sharing a dressing room with a biologically intact teenage male. Or whether, for example, said teenage male's intentions are entirely legitimate, given what we know about the desires of young men. Or how it might feel to be facing a strapping 6ft trans girl armed with a big stick on a hockey pitch. Or a victim of domestic abuse or sexual assault who suddenly finds herself sharing a bathroom in jail with someone with a penis who has been convicted of rape.
Until recently, to raise these questions in even a non-accusatory way, tip-toeing through the minefield of trans-approved terminology, caveating every syllable with painstaking care, has been fraught with danger.
Faced with the prospect of being branded transphobic (the 21st-century equivalent of being accused of witchcraft), many women have understandably decided to just keep their heads down and hope it doesn't happen to them.
But not any more. Author JK Rowling has changed all that.
SHE has, through her courage and clearsighted determination, fought back in the face of this Orwellian nightmare and, at no small risk to herself, stood firm in the face of the onslaught. She has spoken out where others would not, and she has used her voice to embolden more.
Without JK, I could not write this column, we could not be having any kind of honest conversation about these issues. She is, in every sense, a trailblazer.
What makes her stance even more admirable is that she didn't need to do any of it. Insulated by her (well earned) wealth and fame, she could easily have taken the path of least resistance, lounging on some superyacht somewhere, safe in the knowledge that none of these issues were ever going to affect her or her family.
Instead, she chose to stick her neck out and take a stand, and in so doing make herself a target of what can only be described as deranged fury on the part of her critics. She has been betrayed by the very people whose lives and careers she helped foster - not least Emma Watson and Daniel Radcliffe, leading cast members of the lucrative Harry Potter franchise, whose acting careers might well have sunk without a trace were it not for her. She was notably absent from a 20th anniversary special in 2022.
On Monday, she took her bravest stance yet, which was to (and with characteristic wit, another thing that drives her critics spare) write a series of tweets in response to the Scottish government's new Hate Crime and Public Order Act, which creates a new crime of 'stirring up hatred' relating to age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, transgender identity or being intersex.
Rowling described several trans women - including Isla Bryson, a double rapist, and Amy George, a butcher who abducted and sexually abused an 11-year-old girl - as men and accused the Scottish government of placing 'higher value on the feelings of men performing their idea of femaleness, however misogynistically or opportunistically, than on the rights and freedoms of actual women and girls'.
She added that Scottish women are being forced to 'deny the evidence of their eyes and ears, repudiate biological facts and embrace a neo-religious concept of gender that is unprovable and untestable'. She then challenged the authorities to arrest her.
N
O one wanted this fight. The vast majority of women, myself included, have absolutely no objection to trans women living in their chosen gender. But when that right to self-expression begins to impinge on the hard-won rights of other women, that is where we all have an obligation to step in.
By making criticism of trans or intersex people a hate crime, the Scottish government has effectively made it impossible to question the actions and behaviour of anyone who selfidentifies in that way - regardless of their motives for doing so. It is effectively barring women from being able to protect themselves against predatory males - and threatening to throw them in the slammer if they try to do so. It is, quite literally, insane.
Whether JK's defiance succeeds in changing this new law remains to be seen. As to whether the Scottish authorities accept her challenge, yesterday the Scottish police said JK's posts did not break the new hate crime law.
I suspect they're 'feart', as my ex mother-in-law would say. But in a way JK has already won her fight. Because regardless of the detail now, what she has succeeded in doing is giving women back their voice, which for a time had been stifled. She has not only shown us how to have the courage to stand up for our rights, regardless of threat or intimidation, but given us permission to do so.
In a world where so few people are prepared to stand up and be counted, or risk their own comfort and freedoms for something they believe in, she is an inspiration.
What a woman, what an icon - what a www.hero.Be in no doubt, JK, us women are behind you.
Fearlessly JK Rowling has succeeded in giving women back their voice, which had been stif led

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



JK ROWLING 'IN THE CLEAR ON HATE CRIME'; Author hopes all women will be able to speak up in favour of biological sex - as police clear her of any criminality
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 10,11
Length: 950 words
Byline: Jason Groves
Body


JK Rowling says she hopes all women will be treated equally by Scotland's new controversial hate crime laws - after police decided not to take any action against her.
The Harry Potter author had dared Police Scotland to arrest her on Monday for describing a string of prominent 'trans women' as men.
It comes as divisions within the UK's Labour Party over the new legislation were laid bare.
Ms Rowling, a prominent critic of gender identity, has been targeted by trans activists who vowed to pursue her under the new law.
The Scottish National Party's Hate Crime Act introduces offences for threatening or abusive behaviour intended to stir up hatred, which in
Scotland previously applied only to race, and includes a possible sevenyear jail sentence.
Last night, the legislation decended into chaos as Police Scotland confirmed it had 'received complaints' about a post in which the writer had named ten 'trans women' as men but said it would take no action. In a statement, the force explained: 'The comments are not assessed to be criminal and no further action will be taken.'
Ms Rowling welcomed the decision, saying: 'I hope every woman in Scotland who wishes to speak up for the reality and importance of biological sex will be reassured by this announcement and I trust that all women - irrespective of profile or financial means - will be treated equally under the law.'
She warned the police that she was ready to intervene if they pursued lower-profile women for making similar comments, adding: 'If they go after any woman for simply calling a man a man, I'll repeat that woman's words and they can charge us both at once.'
Meanwhile, UK shadow cabinet minister Pat McFadden insisted Labour would not extend the Scottish hate crime law to the rest of the UK - despite backing its introduction north of the border. He said his party was 'not planning' new legislation and suggested Scotland's law may prove impossible to enforce.
However, a Conservative source pointed out that Labour had voted for the law, with leader Anas Sarwar saying this week it was 'the right thing to do'. The source accused Labour of 'saying different things on different sides of the border'.
Scotland's hate crime law came into force in a blaze of publicity on Monday, when Ms Rowling signed off her defiant message on social media with the hashtag #arrestme.No. 10 Downing Street warned yesterday that the legislation would have a 'potentially chilling effect on free speech' and said it would not be extended to the rest of the UK.
British prime minister Rishi Sunak said: 'We're not going to do anything like that here in England. We should not be criminalising people for saying common-sense things about biological sex. Clearly that isn't right.'
Asked about Ms Rowling's case, he said: 'It's not for me to comment on police matters, individual matters, but what I do support very strongly are people's right to free speech, and nobody should be criminalised for saying common-sense things about biological sex.'
However, the Labour Party appeared divided over the issue. Championed by SNP leader Humza Yousaf, the new act was backed by Scottish Labour and the Liberal Democrats when it passed through
Scotland's parliament in 2021. A total of 15 Scottish Labour members voted for the legislation, including Mr Sarwar, while only three voted against.
Speaking at the weekend, Mr Sarwar acknowledged that there was a 'huge gap in the legislation' in terms of its failure to protect women.
But the Scottish Labour leader defended his decision to support the law. He said the controversy had been overblown and police needed more training on its implementation. Mr Sarwar said the law would make Scotland a 'more tolerant nation'.
He told LBC radio station: 'We supported the legislation going through parliament and I stand by that being the right thing to do... I don't want us to get involved in trying to police thought.'
But Mr McFadden said that a future Labour government would not introduce the law to the rest of the UK, adding that Ms Rowling should not be arrested.
He told GB News: 'We want proper enforcement of the anti-hate crime laws that are there and to make sure that the right penalties are in place to protect people.
'We will see how this can be enforced,' he said. 'It looks to me like this might not be an easy passage.'
news@dailymail.ie ÷
FORMER Scotland soccer star Ally McCoist, inset, described the country's new hate crime law as 'madness' yesterday and claimed he will break it 'along with 48,000' Rangers fans at this weekend's Old Firm derby.
Speaking on TalkSPORT radio, the Rangers legend said: 'A hate bill has been passed in the country. And I can guarantee you, next Sunday at Ibrox, I along with 48,000 will be committing a breach of that hate bill in the particular Rangers v Celtic game we are all going to. It is madness…There is nobody… who thinks that is a good idea, who I have spoken to.'
COMEDY GIG'S A MONSTER HIT
A COMEDY show celebrated the first day of the new Scottish hate laws with a gig mocking them.
The Edinburgh performance by Comedy Unleashed featured a life-sized version of Police Scotland's widely ridiculed 'Hate Monster'.
The London-based troupe had been forced to try 16 different venues amid fears the law could impact the comedy circuit. One told them they 'didn't want police at their door'.
An audience of 250 was eventually hosted at the Hibernian FC Supporters Club on Monday.
For Women Scotland (FWS), acting as local organisers, said businesses had raised particular concerns about the Hate Monster.
The provocative show featured a lineup that included Jewish comedians sharing a stage with a singing Hitler.
'Might not be an easy passage' Includes possible jail sentence

Graphic


Taking a stand over gender identity: JK Rowling

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Kate's facing debts of (EURO)2 million Things got so bad she had to turn off the heating; She's shown extraordinary compassion and resilience. So, it's shocking to hear what caring for her husband's done to her...
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 24,25
Length: 2050 words
Byline: Sarah Rainey
Body


THE letters ? more than 8,000 of them ? have been arriving by the bagful since Kate Garraway's husband, Derek Draper, died in January.
Derek, 56, a political-lobbyist-turnedpsychotherapist, endured a painful and debilitating decline after becoming one of the first people in Britain to contract Covid-19 in March 2020. He spent 98 days in a medically induced coma, paralysed, intubated and unable to communicate, with the virus ravaging every organ in his previously-healthy body.
After his discharge from hospital in April 2021, Kate cared for him at home, watching in horror as her husband of 18 years slowly improved, then declined ? and eventually slipped away as she and their two children, Darcey, then 17, and Billy, 14, sat at his bedside in a London hospital on January 3.
Shortly afterwards, when ITV's Good Morning Britain presenter Kate, 56, shared the tragic news with the world, the letters started coming.
There were handwritten cards and notes of condolence, all of them heartfelt, and most of the senders had something in common: they, like Kate, were carers. They had devoted their lives, sacrificed their careers and given up everything to care for loved ones who, for one reason or another, were unable to look after themselves.
They too felt frustrated, and financially crippled, by the bureaucratic maze of the care system ? one which Kate insists is 'broken' and in urgent need of reform.
'It's supposed to be a system that's meant to catch you if you fall,' she explains. 'But, actually, it feels like it's trying to catch you out. You feel like you're in the dock answering questions about things that will literally mean life or death to someone you love.'
In fact, Kate reveals in a moving new documentary, Kate Garraway: Derek's Story, shown on ITV last night, such was the huge financial burden of caring for Derek ? who required round-the-clock support from a team of professionals ? that it has left her with debts of over (EURO)800,000.
His care cost £4,000 ((EURO)4,700) a week ((EURO)244,000 a year, over almost three years) ? far more than the broadcaster, whom many might assume had millions in the bank from her high-profile TV and radio roles, could afford.
'Derek's care costs more than my salary at ITV,' Kate reveals in the documentary, which was filmed last autumn.
'His basic need, not including any therapy, is nearly £4,000 a week. How can I afford that? How can anybody afford £16,000 a month? And that's before you pay for a mortgage, before you pay for household bills, before you pay for anything for the kids. So we are at crunch point.'
In an astonishing confession, she admits she couldn't afford to have the heating on in the family home last October.
'It's the brutal reality that Derek's salary is over and his expenses are up,' she said, speaking candidly in the documentary.
'We haven't got the heating on anywhere but in his room. Everything is more expensive. I don't know what to do.'
Kate added: 'I am in debt. I can't earn enough money to cover my debt because I'm managing Derek's care. I have an incredible job that I love and it's well paid. But it's not enough.
'If this is what it's like for me, what on earth is it like for everybody else?'
Add to this the (EURO)800,000 debt incurred by Derek's business, a psychotherapy company ? which continued to rack up running costs despite generating no revenue when he fell ill ? and overall the family has been saddled with as much as (EURO)2 million of debt.
That does not include the vast cost of rehabilitative therapies, including pioneering treatment at a specialist clinic in Mexico last December, which depleted their savings to virtually nil.
Speaking on Good Morning Britain this week, a deeply emotional Kate, who returned to co-host the show on Fridays, a month after Derek's death, said she felt 'ashamed' to be in debt. 'I'm not a carer travelling miles, paying for my own transport, to help someone. I'm someone who is very well-paid, and I feel ashamed that I couldn't make it work.'
She admits that she has now entered 'survival mode' to keep things as normal as possible for the couple's two children. But having been deluged by messages of support, she feels the moment has come to speak out.
For as she now knows, she was far from alone in her plight.
According to the latest statistics , there are around 300,000 carers ?defined as anyone, whether adults or children, looking after a family member, partner or friend who needs help because of their illness, frailty, disability, a mental health problem or addiction, and who cannot cope without their support ? in
Ireland today.
These, like Kate, are unpaid carers and thousands of them are also juggling holding down a job. More than half of unpaid carers are female. In fact, one fifth of women aged 55-59 is, as Kate was, a carer ? a number that experts predict will rise.
Many of these struggle to make ends meet while trying to cope with the demands of caring for a loved one whether that is a child, parent, sibling, grandparent or partner.
Of course, none of this would seem to be relevant to Kate Garraway, one of Britain's best-known and most popular TV presenters, with a reported net worth of (EURO)2million and an estimated annual salary of around (EURO)250,000. So how did she, of all people, come to be so crippled by debt?
The complex set-up of England's care system, with responsibility falling to the country's 152 local authorities, is at the heart of it.
First, this type of care funding is not means-tested, so neither Kate's savings nor salary had any bearing on how much support she received. Instead, she says, it's a 'postcode lottery'.
Once Derek was discharged from hospital, his eligibility was reviewed for 'continuing healthcare' under the NHS, which is provided to those who have a 'primary health need'.
These funding assessments, explains Kate, entailed two-hour visits to their home, during which a professional would apply a series of 'tick-box' criteria, many of which were meaningless to Derek's complicated and changing health struggles.
Doubly-incontinent and fed through a tube, he was unable to wash himself or sit up in bed, and yet ? according to the local authority assessments ? he still was not classed as having a 'primary health need'.
The system meant that funding was temporarily provided to the family, but then repeatedly revoked after perfunctory reviews.
'Derek's needs were clearly so great, yet he didn't warrant funded care. So you think, if he isn't getting it, then who is?' she asks. 'Something has to be done or the whole service, the people working in it, everything is going to break.'
Once, Kate was given just four hours' notice before Derek's care was terminated, and advised simply to call an ambulance and have him admitted to A&E.
Another time, she tried to care for him alone for ten days without any sleep ?- and found it so tough she feared for her own health, so was left with no choice but to pay for carers out of her own pocket.
She appealed the local authority's decision not to fund Derek's care, but says: 'Two-and-a-half, three years later, my appeal is still being processed.'
Then, a ruling last August ? which she wasn't allowed to attend ? demanded that every penny the local authority had paid for Derek's care should be returned, as he didn't qualify for it.
The continuing care criteria decree that the majority of a person's care must involve managing their health needs, not social or personal care needs ? and Derek was deemed to be outside of this.
This is where the debt, which Kate estimates between (EURO)600,000 and (EURO)800,000, lies. With such steep costs for Derek's everyday care, it's not hard to see how even a hefty TV salary and substantial savings might dwindle to nothing.
A TV insider says the broadcaster, who works two days a week on ITV, and provides holiday cover, likely earns just under (EURO)150,000 for her role, plus around (EURO)150,000 for her five-day-a-week show on Smooth Radio.
While this was once bolstered by Derek's salary, from the moment he contracted Covid, Kate had to become the sole breadwinner for the family, and, as a part-time employee, it's unclear whether she was paid over the period she took off work to manage his needs.
She hasn't yet had to pay the funding back, but the spectre of doing so looms large.
'To be fair to them, no one's contacted me since he passed away to ask for that,' she says. 'They may well still do.'
She is still paying a mortgage on their North London home, worth around (EURO)3million, which she had remodelled to adapt to Derek's needs ?including a wheelchair lift, wet room and ground-floor bedroom ? on his return from hospital.
Friends say she now faces the devastating reality of selling the house to pay off her mounting debts.
'The house is about all she has left financially,' one said in January. 'She is now facing up to the fact it might have to be sold.
'It's where she and Derek were so happy and also where her two children grew up, but bills are bills and they have to be paid.'
Then there's the matter of Derek's psychotherapy business, Astra Aspera Ltd, which closed in 2022, £184,000 ((EURO)215,000) in the red.
In a recent interview last weekend, that figure was revealed to be significantly higher ? in excess of (EURO)800,000 ? due to the fact that Kate had no legal authority to administer her husband's company affairs when he fell ill.
This meant it continued to incur running costs, despite not making any money.
Kate was eventually able to become a co-director in 2021 and wound up the company the following year.
That same year, she flew Derek to Mexico to take part in a medical trial, pioneered by a renowned American doctor with expertise in treating long Covid. The trip 'took weeks and weeks of planning', and involved a 28-day stay in a private clinic undergoing experimental tests and treatment, at vast expense to the family.
It was this same clinic that Kate and Derek visited last November hoping for more ground-breaking treatment, and it was here, despite reports of Derek's 'massive' improvement, that his heart stopped.
After 14 hours of neurosurgery, he was flown on a hospital plane to London ? but remained in a coma over Christmas and New
Year, and never woke up.
Throughout the past four years, despite the unimaginable pain and grief she has endured behind closed doors, Kate has remained in the public eye.
She has released two memoirs, The Power Of Hope and The Strength Of Love, and allowed documentary-makers into their home three times: Finding Derek was released in 2021 and Caring For Derek in 2022.
For sharing her family's story so frankly and honestly, Kate has been widely praised ? but critics have been harsh, too, with trolls slamming her for courting the spotlight at such a private time.
But knowing now the depths of her dire financial straits, it's not hard to understand why her fame might have come in handy.
After all, the advance that comes with a book deal, not to mention the fee for a documentary (estimated to be around (EURO)60,000 apiece), were needed to ease the financial pressure under which her family was buckling.
Of her latest TV venture, she says: 'I don't know what flak I'll get. A couple of people [on social media] have said, "Oh, why is she doing that now?" ' At first, Kate admits, it felt 'unbearable' to release the documentary ? made last year ? with Derek no longer by her side.
Footage shows several poignant moments between the couple, including Derek's first tentative words on camera. 'I want to be heard,' he says.
Making this, their last documentary together, was something Kate says she had to do for him.
It's also for those 8,000 letterwriters, to shine a light on the hardships and injustices of the modern care system ? and to try to bring about change.
Choking back tears on TV yesterday, Kate said: 'I'm sad because I don't have the chance to care any more. But it felt wrong to walk away from the caring campaign I felt I have a responsibility for.
'We need this system to change. If something can be done, it will be a wonderful legacy for Derek.' ? Have you struggled to provide care for a loved one? Email us at features@dailymail.ie
'Derek's care cost more than my TV salary' 'I feel ashamed I couldn't make it work' Kate may have to sell her house to pay her debts 'It will be a great legacy if things change'

Graphic


Tender love: Kate and Derek at home in May 2023 ? the house had been remodelled to adapt to her husband's needsCampaign: Kate will carry on the fight for better treatment of carersPictures: TONY WARD/REX/SHUTTERSTOCK/ITV

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



McStay recalls Big Apple fright ahead of visit
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 351 words
Byline: MICHEAL CLIFFORD
Body


KEVIN McSTAY has admitted that his first trip to New York could also have been his last as an inter-county manager.
In his rookie season as joint manager along with Fergal O'Donnell, he took his Roscommon team, who had reached the League semi-final weeks earlier, to New York in 2016 for what was perceived to be a routine opening round joust in Connacht.
But it took a late point from Senan Kilbride to secure a one-point win over the exiles, with
McStay admitting that had they lost, his career as a manager would have gone up in smoke.
'I've gone through the therapy and out the other end,' joked McStay.
'They were super on the day, and Roscommon weren't as good as [they] wanted to be.
'I remember, they went around the 'keeper to kick the ball into an empty net, and I think the New York lad got a little bit casual and Geoff Claffey put out his boot, and it hit the top of his boot and spun over the bar for the equaliser.
'So, if he puts in the net, they're two up as we're approaching the finish. Myself and Fergal (O'Donnell) along with the county chairman would probably have had to resign before we got to JFK on Monday evening.
'And then for John Prenty and the Connacht Council. They hadn't envisaged a defeat - so we would not have had access to the qualifier competition.
'I remember him saying to me that there was no rule for Roscommon to be back in the competition,' recalled McStay, who will take Mayo back to the Big Apple on Sunday.
'Ultimately, you learn from it. It was a winning experience in the end, but there was a lot of sweating before we got to that finishing line.
'I know better now in terms of how the weekend should look. How the programme should look in terms of down time; how to use it to best advantage. You can't take a Championship game for granted, so we've to put full focus on it.
'Donie (Buckley) and Rochy (Stephen Rochford) and a lot of the players have been over in New York previously as well, so they have a great sense of what the requirement is as I have.
'We're going to put out our best championship team and we're going to get stuck into New York as hard as we can.'

Graphic


Full focus: Kevin McStay

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



My twins? I let them eat cake!; After SJP's own mother banned her from eating sugar as a child...
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 3
Length: 424 words
Byline: Molly Clayton
Body


IT'S an age-old dilemma for many parents - how much sugar should you let your growing children have?
Sarah Jessica Parker has now revealed her perhaps surprising verdict - giving her twin teenage girls freedom to eat as much cake and sweet treats as they desire.
The actress's decision stems from her own childhood when her parents banned sugar, chocolate and cookies from the home where she grew up with seven siblings.
Ms Parker, 59, told how it is important for her 14-year-old daughters Tabitha and Marion to have a healthy relationship with food.
'When I had girls, I didn't want them to have a relationship with food that was antagonistic and to see it as an enemy,' said the Sex and the City star.
'When I was growing up, we weren't allowed sugar in the house or chocodinner late or cookies. So, of course, the minute we moved out we all bought a load of cakes and cookies, and I didn't want that for them.'
On the Ruthie's Table 4 podcast, created by The River Cafe owner Ruth Rogers, she added: 'In our house we have cookies, we have cake, we have everything, and as a result you have a better relationship.
'And my daughters will have the figures they have and hopefully they'll be healthy. And they're athletes and they enjoy food and have different palates.
'I hope that they can maintain their affection for the experience and their delight in taste.'
The American actress is staying in London with her husband Matthew Broderick, 62, while the couple both feature in the West End play Plaza Suite.
'Matthew cooks, we both cook every single day,' she said. 'We eat dinner as a family every night. And have every Sunday night. It's just what we do.'
Ms Parker, who also has son James Wilkie, 21, with Broderick, told how she shuns trendy restaurants when abroad, instead taking the lead of hotel staff. She asks them where they eat but they are reluctant to say as they think she wants 'fancy' food.
'And so I'll just follow the employees home,' she revealed. 'I literally follow them home. And I see where they live and their communities and their restaurants. And that's where I go and that's where I shop.'
While in London, Ms Parker is enjoying cooking upmarket Burford eggs.
'There are these eggs here that I'm in love with, that I go mad for, the ones I want to put in my suitcase but I know I'm not allowed,' she said.
'They have an orange yolk and oh my god. We go through a lot of those.'
The third series of Sex and the City spin-off, And Just Like That, is expected to be released next year.
news@dailymail.ie
'In our house we have everything'

Graphic


Close: Actress with her daughtersGirls' night out: Sarah Jessica Parker in New York with Tabitha and Marion

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Pep relishes using Keane's barbs as fuel for title charge; comment
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 51
Length: 636 words
Byline: Jack Gaughan
Body


ALARGER number of Premier League players than you might expect read everything. They see everything. Some even have the MailOnline app installed on their phones.
And Manchester City's are no different - a point crystalised before winning at Leeds last season. Rodri had watched Arsenal beat West Ham two days prior, the Spaniard becoming incensed at the giddying commentary around Mikel Arteta's team and their title prospects.
'They were talking like it's almost done,' Rodri said inside an Elland Road dressing room huddle. 'I was thinking, "What the f***?" It seems they don't respect you guys.'
Rodri is a product of his environment, one in which Pep Guardiola's messaging is consistently driven by perception. He has built an atmosphere of defiance over time; against UEFA, against the Premier League, against the broadcasters, against the general public. Millwall but with the ball on the floor.
They're always railing against something, this City team, and
Roy Keane handed them more ammunition over the weekend. Keane's suggestion that Erling Haaland resembled a League Two striker outside the box prompted a strong reaction from Guardiola that now makes it a clean sweep of Sky Sports big hitters who have agitated the City boss this term. Gary Neville, Jamie Carragher and Micah Richards all copped for it before Christmas.
Guardiola relished the question on Haaland, knowing exactly how he would counter it. He dismissed the assertion outright before then appearing mystified that any former professional would criticise a current superstar.
'From journalists I can understand, because they have never been on the pitch, but the former players I am always surprised at,' Guardiola said. 'Their memory disappears quick. How difficult is that business for the players? It's like the referees when they retire, they always criticise the referees. I am not a guy who is going to criticise my colleagues when I retire, I am not going there saying it should be this or that.
'But if you can't accept it as a footballer, you must find another job or read a book. If you're in the public eye, you have to accept it. It's why you have to get your agent to ask for a lot of money.'
There was humour and sarcasm mixed in, as is the Catalan's way to soften any point, but the overriding emotion in response to Keane was exactly the same as Rodri's at Leeds. Jibes at how Keane, like everyone else, made 'one thousand million' mistakes throughout his career.
One remark about the Irishman's managerial record could be construed as either snarky or sincere. Guardiola has a penchant for purposefully leaving those open to interpretation.
And City have a game tonight against a team who schooled the Treble winners back in December. Aston Villa nullified Haaland while winning 1-0, passing City off the park. Even with Villa's Ollie Watkins absent through injury, Guardiola is understood to have been a little more edgy around the training ground yesterday. City cannot afford to lose but - given the relatively comfortable fixtures for Arsenal and Liverpool - a draw would not be much good to them, either.
Goalkeeper Ederson is out again and City are worried about the extent of Nathan Ake's calf injury. Kyle Walker has no chance of playing tonight or against Real Madrid next week.
Some of City's problems were overshadowed by the Keane issue and that is probably how
Guardiola preferred it. There were very few questions about title aspirations. One did stick, though. Guardiola was reminded of a comment he made in 2022, a claim that the whole country wanted Liverpool to prevail over City in that nail-biting campaign.
Is that more the case now, given Jurgen Klopp departing in the summer? 'I don't have an opinion now,' he smiled. 'I had one two years ago, now I don't have it.'
Given what we know about him, that is hard to believe.

Graphic


Mr Motivator: Guardiola will have City fired up to face Aston Villa tonight after criticism by Keane EPA

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 42
Length: 392 words
Body


LOOT, APPLE TV+
MAYA RUDOLPH (pictured) is a lovable onscreen presence, even when she's playing a materialistic billionaire with no idea how to conduct herself in the real world. In the first series of this comedy from Parks And Recreation writers Matt Hubbard and Alan Yang, Molly (Rudolph) was freshly divorced from a vile man (Adam Scott), and was on a voyage of self-discovery as a result. Her path back to humanity began when she learned she has a charity and decides to work there - which led to a lot of entertaining mistakes and amusing tantrums.
As the show returns for a new, weekly, ten-part run, Molly resolves to give away her entire fortune in pursuit of personal growth. It's a tougher challenge than she expected, but the show is great at delivering her journey with a wickedly sharp sense of humour. And while Molly's been happily single since divorcing her tech tycoon ex, there might just be hints of a new romance on the horizon with the arrival of guest star Benjamin Bratt ... TREASURED MEMORIES The Repair Shop Australia, 10pm, Quest THIS charming spin-off series follows the same pattern as the British original. The first items include a grandmother's clock that's been passed down through the generations and has a lot of memories attached, but is now in need of a timely intervention from master clockmaker Andrew. Also brought into the barn Down Under are a fire-damaged necklace and a toy train. ACCLAIMED DRAMA Clocking Off, 10pm, BBC4 WRITTEN by Paul Abbott (State
Of Play, Shameless) and first aired in the early 2000s, each episode of Clocking Off focused on a family connected to a factory in the northwest of England. Philip Glenister, Lesley Sharp and Jason Merrells (pictured) star in this first of a repeat from the start.
POIGNANT MOVIE All Of Us Strangers, Disney+ WHAT if you could meet your parents as equals? That's the idea behind this Bafta-nominated movie, which stars Dubliner Andrew Scott as a gay, lonely writer who visits his childhood home and meets his parents at the age he is now - they died in a car crash when he was 12 and are beautifully played by Claire Foy and Jamie Bell. They get to know each other over a series of honest, difficult and sometimes very funny encounters, each coming to terms with the past. Scott is also the star of new thriller series Ripley, which arrives on Netflix tomorrow.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 46
Length: 389 words
Body


LOOT, APPLE TV+
MAYA RUDOLPH (pictured) is a lovable onscreen presence, even when she's playing a materialistic billionaire with no idea how to conduct herself in the real world. In the first series of this comedy from Parks And Recreation writers Matt Hubbard and Alan Yang, Molly (Rudolph) was freshly divorced from a vile man (Adam Scott), and was on a voyage of self-discovery as a result. Her path back to humanity began when she learned she has a charity and decides to work there ? which led to a lot of entertaining mistakes and amusing tantrums. As the show returns for a new, weekly ten-part run, Molly resolves to give away her entire fortune in pursuit of personal growth. It's a tougher challenge than she expected, but the show is great at delivering her journey with a wickedly sharp sense of humour. And, while Molly's been happily single since divorcing her tech tycoon ex, there might just be hints of a new romance on the horizon with the arrival of guest star Benjamin Bratt
TREASURED MEMORIES The Repair Shop Australia, 10pm, Quest THIS charming spin-off series follows the same pattern as the British original. The first items include a grandmother's clock that's been passed down through the generations and has a lot of memories attached, but is now in need of a timely intervention from master clockmaker Andrew. Also brought into the barn down under are a fire-damaged necklace and a toy train.
ACCLAIMED DRAMA Clocking Off, 10pm, BBC4 WRITTEN by Paul Abbott (State of Play, Shameless) and first aired in the early 2000s, each episode of Clocking Off focused on a family connected to a factory in the north-west. Philip Glenister, Lesley Sharp and Jason Merrells (pictured) star in this first of a repeat from the start.
POIGNANT MOVIE All Of Us Strangers, Disney+ WHAT if you could meet your parents as equals? That's the idea behind Andrew Haigh's Baftanominated movie, which stars Andrew Scott as a gay, lonely writer who visits his childhood home and meets his parents at the age he is now ? they died in a car crash when he was 12 and are beautifully played by Claire Foy and Jamie Bell. They get to know each other over a series of honest, difficult and sometimes very funny encounters, each coming to terms with the past. Scott is also the star of new thriller series Ripley, which arrives on Netflix tomorrow.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Psychic agony aunt and angel therapist; Soul Guide
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 26
Length: 590 words
Byline: LINDA MOONEY
Body


Linda Mooney is a leading angel therapy practitioner with fifteen years' experience, trained and certified by Doreen Virtue an international expert in this field. Linda specialises in the healing aspect of angel therapy helping people to engage with their angels to find inner peace and healing. Email Linda at linda@dailymail.ie or write to Linda Mooney, Irish Daily Mail, Two, Haddington Buildings, Haddington Road, Dublin 4
QUESTION Hello Linda, Please advise me. My daughter and only child who is now in her late 20's has recently confided in me that she is gay. She left home last year to take up work abroad after she finished college.
Her father walked out on us for a younger woman 10 years ago and has never been in touch since. I have very little close family and those I do have are very conservative and would be shocked at my daughter's revelation.
I have been unable to face family and friends since she broke the news to me and haven't stopped crying. I had a vision of her marrying and and me having grandchildren.
I cannot get my head around the situation. She wants to visit this summer with her present partner and for them to stay with me. Please advise me as to what to do. I appreciate any advice you may offer. Yours truly, N.
ANSWER Dear N, Asking yourself which is more important to you, wondering how your family will react or supporting your daughter, may put things in perspective for you. A mother's love is unconditional and the happiness of your daughter I am sure is of great importance to you.
You have a healthy, honest daughter whom I have no doubt realises what your family's reaction will be, but put you first by being upfront with you. She deserves your respect and support. Wouldn't it be far worse if she was contacting you saying she has a terminal illness? As for your visions of her life, she must be true to herself - it is her journey.
ö FIRST CARD: STRENGTH This card comes to you because you need to know that you're stronger than you realise. You can definitely handle your current situation.
However, instead of 'powering through it', you're better off with an approach of compassion, kindness, and gentleness. The strength that this situation calls for comes from the softness of a spiritual core. Your strength and effectiveness increase as you believe in yourself and your ability to grow. Look upon challenges as opportunities to learn and apply your knowledge and magical touch.
ö ADVICE/OBSTACLE: RELATIONSHIP HARMONY Your prayers for personal pace have been answered, and you are to be commended for your role in ushering peace into this situation. Visualise everyone involved (including yourself) being cooperatiive and openminded, even if particular persons aren't usually this way. Trust the inner guidance you receive, and know that changes are sometimes uncomfortable but often necessary.
Ask the angels to help you with any aspect of relationships that need healing.
ö OUTCOME: VISUALISE SUCCESS 'See yourself doing well in this situation, and have faith in a positive outcome'. The angels want to boost your confidence and relieve you of worries. Part of the process involves holding positive visions of yourself and the other people involved. When you expect the best, you inspire the best in yourself and others.
? To have Linda answer your question, please send your date of birth. The more specific the question, the more specific the answer. Readers' dates of birth will not be published. Linda regrets she cannot enter into personal correspondence but she intends to answer all letters.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Return to substance over style best bet for FG revival
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 12
Length: 862 words
Byline: SHANE MCGRATH
Body


SIMON Coveney sold his decision to stand down from Cabinet as part of a renewal of Fine Gael.
View it as part of the rebuilding of the party under Simon Harris, urged Coveney.
Leaving aside the inevitable calculation in such a decision - nobody wants to be pushed if they can jump first - his observations fit with the analysis that has accompanied the ascension of Harris.
'I think a party needs to find a way of renewing itself, refreshing itself, bringing forward new faces, new voices, new ideas,' Coveney told Claire Byrne on RTÉ.
'In many ways, when Leo Varadkar decided to step down a couple of weeks ago, he started that process.'
Harris as an agent of transformation has become the settled vision among Fine Gael politicians and champions of the new leader.
Given how dreadfully uninspired the Varadkar years have been, the prospect of rejuvenation holds an obvious attraction.
Lurch But yet another lurch in pursuit of the latest progressive trend is precisely what Fine Gael does not need.
Instead, a leader that committed to returning the party to long-established principles that prized hard work and law and order, and providing conditions in which businesses can thrive, would appeal more to an electorate wearied by the pressures of modern living - but also left frustrated by the failure of its leading politicians to understand their concerns, and adequately address them.
The recurring failure under Varadkar was Fine Gael pursuing priorities that not only alienated its traditional support, but which also failed to resonate with the wider public.
Humiliation at the hands of voters in last month's ill-conceived referendums was the most explosive public manifestation of festering discontent, but it has been tracked, too, in consistent polling that has seen the party's popularity plummet, alongside that of its erstwhile leader.
This is undoubtedly a consequence, in part, of 13 years in power, and the unavoidable discontent that percolates over such a long period of time.
But it is also the result of many voters believing that the party has drifted away from them as surely as they have felt detached from it.
At the start of his triumphant campaign for the Fine Gael leadership seven years ago, Varadkar said he wanted to lead a movement that supported those who get up early in the morning.
Cue uproar, with accusations of dog whistles and class shaming.
This was complete nonsense, but that commitment was quickly abandoned, despite the fact that there are hundreds of thousands getting up earlier and earlier, trying to live productive, positive lives that improve the prospects of their families but also Irish life more generally.
Accounts of teachers living hours away from schools have proliferated in this, the week of the union conferences.
Similar stories of nurses, gardaí and other public servants unable to afford to live in Dublin and other cities where they work are commonly recounted, too.
The ceaseless pressures on childcare threaten to become unsustainable, with warnings that many parents are unable to return to work after the birth of a child because families either cannot get a place in a creche, or are unable to afford the eyewatering charges.
This is one of two major stresses on young families in particular, the other being the housing crisis.
Were Simon Harris to dedicate himself as Taoiseach to treating these two policy areas, along with policing, as urgent matters that necessitated emergency treat- ment, then he would be making the decisive break with the past that all seem convinced is required to reboot a floundering organisation.
A more effective jump-start would come with a reversion to beliefs too long neglected, than in joining Sinn Féin on a chase for populist, opportunistic stances.
The main opposition party are showing a willingness to shuck off commitments and previous positions with an ease that is unsustainable, and it would be a mistake for Harris to follow suit.
It would also be calamitous if his party continues to leave vast swathes of rural Ireland feeling ignored, its concerns gone unheeded.
Reality The reality is that the issues causing anxiety in rural areas largely mirror those in urban Ireland: housing, childcare, policing, healthcare access, transport.
There are niche issues around turf-cutting, while the concerns of the farming community are well ventilated, its advocates prominent and effective.
The everyday struggles of the thousands in rural Ireland who are not farmers tend to get lost, though, as the countryside is treated as one homogenous blob.
There has been a great deal of talk about Harris learning the lessons of the referendum defeats, and one of the most important is that those who voted no, did not do so with one voice.
Their concerns were multi-faceted, and were only further proof of the competence of the Irish electorate in dealing with complex topics. People showed their compassion in previous referendums, and last month they saw through trivial changes designed to mask deeper policy failings.
Substance, in a diffuse and unstable age, matters more than ever.
Fine Gael once committed to its provision. A radical return to that stand could be the best hope for Simon Harris.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



RORY URGED TO BLOCK OUT DISTRACTIONS; Two-time US Open champion Strange says Texas will keep McIlroy's mind off Augusta
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 47
Length: 474 words
Byline: ROBERT GORMAN
Body


RORY McIlroy has been urged to block out all distractions to deal with the 'baggage' associated with his attempts to win the Masters and complete a career grand slam.
The advice came from two-time US Open champion Curtis Strange as McIlroy prepares to contest this week's Valero Texas Open before heading to Augusta National for the first major of the year.
Strange (below) believes that will help McIlroy keep his mind off what he will be trying to achieve at Augusta and recounted a recent conversation with top psychologist Bob Rotella, who has worked with McIlroy on the mental side of the game.
'Bob said the main thing for Rory next week is to stay calm and cool,' Strange said in an ESPN teleconference.
'He had this phrase "the mind has to be stronger than the swing" and I think in Rory's case that is exactly right because he does have some baggage coming in here.
'He knows he could have won here a couple of times, but he knows he has the game as well.
'So do what you know how to do.
'Play your own game, play smart, play a little more conservative golf around Augusta and then on Sunday afternoon, if the chips fall, he'll be in contention.
'One of the best stories I have ever heard is when Claude Harmon was the pro at Winged Foot when the US Open was there.
'They played a practice round with [Ben] Hogan, who said, "Claude, you have a chance this week if you look at the grass all week long". Meaning don't make eye contact with friends, don't speak to everybody.
'I think that relates to Rory next week. He's been coming in here for so long with so much on his mind that it's all about you next week, Rory.
'It's all about what you can do, your game.'
Elsewhere, Anthony Kim has spoken about falling victim to 'scam artists' and 'snakes' as he prepares to compete in the United States for the first time since 2012.
Kim withdrew after the first round of what is now called the Wells Fargo Championship in May 2012 and did not play in another professional event until last month's LIV Golf event in Jeddah.
The 38-year-old finished last by 11 shots in Saudi Arabia and 50th in the 54-man field in Hong Kong, before missing the cut in an International Series event in Macau.
Ahead of this week's LIV Golf event in Miami, the former Ryder Cup player spoke of some 'very dark moments' after dealing with addiction and numerous surgeries.
'I'm not going to lie, I was around some bad people,' Kim said in an interview with LIV broadcaster David Feherty.
'People that took advantage of me. Scam artists.
And when you're 24 or 25, even 30 years old, you don't realise the snakes that are living under your roof.'
Kim said he has removed '98 percent' of the people who were around him at that time from his life and revealed that when he was playing he 'had no self-worth'.
'Until I became a father, I really didn't feel that. Now I have a duty,' he said.

Graphic


Tough times: Rory McIlroy has not added to his major tally since 2014

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Semenyo off his sick bed to save the day
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 55
Length: 566 words
Byline: JAMES SHARPE
Body


BOURNEMOUTH Kluivert 79 1
C PALACE 0
IN the end, even a mystery illness failed to stop Antoine Semenyo being Bournemouth's magic man again.
The Cherries' talisman was named on the bench before prematch whispers suggested he had fallen foul of a bug that had swept through the Bournemouth camp over the weekend and been removed from the squad.
Cue turned heads and surprised glances when Semenyo trotted out the tunnel to take his place among the substitutes and then made a second-half cameo, setting up Justin Kluivert's winner.
And oh how this game needed it. For so long, even the purists would have struggled with this one. On a bitter night on the south coast, beneath howling winds and swirling rain, these two mid-table Premier League teams played out a contest that embodied how little they still have to fight for.
Music from the Great Escape greeted the teams as they emerged on to the pitch at the Vitality Stadium and yet, in only the first week of April, neither of these clubs feel as though they will be daunted by such end-ofseason scraps.
Relegation is too far in the rear-view mirror, even for Palace now with points deductions flying around, but Europe is a speck in the distance.
The pre-match Semenyo drama was as exciting as it got for almost half an hour as the best either team could muster was timid efforts at either end by Palace's Jean-Philippe Mateta and Bournemouth's Philip Billing.
Eventually the game creaked open and Billing chanced his luck again with a couple of free-kicks, putting one straight at keeper Dean Henderson and the other into the wall.
Bournemouth's best chance of the half also fell his way, but he saw his soaring leap and header from close range tipped over the bar by Henderson.
Billing, at the heart of it again, whipped in the resulting corner but Lloyd Kelly headed wide when he should have done better.
Eberechi Eze thought he had been the one to bring the game to life when he scored and danced his way towards the Palace fans on the stroke of half-time.
But, as always, VAR was on hand to spoil the fun as Mateta's heel was deemed to be just offside in the build-up.
Semenyo's mystery illness subsided enough for him to come on at half-time as Cherries boss Andoni Iraola looked for inspiration from the forward who has scored four times in his previous six matches, including the equaliser and winner in that remarkable comeback from 3-0 down against Luton here last month.
In the end, that is just what he got. With 10 minutes on the clock, he bullied his full-back down the Bournemouth left and pulled the ball back for fellow substitute Kluivert to smash the winner.
The hosts held their breath briefly at the death when Jeffrey Schlupp went down in the box under a challenge by Cook.
VAR, for once, chose not to get involved and three points went Bournemouth's way.
BOURNEMOUTH (4-2-3-1): Neto 7; Smith 7 (Aarons 90min), Cook 7, Zabarnyi 7, Kelly 7; Billing 8 (Kluivert 65, 7.5), Scott 5 (SEMENYO 46, 8.5); Tavernier 6, Christie 6.5, Ouatarra 6 (Kerkez 65, 7); Solanke 5.5 (Unal 90).
Scorer: Kluivert 79. Booked: Tavernier, Semenyo. Manager: Andoni Iraola 7.5. CRYSTAL PALACE (3-4-3): Henderson 7.5; Ward 6.5, Anderson 6.5, Lerma 7; Munoz 6.5, Wharton 6.5 (Edouard 86), Hughes 7 (Ozoh 70, 5.5), Mitchell 6; Eze 6.5, Mateta 6.5, Ayew 6 (Schlupp 71, 6). Booked: Anderson, Hughes. Manager: Oliver Glasner 5.5 Referee: Graham Scott 6.
Attendance: Not provided.

Graphic


Cherry picker: Kluivert celebrates with Kerkez and Semenyo PA

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Shambolic FAI need another shake-up
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 50
Length: 731 words
Byline: Philip Quinn
Body


IT is five years next Wednesday since John Delaney, all lawyered up, took a vow of silence at a Leinster House hearing which eventually led to his long overdue red card from the FAI.
From the moment Delaney pressed the mute button, bit by bit, new props were put in place and the old FAI guard were moved on, Delaney among them.
Some dared to protest their innocence.
In came independent directors to the FAI board; a Memorandum of Understanding with the government, UEFA and the banks was signed off to keep the FAI financially afloat, while a new General Assembly was elected to represent and oversee all strands of football.
As the Association fumbled in the dark for a way out of its financial disarray, there was a sense Irish football might be getting a second chance at redemption.
When Stephen Kenny, one of the League of Ireland's own, was appointed manager of the senior team in April 2020, a huge feelgood vibe enveloped him. All of a sudden, there was air in the footballs again. The sport was back on its feet and ready to rumble. Give it a lash, and all that.
And now? It's an unholy mess akin to sheep in as heap, as Babs Keating once labelled the Offaly hurlers.
The fiasco over a new manager for the senior men's team is an embarrassment.
It's 19 weeks since Kenny's exit and there should have been an appointment in good time to prepare for the recent internationals.
WAITING for the Euro 2024 play-offs to finish last Tuesday was a flawed strategy, no matter who is unveiled this month, where it's Gus Poyet or Gussy Goose, John O'Shea or Kitty O'Shea.
The FAI's headhunting team, led by Marc Canham, the Director of Football, with assistance from CEO Jonathan Hill and Packie Bonner, Irish goalkeeping legend, have dallied too long on the ball.
Canham is in the spotlight, as the driver-in-chief of the process. After the way he went around the houses before appointing interim manager Eileen Gleeson to succeed Vera Pauw, no one would be surprised if Canham repeated the trick with O'Shea and Co. If that's the case, Canham will have to explain why O'Shea was never on the FAI's list of candidates when Kenny left and why he (Canham) ruled him out of the job as recently as March 4. Canham is part of a FAI senior leadership team that hasn't delivered.
Hill, the CEO, lacks credibility after misleading the FAI AGM and two parliamentary committees about the circumstances of his cash payment for unclaimed holidays.
That the payment was approved by former chair, Roy Barrett, without the knowledge of the board only illustrated how those appointed to govern the sport cannot govern themselves.
Hill should have fronted up for his mistake. Instead, he kept digging a hole for himself, and now he's hiding in plain sight.
His last press briefing was almost four months ago.
Hill has under-achieved as
CEO. He took almost three and a half years to source a sponsor for men's football, and even then, it was no more than a top up of an existing deal.
He bungled the exit of Pauw, backed a new contract for Kenny and put together the largest begging bowl in history to be brought to Leinster House for state cash - that bowl is 10 months old and gathering dust.
Hill has continued to commute from London to Dublin where he spends four nights a week, but he's never around on Fridays when League of Ireland games are played and football people gather.
On his watch, morale on the coalface in Abbotstown is on the floor, I'm reliably informed. It has been described as an 'upstairs-downstairs' regime which won't engage with the FAI's SIPTU workers to negotiate their pay and conditions.
At the same time, Hill has availed of pay rises every year as CEO, plus other perks.
Seen as an aloof personality in Abbotstown, when Hill goes, he won't be missed.
It's time for a shake-up, for new faces, new ideas, and a few smiles too in Abbotstown which is as hospitable as a morgue.
There used to be a welcome behind the green door in Merrion Square in the old days, and biscuits to go with the tea too.
I've been reporting on Irish football events for nearly 40, the wonder, the warts, and all.
It has often struck me that Irish teams at all ages, and League of Ireland clubs too, survived in spite of the FAI top brass, not because of it. That's where we are again now.
Captain Boyle's remark about 'the whole world's in a terrible state of chassis' is as relevant today regards the FAI as it has ever been.

Graphic


Top table: Marc Canham (left) and Jonathan Hill

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Sky high: (EURO)2.2bn terminal plan for Dublin
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 482 words
Byline: Ian Begley
Body


A PRIVATE company has submitted plans to develop a new (EURO)2.2billion terminal that would double Dublin Airport's capacity - despite ongoing controversy over a strict cap on passenger numbers.
The proposal from businessmen brothers Des and Ulick McEvaddy would also include a hotel, cargo terminal, logistics park, office space and car park on a 261-acre site west of the airport, according to 'concept plans' submitted to Fingal County Council.
Dublin Airport is under a passenger cap of 32million, which it is struggling to maintain, and has applied to An Bord Pleanála to have it raised to 40million, with a decision due next year. The McEvaddy brothers say the 40million target is 'short-sighted' and that they could double the airport's capacity for the same cost.
'There is a lot of discussion around increasing the passenger cap to 40million passengers. This is short-sighted and lacks vision for future needs,' said a spokesman for the brothers' company, DA Terminal 3 Ltd.
'The fact is that Dublin Airport needs a strategy based on the reality of what is to come. We are looking at a masterplan that not only meets the needs of the travelling public, but with the development of the Western Campus, a significant economic hub for Fingal and Dublin.'
The new Terminal 3 will be situated between the two runways at the airport, on land that is 'the ideal optimum location for the campus and a new airport terminal', the company proposed.
A key aspect of the plan is access to the airport, the McEvaddys added. They also claim a new terminal will be vastly superior to airport operator DAA's plans to increase footfall.
The spokesman said: 'The spend anticipated by the DAA for its proposed developments and increasing the capacity by a mere 20% is (EURO)2.2billion.
'For approximately the same spend on a new terminal building, we will double the capacity.'
The spokesman said Terminal 3 'will be a strategic investment in Ireland's connectivity and in the efficiency of our airport'.
They added: 'With our plan, Dublin Airport can become a global aviation hub and a major centre for commercial activity'.
Following their submission, the McEvaddys will put forward a pre-planning presentation, followed by a planning application.
In response, DAA said it won't be involved, but wished the McEvaddys the best in their venture.
Capacity issues at the airport have been a source of controversy, after it emerged a number of Green Party TDs made submissions opposing plans to increase the limit to 40million. The Irish Daily Mail revealed yesterday that Transport Minister Eamon Ryan was summoned to meet US Ambassador Claire Cronin to discuss the matter on January 17.
It came after she was warned by an American aviation group that plans to suspend ad hoc flights would damage 'US investment in Ireland' and the 'existing US-Ireland economic relationship'.
ian.begley@dailymail.ie
Wished brothers the best

Graphic


Hope: New terminal would alleviate the current capacity issues at Dublin Airport, it's claimed

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Switch off: E-car sales fall by 40%
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 224 words
Byline: Ian Begley
Body


SALES of electric vehicles have plunged by over 40% in a year, casting doubt on the Government's target of 945,000 EVs on our roads by 2030.
The Society of the Irish Motor Industry said 2,009 new e-cars were registered last month, which was 41.1% lower than the 3,412 in the same period last year. So far this year, a total of 7,971 have been registered, a 14.3% decrease compared to the first three months of 2023, when the figure stood at 9,297.
In the new car market share by engine type for 2024, petrol leads at 33.37%; diesel at 23.05%; hybrid (petrol electric) at 21.33%; electric at 12.69%; and plug-in electric hybrid at 7.92%.
Brian Cooke, director general of SIMI, said: 'The electrification of the fleet requires increased collaboration between all stakeholders to bridge this current chasm in the market.'
Meanwhile, an AA Ireland survey reveals half of us are unlikely to go electric with our next car. Some 53% believe EV batteries last less than 100,000km. And half say they don't agree EVs are better for the environment.
David Savage, Irish vice president of tech company Geotab, said: 'There is an urgent need for the Government to... restore grants to their previous levels and introduce other incentives to jumpstart the market.'
A Department of Transport spokesman told the Mail the Government is confident it will reach its targets.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Taylor's swift to join record number of billionaires
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 3
Length: 297 words
Byline: Sam Merriman
Body


THERE are now more billionaires across the world than ever before, it was revealed yesterday.
According to Forbes's annual list of the world's wealthiest people, the elite group grew by 141 last year to make the tally 2,781, which is 26 more than the record set in 2021.
They are also richer than ever, with a combined wealth estimated at (EURO)13.2 trillion - which is (EURO)1.9 trillion more than last year and (EURO)1 billion above the previous record.
There were 265 newcomers including pop megastar Taylor Swift, with her fortune estimated at $1.1billion ((EURO)1 billion) and fashion designer Christian
Louboutin, worth an estimated $1.2billion ((EURO)1.1billion). Another new member, with a fortune of $1.5billion ((EURO)1.4billion), is British businessman Ben Francis, who built the Gymshark sportswear empire.
A record 14 people are 'centibillionaires' in the 2024 list after amassing 12-figure fortunes of over $100billion ((EURO)93 .billion) to total (EURO)1.9 trillion.
Despite financial uncertainty for many, two-thirds of billionaires became even richer. This was largely driven by the 20 wealthiest, who are a combined (EURO)650billion better off.
French businessman Bernard Arnault, who oversees a fashion and cosmetics empire including Louis Vuitton and Tiffany, kept his world's richest man crown with a (EURO)216 billion fortune.
He added (EURO)20.5billion to his personal wealth, putting him (EURO)35billion above Tesla owner Elon Musk. Amazon founder Jeff Bezos was third on (EURO)180 billion with Facebook's Mark Zuckerberg fourth on (EURO)165billion.
Tipperary brothers John and Patrick Collison, co-founders of online payments firm Stripe, were joint 382nd on the list, with fortunes of (EURO)6.7 billion each. There were 369 women on the list, which was 13% of the total.

Graphic


Superstar: Swift is worth $1.1billionTipp for the top: Brothers Patrick and John Collison

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



TELEVISION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 40,41
Length: 246 words
Body


CHARITY CELEBRATION Andi Oliver's Fabulous Feasts, 8pm, BBC2 ANDI OLIVER is in Bristol, 'a creative hotbed', where Andi's love of music was forged in her teenage years. She's there to visit a truly inspirational character. Jasper Thompson (pictured with Andi) turns shipping containers into temporary homes for the homeless and helps people to turn their lives around. More than just homes, Jasper has created a much-needed community. Andi's party will be a big launch event to get Jasper's neighbours and other locals excited about his charity. For the feast itself, she's going full Caribbean, inspired by Jasper's Jamaican and her own Antiguan roots. We've got our eyes on those incredible plump doughnuts.
OPERATING THEATRE Surgeons: At The Edge Of Life, 9pm, BBC2 TONIGHT at Southampton General we look at the medical engineers who take care of the equipment, ensuring lifesaving machines worth hundreds of thousands of pounds stay in working order. Both of the show's procedures are the removal of body parts stricken by cancer. Norman, 83, needs his bladder removed, but be warned, close-up views of 76-year-old Mick's operation, to take out one of his eyes, are gruesome.
CLIMATE CHANGE Rising Tides: Ireland's Future In A Warmer World, 9.35pm, RTÉ One PHILIP BOUCHER-HAYES continues his investigation into what kind of adaptations the human race need to survive and thrive into the future, such as a retreat to another hospitable planet. He goes in search of a 'twin Earth'.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



TELEVISION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 44,45
Length: 278 words
Body


CHARITY CELEBRATION Andi Oliver's Fabulous Feasts, 8pm, BBC2 ANDI OLIVER is in Bristol, 'a creative hotbed', where Andi's love of music was forged in her teenage years. She's there to visit a truly inspirational character. Jasper Thompson (pictured with Andi) turns shipping containers into temporary homes for the homeless and helps people to turn their lives around. More than just homes, Jasper has created a much-needed community. Andi's party will be a big launch event to get Jasper's neighbours and other locals excited about his charity. For the feast itself, she's going full Caribbean, inspired by Jasper's Jamaican and her own Antiguan roots. We've got our eyes on those incredible plump doughnuts.
OPERATING THEATRE Surgeons: At The Edge Of Life, 9pm, BBC2 IF YOU'RE not a fan of the operations featured in this series, and one of tonight's is especially grim, then tune in instead for the inside story on some of the lesserknown aspects of how hospitals like Southampton General deliver world-class care. Tonight, that includes a look at the medical engineers who take care of the equipment, ensuring life-saving machines worth hundreds of thousands of pounds stay in working order. Both of tonight's procedures are the removal of body parts stricken by cancer. Norman (83) needs his bladder removed, and we learn more about the art of blunt dissection, namely using your fingers instead of a blade. Consultant urologist Vicky Dawson describes it as 'like trying to peel solid chewed chewing gum off the underside of a table with just the end of your finger.' Be warned, closeup views of 76-year-old Mick's operation, to remove one of his eyes, are gruesome.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



The best ways to spring clean your skin this April
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 650 words
Byline: Hannah Betts
Body


SPRING cleaning is not merely an urge that strikes us on the home front at this time of year - it is also something we want for our skin.
Obviously, when asked what the most important skincare step is, I always answer 'sun screen'. I turned 53 over Easter, and a 28-year-old friend wistfully informed me that she has more sun damage than I do. I am horrified to confirm that she's right. But it's never too late to start SPF-ing up.
Still, taking it right back to basics, cleansing will have a more obvious effect in the short-term. Get it wrong, and you can render your face dry, dull, blotchy, spotty, or a combination of all four. Get it right, and everything else should fall into place.
The key to finding the right cleanser comes down to personality: does the formula fit yours and your skin's? Read on to find the best match.
Budget-conscious puritan THE French pharmacy brand Bioderma was the inventor of micellar water, and its Bioderma Sensibio H2O Micellar Water for sensitive skin (from (EURO)10.80 for 250ml, www.boots.ie) is prized by many celebrities, including Drew Barrymore and Selena Gomez.
Even this gentle micellar, left on the skin, may cause irritation, so splash with water once your cotton pad is clean, or remove any residue with a budget milk by Simple, Neutrogena, Cetaphil or The Body Shop.
Alternatively, if you have earned a splurge (even puritans deserve a treat), I dare you to experience this mulberry Drowsy sold out, the bliss that is Votary Rose Geranium And Apricot Cleansing Oil ((EURO)62.10 for 100ml, www.cultbeauty.com). Nurturing craver WHEN more unctuous remedies are required, Emma Hardie Skincare's award-winning Moringa Cleansing Balm (now (EURO)56.50, www.cultbeauty.com) is cherished as a facial in a jar, and an antidote to dullness in one's complexion and life. Users become devotees.
I can't resist Aromatherapy Associates Nourishing Cleansing Balm (now (EURO)55.95, www.lookfantastic.ie) for the same perfumed plumping effect. While Marks & Spencer's scented Revive Nourishing Cleansing Butter in Calm ((EURO)17, www.marksandspencer.com) makes a great budget choice.
Whate at Biome
Sensitive skin sufferer WHATEVER rashes life throws at me, Cultured Biomecare Biome One Cleansing Balm (from (EURO)16.90, www.cultbeauty.com) never fails to set my skin straight. Ditto the bargain that is Bioderma Atoderm Cleansing Oil - which is perfect for very dry to eczema-prone skin (now (EURO)18.95 for 1ltr, www.boots.com).
For those with the most extreme reactivity, Oodee's allergen-neutral Halo Purifying Foaming Cleanser ((EURO)28) is the only choice. Or invest in its Three-Step Phenomenal Skin Edit ((EURO)128, www.oodee.com).
92, list.
Party-slap addict FOR those who want a full face of make-up removed in the blink of an eye, Japanese gel-to-oil tech is required. Shiseido's Waso Shikulime Gel To Oil Cleanser (now (EURO)24.85, www.parfumdreams.ie) is as cosseting as it is utterly brilliant. For glass-like smooth skin, try Sculpted By Aimee's Duo- Cleanse ((EURO)36, www.sculptedbyaimee.com) for a quick and mightily effective two-step cleanse.
Wake-up woman I DISLIKE face washes as a rule, yet I adore the American smash hit Youth To The People Superfood Cleanser (from (EURO)17.25, www.spacenk.com). This 'green juice for your face' is invigorating, but also non-stripping, removing everything in its wake, while dousing skin in antioxidants. Massage in for 30 seconds to reap full benefits.
Charlotte Tilbury's new 3-in-1 Magic Hydration Revival Cleanser (from (EURO)15, charlotte www.tilbury.com) will cleanse, hydrate and prime your skin.
Pore obsessive CERAVE SA Smoothing Cleanser with Salicylic Acid for dry, rough and bumpy skin (from (EURO)12, www.boots.ie) is a face and body cleanser that tackles face breakouts and pimply chests and backs. Salicylic acid tackles clogged pores and uneven texture, while a cocktail of ceramides keeps sensitivity at bay.

Graphic


PRESS Camera Picture:

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



The shaming of MrPerfect; He's the Stanford professor with one of the world's top health podcasts who looks like Hercules and counsels millions of men about self-discipline. So how does he explain being caught cheating on his girlfriend with FIVE lovers?
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 16,17
Length: 2059 words
Byline: Tom Leonard
Body


AS THE girlfriend of one of the world's most famous health experts - a neuroscientist and podcaster whose advice on healthy living is observed by millions - Sarah always knew that Andrew Huberman was in demand.
Such was the cult-like star power of her heavily tattooed, muscly 'wellness bro' boyfriend, who is an associate professor at Stanford University, California, and whose podcast is one of the most popular in the world, that whenever they went out together he would be mobbed by admirers. Quite how much in demand she only discovered in the summer of 2022, however, when she grabbed his mobile phone after he'd left it in the bathroom and looked through his text messages.
The couple were having IVF treatment to have a baby, but Sarah had started to get suspicious about his behaviour with other women, only for Huberman to bat away her doubts. They were just 'stalkers, alcoholics and compulsive liars', he reassured her. His mobile phone told a different story. Even during a camping trip he'd just returned from with Sarah, he'd been communicating with another woman, Eve.
'Your feelings matter,' Huberman, a master of the language of professional therapy and psychobabble, told Eve. 'I'm actually very much a caretaker.' In a later text he confided: 'I'm back on the grid tomorrow and would love to see you this weekend.'
Obviously, this was no stalker. In fact, Eve was an 'ethereally beautiful actress, the kind of woman from whom it is hard to look away' (according to New York magazine journalist Kerry Howley) and she'd been having an affair with Huberman since she'd seen him on a private, invitationonly dating app two years earlier and they'd gone for a swim.
If one affair was not enough, Sarah eventually discovered Huberman - the ascetic who incessantly preaches the importance of self-discipline and who counsels millions of other men on how it's critical to cut down on stress - was cheating on her with at least five women at once.
These lovers for the most part had no idea he was seeing anyone else, while Huberman's alleged shameless subterfuge involved firing off romantic text messages to different women almost simultaneously.
The sensational details about the private life of a very public academic have been revealed in the latest issue of New York magazine. The publication, which gave the girlfriends pseudonyms to protect their identity, spoke to five of the women and reported how insiders say there is a 'darker side' to the American's much-admired public persona.
It is a persona that has brought him six million followers on social media site Instagram and 5.25 million subscribers to his YouTube channel, Huberman Lab, not to mention reportedly millions of dollars by running adverts for dietary supplements and wellness products.
Time magazine profiled him last year under the glowing headline 'How Podcaster Andrew Huberman Got America To Care About Science'. It quoted another neuroscientist who said he was a 'rock star' in their field and said Huberman was considering one day entering politics. Asked by Time how he defined fun, he replied: 'I learn and I like to exercise.'
OBSERVERS say it's no surprise Huberman rose to fame during the pandemic as his intense but patient explaining of the interactions between the brain and the body seemed the perfect tonic for so many people struggling with their mental health.
And it's been alleged that Huberman - who some of the women say could be aggressive, manipulative, ultra-narcissistic and even psychopathic - isn't only untrustworthy as a lover but is also unreliable as a scientific expert.
It's claimed he packs his podcasts with 'pseudoscience', while the laboratory he boasts about having at Stanford - and which inspired the podcast title 'Huberman Lab' -
is no more than a post-doctoral student working alone.
New York magazine's investigation has also cast into doubt his account of his early years in the California town of Palo Alto, where he says the trauma of growing up in a broken home turned him into a troubled youth who got into street fights and had a spell in a detention centre. The investigation instead said it found that Huberman, the son of a father who was also a Stanford academic, went to a wealthy, high-performing school where he spent his time skateboarding rather than fighting.
Its contents have clearly come as a huge blow to members of the 'Hubersphere', the legions of Huberman fans who religiously follow his very precise 'protocols' (all based on strong scientific data) to 'maximise your productivity, physical and mental health'.
T
HEY include ensuring you get early morning sunshine, filtering tap water, only consuming caffeine at set times and plunging into ice baths. And the news their hero may not be quite what he makes out has hit his devotees with the shock of one of those baths.
For while, with his hulking frame, bushy beard and cult status in the macho 'manosphere', Huberman might smack of another over-muscled Andrew Tate, he instead comes across in his podcasts as a thoughtful, gentle and earnest academic - who just happens to look like a modern Hercules.
Huberman hasn't specifically responded to the serial infidelity allegations, although his spokesman dismissed other claims in the article, including Sarah's claim that he was subject to rages ('Dr Huberman is very much in control of his emotions,' said the spokesman) and that they were trying to have a baby. (He says they were only trying to produce embryos).
He also insisted he was not in a monogamous relationship with Sarah until late 2021.
Social media has erupted into open warfare over the claims, with his sympathisers who say Huberman's private life is his own affair clashing with critics who insist it's justified to question the credibility of an 'influencer' who portrays himself as having virtually no vices and who has made personal integrity one of his chief selling points.
Some fans have chosen to see the lighter side to all this, joking that his tips on boosting energy certainly work, at least for him, if he can manage to have six affairs and a successful career at once. Even one of his ex-girlfriends admitted being impressed at how he managed to fit them all in, saying: 'I can barely schedule three Zooms in a day.'
And predictably there are some males who have applauded a man who can keep up such a relentlessly packed sex life.
In that vein, Huberman has earned the possibly unhelpful support of Russell Brand. The selfproclaimed 'sex addict', who denies accusations from various women of rape, sexual assault and emotional abuse, dismissed the new report as an 'astonishing hit piece' on a man who champions a 'return to traditional male values' such as 'empowering lifestyle, autonomy, fitness, strength'.
The ability to multi-task is not widely regarded as a 'traditional male value', but how else would you describe Huberman's alleged synchronised philandering?
The various women reportedly in Huberman's life say they gradually discovered the lengths he was having to go to keep them all thinking his relationship with each of them was an exclusive one.
Sarah began a relationship with Huberman in 2018 in the San Francisco Bay Area, where they both lived, after he messaged her on Instagram.
Both of them 'had devoted their lives to healthy living', but Huberman wasn't yet famous. Both were'
self-optimisers', obsessed with making themselves physically and mentally as perfect as possible.
She says they agreed to have a monogamous relationship but she soon discovered he could be strangely elusive, regularly disappearing or failing to turn up as agreed, even to a 2018 Thanksgiving party at which she'dplanned to introduce him to her parents and close friends.
Some of his male friends attested to this unreliability as they also did to Sarah's claims that he was prone to flying into rages.
In 2021, Sarah's suspicions were aroused when she contracted a sexually transmitted infection, linked to cervical cancer, even though shehad tested regularly for it for the past ten years.
Huberman reassured her she could have contracted it in various ways other than from him.
Later that year, he had an evolutionary psychologist named David Buss on his podcast when Huberman turned the conversation to 'infidelity in committed relationships'. When his guest assured him it would be impossible to have '
long-term affairs with six different partners', Huberman curiously corrected him, saying: 'Unless he's juggling multiple phone accounts or something of that sort.'
The following summer, Sarah and two children she had from a previous relationship moved to Malibu to be closer to Huberman, who despite being an associate professor at Stanford had rented a house in Topanga, a six-hour drive away.S
HE says his angry outbursts became more frequent and that he once told her, revoltingly, that dating her was like 'bobbing for apples in faeces', although he denies he said that.
After she found the giveaway text messages to 'Eve', Huberman reportedly apologised, explaining in his typical therapy-speak: 'The landscape has been incredibly hard.
I let the stress get to me … I defaulted to self safety.'
The following month, the two women connected online after Eve spotted Sarah was looking at her posts on Instagram.
'Is there anything you'd rather ask me directly?' asked Eve. The truth came out in a phone conversation.
Eve reported how she'd also had to contend with Huberman's '
endless excuses for not showing up' during their two-year relationship, during which he'd talked about starting a family.
'Our children would be amazing,' he reportedly told her.
Sarah says she finally left Huberman in December 2023 - 16 months after finding the tell-tale texts - when she turned up unannounced at his home and, through a window, saw him on the sofawith another woman.
The following month, another woman -dubbed 'Alex' - got in touch with Sarah via Instagram.
Alex was an 'intense, direct, highly educated' woman from New York who also thought she was in an exclusive relationship with Huberman.
The three women started an online group chat and soon had a fourth member,
Mary, a 'dreamy, charismatic Texan' Andrew had been 'seeing for years'. Mary's friends called him 'breadcrumbs' for his habit of suddenly disappearing without explanation.
And there was a fifth woman in Los Angeles who was '
funny and fasttalking' but is not named in the article.
Alex admitted she 'felt foolish for believing Andrew's lies' and feared she would find the other women also gullible.
She instead discovered they were all 'assertive and successful and educated and sharp-witted', although - perhaps making them vulnerable to a '
wellness' guru - they were all obsessed with good health.
The group never discovered the sixth woman - the one Sarah had seen with him on the sofa -despite attempting to trace the black pick-up truck she had left parked outside. They were, however, able to pool the text messages on their phones and put together an '
extraordinary record of deception' by Huberman. On a single day in Texas, for instance, after Sarah left his hotel, he slept with Mary and texted Eve.
And on another in March 2021, 'a day of admittedly impressive logistical jiu-jitsu', while Sarah was in the home they shared in Berkeley,
California, he had Mary fly from Texas to Los Angeles to stay with him in the house he rented there in the LA suburb of Topanga.
While Mary remained there looking after his dog, he then drove to a local coffee shop where he met Eve.
They discussed their relationship and how much he wanted to make it work.
Later, as he texted Mary to say he'd been out of touch because his phone had died, he messaged Eve to say: 'Thank you … for being so next, next level gorgeous and sexy.' He also texted Sarah, telling her: 'Sleep well beautiful.' According to Mary, Huberman told her 'that what he wanted was a woman who was submissive, who he could slap on the ass in public, and who would be crawling on the floor for him when he got home'.
His spokesman denies he said this. One of the women said he told her he wasn't a sex addict but a '
love addict'. Some are asking if Huberman can recover from such cringemaking allegations and still keep pontificating about good mental and physical health on his podcast.
If everything his critics say about Andrew Huberman is true, it wouldn't be the first time an internet superstar has been found to have feet of clay.

Graphic


Health hunk: The heavily tattooed Andrew Huberman and, inset, in a YouTube video Alex admitted she '

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



The Spanish chef behind charity feeding the people of Gaza
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 14,15
Length: 205 words
Byline: Sam Greenhill
Body


IN disaster zones there are always people going hungry - and World Central Kitchen's ethos is to feed them 'not tomorrow, today'.
Set up by restaurateur José Andrés, the charity provides healthy meals to families in need all over the world. Flamboyant chef Mr Andrés has made it his life's mission to set up field kitchens in some of the world's most dangerous spots.
He said: 'When you need medical service, you bring doctors and nurses.
'When you need the rebuilding of infrastructure, you bring in engineers and architects. And if you have to feed people, you need professional chefs.'
Born in Spain, Mr Andreas moved to New York aged 21 with just $50 in his wallet - he went on to own several restaurants across the US.
After the devastating earthquake in Haiti in 2010, he flew there to cook alongside families made homeless who were living in a camp, learning from them in order to create proper comfort food for survivors of a crisis.
Since then, WCK has expanded to serve more than 350million hot meals following hurricanes, wildfires, tsunamis, volcano eruptions and wars around the world, including Gaza.
WCK said its team in Gaza has operated there for nearly six months and supplied more than 42million meals to Palestinians.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



TIGHT SQUEEZE; Monaghan boss wary of crammed schedule
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 826 words
Byline: MICHEAL CLIFFORD
Body


IN hailing an epic Allianz League final last Sunday, Jarlath Burns proclaimed that the GAA's great gift was its elite players who are 'amateur in culture but professional in nature'.
As he prepares for an eighth game in an 11-week-old season, Monaghan manager Vinny Corey could be forgiven for thinking that the lines between amateur culture and professional nature have become blurred on all kinds of levels.
For starters, professional sport came knocking at Monaghan's door in the pre-season, and when it opened he was left shy of two of his key players, his iconic goalkeeper Rory Beggan now on the brink of an NFL contract, with one of their bright emerging talents Kyle Carragher having already signed on the dotted with the Adelaide Crows in the AFL.
'It is not something Monahgan has ever had to contend with.
'We never had someone go to the AFL, we never had someone go to the NFL and we went through a long period when everyone was back every year, so it is different for Monaghan to contend with.
'But as I said at the time, they are not the first players to go to the AFL and they won't be the last. I think, with regards to how well trained GAA players are, they are probably ripe for the picking for these professional clubs.
'If you are offering a fellow who is training almost at a professional level and he is playing an amateur sport to play professional sport and he is going to get paid for it, it is going to be very tempting for boys,' suggests Corey.
It raises a question; given the time and considerable resources which the GAA invests in developing talent as to whether the gates of its orchard should be free to enter for others to pluck its harvest.
While Beggan's venture to the NFL is brand new, the AFL has used the GAA as a recruitment base for almost 40 years, one that has become ever more popular given the near-professional environment that GAA players are now exposed to.
However, the very idea that GAA units should seek financial compensation from those who sigh their players is most definitely a place called stop for Corey.
'For amateur sport, it is not as if we own the players or the players are contracted to us, so it's very much an individual choice for players now.
'We have no say over amateur players' lives; they have their jobs and they do this supposedly as a part time sort of a sport for themselves so, no, I don't think we can make any demands of professional teams as it stands, so long as we are amateur,' insisted the Monaghan boss.
A condensed season that has given Corey just a fortnight to pick his team up after being relegated out of Division 1 for the first time in 10 years to face neighbours Cavan in Sunday's preliminary round Ulster championship clash in Clones ensure that the inter-county game now has a schedule that mirrors the week-on-week grind of professional sport.
'It is a tight turnaround,' concedes Corey (right).
'There was a time there was eight weeks to your first championship game from your last national league game and boys went back and played with their clubs.
'That is not there anymore and it is even worse when you are drawn in the preliminary round which we are, so it is a difficult turnaround but we will have to deal with it as best we can.
'I think most teams would now try to be getting up a head of steam early in the year and it is maintenance more so than doing another pre season after the league which most teams would have done in the past when you had six, seven, eight weeks of a layoff.
'I don't think you can squeeze a whole pile of heavy training in now, it is just too tight.
'And you can see the trouble teams have with injuries, so there is no point getting a heavy block in and having five or six boys injured. That is no good to anyone either.'
Should his team go as far as last year when they lost to Dublin in the semi-final, Monaghan might have to play as many as 10 games in 15 weeks.
While he says that his players embraced the new format last season, the old problem of teams in Ulster being forced to go harder and earlier than many of their rivals has become an issue exacerbated by football's new way.
For example, Kerry will play one game against Division two opposition to reach the Munster final, while should Monaghan get over Cavan, they will still have to face two knock-out rounds against Division 1 opponents.
'You are starting in the preliminary round, so there is no guarantee you get to play four games, we could be out after the preliminary round and you've an eight week layoff for the All-Ireland championships, so who is to know.
'I think traditionally it has always been accepted that if you are starting out in a province like Ulster, you are going to have a longer route than teams from a different province.
'It was always tough but the fact the year is condensed and you have all these games to play in a shorter space of time makes it more difficult.'
"We will have to deal with it as best we can" "We've no say over amateur players' lives"

Graphic


Busy period: Monaghan's Barry McBennett puts the heat on Darren McHale of Mayo

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Time running out for Clarets to escape drop
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 53
Length: 592 words
Byline: IAN WHITTELL
Body


BURNLEY 1 WOLVES 1
VINCENT Kompany's hopes of leading Burnley on an unlikely late-season survival charge hit stubborn resistance in Wolves and Rayan Ait-Nouri at Turf Moor last night.
The Algeria international scored his third goal in four games for Gary O'Neil's side as they bounced back after falling behind to Kompany's struggling Clarets.
Burnley, now six points from safety, started with plenty of intent, still believing they might have a chance of escaping the drop back to the Championship.
And they were rewarded when Jacob Bruun Larsen shot them in front on 37 minutes, from a direct but brilliantly executed goal.
Keeper Arijanet Muric found Dara O'Shea around the halfway line and the defender advanced before delivering a superb cross that was met by Bruun Larsen on the volley.
The devastating finish gave Jose Sa no chance and the goal had been achieved with three Burnley players involved and no Wolves player remotely close to getting in a significant touch.
It was also consolation for those Burnley fans at the opposite end, in the Jimmy McIlroy Stand, who had been forced to evacuate their section due to a piece of metal hanging from the underside of the roof.
It was all a far cry from the dismal Turf Moor form at the start of the season, when nine defeats in 10 home games seemed to have doomed Burnley to relegation even before their season had properly begun.
But this is also a Burnley team who have kept just one clean sheet at home all season - that against rock-bottom Sheffield United - and Wolves were always liable to pose a threat.
Sure enough, they should have been in front on 26 minutes from a Pablo Sarabia corner. Matt Doherty headed back across goal and Joao Gomes nodded wide from a promising position.
Then, after the shock of going behind, Wolves fought their way level in the last of the three minutes of first half stoppage time. Sarabia's free-kick should have been dealt with by the home defence but Ait-Nouri was left unmarked and steered a wellplaced header past Muric from just outside the six-yard box.
Ait-Nouri had won the free-kick himself, after a foul by O'Shea which Burnley hotly contested, and Kompany approached referee Thomas Bramall to air his views after the half-time whistle.
The Burnley manager had bemoaned the standards of Premier League officiating before the game and the Belgian remained similarly unimpressed after the restart.
His mood would have worsened on 53 minutes if Ait-Nouri had accepted a brilliant chance to score his and Wolves' second after centre back Max Kilman's pass sent him sprinting away from his marker.
But with only Muric to beat, the Burnley goalkeeper spread himself large and made a solid, goal-saving block.
At the other end, Sa was forced into important stops too - sticking out a boot to deny Bruun Larsen and then showing good reactions to scoop away a fierce hit from Wilson Odobert.
Muric was sharp again, racing well out of his area to beat Sarabia to a long through ball, while Odobert struck a shot straight at Sa from a promising position. BURNLEY (4-2-3-1): Muric 6; Taylor 6, Esteve 6, O'Shea 6, Vitinho 7; Cullen 6, Berge 7; BRUUN LARSEN 8.5, (Rodriguez 73min, 5), Foster 6 (Manuel Benson 86), Odobert 7; Fofana 6.
Scorer: Bruun Larsen 37. Manager: Vincent Kompany 6. WOLVES (3-4-2-1): Sa 7; Semedo 6, Kilman 7, Toti 6, H Bueno 6 (S Bueno 68, 5); Doherty 7, M Lemina 6, Gomes 6, Ait-Nouri 8; Sarabia 7 (Traore 83); Chiwome 5 (Cunha 76, 5).
Scorer: Ait-Nouri 45+4. Booked: Semedo, Gomes. Manager: Gary O'Neil 6.
Referee: Thomas Bramall 6. Attendance: Not provided.

Graphic


Elation: Ait-Nouri (right) enjoys his goal for Wolves GETTY IMAGES

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



We're being led by people we didn't vote for - so let's get back to ballot box
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 711 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


IT was a lovely, red-letter day for my family, one that lingers long in our collective memory because of everything that happened afterwards.
Our ancient, beloved dog had undergone cataract surgery a couple of weeks earlier and after a slow, complicated recovery, had begun to show signs that he could see again for the first time in a miserable year.
On Sunday, February 8, 2020, we decided to take him with us on the short walk down to the polling station at the local primary school.
We put on his lead and all five of us - including our youngest, voting for the very first time - proudly walked him together, something that had never happened before.
It took a while, but his tail never stopped wagging on his short walk back to what we hoped would be a second, happy life. We never walked him together again. Three weeks later, our adored Denis died. On the same day, the first case of Covid was confirmed in Ireland. And you all know what happened after that.
That feels like a lifetime ago now. So much so that when Simon Coveney announced yesterday that he is giving up his role in the Cabinet, I had to take a moment to remind myself that the administration Coveney is leaving behind is, technically at least, the same one that arose from that longago general election.
To say that all is changed, changed utterly is a lazy understatement, but what is more pertinent as we enter the final phase of this Government is just how much the administration itself is changed. Like a constantly evolving Boney M tribute act, we might reasonably ask: is this really what we voted for back in 2020?
Back then, lest we forget, the balance of power shifted from Fine Gael to Fianna Fáil, while Sinn Féin's surging popular vote didn't translate into seats because the party hadn't run enough candidates.
The prolonged horse trading that followed felt like a hollow victory for the potential government partners: a party to which the most popular kids in the class weren't even invited. But that's how democracy - especially democracy based on the proportional representation system - works, and so we had a Taoiseach from the party that had won the most seats, supported by the party that had arguably been at the receiving end of the greatest punishment from the voters. If we hadn't spent most of the next three years grappling with the biggest public health emergency in the State's history, who knows how stable such an unconvincing alliance might have proved.
Still, at least Micheál Martin had the numbers. When Leo Varadkar moved his stuff back into the Taoiseach's office at the end of 2022 - as agreed in the programme for government more than two year previously - it felt, to this voter at least, that the power of our ballot boxes had been distilled. Perhaps I'd been too distracted by my dog, but I really didn't remember the country voting for a Fine Gael Taoiseach.
NEXT week, we get another one. And whatever was agreed between Fianna Fáil, Fine Gael and the Greens in 2020, we certainly were not consulted on this latest curveball. In addition, Simon Coveney's resignation from the Cabinet brings to 11 the number of high-profile Fine Gael TDs who've either scarpered or announced their intention to get off at the next stop.
As a result, next week, incoming Taoiseach Simon Harris will announce a new Cabinet that is likely to feature names that were not in the public consciousness at all four years ago.
Even the Taoiseach designate himself would scarcely have been in the mix had Leo Varadkar resigned as party leader following the punishing poll in 2020. With so many moving deckchairs, it will be almost impossible to identify the electorate's fingerprints on this final phase of a
Government that we never really voted for in the first place.
Opposition parties argue that Varadkar's departure should have precipitated a general election. And of course they would, wouldn't they. But as control of the ship of state is handed to an unelected leader of an unelected party, it's hard not to feel that the democratic process has been undermined by successive shifts in rooms and buildings to which we voters don't even have access.
We haven't voted for ages and we certainly didn't vote for this. The sooner we can get back to the ballot boxes, the better for all.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Why I believe it was wrong to be 'body positive' about my plus-size figure...; There are health implications of being overweight - and it's wildly unhelpful to tell people otherwise I was not happily overweight, I was wrecking my health with food behind closed doors
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 21,22,23
Length: 2170 words
Byline: Emma Gunavardhana
Body


SCANNING the menu in a restaurant, browsing the sandwich options in the coffee shop at lunchtime or doing the weekly shopping in the supermarket might be simple, everyday tasks for most people, but for 30 years I found them confusing and difficult.
Why? Ultimately, I wanted two things that were in direct conflict with each other; to eat all the foods I knew I shouldn't, and not to be fat.
As a child of the 1980s - a fat child of the 1980s - I lived in the eye of the diet culture storm. Encouraged by my doctor, I attended my first WeightWatchers meeting at the age of 11, though that wasn't my first diet. I have memories of 'can't eat this' and 'mustn't eat that' linked to my growing size long before I
TURN TO NEXT PAGE
FROM PREVIOUS PAGE joined WW. At some point during my childhood, I started to eat in secret. I'd sneak a packet of crisps out of a multipack in the middle of the night; slice slivers off cheese in the fridge hoping they'd go unnoticed or snap corners off biscuits in the biscuit tin.
The binges would start with urges to eat those foods that every GP and diet told me not to. I knew what I should be eating, and that's what I ate in public, and I also knew what I shouldn't and that's what I'd feast on in private.
If anyone asked me how much I was eating, I'd lie. The truth is, I couldn't admit it to myself let alone anyone else. For years I was on the diet rollercoaster many women know so well, though I took it to extremes.
From the age of 20, I'd lose 40-50lb every few years on an all-or-nothing exercise regime and restrictive diet going from 14-plus stone, to 10st, or a size 16-18 to a size 12 - and then I'd gain it all back.
But though my yo-yoing weight was frustrating, there was some comfort in knowing exactly what to do to shed the pounds. All it required was the resolve to lose the weight and then I'd go on another diet. It wasn't ideal, but it did work.
That was until the body positivity movement came along and turned everything I felt about myself on its head. And not in a good way.
When I was growing up, if you were overweight and you weren't outwardly expressing your dissatisfaction with your weight and attempting to change it, then there was something wrong with you. This is why I've spent so much of my life telling
I was when I people about the diet I was currently on or boring them with the latest fitness regime I was doing. I used to log my runs daily on social media, for example. I shared selfies from the half marathon I ran and posted photographs from the gym floor - all so other people would know I was trying not to be fat. It was so I had a line of defence if someone called me lazy or, worse, greedy.
But with the advent of body positivity and body acceptance, all of a sudden the opposite became true. If you were overweight and you weren't accepting your body, its size and dimensions, then there was something wrong with you.
For a while, I tried to embrace the principles of body positivity. The movement was formed by a group of fat, queer black women in the 1960s to end fat-shaming, but the type I was aware of was the one that went mainstream and proliferated on social media in the 2010s that claimed 'all bodies are beautiful'.
For a while, I tried to embrace the idea that 'all bodies are beautiful'.
Here they were on Instagram and Facebook, all these obese women who looked just like me, telling me the problem to be solved wasn't our size, but the way the world responded to our size. I wanted it to be true - but somewhere at the back of my mind, something niggled.
For logically I knew these women would be out of breath after climbing a few flights of stairs. They'd have thighs that chafed as they walked, and heart conditions developing even in their 20s and 30s. They were at greatly more risk of type 2 diabetes than slimmer women. And yet here they were telling me there was nothing wrong with them, and by extension me too.
Their message was that I didn't need to diet or lose weight; it was the fatphobic society that needed to change. Instead, I should - I must - learn to love my body and ignore the looks I got as I took up space in the world. Over the years, I have blamed many things for my size. My hormones (I have PCOS or polycystic ovary syndrome, which has a close link with obesity); my genetics, glands, thyroid, even the patriarchy.
Yet for me, accepting myself and my body when I was tipping the scales at more than 200lb (14st 3lb) would have been to ignore and enable a form of self-sabotage. I wasn't happily plus-size, I was wrecking my health with food behind closed doors.
Plus, it seemed like a fool's errand to focus on changing society's views of fat people, something over which I had no agency, when I could focus that energy on myself.
After 30 years of dieting, at the age of 41 I came to understand I had an eating disorder.
It was 2019, and I had just had breast reduction surgery in the hope that it would 'fix' my body image issues, taking my size down from a F/G cup to a D cup. But instead, unable to hide behind my 'large boobs' any longer, I had to confront what I'd been trying to deny for decades. When left to my own devices, in other words, not following the rules of a diet, I'd eat more food than I needed and that showed up as weight gain.
Still bandaged after my operation, I read the book Brain Over Binge by
Kathryn Hansen, which a friend had recommended to me months before. She was in recovery from an eating disorder and had gently suggested the book might be helpful. I, of course, was offended at the idea a book with 'binge' in the title could help. This was how deeply in denial I was.
just 11 went to WeightWatchers
Ironically, I binged the book. I read it cover to cover in one session, highlighting the passages that struck a chord as I read, and by the end of it was in no doubt that I had an extremely unhelpful, complicated relationship with food.
A few months later on my podcast, I spoke to Dr Joanna Silver, lead Psychological therapist at Orri, an eating disorder treatment centre in London, and something she said clarified matters even further for me.
As we chatted about different kinds of disordered eating, she mentioned a variant called 'binge eating disorder', which affects three times the number of people diagnosed with anorexia nervosa and bulimia nervosa combined. She described 'obsession with food, size, shape and weight' - immediately I recognised myself.
I knew something was invisibly sabotaging me from the second I woke up to the second I went to sleep, I just didn't know until then it was this, a binge eating disorder.
It was a huge relief to understand I wasn't choosing this; I wasn't wilfully eating to excess unbothered by the consequences.
The truth was, I thought about it more than I thought about anything else. As with all eating disorders, the physical impact is only part of the issue and, for me, it was the constant mental chatter that was life-limiting. I 'postponed' everything, from making career moves, starting relationships, even going on holiday. At the core of these decisions was the feeling that I could do all of those things, but only when I lost weight.
These dark, self-sabotaging feelings ran so deep that not only did I misunderstand them, it's unlikely anyone would have been able to see this turmoil from the outside.
Joanna Silver reveals that 'a lot of people who look really healthy or normal' are in fact gripped by a similar sort of mental suffering so 'we mustn't get too caught up in the physical'
aspect or be fooled by what looks like an average body size.
Somebody with a perfectly average body size might be struggling with these issues i.e. It's not just the stereotypical underweight white teen with anorexia who might be dealing with eating disorder issues.
Perhaps the most significant mental shift I made, and what started my road to recovery, was realising that using diet and exercise as the only tools to tackle weight problems is like using a blunt instrument. It's like telling someone with depression to 'cheer up' or someone who selfharms to 'stop doing that!'.
I didn't need another branded diet or exercise plan. I needed a strategy to help me behave rationally around food.
Installing that new rational behaviour meant doing something quite controversial in the current cultural climate, and anathema to the body positive movement: I counted calories.
Unlike the metrics some diets give you, which you have to pay to use (Points, Syns, forbidden foods etc) calories are freely available and printed on pretty much every food product.
Like many serial dieters, however, I hated calories because whenever I counted them, I was faced with the fact I ate more of them than I needed. It's also why I hated scales for so many years - not because scale weight is meaningless or unhelpful but because it always told me a number I didn't like.
This time around, however, I found calorie counting far easier because I finally accepted the logic and science behind it.
By counting the calories in my breakfast, I would know there was no way I could be physiologically hungry an hour or so later, when my brain was urging me to 'go on, have a snack'.
That meant I was putting time between one meal and the next and not grazing constantly. I'd always craved foods I knew I shouldn't eat, but because I wanted this new way of eating to 'stick' for life, my rule was that nothing was off the table. I was done with restrictive diets and banning food groups, I wanted to enjoy everything, and calorie counting allowed me to accommodate the foods that diet culture had previously taught me were 'bad'.
If I looked at what I could eat for the whole day, sometimes the foods I'd crave just weren't worth the calorie 'expense', or if I wanted it, I would have it and make adjustments accordingly. I also didn't see it as 'bad' to go over the calorie quota. I just made sure it wasn't a regular occurrence.
Over time I lost weight - 30lbs in five months - and though it wasn't easy at first, gradually these new habits began to stick. But so did something else. The mental preoccupation, the constant thoughts about what I was going to eat next, went quiet.
It's the same way people who are on weight-loss drugs such as Ozempic describe how the medication has quieted their brain noise about food, yet this was by small behaviour changes alone.
I also dialled down my exercise regime. Instead of running 5km every day, which I had thought was the only way to be fit and lose weight, I did three strength training sessions a week.
A second significant mental shift occurred with regard to the 'timeline' I was on. Every diet I've ever done has you on a timeline, working towards a goal weight and/or date. Instead, I let go of any expectations and trusted that if I was consistent, then over time I'd see results.
And the way I charted that progress was with the scales, by weighing myself every day and by looking at the trend over time.
In 2023, after maintaining a 30lb weight loss for nearly three years, I decided to lose another stone, and it's been interesting how people have responded to my new shape and size.
I'm now 10st and despite what the body positivity movement would have us believe, the majority of people praise how I look, with comments such as 'you've lost so much weight' or 'you look like a different person'.
Sometimes, people say, 'well done, you've obviously worked really hard', which I appreciate because it has been about undoing a lot of mental and emotional hardwiring to achieve a physical result.
There have, however, been some barbed comments from people who have embraced the principles of body positivity and who have expressed their displeasure at the changes I've made and how I've made them. One comment which really riled me was that I had a long way to go on my 'journey of self-love' because I didn't love myself in a bigger body.
It's a notion I reject. I think the biggest act of 'self-love', if that's what you want to call it, is facing up to my behaviours, being realistic about the negative long-term impact being in that bigger body could have had on my health and committing to make change. It's not helpful to tell people who are struggling with their weight that they need to eat less and move more. But it's also wildly unhelpful to tell people who are overweight that it's fine to be that way when there are proven health implications and, as in my case, the extra weight is symptomatic of an eating disorder.
There is a space between what diet culture tells us and what movements such as body positivity tell us, and it's one where you can make long-lasting change.
Sometimes though, as the saying goes, the first step to making that change, is to admit you have a problem.
? THE EMMA GUNS SHOW is published twice-weekly on all good podcast platforms. www.podcasts.apple.com/gb/podcast/theemma-guns-show/ id1102982843. Instagram @emmaguns.
Everyone shines, given the right lighting AMERICAN AUTHOR SUSAN CAIN I did something controversial: I counted calories I was just 11 when I went to WeightWatchers

Graphic


Yo-yo girl: Emma's weight fluctuated after fad dietsSlimmer and happier: Emma is proud of her weight-loss journeyMESQUITA EMMA Styling: RUDDY. COLLETTE up: make- and Hair MILES. ED Pictures:

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Why the Queen Mum kept mum; ANSWERS TO CORRESPONDENTS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 38
Length: 885 words
Byline: Charles Legge
Body


QUESTION
What was the reason for the Queen Mother's refusal to give interviews?
QUEEN Elizabeth, the Queen Mother, did not give interviews but communicated brilliantly by deploying her considerable charm and was not averse to playing to the cameras when she thought it might do the trick.
Although she did speak publicly from time to time and always with warmth, clarity and good sense, her reluctance to give interviews was a case of 'once bitten, twice shy'.
In early 1923, she became engaged to Prince Albert, the second son of King George V and Queen Mary. When their engagement was announced, the then 22-year-old Lady Elizabeth Bowes-Lyon, ninth of ten children of the Earl and Countess of Strathmore and Kinghorne, made a mistake - at least in the eyes of Buckingham Palace. She invited a reporter into the family's London residence in Bruton Street, Mayfair.
The interview she gave him resulted in the publication of a portrait in words of a young and beautiful titled lady looking forward to her marriage into the royal family. The interview was short on personal detail, disclosed nothing of any great interest and was so guarded and respectful that it bordered on the bland, even anodyne. But such was the strictness of her fiancé's parents, the young bride-to-be found herself thoroughly ticked off for being willing to even speak to a journalist. She never did it again.Michael Cole, BBC TV Royal Correspondent 1985-88, Woodbridge, Suffolk.
QUESTION
Where does the word 'barbecue' come from? BARBECUE is derived from the Arawak word 'barbacoa'. The Arawak were a group of indigenous peoples of northern South America and the Caribbean.
The first written reference comes from the Historia general y natural de las Indias (1526) by the Spanish historian Gonzalo Fernandez de Oviedo. He used it while describing a scene along the Panamanian isthmus where natives used the barbacoa, a structure made of a raised framework of sticks to store grains and at other times to cook food.
A particular method of cooking involved slowly smoking and cooking meat on the structure.
Compiled by Charles Legge
The term spread across the Caribbean, where it came to refer to the cooking method rather than to the device.
The word filtered into English in various spellings. The earliest use in English dates to 1661: Edmund Hickeringill's Jamaica Viewed reported that animals 'are slain, And their flesh forthwith
Barbacu'd.'
Richard McGarry, Leven, Fife.
QUESTION
Have there ever been novels written by dictators?
ITALIAN dictator Benito Mussolini used to work for a trade union and, aged 25 in 1909, he helped edit a Socialist newspaper called Il Popolo. One of his tasks was to write the weekly fictional serial, which he did with a story called Claudia Particella, published in English as The Cardinal's Mistress in 1929.
It was set in the 17th Century, telling the tale of Carl Emanuel Madruzzo (the Cardinal and Archbishop of Trent) and his long-time mistress, Claudia Particella, whose father is the Cardinal's closest friend.
Madruzzo wants to marry Claudia, but the Vatican forbids this. Eventually, Claudia is poisoned by her enemies and dies, with Madruzzo living out his life in unhappy seclusion.
Mussolini had wanted to kill off Claudia earlier but was over-ruled by the editor as the serial was very popular and helped to increase the newspaper's circulation.
Tim Mickleburgh, Grimsby, Lincs. SADDAM Hussein, the former dictator of Iraq, wrote four novels. The first of these was called Zabibah And The King, which was published anonymously in 2000. It was set in Medieval Tikrit, Saddam's birthplace, and was an allegorical tale about a great king (Saddam) and a simple, yet beautiful commoner named Zabibah (the Iraqi people).
Zabibah is married to a cruel husband (the United States) who rapes her. The King promises to wage a battle to avenge her honour and in the fighting Zabibah and her husband are both killed. The date of their deaths? January 17, significant as it was the commencement date, in 1991, of Operation Desert Storm, when the U.S. began bombing Iraq during the First Gulf War.
The work was studied by translators working for the CIA. They concluded that the novel was probably largely ghostwritten yet had considerable personal input from the dictator, providing 'an intriguing window into Mr Hussein's thinking'.
Begone, Demons, Saddam's last novel, describes - through biblical metaphor - a Zionist-Christian conspiracy against Arabs and Muslims.
Jayne Collins, Chesterfield, Derbyshire.
? Is there a question to which you have always wanted to know the answer? Or do you know the answer to a question raised here? Send your questions and answers to: Charles Legge, Answers To Correspondents, Irish Daily Mail, DMG Media, Two Haddington Buildings, 20-38 Haddington Road, Dublin 4, D04 HE94. You can also fax them to 0044 1952 510906 or you can email them to charles. legge@dailymail.ie A selection will be published but we are not able to enter into individual correspondence.
questions
Q: Who invented dummies for babies?
Q
Natalie Walsh, Brentford, Middlesex. : How is the nutritional value of foods determined by the supermarkets and food manufacturers?
Q
Michael Albin, Blackburn, Lancashire. : Have the Devil's Hoof Prints, a 19th-century phenomenon, ever been explained?
John Radcliffe, Blackpool, Lancashire.

Graphic


Anonymous: Saddam HusseinQueen Mother: The young Lady Elizabeth Bowes-LyonIMAGES GETTY Picture:

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL Arc Design [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 215 words
Body


WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL Arc Design seeks Retention Permission and Permission on behalf of Gordon Harris STrysha Htzmaurice for the development at 85 The Briary, Blainroe, Wicklow Town, Wicklow A67 X624 which consists of Retention permission for partially constructed and permission for completion of same for: (a) Construction of 5sqm entrance porch, (b) Existing utility room to be converted into habitable office whilst raising flat roof to link in with new porch, (c) Rear side extension for office and Utility rooms. The planning application may be inspected, or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy, at the offices of the planning authority during its public opening hours. The planning application may be viewed onljne at www.wlcklow.ie, under planning online enquires.
A submission or observation in relation to the application may be made in writing to the planning authority on payment of the prescribed tee, (EURO)20, within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the authority of the application, and such submissions or observations will be considered by the planning authority in making a decision on the application. The planning authority may grant permission subject to or without conditions, or may refuse to grant permission.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL. Giles and [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 228 words
Body


WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL. Giles and Madeleine Smyth intend to apply for planning permission & retention permission for development at Vico; 14 Dromont, Kindlestown Upper, Delgany, County Wicklow, A63 TF29.
The development will consist of; • Planning permission is sought for the construction of dormer windows to the dwelling, along with internal and elevational changes and associated site development works; and; • Retention permission is sought for: (a) Self-contained independent guest accommodation (39sq.m), which is interconnected to main dwelling house, (b) Connection link between self-contained guest accommodation and main dwelling house containing gym and boot room entrance and The planning application may be inspected or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy, at the offices of the planning authority, at Wicklow County
Buildings, during its public opening hours. The planning application may also be viewed online at www.wicklow.ie, under planning online enquires.
A submission or observation in relation to the application may be made in writing to the planning authority on payment of the prescribed tee within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the authority of the planning application. The planning authority may grant permission subject to or without conditions or may refuse to grant permission.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Zouma rises highest for Moyes to rain on the Spurs parade; PREMIER LEAGUE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 54,55
Length: 880 words
Byline: MATT BARLOW
Body


WEST HAM Zouma 19 1
TOTTENHAM Johnson 5 1
TOTTENHAM have not warmed to the Olympic Park. The last time they won here was the opening game of Jose Mourinho's tenure, with the Amazon cameras rolling behind the scenes to see if his special powers might extend to rekindling Dele Alli's flame.
Turned out they did not. And four years and three managers down the line, with Adam Peaty leading a parade of hopefuls for the Paris Games up and down the pool in the nearby Aquatics Centre, they made the short journey to Stratford.
Could they continue in the best Olympic traditions by turning it on every four years, firing hopes of qualification for the Champions League and turn up the heat on Aston Villa ahead of their match at Manchester City tonight?
Turned out they could not.
Brennan Johnson gave them a flying start with his fourth goal in eight games but Spurs fizzled and disappointed again at the home of West Ham.
Kurt Zouma scored the equaliser and helped the home team resist to a take a point, watched from the stands by his friend Paul Pogba, currently serving a ban after failing a drugs test.
West Ham started in the same careless defensive fashion they finished in at Newcastle, where they transformed a 3-1 lead into a 4-3 defeat with a late collapse on Saturday, and Tottenham's Johnson started in the way he finished against Luton, three days earlier.
Johnson came off the bench to inspire another comeback win for Spurs, which earned him a return to the starting line-up, and he found the net within five minutes here. Rodrigo Bentancur rolled a short pass to Timo Werner who beat Vladimir Coufal with a change of pace and cut the ball square. Johnson arrived in a hurry from the opposition flank, just as Ange Postecoglou demands, to convert from close range.
There was little chance for goalkeeper Lukasz Fabianksi, the only change made by David Moyes to the team that started at Newcastle, where Alphonse Areola picked up an injury. It was the first time Spurs had scored in the first half of a game since Richarlison's double against Everton at the start of March.
For Moyes, it was a dispiriting turn of events after seeing Jarrod Bowen squander the first good opportunity of the game. Bowen has been deadly in front of goal this season and nobody expected such a scruffy finish when he shinned wide a cross from Mohammed Kudus, who had caught Pedro Porro dwelling on the ball in defensive territory.
Porro, more comfortable at the other end of the pitch, went close to a second for Spurs, fizzing one wide from the edge of the box.
Fabianski then saved from Son Heung-min and, as the visitors cursed missed opportunities to ease clear, West Ham levelled from a corner. Bowen swung it across and Kurt Zouma appeared unmarked in front of goal to score off his back past Guglielmo Vicario, the Frenchman's third goal of the season.
West Ham's set-pieces caused problems. Vicario kept out a freekick by James Ward-Prowse before the interval and a collection of in-swinging corners, unquestionably designed to pile pressure on the Italian goalkeeper, were scrambled clear, seldom with any composure. Vicario was required to make the first save of the second half to keep out Michail Antonio, although at the expense of a corner and again, he came under attack.
Bowen's delivery was accurate and Konstantinos Mavropanos won the header, powering it down into the keeper's legs. Antonio was offside in front of Vicario.
It would not have counted but the plan continued to provide hope.
Lucas Paqueta jinked away from Bentancur on the edge of the box and curled an effort wide. The home crowd responded. Their team, after a sluggish opening, were firmly in the contest that was uncertain on which way it would tip.
Tottenham threatened as well. James Maddison had a shot blocked and Johnson whipped another dangerous low cross through a crowded goalmouth without a touch.
Yves Bissouma curled a shot wide when he might have done better.
Then it was Antonio who ought to have found the net, released by a long pass by Ward-Prowse and helped by a slip from Micky van de Van, racing back on his first appearance since his return from a hamstring injury.
Antonio found himself with only Vicario to beat. He aimed low with power but did not connect sweetly and enabled the Spurs goalkeeper to keep it out, a splendid save but one that he should not really have been able to make.
This was the pattern of the closing phase.
Tottenham dominated the ball and searched for a way through. Postecoglou made changes from the bench in an attempt to help. West Ham resisted and threatened on the counter-attack as tbe seconds ticked down.
Moyes did not feel the urge to send on Kalvin Phillips, and his team took a well-deserved point from the derby.
WEST HAM (4-2-3-1): Fabianski 6; Coufal 6, Mavropanos 7, ZOUMA 8, Emerson 7; Paqueta 7, Soucek 6.5; Bowen 7, Ward-Prowse 6.5, Kudus 6; Antonio 5.5. Scorer: Zouma 19. Booked: Antonio. Manager: David Moyes 6.5.
TOTTENHAM (4-3-3): Vicario 7; Porro 6, Romero 6, Van de Ven 6, Udogie 6; Bentancur 6 (Sarr 70, 6), Bissouma 6 (Hojbjerg 82), Maddison 5 (Kulusevski 70, 6); Johnson 7 (Lo Celso 90), Son 6, Werner 6 (Richarlison 82).
Scorer: Johnson 5. Booked: Van de Ven, Bentancur, Johnson, Romero.
Manager: Ange Postecoglou 6. Referee: John Brooks 6. Att: Not provided.

Graphic


French fancy: Zouma wheels away to celebrate REUTERSHead boy: Zouma leaps unmarked at a corner and equalises with his back AP

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



'Wine mums' who drink [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 35
Length: 44 words
Byline: Max Pemberton
Body


'Wine mums' who drink daily are more likely to get heart disease, a study has found. I'm no killjoy. Have a glass of wine now and then. But I worry about the rise in women who have normalised daily drinking and don't realise the health effects.
me, this has writing

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



30-SECOND CHALLENGE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 57 words
Body


START on left with number given and follow instructions as you go across. In 30 seconds, beginners have to complete their own challenge; intermediates have to complete their own challenge and the beginner's; advanced players have to complete their own challenge and the intermediate's.
YOUR ANSWERS
SOLUTION BELOW http://www.30secondchallenges.com

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



89 years to save for a deposit on first house
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 116 words
Body


IF you're considering buying your first home, you may want to think again.
It could take a first-time buyer anywhere between two-and-ahalf years and almost 89 years to save for a deposit on a home, depending on where in the country they want to live and if they are buying alone.
A survey by www.Switcher.ie found Leitrim, Longford, Roscommon, Sligo and Mayo were the top five most affordable places for joint buyers. If both earned the average amount for their county, they could save for a deposit for a property in Leitrim in just 2.5 years. However, in Dún Laoghaire, Dublin, it could take a resident on the average salary for that area up to 88.5 years to build up a deposit.
FULL STORY - PAGE TWO

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



ACCEPTING an Icon award over [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 72 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


ACCEPTING an Icon award over the weekend at the LAbased iHeart Radio Awards, an emotional Cher, left, urged the audience never to give up on their dreams, sharing that she herself had been 'down and out so many times that you wouldn't believe it'. While applauding her ability to keep bouncing back, I'd suggest that the ageless 77-yearold multi-millionaire's definition of 'down and out' might be a little different to most people's.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



AS the balsa wood prop [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 68 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


AS the balsa wood prop door that Kate Winslet's Rose refused to share with poor, drowning Leo DiCaprio's Jack in the concluding scenes of Titanic sells at auction in the US for an eye-watering $718,750, clearly, the hugely lucrative market for items retrieved from the real wreck has now been extended to include movie memorabilia. I suppose it's true what they say: a rising economic tide lifts all - oh, wait.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



AT the risk of succumbing [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 48 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


AT the risk of succumbing to lazy national stereotyping, I would have thought that upright Germany would have been one of the last countries in the world to legalise cannabis. Still, perhaps the rest of us will now have a fighting chance of grabbing the good sunbeds on holidays this summer.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Bey's cowboy night as Cher and Meryl reunite
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 18
Length: 163 words
Byline: Dolly Busby
Body


IT was the night Beyoncé rode into town in sparkling form but could not out-shine the 'unbreakable bond' between two superstars.
Beyoncé is celebrating her debut country album, Cowboy Carter, and appeared at the iHeartRadio Music Awards in LA in Western attire.
But Meryl Streep, 74, and l Cher, 77, stole the show at the Dolby Theatre, renewing their friendship that started on the set of the 1983 movie Silkwood.
Little seemed to have changed, in 40 years with even their outfits looking similar. Accepting her Icon Award from Meryl on Monday, Cher revealed she was wearing the same vintage Chrome Hearts trousers from the 1989 If I Could Turn Back Time music video.
She said: 'I've had these pants for 40 years. I thought we should accept this award together.'
Beyoncé, 42, was in a Wild West leather suit and sherrif's hat from Versace as she received the Innovator Award from singer Stevie Wonder, 73, who played harmonica on her latest album.
'I've had these pants for 40 years'

Graphic


Pals: Meryl Streep and Cher and, right, at the Silkwood premiereRootin' tootin': Beyoncé at the awards in LA

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



BLOSSOMING NAIL SHADES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 128 words
Byline: Hannah Betts
Body


÷
& Other Stories Nail Colour in Colbalt Blue ((EURO)7, www.stories.com) A FABULOUS, titian-blue, for those dipping a toe into April.
÷
Candy Coat Glossies Nail Polish in No. 117 Romy ((EURO)5.85, love www.candycoat.com) A CREAMY, ultrapigmented gloss in a pale hyacinth. Quick-dry and lasts up to seven days.
÷
Essie Special Effects Topcoat in 30 Ethereal Escape ((EURO)9.99, www.boots.ie) PURPLE 'flip-pixel pearls' create a dreamy 'digital' effect for your nails.
÷
Kiko Smart Fast Dry Nail Lacquer in Pearly Comfy Rose ((EURO)3.49, kiko www.cosmetics.com) THIS is a pretty, opaque neutral that just sings a bright sunny spring day.
÷
Nails Inc Euphoria Highlight in Magic Does Exist ((EURO)10.10, www.cultbeauty.com) A SHIMMERstacked pink designed to shape-shift in the light.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Body found in hunt for missing woman
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 19
Length: 116 words
Body


A BODY has been found in the search for missing woman Paula Elliott, the PSNI have said.
Officers confirmed that the body of a woman was recovered from the River Lagan in Lisburn, Co. Antrim, on Monday. Formal identification is yet to take place, but police have notified the family of the 52-year-old, who was reported missing on Tuesday, March 5.
A post-mortem will take place in due course. Described as a high-risk missing person, Ms Elliott was seen on CCTV cameras leaving the Sprucefield Court area of Lisburn, at 5.30pm on March 5. She was last seen travelling along the Hillsborough Road at 5.39pm, driving a red Citroen C4 car, which was found a short time later parked near the Lagan Towpath.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Boy, 12, shoots dead classmate at Finnish school
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 8
Length: 181 words
Byline: Chris Jewers
Body


A BOY of 12 shot dead another child and seriously wounded two others at a school in Finland yesterday.
Pupils and staff had just returned after the Easter holidays when the suspect carried out the shooting in a classroom in the city of Vantaa.
Frightened children phoned their parents from inside Viertola lower secondary school, families told newspaper Helsingin Sanomat.
Police arrived minutes later and tended to the victims, all aged 12. One had died 'instantly', officers said. The suspect ran off but police caught up with him a few miles from the school, which is close to Helsinki. Video footage showed two officers next to the boy as he was held face down on a pavement. He had been holding a firearm and admitted carrying out the shooting, police said.
He is understood to have used a gun licensed to a close relative.
Children under 15 are not criminally liable in Finland and the boy will be placed in the care of social services.
Prime minister Petteri Orpo said he was 'deeply shocked', adding that his thoughts were with the victims, their relatives and other pupils and staff.

Graphic


Arrest: Officers detain the boy yesterdayPolice response: Armed officers at the school

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Calvert-Lewin finally ends his drought to rescue point for Toffees
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 37 words
Body


LAST NIGHT'S RESULTS NEWCASTLE....... 1 EVERTON............ 1 N FOREST .......... 3 FULHAM............. 1 BOURNEMOUTH . 1 C PALACE ......... 0 BURNLEY ........... 1 WOLVES ............. 1 WEST HAM ......... 1 TOTTENHAM ...... 1

Graphic


Worth the wait: Calvert-Lewin celebrates scoring his late penalty last night GETTY IMAGES

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



CANYON CAFTTAL INVESTMENT UPTON DESIGNATED [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 98 words
Body


CANYON CAFTTAL INVESTMENT UPTON DESIGNATED ACTIVITY COMFANY (the "Company"), having its registered office 32 MOLESWORTH STREET, DUBLIN 2, DUBLIN 2, DUBLIN, Ireland; having ceased trading on 31 December 2022 and having no assets or liabilities exceeding (EURO)150, has resolved to notify the Registrar of Companies that the Company is not carrying on business and to request the Registrar on that basis to exercise hisyher powers pursuant to section 733 of the Companies Act 2014 to strike the name of the Company off the register.
BY ORDER OFTHE BOARD MFD Secretaries Limited Company Secretary

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Catterick
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 54 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 1.55 Zoom Star 2.25 Vince L'amour 2.55 The Knot Is Tied 3.25 Eye Of Dubai 3.55 Langholm 4.27 Last Applause 5.00 Impressor 1.55 Stroxx 2.25 Big Blue Boy 2.55 Lexington Hero 3.25 EYE OF DUBAI (nap) 3.55 Sir Maxi 4.27 Artistic Mission 5.00 Impressor
NORTHERNER - 3.25 EYE OF DUBAI (nap); 3.55 Sir Maxi (nb).

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Chef De Parfe required to [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 58 words
Body


Chef De Parfe required to work at Dall' Italia Pasta bar based in 2 Bloom Ln, North City, Dublin, D01 XF21. Must have at least 2 years' experience in similar role. Duties are preparation, cooking, presentation of various dishes and preparing menus. Salary: (EURO)34,000 per annum. Hours: 39 per week. Apply to: Attila Antal at attilapastabar@gmail.com

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Clarifications & corrections
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 77 words
Body


¦If you feel any report in the Irish Daily Mail has been incomplete or inaccurate you can email Corrections and Clarifications at corrections@dailymail.ie ¦This publication supports the work of the Press Council of Ireland and the Office of the Press Ombudsman, and our staff operate within the Code of Practice. You can obtain a copy of the Code, or contact the Council, at www.presscouncil.ie, PH: (01) 6489130, Lo-call 1890 208 080 or email: info@presscouncil.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Club's defibrillator targeted by vandals
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 19
Length: 111 words
Body


VANDALS have destroyed a defibrillator at the grounds of a soccer club.
College Corinthians, based out of Douglas in Cork, shared a photo on Twitter/X of the broken defibrillator, stored at the entrance of the club's grounds, Corinthians Park.
It was destroyed at some point between Friday night and Saturday morning.
Corinthians chairman John O'Regan said it was the first time something like this had happened. The club wrote on social media: 'Unfortunately, [we] have to report that the Club Defibrillator situated at the entrance to Corinthians Park was vandalised and destroyed... Hard to comprehend or understand the minds of people who would carry out such an act.'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



COSMETIC CRAVING
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 118 words
Byline: Hannah Betts
Body


WHEN make-up artist Val Garland calls something a 'game-changer', you can believe it - and she has recently been singing the praises of this wonder.
A single sweep of L'Oréal Paris Volume Million Lashes Panorama Mascara (now (EURO)14.79, www.boots.ie) delivers instant, exquisitely curved impact across the entire length of the lash, the equivalent of 1.4 times bigger eyes; no painstaking building and shaping required.
The secret is the brand's patented 'stretch-flex' formula and multi-level bristle brush, which work together to create a fabulous, fully fanned-out, Bambi effect.
Plus, it feels lightweight, doesn't smudge, lasts well over 24 hours, and yet is easy to remove. All hail, the perfect lash lifter!

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



DESIGN DOUBLES; This week DOUBLE HEART EARRINGS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 34
Length: 84 words
Byline: EMMA MESQUITA
Body


THE Wollenberg sisters have created the perfect accessory to add to your spring wardrobe. These lightweight 14kt Gold Vermeil heart earrings are not only chic but eyecatching and modern too ((EURO)230, www.otiumberg.com).
BLOWOUT
'd get
IF you're a magpie for gold jewellery but can't justify the price, Kiki & Co have you covered. These are the perfect earrings to take you from day to night for just £9.99. The simple design is fit for many occasions, no matter the season ((EURO)11.95, www.kiwiandco.co.uk).

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



DR MAX PRESCRIBES... KIWI FRUIT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 35
Length: 67 words
Byline: Max Pemberton
Body


A RECENT study in the British Journal of Nutrition compared the effects on mood, sleep and activity levels in people given either vitamin C-rich kiwi fruit, supplements or a placebo every day. It found those eating the kiwi reported the most improvements - and in just four days. The people on supplements had only marginal mood improvements up until day 12, when their vitamin C was at an optimal level.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



DUBUN CITY COUNCIL - Jennifer [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 124 words
Body


DUBUN CITY COUNCIL - Jennifer & Mark Mills intend to apply tor planning permission at 97 Comb Road, Terenure, Dublin 6W, D6W F767 for the construction of a single storey extension at the front, a change to the finish of the front facade of the existing house and a widening of the existing vehicular driveway entrance. The Planning Application may be inspected or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy at the offices Dublin City Council during its public opening hours and a submission or observation in relation to the application may be made to the Planning Authority in writing on payment of the prescribed fee within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the authority of the application.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



DUBUN CITY COUNCIL Paul Begley [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 125 words
Body


DUBUN CITY COUNCIL Paul Begley intends to apply for planning permission to amend previously permitted development Reg. Ref 4913/23 by the omission of the 1 No rooflight to the front (east) elevation and its replacement with 2 No new rooflights in different locations on the same elevation all at No 27 Brookfield,Kimmage, Dublin 12 The planning application may be inspected or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy at the offices of Dublin City Council during its public opening hours and a submission or observation in relation to the application may be made to the authority in writing on payment of the prescribed fee within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the authority of the application.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Duff is doing a great job
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 50
Length: 179 words
Byline: Philip Quinn
Body


AFTER a drab duel finished scoreless on Monday, Damien Duff made a beeline for the Riverside Stand at Tolka Park to acknowledge the support from the Shelbourne diehards. For Duff, 0-0 against Derry City was a decent afternoon's work, especially with a cluster of his players low on energy due to a tummy bug in the camp.
The first series of Premier Division games wraps up on Friday with Shels away to Drogheda, where they clinched fourth place on the final day last season, which ultimately secured a return to UEFA club competition. This time a year ago, Shels had nine points from eight games. Now, they have 20. By any metric, it has been an astonishing improvement. The Reds are eight points clear of Sligo Rovers, Derry City and Shamrock Rovers - the latter have a game in hand.
As it stands, Shelbourne are the most likely team to halt the Hoops' drive for five. They may not be as fluent in the final third as Rovers, but their defence is miser tight. Duff, bizarrely snubbed by the FAI in their protracted search for a new Republic of Ireland manager, is doing some job.

Graphic


Good work: Damien Duff

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Enis Takeaway Limited, UNFT 6, [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 52 words
Body


Enis Takeaway Limited, UNFT 6, IDEAL SHOPPING CENTRE, CURRYHILLS, PROSPEROUS, CO KILDARE, W91 HT35 is looking to recruit a Chef De Parte (2 positions available) to work in busy place, work 39 hours per week and salary between 30,000-35000 Euro per annum please send in CV by post or email at enistakeaway@gmail.com

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



FINGAL COUNTY COUNCIL Planning permission [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 193 words
Body


FINGAL COUNTY COUNCIL Planning permission is being sought for the provision of collapsible road bollards to be located adjacent to 18/19 Seamount Abbey , Malahide Co Dublin, the bollards will remove vehicular access and retain pedestrian access connecting between Seamount Abbey and Seamount Rise Residential Development. Applicants: Seamount Abbey Residents Association.
The planning application may be inspected, or purchased, at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy, at the offices of the Planning Authority, Fingal County Council, County Hall, Swords, Co. Dublin, between the hours of 9.00 and 16.00, from Monday to Friday (excluding bank holidays), and that a submission or observation in relation to the application may be made to the Authority in writing on payment of the prescribed fee ((EURO)20) within the period of five weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the Authority of the application, and such submissions or observations will be considered by the Planning Authority in making a decision on the application. The Planning Authority may grant permission subject to or without conditions, or may refuse to grant permission.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Following persons have applied for [...]; PUBLIC NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 153 words
Body


Following persons have applied for the solemnization of their marriage at Embassy of India, Dublin. Anybody objecting to the same may contact the Embassy within one month from the date of this notice by email cons.
dublin@mea.gov.in/letters/telephone calls (00353-1-2060932,00353-1-2060946). Bridegroom: Rohit Kumar S/O Ramanand Lai Karn, Date/ Place of Birth: 06/02/1986, Bangalore, Karnataka. Indian Address: # 13, Sheena Villa, 255/1, 8th Cross, Manjunathnagar, Bengaluru- 560016, Karnataka, India. Ireland Address: Apt130, The Daman Building, HSQ, St. Johns Rd West, Dublin 8, D08KW53. Civil status: Unmarried. Bride: Jaspreet Kaur Dullat, D/O Sukhwinder Singh Dullat, Date/ Place of Birth: 28/04/1987 Chandigarh, Chandigarh. Indian Address: VII. Santokhpura, P/O Bhalwan, Sangrur- 148001, Punjab, India. Ireland Address: Apt 130, The Dargan Building, HSQ, St Johns Rd West, Dublin 8, D08KW53. Civil status: Unmarried.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



GET YOUR BRILLIANT DIGITAL EDITION [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 9 words
Body


GET YOUR BRILLIANT DIGITAL EDITION www.mailsubscriptions.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Heading for the escape pod! Tommy and friends call time on online show
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 5
Length: 160 words
Byline: Olivia Fahy
Body


HE has become the nation's favourite RTÉ broadcaster, but Tommy Tiernan - along with collaborators Hector Ó hEochagáin and Laurita Blewitt - have called time on their popular podcast.
The trio announced on social media that, due to scheduling conflicts, they're ceasing production on their Tommy, Hector & Laurita Podcast, also known as the 'Henhouse'.
They said their post-lockdown lives were too busy, making it difficult to organise the recordings. Tommy, 54, said: 'Thank you so much for listening to us over the past few years, and a thousand thank yous to Hector and Laurita for making me laugh more than anybody else has ever.'
The podcast had hit one million streams in January 2023, but in March of last year, the trio announced the collaboration was taking a break for six months. Each took time to focus on their own projects before the podcast returned last September.
The last episode was released on March 7 of this year, and was titled Tallaght Llama.

Graphic


Jokers: Hector, Tommy and Laurita are ending the podcast

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Health Care Assistants required at [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 157 words
Body


Health Care Assistants required at Heritage Homecare Ltd, located at 13 Clarinda Park North, Dun Laoghaire, Co Dublin.These roles are within domiciliary services and based within the South Dublin community. Duties and responsibilities include: Assisting clients with personal and practical needs, monitoring clients health & well-being, assistance with activities of daily living such as shopping, housework, meal preparation and feeding, medication prompting, transferring clients with poor mobility using the hoist and assistance with short walk, ensuring client safety through a high level of observation skills, accurate recording & reporting. Must have experience in a similar role, knowledge of the healthcare system an advantage. Must also have a QQI Level 5 healthcare qualification in progress or completed or healthcare related degree. Salary (EURO)30,000 per Anum. Hours: 39 per week. Apply to: jobs® www.heritagehomecare.ie/01-2987655.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Healthcare Assistant - Larissa Lodge [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 51 words
Body


Healthcare Assistant - Larissa Lodge Nursing Home, Gleann Tain, Camamogagh Upper, Letterkenny, Co. Donegal, Ireland. Contribute to and enhance the quality of resident activities, events, and high-quality personal care. (EURO)27k P/A, 39 hrs P/W. To apply: send your CV and cover letter to linda@larissalodge.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Healthcare Assistant - Lodge Nursing [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 47 words
Body


Healthcare Assistant - Lodge Nursing Home, Main Street, Shinrone, Birr, Co. Offaly, Ireland. Contribute to and enhance the quality of resident activities, events, and high-quality personal care. (EURO)27k P/A, 39 hrs P/W. To apply: send your CV and cover letter to ann@ealgalodge.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Healthcare Assistant - Tinnypark Nursing [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 46 words
Body


Healthcare Assistant - Tinnypark Nursing Home, N76, Derdimus, Co Kilkenny, Ireland. Contribute to and enhance the quality of resident activities, events, and high-quality personal care. (EURO)27k P/A, 39 hrs P/W. To apply: send your CV and cover letter to admin www.atinnypark.com

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Healthcare Assistant- Oaklodge Nursing Home, [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 48 words
Body


Healthcare Assistant- Oaklodge Nursing Home, Churchtown South, Cloyne, P25 FF88, Ireland. Contribute to and enhance the quality of resident activities, events, and highquality personal care. (EURO)27k P/A, 39 hrs PA/V. TO apply: send your CV and cover letter to ops@oaklodgenursinghome.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Healthcare Assistant- Sllvergrove Nursing Home, [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 47 words
Body


Healthcare Assistant- Sllvergrove Nursing Home, Main St, Clonee, Co Meath, Ireland. Contribute to and enhance the quality of resident activities, events, and high-quality personal care. (EURO)27k P/A, 39 hrs P/W. To apply: send your CV and cover letter to irvfo@silvergrovenursinghome.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



HIP-HOP DISH OF THE NIGHT: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 43 words
Byline: CHRISTOPHER STEVENS
Body


HIP-HOP DISH OF THE NIGHT: Caterer Vickz, private chef to music stars, was tempting supermarket buyers with her mac and cheese plus slow-cooked ribs, on Aldi's Next Big Thing (Ch4). Since her clientele includes rapper Stormzy, shouldn't she serve that in a wrap?

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Horticulture Workers wanted to work [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 68 words
Body


Horticulture Workers wanted to work full time at Sillis Green Veg, Sillis, Glaslough, Co. Monaghan. 39 hour week. Salary (EURO)30,000.
Horticulture workers wanted to work full time on the grounds of a busy vegetable processing plant in North Monaghan. Under the direction of a supervisor, horticulture works will include, but not limited to the growing of plants and crops. Apply with CV to aine@sillisprepveg.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



hotspots
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 44 words
Body


WORK WHISPER RUSSCO (Catterick, 3.55) WEIGHTING GAME JOHN KIRKUP (Catterick, 5.00) Down 16lb from last winning mark. BURNT FINGERS CARD SHARK (Kempton, 4.50)
CAPTAIN HEATH TRIO CRACKER STAR (nap) (Kempton, 8.30) BRIONI (nb) (Kempton, 4.50) ZOOM STAR (Catterick, 1.55)

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



I'm begging you, please skip Beyoncé's Jolene
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 131 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


MY PERSONAL jukebox jury is still out on Beyoncé's country album, but I confess can't stand the version of Jolene by Queen Bey, left. Dolly Parton's song is one of the best ever written - its plaintive, desperate plea from a woman on her knees to a rival is spellbindingly sad. Swapping out 'I'm begging of you please don't take my man' for 'I'm warning you, don't come for my man', and switching 'please don't take him just because you can' to 'don't take the chance because you think you can', might be bringing empowerment to the party, but it does so at the cost of the original's raw emotional power. Parton has endorsed the cover, but I can't imagine many people talking about this misfiring Jolene in their sleep. A devastating line that is also, sadly, erased by Beyoncé's version.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



In the Matter of the [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 124 words
Body


In the Matter of the COMFANIES ACT, 2014 and In the Matter of EDWARD FAUL NUGENT LIMITED (In Voluntary Liquidation) NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN pursuant to Sections 706 & 707 of the Companies Act 2014 that a Final Meeting of the Creditors of the Company will be held remotely from Carrick House, 49 Rtzwilliam Square, Dublin 2 on the 30th day of April 2024 at 11:30 p.m. to transact the following ordinary business of the Company: To pass the below resolutions: 1. To receive and consider the accounts of the Liquidator of his acts and dealings and conduct of the winding up.
2. To approve the liquidator's fees 3. The books, accounts and documents of the Company and the Liquidator may be disposed of 6 years following the dissolution of the Company.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



IN THE MATTER OFTHE COMFANIES [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 142 words
Body


IN THE MATTER OFTHE COMFANIES ACT 2014 In the matter of ROCKSOLVERS LIMFTED SHAREWATCH LIMITED SMA CONSTRUCTION LIMITED SPOCTA LIMITED NOTICE is hereby given pursuant to Section 680 & 706 of the Companies Act, 2014 that the Final Meeting of creditors of the above named Companies will be held on the 30th Day of April 2024 at 46, St Mary's Road, Midleton, Co. Cork. Creditors meetings shall start 10 minutes after the members meetings. Members meetings as follows: Rocksolvers Ltd. At 9.00am, Sharewatch Ltd. At 9.20am, SMA Construction Ltd. At 9.40am, Spocla Ltd. At 10.00am for the purposes mentioned in the said Section and also to determine pursuant to section 707 of the Companies Act 2014 the manner in which the books, accounts and papers of the company and of the Liquidator shall be disposed of.
Gerard Murphy, Liquidator Dated the 30th March 2024

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



IN THE MATTER OFTHE COMPANIES [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 168 words
Body


IN THE MATTER OFTHE COMPANIES ACT 2014 AND IN THE MATTER OF (HOC) HAIRDESSING LIMFTED Notice is hereby given pursuant to Section 587(6) of the Companies Act 2014 that a meeting of the creditors of the above named company will be held remotely by Zoom conferencing facilities on the 15th April 2024 at 10.00 a.m. for the purposes mentioned in Sections 588 and 667 of the said Act. In order ID comply with current government and health care advice during the Coyid - 19 pandemic a physical meeting of creditors should not lake place. In view of this the meeting will be held remotely by Zoom conferencing facilities. The company shall nominate Barry Forrest of Forrest & Co as Liquidator of the company. Any creditor that wishes to attend the remote meeting as set out above must email conlacthocltd@gmail.comnotlaterthan4.00p.m.on the 14th April 2024 to seek remote access details. Under S.587(3)(ab) the creditors have the power to appoint a committee of inspection.
By Order of the Board. Dated 3rd April 2024

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Itoje fit for Sarries' French showdown; RUGBY UNION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 47
Length: 128 words
Byline: Alex Bywater
Body


MARO ITOJE is set to return from injury for Saracens' Champions Cup showdown with Bordeaux. Itoje missed games against Harlequins and Northampton due to a minor knee issue which came on the back of him featuring heavily in England's Six Nations campaign. But the second row is back in training and poised to start his team's last-16 trip to France on Saturday. 'He should be fine for selection, he has been training this week,' Saracens assistant coach Kevin Sorrell said of Itoje. 'He has experience of games in hostile environments, whipped-up crowds. It is good having a senior player back.' Meanwhile, Saracens have agreed to sign Crusaders' Fergus Burke as Owen Farrell's replacement, The New Zealand-born playmaker, 24, qualifies to play for England and Scotland.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Keep children safe from predators by not giving them phones
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 12
Length: 195 words
Byline: SHANE MCGRATH
Body


THE risks posed by AI, the threat of the far right and the pressures facing teachers around housing all made headlines in conference week.
There was no contribution more chilling, or in need of urgent attention, than the one from the Minister for Education to the INTO conference on Easter Monday.
Norma Foley related to delegates information from Coimisiún na Meán about algorithms deployed by social media companies which aim to keep children online for as long as possible.
The regulator also told her of a 'sharp rise' in compromising images of a sexual nature among seven to 10 year olds. Yet it was reported last week that a number of companies, including X, Amazon and Snapchat, did not take up invitations to meet the minister in February.
Those that did attend that meeting refused to commit to the introduction of measures, including age verification, designed to safeguard children online.
A far tougher stance towards social media companies is clearly required, but even more necessary is much more vigilance from www.parents.No adult should leave a seven-year-old child vulnerable to the grotesque dangers lurking online.
Giving kids phones is easy, and disastrous.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



KEMPTON RTV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 63 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 4.50 Brioni 5.25 Screaming Eagle 6.00 Winter Snowfall 6.30 Celtic Warrior 7.00 Hickory 7.30 She's Centimental 8.00 DARK DREAMER (nap) 8.30 Maxim De Winter (nb)
4.50 Jayyash (nb) 5.25 Screaming Eagle 6.00 Winter Snowfall 6.30 Rogue Encore 7.00 Kiwano 7.30 Miss Moonshine 8.00 Whiteley Way 8.30 Waldora
NEWMARKET - 6.30 ROGUE ENCORE (nap); 7.00 Hickory (nb).

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Life's LITTLE luxuries LUGGAGE LABELS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 23
Length: 1 words

Graphic


Styling: LIZ HEMMINGScom selfridges. £15, Samsonite,com aspinaloflondon. (EURO)50, Saffiano,(EURO)70, line, com luggage LGP longchamp.Diabolo, (EURO)650, www.cartier.com

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Meaning of friendship; LET TERS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 177 words
Body


FRIENDSHIPS are one of the most important things in life.
Jobs, cities and circumstances change but true friends are constant. As the late, great Muhammad Ali said: 'Friendship is the hardest thing in the world to explain. It's not something you learn in school, but if you haven't learned the meaning of friendship, you really haven't learned anything.' So it's devastating when a friend lets you down.
The so-called friend is going for a highly respected position so thought it best to cut ties. You find you are surplus to requirements. 'Why?' you ponder, keeping the hurt and tears at www.bay.No reason given, no explanation sought. There is just a huge sadness which is yours alone.
She wasn't a true friend. In your mind's eye you saw the fun, laughter and loyalty. You have no regrets. You were yourself, and maybe that was the problem.
It's worth noting the most valuable antiques are dear old friends. True friends are like big knickers: full of support, with comfort like no other, and they cover your a***s when you need them.
JACQUIE CONNOLLY, Foxrock, Dublin.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Murphy to miss Craven Meeting over whip rule
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 153 words
Byline: EOGHAN O'BRIEN
Body


OISÍN MURPHY has announced he will miss the Craven Meeting after breaking the whip rules at Newcastle on Good Friday.
The rider said he was found to have used his whip once more than the permitted six strikes when beaten just over five lengths in fifth aboard Vaguely Royal in the BetUK All-Weather Championships Marathon Handicap.
Murphy's initial penalty was four days, but the value of the race means it is doubled to eight days, although he had two days deducted in recognition of his previous good conduct. In a post on X, Murphy said: ' I've picked up a six-day suspension for one strike too many on Vaguely Royal on Good Friday when finishing fifth in the Marathon.
' This was a genuine mistake and I didn't purposely use my whip once more than permitted. As the race was worth £150k total prize money, my suspension should've been eight days but the fact I've not been suspended for a whip breach in over 200 rides.'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Nesbitt's Northern thriller gets bullet after two seasons
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 19
Length: 160 words
Body


JAMES Nesbitt's BBC crime drama has been cancelled after just two series following a poorly performing second series.
The star, 59, pictured, portrayed DCI Tom Brannick in Bloodlands, which launched in 2021 and followed Tom as he made a connection between a kidnapping and the cold case of his wife's murder.
The Bill's Lorcan Cranitch, The Young Offenders' Chris Walley, and Victoria Smurfit also starred. Its debut episode achieved 10 million views, however series two received under four million. Now, with no episodes having aired in 2023, it is thought that the BBC has finally axed the Northern Irish thriller.
The news was foreshadowed by Charlene McKenna when she told the Belfast Telegraph in 2023: 'I want a series three so much but, no, I don't think so. Bloodlands may have reached its natural conclusion with James Nesbitt's character, DCI Tom Brannick, being revealed as serial killer Goliath.'
Fans criticised the second series for its 'boring plot'.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



NIGELLA LAWSON THE TV [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 60 words
Byline: Hannah Betts
Body


NIGELLA LAWSON THE TV chef, 64, argues that her complexion is a testament to 'no sun and eating lots of fats', and that dry shampoo before bed is the secret to great hair. Her latest obsession is the new DoSe by Victoria Health Ergothioneine Serum ((EURO)30.40 for 30ml, www.victoriahealth.com), which she awards 10/10 for alleviating stressed and jet-lagged skin.

Graphic


BENETT e Dav Picture:

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



No need to Shout... Why Lulu never speaks before midday
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 90 words
Byline: Irish Daily Mail Reporter
Body


LULU has revealed she does not speak before noon on days she is performing to protect her voice.
The Scottish singer, 75, said of her strict regime: 'It makes it easier. I take care of my instrument, it allows me to sing.'
The Shout star's farewell tour starts in Glasgow next week after a 'gruelling' run of gigs in 2023. She had to cancel more than 30 dates due to the effects of long Covid. She told BBC News: 'If when I was 15 and someone would have suggested I'd be doing a farewell tour when I'm 75, I'd have said: "You are having a laugh."'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



No reprieve from the rain but temperatures to start rising
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 5
Length: 155 words
Byline: Helen Bruce
Body


THERE may be a grand stretch in the evenings but there will no reprieve from the rain this week, as Met Éireann is warning of more deluges during the week.
The forecast will be of little comfort to farmers, who have complained that 'incessant rainfall and shocking ground conditions are adding hugely to costs and stress levels' for them.
However, temperatures will rise to 16 degrees by Friday.
'The week ahead will be unsettled with frequent showers and rain, and some heavy downpours at times. As a result, rainfall amounts will largely be between two and four times higher than normal,' it predicted Drying conditions will be generally moderate or poor this week due to frequent showers and spells of rain, it added.
Today will start off mostly cloudy with outbreaks of rain in the east, which will gradually clear to the northeast.
Highest temperatures are expected to be between eight and 12 degrees, with moderate northwest breezes.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



PEP SLAMS KEANE; City manager hits back at Roy over his Haaland digs
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 192 words
Byline: JACK GAUGHAN
Body


PEP GUARDIOLA hit out at Roy Keane yesterday after the former Manchester United captain described Erling Haaland's all-round game as being reminiscent of a League Two striker.
Manchester City's top scorer attracted criticism after Sunday's goalless draw with Arsenal with Keane claiming that aside from finishing, the Norwegian offers nothing.
Guardiola defended Haaland by insisting City's lack of firepower was not his fault.
'I am surprised it comes from former players,' he said. 'I am not agreeing with him, absolutely not. It's like if I said he's a manager for the second or third league.
'The memory disappears quick.
The problems the players have now, the pundits had. The missing of chances, they missed them one thousand million times and they were hurt when they were criticised by former players.'
Guardiola, whose side host Aston Villa tonight, added on Haaland: 'He's the best striker in the world and he helped us win what we won last season. The reason we don't create many chances is not because of Erling. We need more presence in the final third with more people. Erling is exceptional.'
FAI IN DIRE NEED OF A SHAKE-UP PHILIP QUINN - Page 50

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S RADIO
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 46,47
Length: 168 words
Body


HELEN LEWIS HAS LEFT THE CHAT, 9.30AM, RADIO 4
ALTHOUGH many were deleted, the WhatsApp messages that remained provided a fascinating and colourful insight into what was going on inside government during the Covid pandemic. Dominic Cummings is among the interviewees in this series as Helen Lewis (pictured) explores the extraordinary rise in instant messaging - there are now an estimated 2.7 billion users on WhatsApp alone. Its speed and the casual nature of the communication can lead to indiscretions, so there are definite dangers.
÷
PAUL MERTON returns with a new series of ROOM 101 (6.30PM, RADIO 4), the show in which celebrities get to assign their pet hates to oblivion, but can also talk up one thing that they feel they could not do without. First up is comedian Chris McCausland - whose panel show You Heard It Here First returns to Radio 4 this Saturday night. On his list is the annoying habit that shops have of pricing things so they end in 99p, and teacups that have irritatingly tiny handles.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 40
Length: 178 words
Body


GREY'S ANATOMY, 9.35PM, RTÉ2
THE title of this episode of the medical drama may be We've Only Just Begun, but it's also the first instalment in the 20th series, meaning any newcomers have a lot of catching up to do. For long-standing fans it may seem like business as usual but there have been changes both in front of the camera and behind. Krista Vernoff, a key showrunner behind the longest running medical primetime drama in the history of US TV, has departed the series as have stars Kelly McCreary, who played Dr Maggie Pierce, and Scott Speedman, who played Dr Nick Marsh. And while the drama's star Ellen Pompeo (right) is still around to play Dr Meredith Grey, she has scaled back her role. Still, the show maintains its high standards in this series opener when Meredith and Bailey team up to guide the interns through a life-ordeath situation involving a self-driving car and a crashed ambulance. Meanwhile, Simone and Lucas are put to the test by their own emergency, Richard confides in Bailey about his struggles with sobriety, and we discover Teddy's fate.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 44
Length: 180 words
Body


PROFESSOR T, 9PM, UTV
JASPER TEMPEST (Ben Miller) might not be Professor T for much longer. His stint at His Majesty's pleasure means the college is reconsidering his professorship. And if that news weren't bad enough, he gets a visit from his mother (Frances de la Tour). We haven't seen nearly enough of Ms La Tour, and her presence is a waft of fresh air through the stagnant corridors of the musty old prison that Jasper now calls home. Of course, prison is no place for a sensitive soul like Jasper, so it's lucky he seems to get so much time out of his cell, visiting either his shrink (Juliet Stevenson, pictured) or crime scenes. This week, he provides the necessary insight when a new bride is found floating in the hotel swimming pool. The wedding photos are a picture of happiness, but was everything as it seemed behind the smiles? She was marrying into the family of a wellknown televangelist, and that's enough to sound alarm bells to even the most casual of crime fans. All of this six-part third series, as well as the first two, are available to watch now on ITVX.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Race you to it!
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 32 words
Byline: Hannah Betts
Body


THIS Breakfast at Tiffany's mask in mulberry silk by sleep-mask company Drowsy is pure Audrey Hepburn ((EURO)92, www.drowsysleepco.com). The first batch sold out, so sign up to the waiting list.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



SEE ALL YOUR FAVOURITE CARTOONS [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 12 words
Body


SEE ALL YOUR FAVOURITE CARTOONS ON PAGE 44
PLUS: OSCAR CAINER'S HOROSCOPES

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



SINCE the inception of the [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 50
Length: 103 words
Byline: Philip Quinn
Body


SINCE the inception of the Championship, John Aldridge holds the record for the most goals scored by an Irish international - 27 goals for Tranmere Rovers in 1995-96. It's a target within reach for Sammie Szmodics (right) whose brace for Blackburn Rovers on Easter Monday lifted him to 23 league goals with six games to go. As Rovers have yet to play Southampton (home), Leeds United (away) and Leicester City (away), it's asking a lot for Szmodics to draw level, never mind overhaul, Aldridge. But the in-form striker, who impressed on his Irish debut recently, has the means, motive and opportunity to set a new mark.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



SOUTH DUBLIN COUNTY COUNCIL Denise [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 178 words
Body


SOUTH DUBLIN COUNTY COUNCIL Denise White intends to apply for retention permission for the singlestorey structure built at the rear of no. 110 Palmerstown Avenue, Dublin, 20, which replaced a garage structure on the site, and which is to be used as a dwelling separate to the existing two-storey house at the front of the application may be inspected, or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy, at the offices of South Dublin County Council, County Hall, Town Centre, Tallaght, Dublin 24, during their public opening hours (9.00am to 4.00pm), and a submission or observation in relation to the application may be made in writing to the Planning Authority, on payment of the prescribed fee ((EURO)20) within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the authority of the application, and such submissions or observations will be considered by the planning authority in making a decision on the application. The planning authority may grant permission, subject to, or without, conditions, or may refuse to grant permission.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



SOUTH DUBUN COUNTY COUNCIL I [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 180 words
Body


SOUTH DUBUN COUNTY COUNCIL I Mohammed Faroqo Hussain intend to apply for Planning Permission for development at this site, 7 Hallwell Drive Adamstown Lucan Co Dublin. Planning permission is sought for new single storey extension to rear of house for lounge, recreational use and all associated site works. The development is within an SDZ The planning application may be inspected or purchased at the offices of South Dublin County Council, County Hall, Town Centre, Tallaght, Dublin 24 during its public opening hours of Monday to Friday from 9:00am to 4:00pm., and may also be viewed on the Council's website - www.sdcc.ie.
A submission or observation in relation to the application may be made in writing to South Dublin County Council on payment of a fee of (EURO)20 within 5 weeks of receipt of the application by South Dublin County Council and such submissions or observations will be considered by the Planning Authority in making a decision on the application. The Planning Authority may grant permission subject to or without conditions or may refuse to grant permission.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Stauntons Operations Limited T/A Stauntons [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 52 words
Body


Stauntons Operations Limited T/A Stauntons On The Green is hiring Chef De Partie at 83 ST Stephen's Green Sout Dublin 2 Dublin Ireland. Duties: Preparation, cooking, presentation of dishes & maintaining good hygiene. Salary (EURO)34,000 P.A, 39-hours P.W, 2-Years Contract. Forward CVs to john@stauntonsonthegreen.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Straight to the POINT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 106 words
Body


MY advice to young women would be to ignore Fern Britton (Letters) and find a good man, get married and hang on to him. You may think being independent is the key to empowerment, but there's nothing empowering about growing old in loneliness.
K. YOUNG, by email. ? DID the Government have to bring in minimum pricing ö
for alcohol? Guinness has done it on its own.
NAME SUPPLIED. ? I WAS interested to read the article by Dr Emily Leeming about flatulence (Good Health) but fear there is one cause she left out: statins. One of their sideeffects is flatulence, according to the information provided in pill packets.
JUDITH HUTCHINSON, by email.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Suspended Egan out of marquee meeting
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 199 words
Byline: DOMINIC KING
Body


DAVID EGAN has picked up a suspension from the Whip Review Committee ruling him out of Newmarket's prestigious Craven meeting.
Amo Racing's retained jockey, 24, has enjoyed a blistering start in one of the most high-profile jobs in Flat racing, winning big races on Mr Professor, who sprang a 33-1 shock in the Lincoln Handicap, and the progressive Elegant Man.
But Egan's ride on Mr Professor at Doncaster last month fell foul of the stewards and at the latest Whip Review Committee meeting, he was deemed to have used his whip in the wrong place. He was banned for four days, starting on Tuesday, April 16.
Amo Racing won both the Craven Stakes and the Nell Gwyn Stakes - the recognised trials for the 2,000 and 1,000 Guineas - last spring and Egan would have been set for a number of important rides over the three days at Newmarket.
He will be back, though, for Elegant Man's next run. Trainer Adrian Murray has entered the colt in the Lockinge Stakes and the Coronation Cup - both Group One races - and has no doubts he can be competitive following a blistering performance in the Easter Classic at Newcastle on Good Friday.
'We were expecting a nice run,' said Murray. 'He's a right nice horse.'

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Terex MDS (T/A Murray Design [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 107 words
Body


Terex MDS (T/A Murray Design Services) are looking to recruit experienced industrial Welders onto their team. Based in Magheracloone, Co Monaghan Terex MDS are offering permanent and full time employment to suitable candidates who will be part of the team who manufacture mobile screening equipment Working 40 hours per week, positions are available on day shift (6AM to 2:30PM Monday to Friday) and evening shift (2:30PM to 1AM Monday to Thursday).
Starting rate of pay is (EURO) 16.50 per hour, depending on experience. Applications should be made in writing addressed to the HR Department, Terex MDS, Magheracloone, Carrickmacross, Co Monaghan.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



The House of Nails is [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 167 words
Body


The House of Nails is looking for an International Business Sales Executive to work at 10 Tuckey st, 1st floor, Cork, T12WCD8. The candidate must have at least 2 years' experience related to the role, must speak Portuguese (Brazilian) as the salon provides several Brazilian beauty services and products. The duties will be: Discusses customer requirements and advises them on the capabilities and limitations of the sale of composite packages to Brazilians customers interested in beauty services; Quotes prices and payment arrangements; Makes follow up calls to ensure customer satisfaction and to obtain further updates in field and suggests possible improvements to service; Maintains records and accounts of sales made and handles customer; Complaints Discusses business methods and services and targets customer group with employer in order to identify marketing strategies. Hours of work: 39 hours. Remuneration: (EURO)34,000 per annum.
Please contact Agnieska Deryng (thehouseofnailscork@gmail.com).

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



The last laugh for this talented trio of jokers
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 60 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


HECTOR Ó hEochagáin, Laurita Blewitt and Tommy Tiernan, above with Late Late host Patrick Kielty, are, sadly, closing the door on their 'Henhouse' podcast. I'll miss Tommy's filth, Hector's hippie shakes, Laurita's tearing down of both of them and the trio's general uplifting attitude. If only there was a wizard out there who could make them change their mind.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



THE lucky punter who turned [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 101 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


THE lucky punter who turned a (EURO)20 treble bet into more than (EURO)330,000 when their three selected horses romped home at long odds at Fairyhouse at the weekend reminds me of a story about Angus Loughran, a sports fan briefly famous as Statto on the BBC's Fantasy Football programme. He turned a modest stake into a six-figure windfall when the third part of his accumulator bet paid off, thanks to Tiger Woods winning golf tournament The Open at St Andrew's in 2000. That might not sound like much of a speculative punt - until you learn that Loughran placed the bet in 1990, when the golfer was still 14.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



THE outpouring of goodwill towards [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 35
Length: 130 words
Byline: Max Pemberton
Body


THE outpouring of goodwill towards Kate Middleton, the Princess of Wales, right, since she told the world she had cancer has had another, hopeful response. Data shows her speaking out prompted masses to read up about cancer online. We've seen this before.
Despite the public health HIV campaigns on transmission, the largest-ever peak in requests for HIV testing was seen in January 1991 when EastEnders character Mark Fowler was diagnosed HIV-positive.
When someone the public feels they know - fictional or real - is seen to suffer a medical condition, many more talk with friends and family about it, and in some cases present to their GPs because they fear for themselves. Breaking this psychological resistance is a much-appreciated side-effect of the princess's difficult news.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



To provide creditors with the [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 100 words
Body


To provide creditors with the opportunity to participate in the meeting, remote access will be provided ID creditors upon their request. The meeting will take place via Zoom video conference facility. To ensure that all those wishing to participate remotely are able to take part, Creditors who wish to participate are requested to submit a request by email to cormac@fitzcorpinsol.ie by 4pm on the 28th April 2024 and indicate that they wish to be sent details by email.
Dated this 2nd Day of March 2024 For and on behalf of EDWARD RHUL NUGENT LIMITED (In Voluntary Liquidation) CORMAC MOHAN LIQUIDATOR

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 63 words
Body


TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: Soft-heavy in places (prec inspection 8am). STALLS: Inside. DRAW ADVANTAGE: Low. Top jockey: Jason Hart. Top trainer: T Easterby. Placed in the race last year: 1.55 Tommytwohoots (2nd); 2.55 Sugarpiehoneybunch (1st); 3.55 Langholm (2nd). Headgear first time: 2.25 Big Blue Boy, Drinkable, 2.55 Clear White Light, 3.25 Dandycan, 4.27 Artistic Mission.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



TRACK FACTS: PRINCIPAL & JACKPOT [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 83 words
Body


TRACK FACTS: PRINCIPAL & JACKPOT MEETING. R-H Polytrack course. GOING: Standard to slow. STALLS: Inside. DRAW ADVANTAGE: Low. Top jockey: Oisin Murphy. Top trainer: A Balding. Headgear first time: 6.30 Mashadi, Tribal Chief, 8.00 Reflexion Faite. Longest traveller: Zachary (8.00) 245 miles. Drop in Class: 4.50 Great Chieftain is down 2 grades on last run (Class 3 to Class 5); Not Me (3); 5.25 Mighty Nebula (2); 8.00 Bated Breeze (2); Hearitfortheboys (2); Dark Dreamer (2); 8.30 Maxim De Winter (2).

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Trolls should leave Kate alone
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 97 words
Body


SADLY, Kate Garraway has set herself up to be a target for all those vicious trolls and bullies who feel they have the right to an opinion. She clearly acknowledges that her income is higher than most people's. What she shared with thousands, though, was the bureaucracy of the care sector, the harrowing round-the-clock care someone such as Derek needed and the toll that takes on everyone involved. For all his suffering, Derek wanted to leave a legacy of awareness and change. Hopefully Kate can fulfil his last wishes and be left alone to ensure that happens.
JEAN McNAMARA, by email.

Graphic


Brave: Kate Garraway

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Two (02) Welders required to [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 45
Length: 136 words
Body


Two (02) Welders required to work at James J. O'Donnell General Engineering Works Limited at Atlas Avenue Dock Road, Limerick, V94 VW71, Ireland. Must have relevant experience in the role. Duties: selects appropriate welding equipment such as electric arc, gas torch, ete.; connects wires to power supply, or hoses to oxygen, acetylene, argon, carbon dioxide, electric arc, or other source and adjusts controls to regulate gas pressure and rate of flow; cuts metal pieces using gas torch or electric arc; guides electrode or torch along line of weld, burns away damaged areas, and melts brazing alloy or solder into joints; cleans and smoothes weld; checks finished workpiece for defects and conformity with specification. Salary: (EURO) 34,000 per annum. Hours: 39 per week. Apply to: Ted Grace at info@jjodonnell.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



Wayne's world; LET TERS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 45 words
Body


I KNOW the Americans love John Wayne but please could we have a month free of him on TV? I'm sick of watching him win World War II single-handed. And why, in westerns, do his six-shooters never need reloading, no matter how many times he fires them?
PETE WILLIAMS, by email.

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



What can I do to fix my bingo wings?; Shh! Anti-agers no one but you need know about
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 32
Length: 162 words
Byline: Inge Van Lotringen
Body


Q
I'M quite slim but my arms are getting crepey and I notice slack 'bingo wings' starting. What nonsurgical treatment can help?
A
PROFHILO, the mosturising, mildly collagen-boosting injectable, can be used on arms.
You get ten jabs in each area, and ten more in 30 days.
The jabs hurt but there is no downtime and you'll see visibly plumper skin four weeks later.
The usual starting price is between (EURO)300-(EURO)450 per treatment (you'll need two). Cosmetic doctor Sarah Tonks says four treatments is ideal for optimum results.
Alternatively, Exion Body is a painless radio-frequency device that applies warm energy to your upper arms for half an hour which increases collagen, elastin and hyaluronic acid by 224 pc, apparently!
Sessions start from (EURO)300.
Cosmetic physician Wassim Taktouk recommends six sessions for best results.
Results for Profhilo and Exion last six months.
÷
EMAIL your questions to Ingeborg van Lotringen, author of Great Skin, at features@dailymail.ie

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



WHY DID PEP FEEL NEED TO LECTURE GREALISH?
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 3, 2024 Wednesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 14 words
Body


IT'S ALL KICKING off!
listen today on apple, spotify or wherever you get your podcasts

Load-Date: April 3, 2024


End of Document



'UL must explain multi-million debt'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 311 words
Byline: Aisling Moloney
Body


REPRESENTATIVES from the University of Limerick and the Higher Education Authority need to come before the Oireachtas Education Committee, its chair has urged.
Paul Kehoe has written to both the University of Limerick and the Higher Education Authority (HEA) to appear before politicians to explain the overspend on property which has plunged the institution into crisis.
The Chancellor of UL Professor Brigid Laffan said the university has entered a period of 'extreme oversight' as the HEA investigates the acquisition of 20 student houses where UL paid 'significantly above market price', having to absorb (EURO)5.2million of the overspend.
Fine Gael's Mr Kehoe said 'serious questions remain unanswered about why UL paid more than (EURO)11million for 20 homes at Rhebogue, 3km from the campus, leaving the university now in deficit to the tune of over (EURO)5million'.
'That this has occurred just four years after a previous significant overspend on the purchase of the former Dunnes Stores site in Limerick city centre is extremely concerning,' he added.
In 2019, UL bought the Dunnes building at Sarsfield Bridge in Limerick with a view to creating a city centre campus, paying (EURO)8.3million, despite no formal valuation. It emerged it had been valued two years previously at (EURO)3million.
The university is due before the Public Accounts Committee on April 11. President of UL Professor Kerstin Mey said she is 'incapacitated' and will not be attending as she is on sick leave.
The HEA has now ordered a statutory review of UL and officials will be on campus in the coming weeks.
A spokeswoman for Minister for Further and Higher Education Simon Harris said: 'The HEA has now advised the Minister it has invoked section 64 of the Act requesting the UL governing body to undertake a review as a result of concerns related to the acquisition of the Rhebogue property.'

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



'Auld' ways are the best!; Dublin pub will keep the price of a pint at under a fiver despite relentless hikes
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 462 words
Byline: Ian Begley
Body


A PINT of plain has become a pint of pain given the number of price increases in recent months.
But one Dublin establishment is determined to show that the 'auld' ways are the best - and is keeping the cost of a pint under a fiver.
The Auld Triangle, famed for having one of Dublin's cheapest pints, will maintain that reputation despite the latest price hike by Guinness owner Diageo - its third in 18 months.
The beverage firm sent a letter to publicans last week informing them that the increase will come into effect from April 15 and will apply to all its draught products including Guinness, Guinness 0.0, Hop House 13, Harp, Rockshore,
Smithwicks and Carlsberg.
The price adjustment will add the equivalent of six cent to a pint and nine cent a pint for Guinness 0.0. The hike has added to the many challenges publicans are facing, such as inflated energy costs and the increase in minimum wage to (EURO)12.70 an hour.
The Auld Triangle on Dorset Street is one of the few pubs left in Dublin that can afford to sell pints for under (EURO)5.
Currently, customers can drink a pint of Guinness there for (EURO)4.50, but co-owner Declan Hallissey says the latest increase will most likely mean that they'll have to put that price up. However, keeping the beloved beverage under (EURO)5 is something that the
Dublin publican is very proud of.
'It's been relentless in terms of rising costs,' Mr Hallissey told the
Irish Daily Mail. 'We've have managed to keep our pints under (EURO)5 which every day of the week is great for our loyal customers, particularly for a Dublin pub.
'We had to increase our prices by 10c going into Covid so it's been two years since we had to adjust them. Unfortunately the latest hike will mean that we'll have to raise the prices again, just like everywhere else.
'You can only hold out for so long, but I can imagine we'll have to soon charge maybe (EURO)4.80, which is still a very good offer.'
According to CSO stats last November, the national average price of a pint of stout in pubs was (EURO)5.64, up 48c compared to November 2022. A pint of lager was (EURO)6.07, up 50c. Mr Hallissey added there are a number of factors why he can continue to keep his costs so low.
'Our operation is different from many other pubs as we just sell drink and no food, which is a way to keep our costs down. We also only have one member of staff holding the fort at any one time.
'We open up at 10.30am every morning and have a steady flow of loyal customers coming and going all day,' he said.
Diegeo has credited the hike to rising input costs across all its operations in Ireland. 'We continue to experience rising input costs across our Irish business operations,' a spokesman for the British multinational said.
ian.begley@dailymail.ie
'Relentless in rising costs'

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



'Christians' not practising what Jesus preached; LET TERS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 303 words
Body


IN response to 'Francis praises bereaved fathers' (Letters, March 29): Contrary to what is claimed or felt by many of us, deep down there's a potential monster in each of us that, under the right circumstances, can be unleashed; and maybe even more so when convinced God is on our side.
But Christ practised and preached the opposite of what enables the most horrible acts of human cruelty to occur on this planet. Sadly, sometimes those atrocious acts are allowed to remain a buried secret.
Institutional Christianity/Christians (i.e. those most resistant to Christ's fundamental teachings of non-violence, genuine compassion and non-wealth) seem to insist upon creating their Creator's nature in their own fallible and often angry, vengeful image. For example, proclaiming at public protests that 'God hates' suchand-such a group of people.
Often being the most vocal, they make very bad examples of Christ's fundamental message, especially to the young and impressionable. This is why I openly critique those in public life who claim to be Christian yet behave nothing like Christ nor his basic teachings. US Republicans went into their 'Christian' mode by withholding their political support for helping starving Palestinian children.
The self-described Catholic Joe Biden, his administration and too many Democratic senators and congressional representatives want it both ways: to unconditionally heavily arm the Israeli state against Palestine, AND to keep the Palestine and human-rights-supporting voters active and onside. What would Jesus say? But I doubt that Arabic/Palestinian/Muslim voters will collectively compromise and sell their souls by giving Biden a pass on his blatant hypocrisy towards Israel's mass slaughter of mostly Palestinian non-combatants.
FRANK STERLE JR, White Rock, British Columbia, Canada.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



'GAME-CHANGER' HRT ALTERNATIVE AVAILABLE IN IRELAND
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 36
Length: 283 words
Body


A new drug approved for the Irish market is set to help menopausal women beat debilitating hot flushes, experts say.
Veoza is a non-hormonal medication designed to stop hot flushes and night sweats and will be fully available here this month.
Campaigners have branded the daily tablet a 'game-changer' which offers women an alternative to hormone replacement therapy (HRT) for menopause symptoms. 'Veoza is a hugely positive development for those in perimenopause and menopause,' said Loretta Dignam, CEO and founder of the Menopause Hub. 'A UK study concluded that women experience a weekly total of 17 hot flushes and 11 night sweats - and this symptom alone can impact severely on sleep, mood, concentration, work and personal lives,' said Dignam.
Up to 80% of some 652,000 Irish women suffer symptoms of menopause, primarily hot flushes and night sweats which are triggered by low oestrogen levels, affecting the part of the brain that regulates body temperature.
Veoza offers another option to women who can't take HRT for various medical reasons or for those whose bodies won't absorb the hormones.
Dignam said that at present the drug is not covered under the Drug Payment Scheme so it will be available privately at a cost of up to (EURO)70 per month. But Dignam is calling for Veoza to be approved for public funding as soon as possible.
The one-a-day tablet was recently approved for use in Ireland by the Health Products Regulatory Authority (HPRA).
Clinical trials in Europe found that after one month of treatment, the number of moderate to severe daily hot flushes was cut by 53% on average for participants.
It is not approved yet for those with active breast cancer.
See www.themenopausehub.ie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



'Trans women' Rowling dared to label as 'men'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 7
Length: 481 words
Body


JK ROWLING singled out ten trans women in her social media post. After writing about each person, the author added: 'April Fools! Only kidding. Obviously, the people mentioned in the above tweets aren't women at all, but men, every last one of them.' They were: BETH DOUGLAS: Suspended from her post as co-convenor for the Scottish Green Party's LGBT wing last year after a series of 'violent' tweets. Photos showed her posing with knives and an axe captioned: 'I heard yall hate trans women, knives and axes.'
ISLA BRYSON: Double rapist convicted of attacks in 2016 and 2019 while known as Adam Graham but was initially sent to a women's jail. Public outcry saw Bryson - considered at high risk of reoffending - moved to a men's prison and prompted a change in Scotland's policy.
KATIE DOLATOWSKI: Avoided a prison sentence after sexually assaulting a tenyear-old girl in a Scottish supermarket and filming a 12-year-old girl over a toilet cubicle. Subsequently held at a women's prison after breaching a restriction of liberty order in 2022.
SAMANTHA NORRIS: Acquitted by a jury in the UK over two charges of engaging in sexual activity in the presence of a child, and indecent exposure to two 11-year-old girls. Was later convicted of three charges after being caught with 16,000 'abhorrent' indecent images of children.
AMY GEORGE: Abducted a primary school pupil in Scotland while dressed as a woman, before sexually assaulting her for more than 24 hours. At the time known as Andrew Miller, the former butcher lured the girl into a car after offering to give her a lift home.
GIULIA VALENTINO: Caused an outcry after being allowed to play Gaelic football - at the time aged 30 - against young female players. Had moved to Ireland from Italy and took up the sport after being injured while playing for a rugby club.
MRIDUL WADHWA: The chief executive of the Edinburgh Rape Crisis Centre has previously claimed rape victims who do not want support from men are 'bigoted'. Later claimed the remarks had been taken out of context before adding that rape victims should be 'challenged' if 'clearly prejudiced'. MUNROE BERGDORF: The model was dropped as Childline's first 'LGBT+ campaigner' over posts which breached its safeguarding rules. Previously dropped by L'Oreal over a claim that all white people were guilty of 'racial violence', Bergdorf was appointed as the first UN Women's UK Champion.
KATIE NEEVES: A trans activist appointed as UK ambassador to the UN Commission On The Status Of Women, who has confessed to stealing her sister's underwear as a boy.
INDIA WILLOUGHBY: Britain's first transgender newsreader reported Rowling to police after the author referred to her as a man.
Willoughby, who has co-hosted ITV's Loose Women, later said the incident had been logged by Northumbria Police as a 'non-crime hate incident'.
She called Rowling's social media thread 'a sad, pathetic sight'.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



'We'll see return to fuel tourism' after excise duty restored
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 613 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


THE restoration of excise duty on fuel which kicked in yesterday will see a rise in 'fuel tourism', it has been warned, as people cross the border for cheaper rates.
The move meant that 4c, 3c and 1.7c has be added to petrol, diesel and marked gas oil respectively.
But industry chiefs have labelled the Government's move as short-sighted, saying that many people living in border regions will simply travel a few miles to get much cheaper fuel. President of the Irish Road Haulage Association, Ger Hyland, explained how the disparity between UK and Irish prices for petrol and diesel will see the Government lose money while also heaping more misery on forecourt owners who are trying to compete.
He said: 'The price of fuel in our nearest neighbour, Northern Ireland, is now on a par or cheaper than it is here, so we're going to be encouraging fuel tourism and it's going to have an effect on the economy here.
'We use approximately 14 million litres of fuel a week here in Ireland. We're currently paying five taxes on that, there's (EURO)7.84million a week going into the Government's coffers from the transport sector.
'With the increase that's being put back on it today, and in August, that's going to rise to (EURO)8.68million. It's huge in the scheme of things,' he told RTÉ's Morning Ireland.
He added that the increase to fuel costs will also make it harder for Irish businesses to compete against those based in mainland Europe.
'The cost of getting our goods to and from the market has never been as high. We're at a distinct disadvantage to mainland Europe. Our tolls have gone up twice already this year, the Government's coffers were never as full, we're facing an election and we would've thought that the Government would've kicked this can down the road,' Mr Hyland added.
This is the second-to-last restoration of excise duty rates which were slashed as a result of serious increases due to Russian war in Ukraine. The last increase is set to be introduced in August.
The move was highly criticised by both lawmakers and lobby groups who said the decision will impact motorists and households alike.
Last month, Sligo-Leitrim TD Marian Harkin renewed her appeal to Finance Minister Michael McGrath to postpone the duty hikes.
She, too, warned of the potential for fuel tourism.
Ms Harkin said: 'Last September, in the Dáil, I strongly suggested to the Minister that he postpone increases in excise duties that were due at that time. I told him these increases would cripple filling stations and retailers along the border, lead to business closures, cause job losses and put increased pressure on rural dwellers who have to use their cars more frequently than urban dwellers.
'The situation will deteriorate further as the price difference for diesel and petrol at either side of the border will be even greater since the UK government, in its recent budget, postponed increases in excise duties on fuel for a year.'
According to Fuels for Ireland, from April 1 there will be a 15c per litre difference in the price of fuel between the North and the Republic.
Ms Harkin remarked: 'The impact in counties like Sligo, Leitrim, Donegal, Roscommon and other rural counties is much greater than in largely urban areas.
'The average number of kilometres driven per car per year is 17,500 in Sligo and Donegal, over 19,000 in Leitrim and Roscommon while the national average is just 16,300 kilometres.
'This shows that car owners in rural areas drive significantly longer distances... while they are all disproportionately hit by these increases in fuel prices, the biggest hit is being experienced along the border.'
garreth.macnamee @dailymail.ie
'This will cripple filling stations'

Graphic


Plea: Marian Harkin TD

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



1,000-year-old oak tree brings whiskey distiller back to its roots
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 10
Length: 208 words
Byline: Cillian Sherlock
Body


A 1,000-year-old Irish oak tree toppled by a storm is set to be resurrected in the form of whiskey casks.
The giant, with a ten-metre girth, stood tall on the grounds of Swainstown Farm in Kilmessan, Co. Meath, until Storm Elin brought it crashing to earth last year. In a unique project between Meath's Boann Distillery and the Kentucky Bourbon Barrel cooperage in Kildare, the oak will be transformed into barrels that will age and produce Preston's brand of single pot still Irish whiskey.
The Preston family, who live on Swainstown Farm, are descendants of Preston's of Drogheda, operators of a major whiskey bonding business for almost a century from 1886.
Peter Cooney of Boann Distillery said it is 'extremely rare' that Irish oak is used to craft casks. He added: 'The idea was first mooted six years ago after I told Arthur Preston about our plans to revive the Preston's whiskey brand... We made a deal that, in return for the casks I gave him for his Swainstown Farm shop, he would let me know when an old Irish oak tree on his grounds would become available for cutting.'
A section from the tree's lower body will now be shipped to France, where it will be made into staves. These will then be transported back to Kildare, and turned into casks.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



6,000 refugees granted asylum stuck in State accommodation
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 278 words
Byline: Aisling Moloney
Body


MORE than 6,000 asylum seekers granted permission to remain in the country cannot leave State-run accommodation due to the housing crisis - up 15% on March last year.
Some 28,100 asylum seekers are now being accommodated by the State's International Protection Accommodation Services (IPAS), according to the latest figures.
There are also 1,517 male asylum seekers without any State accommodation, many of whom are sleeping in tents in Dublin city centre.
Lucky Khambule, co-founder of the Movement of Asylum Seekers in Ireland (MASI), said: 'The excitement of getting your papers gets diminished very quickly because you're going to be stuck there anyway because you will not be able to move.
'A lot of them are in the centres more than two or three years. The problem is when they are leaving direct provision they don't have any proper references to give a landlord or track record of renting.'
He said refugees with status are entitled to the Housing Assistance Payment (HAP), but this is a 'deterrent' for rental agencies and landlords. 'A lot of people would view more than 20 houses,' he said. 'People go long distances to try and get a house, because they cannot find one near the centres.'
Mr Khambule said there is also 'an element of racism' facing refugees leaving centres.
He said: 'When the landlord or agent sees the person or hears their name then suddenly the house is not available any more when it continues to be listed on www.Daft.ie.'
In March last year there were 5,197 people in centres who had permission to remain here.
Integration Minister Roderic O'Gorman said that in the past 12 months, over 2,000 people with status have left IPAS accommodation.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



A spiffing escapade full of Nazis, biscuits and lashings of ginger beer
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 47
Length: 480 words
Byline: CHRISTOPHER STEVENS
Body


SO that's why Julian, Dick and Anne were free to romp around the countryside on their bikes throughout every school hol with their cousin George. Their parents are international spies.
Enid Blyton, who created The Famous Five (BBC1), doubtless never gave a second thought to her characters' parents, any more than she worried what her own children were doing while she was busy writing.
But in their latest all-action incarnation, adapted by Nicholas Winding Refn, the children need some hint of a family life, beyond irascible Uncle Quentin and longsuffering Aunt Fanny (James Lance and Ann Akinjirin).
There's also a subtle shift in the balance of power. Tomboy George (Diaana Babnicova) is the leader of the band, while older cousin Julian (Elliott Rose) has been relegated to goody-two-shoes and worry-guts.
Dick and Anne (Kit Rakusen and Flora Jacoby Richardson) are more sharply drawn than in the books ? he's a miniature boffin and full-time bookworm, she's a bossyboots who can wheedle, blackmail or command adults to obey her bidding.
With Timmy the dog played by an adorable scruffy mutt called Kip, this is their second 90-minute adventure, set in the late 1930s with war looming. The costumes are impressively authentic, all Fair Isle tanktops and braces, but the language sometimes strays by decades. George, who is apt to say, 'Whatever,' when she's sulky, is a particular offender.
The villains this time were Nazi officers, sailing into Loch Ness in a U-boat to steal a prototype computer or 'algebra engine' invented by Uncle Quentin. Lest anyone imagine it's xenophobic to have foreigners as the Bad Guys, the script was at pains to point out that 'nobody's the villain of their own story'. Nazis are people too, you know.
The real Bad Guys are us Brits, of course, or at least our ancestors. Julian told a glamorous foreign agent, 'You can't just run around lying and stealing things that don't belong to you.' 'Sweet boy,' she admonished him, 'you just described the British Empire.' Her moral stance was undermined by the fact she was holding Timmy at gunpoint.
Much of the adventure took place on a train to Scotland ? with sleeper carriages, which was convenient since an enemy agent disguised as a waiter drugged Quentin and Fanny into a stupor.
The waiter didn't feature for long. He stumbled into a British intelligence man (Ed Speleers), who punched him on the jaw, hurled him through a window and quipped, 'You can't get the staff.' Can somebody check whether a new James Bond has been signed up yet?
Despite these deviations, all the Famous Five essentials were in place ? a secret passage, midnight vigils, tea, biscuits and, of course, lashings of ginger beer.
The children saved the day, not with violence but with ingenuity. The Nazis escaped with a typewriter instead of the algebra engine, and even Nessie put in an appearance. All in all, a spiffing escapade.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



American Embassy summoned Ryan over Dublin Airport row; Fears passenger cap could damage US-Ireland dealings
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 8
Length: 491 words
Byline: Brian Mahon
Body


THE American Embassy has become embroiled in the Dublin Airport passenger cap row, summoning Eamon Ryan to a meeting after being warned the plans could end up harming the US-Ireland economic relationship.
The DAA, which operates the airport, proposed suspending ad hoc flights into the country for seven months in a bid to abide by the controversial cap of 32million passengers per year.
A number of Green Party TDs made planning submissions opposing plans by the DAA to increase the limit to 40million.
The Irish Daily Mail can reveal Transport Minister Mr Ryan was summoned to meet US Ambassador Claire Cronin to discuss the matter on January 17. It came two weeks after she was warned by a US aviation group that plans to suspend ad hoc flights would 'damage US investment in Ireland as well as the existing US-Ireland economic relationship'.
In its letter to the ambassador on January 2, the National Business Aviation Association (NBAA), a Washington DC-based lobby group, wrote: 'Dublin Airport has an annual passenger limit of 32million passengers. It is set to exceed this limit in 2024. As a result, the DAA is proposing to suspend all ad hoc general aviation flights. Ad hoc general aviation flights refer to non-sched- uled flights and includes business aviation flights.'
The suspension was to last from March 24 to October 24 this year, and while not yet implemented, it remains under consideration. It would impact soccer's Europa League final at the Aviva Stadium in May, given the finalists have yet to be determined, and new flights will be needed for fans.
The NBAA said ad hoc flights support 'a multitude of public service and business needs' and urged Ms Cronin 'to support continued ad hoc general aviation activity at Dublin Airport'.
Documents released under a Freedom of Information request show that, on January 17, Mr Ryan met Ms Cronin to discuss the issue. The briefing note prepared for the Greens leader showed the DAA had advised the Department of Transport that, until permission to grow beyond 32million is granted, it would manage capacity through the terminals at Dublin Airport to ensure planning conditions are not breached.
Crucially, the note also said the department was 'aware that concerns have been raised by those in the general aviation business in the US' about Dublin Airport's ability to handle general aviation with the 32million cap in place.
The NBAA, in its letter to Ms Cronin, suggested alternative proposals, saying: 'To mitigate this negative impact, the NBAA and the IGBAA (Irish Business and General Aviation Association) has proposed that, should the 40million cap not be introduced in 2024, 20,000 passengers out of the current 32million be allocated for business aviation.'
A spokesman for the DAA said it is 'doing everything it can to comply... while waiting for planning to be granted'.
The IAA directed the Mail's queries to the DAA.
brian.mahon@dailymail.ie
'Doing everything it can to comply'

Graphic


Plane talking: US Ambassador Claire Cronin called minister in over airport plans

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



AN INTENSE FEELING; I had huge confidence in Raffles - Gibney
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 47
Length: 654 words
Byline: EOGHAN O'BRIEN
Body


INTENSE Raffles continued his Fairyhouse love affair to hold off the fast-finishing Any Second Now in a thrilling renewal of the Boyle- Sports Irish Grand National.
Twelve years on from winning the race with Lion Na Bearnai, Thomas Gibney struck gold again courtesy of the Simon Munir and Isaac Souede-owned French import, who has excelled at Fairyhouse in two starts since his transfer from the continent.
Those victories came in the hands of the currently-injured Daryl Jacob, and Jacob's misfortune was JJ Slevin's gain as he stepped in to also register his second victory in the Easter Monday showpiece aboard the gutsy grey, who showed his star quality with a brilliant round of jumping.
Always travelling powerfully in the hands of Slevin as he tracked the pace set by Frontal Assault, not even a mistake at four out could halt Intense Raffles' momentum as the six-year-old eased effortlessly to the head of proceedings.
Keen to hold on as long as possible, Slevin waited until after two out to edge the 13-2 scorer's nose in front and after jumping the last with a narrow advantage he plugged on gamely to the line as Ted Walsh's veteran and Willie Mullins' Minella Cocooner were bearing down.
'He's a fantastic horse and it's easy to train good horses like that,'
said Gibney. 'Last February was the first time I spoke to them (Munir and Souede) and fair play to the boys.
'It's very easy for the big owners to go to the big yards, so for them to pick out a small stable like us and give us a horse, kudos to them. That takes a bit of doing and it's great to repay them. 'When he won here the last time we were just getting to know him and it's just fallen into place.
'I could make out like I'm a genius but I'm not really, it's just the way it worked out - it worked out well.
'I had huge confidence in the horse. People were asking me if I was nervous and hand on my heart I wasn't because we had huge confidence in him. He's the best I've had.
'He's just a good horse, when you ride a good horse you just get a feeling that this horse is so much better than the others. That's the feeling I get on him nearly every day I ride him.
'He's only six so who knows where he'll go. It was a dream to win it in 2012, it was so different to today as there was so much expectation today and pressure."
He added: 'I want to say thanks to the staff, it's a small outfit with my family, my daughters, my wife and a small local team. They are brilliant and it's great for them, they need it as much as I need it.
'I'm getting hugs and kisses, it feels like a wedding! I'm a Meath man and to win it twice is surreal.
'The two lads (Munir and
Souede) are on planes, they were hoping to watch it so I hope they did see it."
Meanwhile, Brewin'upastorm rolled back the years to give trainer Olly Murphy a Grade Two strike to remember in the
Rathbarry & Glenview Studs Hurdle.
The 11-year-old jumped the last in front but Willie Mukllins' favourite Zarak The Brave was rallying on the run to the line, with Murphy's raider digging deep to edge a three-quarterlength success.
Murphy said: 'I enjoyed that! He's a very good horse on his day and he's only good once a year, if that makes sense.
'He really turned up today and I thought he just outstayed Willie's horse from the back of the last.'
Bottler'secret graduated to Grade Two company in style with victory in the O'Driscoll's Irish Whiskey Juvenile Hurdle.
The four-year-old was a dual winner on the Flat for Ciaran Murphy before changing hands and moving to Gavin Cromwell, for whom he made an impressive hurdles bow at Naas in February.
He was well in control jumping the penultimate flight and stretched clear after the last, coming home three and threequarter lengths clear of market leader Miss Manzor.
Cromwell said: 'He's a lovely straightforward horse. He races lazily which you'd love in a horse coming off the Flat.
'He jumped really well there today.'
"He's the best  horse that  I've ever had"

Graphic


Winning ticket: Slevin aboard Intense RafflesReflective glory: JJ Slevin basks in his Fairyhouse triumph yesterday

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



ARREST ME! Defiance of JK Rowling as she dares police over new Scottish hate crime law; Michael McDowell backs author's right to free speech after she makes a series of posts labelling trans women as men 'Unacceptable' if we follow Scottish bill, says McDowell
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1,7
Length: 908 words
Byline: Craig Hughes; Dan Barker ; David Churchill
Body


JK ROWLING dared police to arrest her under new hate crime laws in Scotland - and Michael McDowell is backing her, warning of similar legal chaos to come in Ireland.
As the legislation came into force in Scotland, the Harry Potter author fired off a flurry of incendiary social media posts, declaring that a string of trans women were men.
And former attorney general Mr
McDowell has warned that proposed Irish hate speech legislation cannot be allowed to cause the problems being witnessed in Scotland.
He told the Irish Daily Mail: 'JK
Rowling, she is being told that to misgender somebody can amount to hate speech, to insist on calling them on their original gender... That's the kind of thing that is simply unacceptable.'
Scotland's Hate Crime Act introduces offences for threatening or
Turn to Page 7
Continued from Page One abusive behaviour which is intended to stir up hatred, which in Scotland previously applied only to race, and brings with it a possible seven-year prison sentence.
Ms Rowling, a prominent gender critic, included transgender campaigners and other individuals in her tweets, referring to them as women.
But she ended the thread by saying: 'April Fools! Only kidding. Obviously, the people mentioned in the above tweets aren't women at all, but men, every last one of them.'
The author, who lives in Edinburgh, added: 'Freedom of speech and belief are at an end in Scotland if the accurate description of biological sex is deemed criminal. I'm currently out of the country, but if what I've written here qualifies as an offence under the terms of the new act, I look forward to being arrested when I return to the birthplace of the Scottish Enlightenment.'
She signed it off with #arrestme.
Scottish minister Siobhian Brown said yesterday that people 'could be investigated' for misgendering someone online, meaning a person could be arrested for using the pronouns 'he/him' for a person identifying as a trans woman.
As the author's comments whipped up a social media storm, Independent Senator Mr McDowell said that he has been listening to the debate in Scotland and it has made him 'more determined to ensure freedom of speech and freedom of thought' are not impacted under proposed hate speech legislation here.
The controversial legislation is due to come back before the Seanad at committee stage after being postponed on several occasions. Mr McDowell said that the legislation is 'undoubtedly very defectively drafted' and that he will be proposing a series of amendments, including one that will 'restrict hatred to a very narrow concept'.
The current wording of the legislation does not define hatred, which would be left up to the courts to interpret, as they do with a wide range of other aspects of the law.
Mr McDowell said that 'it should be reasonable' to interpret what hatred will mean if the legislation is passed and will propose his own definition in an amendment in the Seanad.
'I'm working on my own definition [of hatred] which would restrict hatred to a very narrow concept,' he said.
Mr McDowell said that misgendering someone should not be considered hate speech and that the 'Scottish police have said they are worried people will bring complaints unless self-ID is adhered to'.
'That's the kind of thing that is simply unacceptable,' he said.
Pressure is being mounted from the Government backbenches on newly elected leader of Fine Gael and taoiseach-in-waiting Simon Harris to scrap, or at least heavily water down, the legislation.
Fine Gael TDs Michael Ring and Charlie Flanagan have both called for the Bill to be abandoned.
Minister for Justice Helen McEntee has defended the draft laws as an effort to combat a rise in hate crimes and hate speech, but said she was 'listening to' concerns.
Sinn Féin's spokesman for justice Pa Daly last week called for the Bill to be ditched entirely, saying it was 'badly thought through and is not fit for purpose'. 'It is clear to me and to
Sinn Féin that this Bill does not have support across the political spectrum. It must be scrapped,' he said in a statement last week, despite the party voting the Bill through the Dáil last April.
In her social media post, Ms Rowling, 58, listed ten high profile trans people and denied their claims to be women.
Scottish double rapist Isla Bryson was near the top of the list. The 31-year-old was initially jailed for eight years at a women's prison before later being moved to a male prison following a widespread backlash.
Bryson only began transitioning in 2020 after being charged with raping two women. The 31-yearold was known as Adam Graham at the time of the offences.
Ms Rowling wrote: 'In passing the Scottish Hate Crime Act, Scottish lawmakers seem to have placed higher value on the feelings of men performing their idea of femaleness, however misogynistically or opportunistically, than on the rights and freedoms of actual women and girls.'
She added: 'The re-definition of "woman" to include every man who declares himself one has already had serious consequences for women's and girls' rights and safety in Scotland, with the strongest impact felt, as ever, by the most vulnerable, including female prisoners and rape survivors.'
Despite the outcry online, Police Scotland said, as of yesterday evening, they had not received any complaints about the posts by Ms Rowling.
craig.hughes@dailymail.ie brenda power
SEE PAGE 12 NEW HATE LAW IS ANTI-WOMEN
'The re-definition of "woman"' 'Restrict hatred to a very narrow concept'

Graphic


Critic: JK Rowling issued a flurry of tweets yesterdayProtests: Activists in Edinburgh yesterday opposing the new hate speech bill

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Bedding down a great idea; ANSWERS TO CORRESPONDENTS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 38
Length: 873 words
Byline: Charles Legge
Body


QUESTION
Has an inventor ever been inspired by a dream?
THERE are several examples of how sometimes taking a break from a problem, or literally 'sleeping on it', will yield a spontaneous and unexpected solution. One famous example was that of Elias Howe, who worked as a cotton machinist and later as a master mechanic working on precision instruments in Cambridge, Massachusetts.
Howe realised that he might earn his fortune by inventing a sewing machine.
The problem was where the eye of the needle of the sewing machine should be located. His original idea was to follow the model of the ordinary needle and have the eye at the heel.
Then he had a dream in which he'd been captured by a savage king who gave him an ultimatum - he must invent a sewing machine within 24 hours or die. He noticed the warriors were carrying spears that were pierced near the head. This gave him the solution and he patented his sewing machine the following year.
As a student, Larry Page dreamed that he'd managed to download the entire internet. He immediately grabbed a pen when he awoke and wrote down the basis for an algorithm to power his search engine, now known as Google.
In the mid-19th century, the structure of benzene puzzled scientists. It was known to have a molecular formula of C6H6, indicating six carbon and six hydrogen atoms, but experts could not explain how it was both stable and reactive.
Friedrich August Kekule, a German chemist, solved the problem in 1865 following a dream. He wrote: 'What was that? One of the serpents seized its own tail and the form whirled mockingly before my eyes. I came awake like a flash of lightning.'
He proposed the idea that benzene molecules were cyclic, with alternating single and double bonds. This neatly explained the compound's observed behaviour. Similarly, it was the vision of a spiral staircase in a dream that inspired James Watson's 1953 discovery of the double helix spiral structure for DNA.
Simon Keene, Sheffield.
QUESTION
Why do some (usually military) aeroplanes have the wings attached to the fuselage at the top, while almost all airliners have them attached at the bottom? THERE are various reasons why military aircraft might benefit
Compiled by Charles Legge from a high-wing configuration. Visibility is better, with no wings blocking the view below, which is useful for spotters. High wings improve clearance over rough ground, which is important on grass or uneven strips.
High wings give greater access for loading and unloading large goods. For military airlifts, the ability to load cargo is vital; they need to be able to load large objects with little or no ground support available. The fuselage should be as close to the ground as possible to allow roll-on/rolloff of cargo with built-in ramps.
Low wings are favoured for civil aviation because this puts the passenger cabin on top of the wing. Damage from non-normal landings (gear up, no runway, etc.) will happen to the wing first. Low-wing aircraft also have a safety advantage in a water landing because the wings can keep much of the fuselage above water, as well as providing a temporary staging area for deplaning passengers.
A low wing allows engines to be near the ground for easy fuelling and regular servicing. Goods are usually loaded by pallet, so only require side access.
A. S. Leonard, Winsford, Cheshire.
QUESTION
How is the FTSE Index calculated? THE FTSE is maintained by the London Stock Exchange Group. It is a major indicator of the performance of the broader market.
The FTSE 100 Index was launched on January 3, 1984, with an arbitrary value of 1,000.
It is a relative measure; the general health of the UK economy can be gauged by its movement over time.
FTSE 100 represents the 100 largest and most tradeable companies in Britain's economy.
The index is calculated by weighing the stocks by market capitalisation. Market capitalisation is calculated by multiplying the current market price of their shares by the total number of outstanding shares.
Each company's market capitalisation is then weighted within the index. Larger companies with higher market capitalisations will have a greater impact on the index's value compared with smaller companies, and therefore have a greater effect on the index's price movements.
Periodically, the index may be adjusted to reflect changes in the market, including additions or removals of companies.
Sara Pullman, London.
? Is there a question to which you have always wanted to know the answer? Or do you know the answer to a question raised here? Send your questions and answers to: Charles Legge, Answers To Correspondents, Irish Daily Mail, DMG Media, Two Haddington Buildings, 20-38 Haddington Road, Dublin 4, D04 HE94. You can also fax them to 0044 1952 510906 or you can email them to charles. legge@dailymail.ie A selection will be published but we are not able to enter into individual correspondence.
questions
Q: What was the story behind soccer pundit Alan Hansen's assertion that 'you can't win anything with kids'?
Q
John Murphy, Bray, Co. Wicklow. : Who are the youngest and oldest people to be awarded doctorates?
Vicky Spicer, Gillingham, Kent.
Q: Entire books celebrate Winston Churchill's insults, but what jibes were directed at him?
Heidi Warren, Epsom, Surrey.

Graphic


Vision: A DNA double helix, the discovery of which came about as a result of a scientist's dream

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



C.A.F. Trading Company Ltd is [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 255 words
Body


C.A.F. Trading Company Ltd is an Irish-based bean sprout grower, vegetable wholesaler, and distributor. Our bean sprouts supply Tesco, Asian Market Dublin, the Vegetable martlet in Smtthfield Dublin, and various restaurants In Ireland. Currently, we are seeking a full-time Merchant Assistant (Chinese) to join our team and source products in China.
Duties: • Communicating effectively with Chinese suppliers to negotiate terms, resolve Issues, and maintain positive relationships between China and Ireland.
• Processing orders efficiently and accurately, ensuring timely delivery between China and Ireland. • Coordinating with internal teams to ensure seamless logistics and tiventory management between China and Ireland.
• Managing importtaxport documentation, Including customs clearance and compliance with regulations between China and Ireland.
• Providing quality control to support the purchasing team between China and Ireland Essential: > Proficient in Chinese and English language • Ex.p eernleennced In frutt and vegetable merchandising, adept at communication, management, and coordinating business activities between China and Ireland Desirable: • Permanent full time Contract and working hours 39 hours per week; • Annual remuneration is (EURO)34,000.00 • Working location at Unft13, Cherry Orchard Industrial Estate, Ballyfermot, Dubllnirj, D10VE89 Contact: C A R Trading Company Ltd Address: Unrt13, Cheny Orchard Industrial Estate, Ballyfermot, Dublln10,D10VEB9 Tel:+353-1-6267791 Email: www.dereklukecaf-lreland.com

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Camp that gives childhood back to sick children; As Barretstown turns 30, a new report highlights its value to the health service
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 36
Length: 883 words
Byline: maeve quigley
Body


IT is the camp for children that stemmed from an idea the actor Paul Newman had to help children who are suffering from a serious illness have fun again.
And now in its 30th year, in a site on the outskirts of Dublin; Barretstown is celebrating 30 years of offering free, specially designed camps and programmes for those children and their families - supported behind the scenes by 24 hour on site medical and nursing care.
All of the children and families come to Barretstown free of charge. Everything, including accommodation, food and medical assistance are provided at no cost to the family.
Barretstown is supported by donations and the fundraising efforts of corporate supporters, individuals and community groups and is also recognised as a centre of excellence in childhood cancer care and other serious illnesses. Children are referred to Barretstown based on their medical needs.
Since the gates first opened in 1994, over 120,000 campers have walked through the gates and a new report has predicted that this will increase to over 250,000 campers by 2030 as it expands its medically endorsed residential and outreach camps and programmes.
THIS includes over 33,000 volunteers donating more than 1.2 million hours. The programmes provided by Barretstown align to the objectives of the National Cancer Strategy to cater for the psychosocial well-being of children and teenagers impacted by cancer.
The report authored by Sandra Velthuis of Whitebarn Consulting was launched by Health Minister Stephen Donnelly and outlines the breadth of medically endorsed therapeutic programmes that are offered to seriously ill children and their families throughout Ireland helping them to rebuild confidence, independence, selfesteem and enhance emotional wellbeing.
Minister Donnelly said the camp provides a vital service for children.
'I know that the excellent therapeutic care and recreational services Barretstown provides are essential components of our healthcare system,' he added.
'The team in Barretstown deliver services that are a vital part of our National Cancer Strategy, including supporting seriously ill children and their families to rebuild their lives. It is clear to see from the figures contained within this comprehensive report that the social impact of Barretstown's services, and the value of same, cannot be underestimated.'
For Dee Ahearn, the CEO of Barretstown, caring for children outside of a hospital environment is an essential service.
'While hospitals treat the illness, our focus is on treating the child,' she says. 'We now know from the latest medical and psychological research the importance of supporting a child's psychosocial development in the aftermath of a childhood illness. When our founder Paul Newman established Barretstown it was with the novel idea of using the transformative power of a camp experience to rebuild a child's emotional wellbeing and sense of self.
'That idea is now a core pillar of strategic national health policy with Barretstown making an important contribution in response to this.
'As we celebrate our 30th anniversary, this report provides a timely insight into the evolution of the organisation which has gone from supporting over 100 children and family members in our first year of operations, to this year supporting over 22,000.'
The new report gives a valuable insight into the lived experiences of children and families and how Barretstown has helped them.
'Looking ahead, we project growth in the demand for our therapeutic programmes to double by the end of the decade which equates to 250,000 seriously ill children and their families who will have been served by
Barretstown,' Ahearn says. 'As we take stock of what has been achieved to date, it strengthens our resolve to reach and support as many children as possible who need our programmes.'
Commissioned to mark its 30th anniversary, the report summarises the outcomes and impact of Barretstown's residential and outreach camps and programmes. It also highlights Barretstown's engagement within a wider community comprising schools, hospital groups, charity partners, donors and volunteers. From its opening by Paul Newman in 1994, Barretstown has grown to become the largest and most established organisation in Ireland providing research-informed, medically endorsed, therapeutic camps and programmes.
PROFESSOR Owen Smith, UCD Professor of Paediatric and Adolescent Medicine, Consultant Paediatric Haematologist at Our Lady's Children's Hospital, and Medical Patron of Barretstown says play therapy is an essential part of any holistic response to a childhood illness like cancer.
'The value of its therapeutic camps and programmes cannot be underestimated,' he says. ' In the context of responding to a serious illness, we know that the response needs to be, not only medication, but also focusing on the person, and their wellbeing and adopting a more holistic response as part of a comprehensive treatment plan.
'Barretstown's researchinformed and medically endorsed therapeutic programmes play a major role in a child's recovery journey. We know that the impact of the programmes at Barretstown remain with people for life and are regarded as an important component in helping many go on to lead healthy and fulfilling lives.'
To support Barretstown see www.barretstown.org

Graphic


Research: Anne Heraty, Chair, Barretstown Board; Stephen Donnelly, TD, Minister for Health and Dee Ahearn, CEO, Barretstown, left, Jonathan Lennon and his sister Cara Lennon

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Chloe got three more years with her family thanks to a heart transplant from Alex. Now, after HER tragic death, their mothers have found solace in their unique bond; EXCLUSIVE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 22,23
Length: 2157 words
Byline: LUCY LAING
Body


FROM the moment we met and gave each other a hug it felt so comfortable,' says Tracey Pescod, describing meeting Judy Coutinho for the first time a couple of weeks ago.
'We'd been messaging each other a lot but actually to meet her in person was something I will never forget,' says Tracey, still tearful at the memory.
Like any new friends, 'we talked about our children and showed each other photos'. But this interest in each other's family went far beyond polite regard, as these two mothers have been brought together in the most tragic shared circumstances.
Both have been through the almost intolerable pain of losing a child, but their link goes deeper than that. For the sudden death of Judy's son Alex helped save the life of Tracey's daughter Chloe.
At the time, Chloe was just 20 and was critically ill in hospital, her organs shutting down because of heart failure.
It was Judy's selfless determination that bought Chloe precious extra years of life - still reeling at the loss of her son, and just a few hours after Judy and her partner had tried desperately to save his life by performing CPR, Judy told the doctors that Alex's organs should be donated to save others.
Chloe received his heart. The transplant was life-transforming for the teenager and her family, who were able to go on holiday for the first time in years, Chloe was even able to get a part-time job.
But then, in February last year, almost three years after the transplant, tragedy struck again: Chloe's body started to reject her donated heart, and she died, aged 22. Tracey, 47, a former restaurant manager was beside herself with grief. But she knew that Judy, who had by chance messaged her for the first time a week earlier, via social media, would understand how she was feeling.
In fact, Judy was one of the first people Tracey told what had happened, and over the past year it is Judy who Tracey has turned to when she feels overwhelmed with grief. 'Her son saved my daughter, but now we have lost them both and we totally appreciate how each other feels,' says Tracey. 'If I'm having a bad day, I know that I can message Judy and she will understand.'
Judy, 61, says when she heard that Chloe had died she felt deeply for Tracey: 'I knew what it was like to lose a child suddenly. But it also made me feel guilty that Alex's heart hadn't managed to beat on longer for Chloe.'
Theirs is an extraordinary friendship, with its roots in a note Chloe had written to Judy 14 months after her operation. It was anonymous, and came via the transplant services, as is the protocol. In it Chloe expressed her gratitude at her second chance at life (see right). The card happened to land on Judy's doormat on what would have been Alex's 28th birthday. Chloe said: 'I will forever be extremely grateful to have been honoured with a beautiful gift from Alex ...'
'It was one of the most special things I've ever been given,' says Judy, who is a paediatric nurse and lives with partner Gary Cunningham, 62, a retired fireman. She has three other sons, Olly, 30, Rick, 27, and Stephen, 24.
Alex's death in January 2020 was a terrible 'bolt from the blue'. He'd come home for Christmas from Chicago, where he worked as a financial auditor. He was staying at his brother's apartment catching up with university friends and was due back home when he pulled out, saying he felt unwell.
When Judy called the following day she could tell instantly that something was seriously wrong.
'He sounded odd - very vacant and confused,' she says.
'He kept asking what day it was, and alarm bells started ringing. I told him I was coming to get him.'
She and Gary jumped in the car to make the hour-long journey but when they arrived at the apartment there was no reply.
'We heard a groan and a thud from the other side of the door,' says Judy. 'One of the neighbours ran for the concierge who let us in. We found Alex collapsed on the floor. I was hysterical.'
Judy rang 999 while Gary performed CPR on Alex. 'We couldn't comprehend what had happened. He was fit and healthy.'
At the hospital an MRI scan revealed Alex had suffered a catastrophic brain haemorrhage. 'The minute they said that, being a nurse, I knew that it meant he wouldn't recover,' says Judy. 'Our lives changed in that single moment.'
But her mind was racing with what Alex would have wanted and her instinct was he would want to be an organ donor. 'We had never talked about it, but I knew that's what Alex would have wanted, that his organs should help other people,' says Judy.
His heart, lungs and both kidneys went to separate people, while his liver was divided between two recipients. Six people were saved that day - one of them Chloe. For two weeks she had been lying in a hospital bed, her life hanging in the balance.
Chloe was born with a rare condition, Sengers syndrome, which affects the mitochondria, the 'batteries' in every cell. As a result, she had cardiomyopathy (thickening of the heart), spina bifida and cataracts.
She had surgery on her spine at six months old and defied expectations. She learned to walk and made steady progress at school. But aged 16 a routine check detected heart problems, and soon after, another check showed her heart function was rapidly declining - 'it was only 20 per cent of what it should be,' says Tracey. Chloe was put on medication and doctors warned them she might need a heart transplant.
'But we thought that would be way in the future,' says Tracey.
However, soon after, on Christmas Eve in 2019, Chloe said she didn't feel well and kept needing the loo, and her parents took her to hospital.
There, doctors broke the news that her heart failure had worsened and caused multiple organ failure. Chloe was transferred to a specialist hospital and put on to a life support machine. Her only hope was a transplant.
'We were shattered. We didn't know if a heart would be found in time,' says Tracey.
'She was put on the super urgent list - they couldn't tell us how many days she had left, we just had to take it each day at a time.
Over the next fortnight, three hearts became available but each was eventually judged to be unsuitable - the third only after Chloe had been sedated and prepared to be taken to theatre.
When the call about a fourth heart - Alex's - came, on January 8, 2020, Chloe's parents didn't dare hope it would be a match - but it was and the ten-hour operation went ahead.
It was, says Tracey, 'a bittersweet miracle - a miracle that she had got a new heart, but bittersweet because we knew another family had lost their loved one in order for it to happen'.
Chloe recovered well and after three months was back home, the day the country went into lockdown. For a month the family was full of hope. 'We thought she may have a bright future,' says Tracey.
Then, one morning, Chloe said she felt as if she had something in the back of her mouth. 'I had a look and it looked like a decaying mushroom,' says Tracey.
She took Chloe to hospital where they took a biopsy, and to Tracey's horror the swelling was found to be Non-Hodgkin lymphoma, a blood cancer.
Chloe needed six months of chemotherapy and radiotherapy, finishing in September.
She fought back, but two months later went down with neutropenic sepsis, a life-threatening reaction when a patient with low immune cells (such as those who have had chemotherapy) develops an infection.
'But she made a good recovery, she was fit and active and even managed to get a voluntary job at the local garden centre. It seemed like life had turned a corner for her,' says Tracey.
'Having not been away for over five years we managed to go on a family holiday in September to Turkey the following year. Chloe loved every minute. She was in the swimming pool every day.'
But in December 2022 she developed a cyst on her surgery scar and was admitted into hospital.
'Her heart was racing and the lump on her chest kept oozing with pus,' says Tracey.
'We know now she was suffering from organ rejection. She was dreadfully unlucky. After the first year, the chance of rejection reduces dramatically.
'They could have increased her anti-rejection medication, which would have got the rejection under control.'
But by the time they realised what was wrong, Chloe was in a coma.
'They said there was nothing more they could do, and we had to be prepared for her to die.' Tracey barely registered anything else from that difficult time. But one thing made an impression: a message she received from a local cancer fundraiser called David Ansell who had been inspired in part by Chloe's story to do charity walks.
'He'd been contacted by a lady called Judy who'd seen local press articles about Chloe,' says Tracey. 'She noticed the date of Chloe's transplant matched the time she'd lost Alex and donated his organs, and as she'd received a thank-you card from a girl called Chloe, she put two and two together.
'She contacted David and asked would he pass a message to me.' Tracey replied to Judy instantly: 'I thanked her from the bottom of my heart, but it was a tough time - I had to tell her Chloe was really poorly.'
The family - Tracey's husband Gary, 51, and Chloe's sister Courtney, 22, were at Chloe's side when she died on February 3.
It was a week after Judy's message, and Tracey messaged Judy straightaway.
I felt she should be told - she had played a part in giving us extra time with Chloe.'
Judy had written to all of the donor recipients, contacting them through the transplant team at the hospital. She was told a teenage girl had received
Alex's lungs after hers were damaged by cancer - she is still in contact with the family. 'It was anonymous at first, but after we had exchanged three or four letters we decided to drop the anonymity, and I love that they're now real people to me, with lives I could hear about and share.'
A 30-year-old man received one of Alex's kidneys and a woman in her 50s had part of his liver. Judy receives regular, anonymous updates from them.
'A five-year-old boy received the other part of Alex's liver and I've heard from his mum who was eternally grateful for his gift of life,' says Judy. 'She sent a beautiful photo of him and told me his favourite subject at school was chatting! She still sends me updates once a year.
'It really helped getting all those letters and the photos, and seeing that Alex's organs have had some purpose. It would have been easy to slip into total despair after losing my son, but having that contact with the recipients has helped me to keep going.
'Alex was a glass half-full person and the fact he has been able to do this for these people has been such a comfort.'
With Tracey, there is a particular bond: 'From the moment Chloe's card landed on the doormat on Alex's birthday it was like a sign from above,' says Judy. 'We spoke first on the phone and it was always easy between us.'
Over the past year the pair have messaged each other regularly. 'We have an incredibly special relationship,' adds Tracey. 'Judy has been a great support: she messages me on special dates such as Chloe's birthday, and the anniversary of losing her.'
Both women admit they were nervous as well as excited in the run-up to meeting one another.
'I felt responsible for "losing" Alex again for Judy,' says Tracey. 'I know she doesn't feel like that, and she doesn't want me to feel that either, but I feel like I've let her down, and I have to live with that. And I understand even more how she felt losing her son, as I've gone through that pain too.'
Yet from the moment they met any nerves were cast aside.
'It was so emotional,' says Tracey of their meeting, which took place in a wine bar on March 15. 'Straight away we hugged each other and just held on to each other so tightly.
'We spent the whole weekend together, having lunch, drinks in the evening, going for walks.'
Judy adds: 'It was unbelievable meeting Tracey - I feel such a bond with her, and that's been strengthened by meeting her in person: it feels like I'd known her a lifetime.
'If someone had been able to give me three extra years with Alex, I'd have bitten their hand off. So it means the world to me that I've given Tracey three more precious years with Chloe.'
She is sad that she didn't get to know Chloe, and was not able to meet 'the beautiful soul that I know she was, but it's a privilege to have her mother and her family in my life'.
'If I hadn't have donated Alex's organs, then I wouldn't have this amazing friendship with Tracey,' she says, adding: 'It's such a hard time for families when they have lost their loved one, but they should consider it and say yes to donating their organs if they can, as it allows something good to come out of something so tragic.'
Tracey adds: 'Judy and I have a bond that can never be broken now. She and Alex gave me precious time with my daughter, and I can never thank her enough for that.'
? See www.ika.ie
'I had to tell Judy that my daughter had now died' His family tried desperately to save Alex with CPR 'Hearing from the organ recipients has kept me going'

Graphic


Beautiful words: Chloe's poignant letter to Alex's mum JudyMuch loved: Tracey with her daughters Courtney and Chloe, far left. Above: Judy with her son AlexSpecial connection: Tracey and Judy

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Come off it, Roy, his link-up play is not 'League Two' … and it's not even his role under Pep; Roy Keane: The level of Haaland's general play is so poor. He's almost like a League Two player. He has to improve
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 54,55
Length: 782 words
Byline: CHRIS SUTTON
Body


MACAULAY Langstaff of Notts County is currently the top scorer in League Two but last season the 27-year-old from Stockton-on-Tees was being hailed as 'the non-League Erling Haaland' because of the sheer madness of his numbers in front of goal.
Langstaff, who scored 42 goals in 48 games as County secured promotion from the National League, said at the time that he was thrilled with the comparison, as anybody would be.
But I'm not so sure Haaland would share in his delight on hearing that former Manchester United captain Roy Keane has likened him to Langstaff, when he said the Manchester City striker's all-round performance against Arsenal was like that of a 'League Two player'.
It was a lazy, throwaway line from Keane after City's first 0-0 draw in 76 Premier League games. An unfair one, because Haaland's general play wasn't the problem in that drab draw.
Mohamed Salah had 12 shots against Brighton on Sunday -
his most in a Premier League game on his 254th appearance - as Liverpool created chance after chance for him to score.
That wasn't the case for Haaland against Arsenal. Gabriel and William Saliba were aggressive whenever one of them was shadowing him, showing why they are at the heart of the Premier League's meanest defence, but Mikel Arteta's team also went man-to-man out of possession across the pitch.
They stifled City so they could not create the chances they usually do and that was Pep Guardiola's biggest problem.
The onus is on City's players to provide for Haaland. Not vice versa, in spite of Keane's criticism regarding his overall contribution to Sunday's stalemate.
City have failed to score home and away against Arsenal in the
Premier League this season. When they face opponents who defend with as much determination as their title rivals, it is only natural that Haaland is hammered for not doing something different in order to change the game.
But Guardiola did not bring the 23-year-old Norwegian to the club to do what Harry Kane was doing for Tottenham, dropping deep to unselfishly set up Son Heung-min. He has Kevin De Bruyne and Bernardo Silva and everyone else for that.
Besides, the midfield is busy enough as it is, with John Stones an expert at moving up from central defence to act as that extra man. If City wanted their star striker to carry that skillset then they would have coughed up the cash for Kane.
Instead, they got the game's greatest finisher Haaland - an out-and-out No9. They signed him to stay high, to occupy the opposition centre backs - which creates space for his team-mates all around the park, remember, and to stick the ball in the back of the net.
Haaland did that last season, with 36 goals in 35 games in the Premier League. He's done it this season, with 18 in 24, and he will be the first to confess he messed up the one chance that came his way at the Etihad on Sunday when he nutmegged himself after a corner.
If critics believe Haaland should be doing more than patrolling the penalty box, it is a good debate to have after another game against Arsenal in which he failed to have a shot on target. But it is wrong to hammer him for not trying to turn creator in a team who are chock-full of creative talent.
The appropriate discussion to have would be on his form in front of goal. Since returning from injury in January, Haaland has scored four goals in eight Premier League starts.
For a regular striker that would be a respectable return, but for Haaland it is nowhere near the standards he has set himself as City's executor-in-chief.
His miss against Manchester United in last month's league match, when he volleyed over the bar from five yards with the score at 0-0, stands out. But he scored later on to seal a 3-1 win.
Could he improve in his link-up play? Sure, he could be cleaner. But Haaland isn't the world's worst when dabbling in that department.
Certainly, his level is not League Two.
He can hold the ball up better than most and it isn't as if he can't play a pass or turns slower than milk. He was much more involved in the build-up play at Borussia Dortmund but they didn't have the cast of creators who surround him at City.
It was not because of Haaland's lack of creativity that City failed to take charge of the Premier League title race on Sunday. It was because Arsenal made sure he did not get any service.
SO, HOW DOES HAALAND COMPARE WITH LEAGUE TWO TOP SCORER LANGSTAFF? LANGSTAFF (2023-24 LEAGUE STATS) HAALAND NOTTS COUNTY Club MANCHESTER CITY 27 Age 23 £2,900 Weekly wages £375,000 1 Trophies 7 5ft 10in Height 6ft 4in 12st 2lb Weight 13st 14lb 0.6 Goals per game 0.8 0.15 Assists per game 0.22 3.9 Shots per game 4.3 26 Touches per game 24 0.5 Chances created per game 1.1 0.4 Tackles per game 0.2

Graphic


Chart topper: Macaulay Langstaff is flying at Notts County ALAMYStill growing: Haaland reflects on winning the Champions League and (below) watering his beloved bonsai tree MANCHESTER CITY

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Could staring at flashing lights help to delay the progress of dementia?; New study finds it could flush out proteins in the brain
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 24
Length: 567 words
Byline: ROGER DOBSON
Body


EXPOSING patients to flickering lights and sounds may offer a new drug-free way to treat dementia.
The combination is thought to work by flushing out proteins in the brain believed to be implicated in Alzheimer's disease, the most common form of dementia. This, it is hoped, will slow the progression of the disease and may even improve symptoms, according to a new study.
One theory is that in people with Alzheimer's, these toxic proteins are not cleared away as effectively as normal.
In research involving mice, exposure to the lights ? which flicker 40 times a second ? and low-pitched sound for one hour a day for ten days resulted in an increase in the amount of the proteins removed through the brain's drainage system, known as the glymphatic system, and improvements to memory.
The researchers, from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, say the discovery, reported in the journal Nature, could lead to new treatments for those with early Alzheimer's.
Now 100 people with mild Alzheimer's are taking part in the first human trials of the treatment.
Around 64,000 in Ireland have dementia, and about 70 per cent of these have Alzheimer's.
The cause is not fully understood but one idea is that it is linked to an abnormal build-up of toxic proteins called amyloid and tau in and around brain cells.
These proteins clump together, which is thought to interfere with communication between brain cells. Over time, parts of the brain affected by the clumps effectively shrink, and there is a reduction in the levels of the chemicals needed to send nerve messages, such as acetylcholine (levels of acetylcholine are particularly low in people with Alzheimer's). Eventually, the brain struggles to cope with the damage and the patient begins to have problems with memory and thinking.
CURRENT treatments are mainly limited to treating the symptoms of early dementia. The new light treatment is based on the fact that in a healthy brain, excess proteins are continuously expelled along with other toxins through the glymphatic system.
But in some people, this process slows with advancing age. An emerging theory is that this leads to a toxic build-up in the brain.
Previous research has found that sound waves can affect nerve cell activity in the brain.
The new study involved lights that flickered at a frequency of 40Hz (40 times a second) and low-pitched sound of 60dB, about the volume of standard conversation. This combination of light and sound was shown to make blood vessels near the brain's drainage system pulsate more, which speeds up drainage. Exactly why is unclear.
For the forthcoming human trials, patients with mild Alzheimer's will look at a panel with LEDs and speakers to produce sound, or will have a placebo.
Katherine Gray, head of research at the Alzheimer's Society, said: 'While this new research suggests a potential new way to tackle Alzheimer's, much more work is needed to understand how it could benefit people. We welcome the testing and look forward to seeing the outcomes of the research.'
ö
EATING too much salt increases the risk of dementia. An analysis of the diets of more than 400,000 people from the UK Biobank showed the risk could increase by up to 54 per cent among those with the highest intakes.
The researchers, writing in Genes & Nutrition, suggest one possibility is salt is linked to high blood pressure, which has previously been linked to cognitive decline.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Don't call them bird brains... feathered friends are getting MORE intelligent
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 3
Length: 352 words
Byline: Chris Pollard
Body


THEY are considered lacking in brainpower - despite their mastery of flight.
But birds are developing bigger brains which is making them more intelligent, reckon scientists.
An international team of researchers tracked the evolutionary history of birds from the earliest, in the time of the dinosaurs, to the most modern by compiling a genetic family tree.
This gave them new insights into how the creatures have developed skills over millions of years.
Professor Tamas Szekely, of the University of Bath in England, said: 'The average body size of birds has declined, but their brains relative to their body mass has increased, indicating enhanced cognition.
'Large brains may be linked to complex social behaviours, stunning variation in bird song and sophisticated use of tools. In future, we want to look at how body size and brain size have evolved in relation to changes in their behaviour, life histories and ecology. These may all relate to changes in their environment during the history of the Earth.'
While often considered stupid, birds are among the world's most adaptable animals. After the mass extinction 66million years ago that killed the dinosaurs and most other life on Earth, new birds evolved to fill the empty niches.
Professor Guojie Zhang, from Zhejiang University in China, says the team now wants to create a genetic database of every living bird species.
'This will be essential for combating diseases like avian influenza, and will be a treasure trove for conserving birds worldwide,' he said.
Meanwhile, scientists at England's University of Sussex believe chipstealing seagulls should be seen as clever and charismatic, not a nuisance. Professor Paul Graham says the birds, often forced into urban areas due to dwindling fish stocks at sea, have learned to recognise packaging as a potential source of food.
'Gulls didn't evolve to like chips,' he explained. 'Over time they have had to learn to engage with humans in order to source food.
'When we see behaviours we think of as mischievous or criminal, we're seeing a really clever bird implementing very intelligent behaviour.'
news@dailymail.ie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Duff's Shels make a point; Leaders overcome illness in camp
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 50
Length: 612 words
Byline: PHILIP QUINN
Body


SHELBOURNE 0 DERRY CITY 0
FOR Damien Duff, the glass was halffull after a Bank Holiday blankety blank in Tolka Park ended Shelbourne's sixgame winning run.
A hard-earned draw against Derry City maintained the Reds' unbeaten start to the season.
'Calm defending. Calm defending,' barked Duff in the final minutes of a game that began brightly but fizzled out as the teams cancelled each other out.
Three shots on target said it all - there were more yellow cards.
Arguably, there was greater fury between the rival technical areas in the second half than on the pitch.
At the final whistle, it was honours even and handshakes allround after an outcome that was fair, if low on entertainment.
Duff praised his players for coping with a virus that ran through the home dressing room.
'I'd go as far to say that is probably the best point we've earned in two and a bit years and you're probably looking at me going, "are you crazy?" I'm not.
'The whole squad is sick, there is some almighty virus going around so they've been on the toilet, in the toilet.
'For the effort they put in, the players were absolutely heroes because they were dead on their feet.'
'There was a flatness in the air but I think that was just the game that brought that. It's a big point,' he insisted.
With the on-going Ireland managerial vacancy the talk of the sport, there were angles aplenty on show at kick-off.
Stephen Kenny, the former manager, was in the stand, while two of his assistants for a time, Duff and Rúaidhrí Higgins, were opposing managers.
If the FAI needs a negotiator to bring sides together and hammer out a deal, perhaps Bertie Ahern, another enjoying his Bank Holiday in the Tolka enclosures, could give it a dig out.
Early on, it was a decent enough duel. Derry were the better team in the first half although Shels had the best clear-cut chance, which they squandered.
With an eight-point deficit to make up, Derry's intent was clear as they pushed bodies forward with Michael Duffy and Paul McMullen up in support of Patrick Hoban.
Will Patching was on target with a header which Conor Kearns plucked the ball from under the crossbar and then went close with a rasping freekick just before the break.
Shels had a couple of moments. Paddy Barrett pinged a ball over the top for Evan Caffrey who volleyed over on the run.
Just before the half hour, a Shels counter attack saw three red jersey bearing down on two Derry defenders.
The Derry line felt they weren't getting the break of the ball in 50-50 challenges and let referee
Eoghan O'Neill what they thought of some of his calls.
In saying that, they had reason to thank the Tipperary official who waved play on when the ball jumped up and caught Gavin Molloy's arm inside the box.
After the break, with Hoban missing with a groin issue, there was little activity at either end for the 3,932 attendance to get their teeth into.
Shane McEleney was in the right place to intercept a pass for Jarvis with Derry at full stretch, and that was as close as Shels got.
For the visitors, Paul Mullen turned and shot wide, while Patching's free took a deflection off the wall and forced Kearns to parry to his right.
After losing at home to Galway on Friday, Higgins got the response he was looking for.
'It was a much better performance in terms of commitment. We've had some difficult nights. Losing to Galway hurt the most,' he said.
SHELBOURNE: Kearns; Gannon, Barrett, Molloy, Wilson; O'Sullivan, Lunney, Caffrey (Farrell 62); Burt (Ledwidge 82), Smith (Martin 64), Jarvis (Boyd 82).
DERRY CITY: Maher; Boyce (Todd 89), S McEleney, Connolly, Coll, McJannet; Patching, O'Reilly; Duffy, Hoban (Mullen h/t), McMullan (Kelly 76).
Referee: E O'Shea (Tipperary)

Graphic


Standing up: Paddy Barrett of Shels blocks a shot by Derry's Ronan Boyce

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Expert tips on how to banish WIND; Is it really bad to hold it in? How many times a day is normal? Can I train my body to stop doing it?
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 25
Length: 1441 words
Byline: EMILY LEEMING
Body


WHILE it may be a source of amusement for small children, breaking wind is an entirely normal process which each of us does around 15 to 20 times a day.
But there are times when it's a sign something else is going on.
For instance, smelly or excessive flatulence may be related to a problem with your diet or can be a sign of underlying health problems.
The same goes for burping, another normal part of everyday life which, for many people, can become a problem.
Despite the embarrassment both cause, neither flatulence nor burping are in themselves bad things.
In the case of flatulence especially, this is often a sign of a healthy gut - it means your gut bacteria are busy at work breaking down foodstuffs such as fibre that cannot be broken down elsewhere in the digestive tract, and a by-product of that process is wind (largely formed of carbon dioxide, hydrogen and methane).
On average we produce 500ml to 2,000ml of wind a day - and most of this is released without you even realising it.
In fact, while a lot of flatulence is released within an hour of eating, a significant amount is emitted while you're asleep as the anal sphincter muscle, which opens to release gas, relaxes.
Even the gas that's released during the day shouldn't be a big deal as 99 per cent of what you produce doesn't smell.
That's worth remembering if you're the type of person who tries to hold wind in when in company.
I'm no etiquette expert, but as a scientist who has spent the majority of her career investigating how the gut works, I can say that while repeatedly holding it in won't do any major damage, it can make you bloated and lead to abdominal pain as the gas presses on the gut wall.
Obviously, there are occasions when breaking wind can make you feel horribly self- conscious - especially if it's excessively smelly.
BUT why do some people have more malodorous wind? It can just be down to the make-up of your gut microbiome (the community of microbes that live in your gut) - some people just have more of the types of gut bacteria that produce smelly gas.
What you eat can also play a part. One of the most common culprits of pungent wind is eating too much meat: that's due to a compound called sulphur - found in especially high levels in red meat - which is broken down by your gut bacteria into a gas, hydrogen sulphide, that smells like rotten eggs.
Sulphur is also found in other meats and fish, eggs, cabbage, broccoli, Brussels sprouts and cauliflower.
But it's normally red meat that's the culprit - as this is what we tend to eat too much of, rather than vegetables.
So if your wind is smelly you might want to cut back on your red meat consumption.
The last thing I want anyone to do is to cut back on veg such as broccoli, but if you are concerned about your wind and you have a special event coming up, then you could avoid sulphur-rich foods for the 24-48 hours beforehand (in a study I was involved in, published in the journal Gut in 2021, we gave volunteers muffins with blue food dye and found that on average it takes just under 29 hours for food to pass out of the system).
But what, you may be wondering, about beans - the basis of many a fart joke?
While eating more beans, of any type, may initially increase your wind, in the longer term it usually gets better.
Beans are rich in fibre, which is gut bacteria's favourite food - and with around 7g in half a tin, weight for weight beans provide more fibre than fruit and veg.
Most of us don't eat anywhere near the 30g of fibre we need a day.
A lack of fibre can lead to an unhealthy gut microbiome - in other words, the gut bacteria are less diverse, and with more 'bad' ones - and this can also cause more wind and bloating. So, ironically, a poor diet low in fibre may lead to more wind - not less.
Eating more fibre will also help with constipation, which causes smelly flatulence as food gets fermented for longer and traps gas.
Just make sure that you drink plenty of water too, as fibre can make constipation worse if you're dehydrated.
When you start adding more fibre to your diet, be ready for a few days of extra wind, as when you increase fibre intake it's like throwing your gut bacteria a birthday party - they joyfully binge on the fibre and produce a lot of gas.
If you are new to beans I always recommend to start small with, for instance, a tablespoon of beans every other day and slowly increase across the weeks up to half a can or more most days. If you keep that intake up, the bacteria don't get so over-excited by the presence of fibre and they adapt.
A 2004 study in the journal Gut found that when people increased the amount of fibre in their diet, they produced the same amount of wind but as larger amounts less often.
Another consideration for those experiencing excess flatulence is whether it occurs after eating dairy foods such as milk, yoghurt or butter, as here it could be linked to lactose intolerance.
This results from not having enough of the enzyme lactase needed to break down lactose, the sugar in milk.
As a result it travels, undigested, through the gut where it is met by the bacteria that ferment it - resulting in a lot of gas. It can also lead to diarrhoea, constipation and nausea. If you suspect this is the case you can try cutting down on dairy foods for a while to see if your symptoms get any better.
You won't necessarily have to cut out dairy completely - usually the amount in a glass of milk can be tolerated each day, but this can vary.
Or you can choose lower- lactose options such as kefir or hard cheeses.
You can also get lactase drops from the chemist (which you add to milk, for example) to help break down the lactose.
Flatulence can also be a problem for people with irritable bowel syndrome (IBS), the name for a collection of gut symptoms including constipation or loose bowels. This can cause gut spasms and may lead to a painful build-up of wind.
In this case, peppermint oil capsules could be beneficial, as the menthol they contain helps relax the muscles of your gut and so release any wind.
You can get the capsules from a pharmacy (though check with the pharmacist, as it's not recommended when pregnant, or if you have liver disease or gallstones).
Peppermint tea can also be soothing, although won't contain as much menthol.
When it comes to burping - and to some extent flatulence - as well as what you eat, it's good to consider how you eat.
If you eat very quickly the chances are that you're swallowing large quantities of air with that food, and while often that will re-emerge as burps, some will carry through the system and be expelled as wind.
AMAJOR contributor to burps especially is fizzy drinks, which includes beer. That's because the bubbles - small orbs of carbon dioxide - gradually build up in the stomach, which then quickly expels them in a burp when it becomes too overloaded. So sip it slowly and if you enjoy a pint of beer opt for the darker brews which tend to be less carbonated.
And maybe rethink that chewing gum habit! Sugar-free gum provides a double whammy of gas as not only do you swallow air as you chew it, it contains sweeteners, including xylitol, that can contribute to flatulence in some people, as it goes to the lower intestine undigested and is then fermented by the gut bacteria.
Whether its flatulence or burping that's bothering you, one simple way to ease both is to go for a walk in the 30 minutes after a meal as this can help gently disperse any painful build-up of gas and bloating.
As they are fond of saying in Scotland, where I grew up, 'wherever you be, let your wind blow free'.
DO I REALLY NEED...
THIS WEEK: Hydro-Stars, (EURO)15.99, pack of 32, www.boots.ie CLAIM: These tiny, bright yellow stars, which are about 1cm in size, are used to cover an acne spot; the maker says they 'absorb fluid and help reduce the appearance of inflammation to shrink spots overnight'.
EXPERT VERDICT: Dr Archana Rao, a consultant dermatologist, says: 'I have teenage patients in my clinics who use these stars as they are trendy.
'The stars are filled with hydrocolloid which absorbs moisture and pus (and is used in clinic to treat open wounds) - the maker has used this principle for treating inflamed spots.
'The stars might dry out a large acne spot which is oozing pus, for example, but will not help much for smaller blackheads and whiteheads - certainly if they have not yet burst.
'They won't harm the skin, but I wouldn't recommend these to my patients as there is no clear medical backing that they work. Instead, I'd prescribe topical retinoids [which exfoliate the skin] and topical antibiotics [which kill bacteria on the skin causing spots]. This product alone will not cure your acne.'

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



FAI dragging its heels on funding 'risks finance crisis'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 11
Length: 243 words
Byline: Craig Hughes
Body


THE FAI is risking a fresh financial crisis by dragging its heels on its funding requirements, Government sources have warned.
The Irish Daily Mail understands the FAI has yet to submit a new memorandum of understanding (MOU) to the Department of Sport.
The revised MOU is required to be received and approved by Government before it can release any further funding to the troubled organisation.
But Government sources told the Mail of their 'surprise' that the FAI has yet to finalise a new agreement given the climate of political uncertainty.
'I don't think that they realise that potential level of risk there is for a general election,' a sen- ior source said. 'If an election was to be called, which isn't beyond the realms of possibility, there is a significant chance that dealing with the FAI would fall to the back of the priority queue. I don't think they've realised the impact that would have on them.'
In 2019, FAI funding was halted and the association was brought to the brink of financial ruin after the Sunday Times revealed ex-CEO John Delaney - who was being paid (EURO)360,000 a year - provided it with a (EURO)100,000 'bridging loan'. This prompted a forensic examination of its accounts, which unearthed errors in its financial reporting.
In January 2020, a new MOU was agreed between the Government and the FAI, restoring funding of (EURO)2.9million a year and doubling the sum to (EURO)5.8million a year until 2023.
'Would fall to back of queue'

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



From sorbet to Spam - ten surprising ways to load up on vitamin C
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 33
Length: 1346 words
Byline: MANDY FRANCIS
Body


TOMATO SOUP 200 g bowl, 15.6 mg vitamin C TOMATOES - tinned or fresh - provide useful amounts of vitamin C. Add roasted red peppers to your own recipe to boost the vitamin C content, and beans or lentils for extra fibre.
39%
The vitamin C from the tomatoes will also help your body absorb the iron in the beans and pulses.
Processed tomatoes are a particularly good source of lycopene, a plant pigment with powerful antioxidant properties, and a bowl of tomato soup will also count as one of your five-a-day.
BAOBAB POWDER 2 tsp, 26.6 mg vitamin C THIS 'superfood' - available in large supermarkets - is made from the fruit of the baobab tree, which grows in Africa and Australia.
67%
Studies show baobab has a high vitamin C content and is a good source of bonestrengthening calcium and magnesium, plus iron. The dried baobab fruit is ground into a powder, which is almost 50 per cent gut-friendly fibre.
The citrusy powder can be blended into smoothies, sprinkled over porridge and yoghurt, or stirred into stews and curries.
BAKED RED POTATO
One potato, 16.6 mg vitamin C POTATOES that have been peeled before they're boiled, 42% fried or baked can lose up to 45 per cent of their vitamin C during cooking - unpeeled, baked potatoes lose around 7 per cent. Just make sure you eat the skin to get as much vitamin C as possible.
The skin of some potatoes, especially those with brightly coloured red or purple skins, has been found to contain up to 12 times more antioxidant nutrients such as vitamin C than the flesh.
MUSSELS 75 g, 10mg vitamin C IT'S rare for protein-rich foods to be a source of vitamin C - but mussels, clams and oysters are exceptions. A 75g serving (a small bowl) of mussels provides 10mg vitamin C, which is higher per gram than some fruit.
25%
Shellfish are also a good source of heart-friendly omega-3 fatty acids and zinc, which is needed for skin health and thought to work with vitamin C to support the immune system.
CAULIFLOWER RICE 125 g, 50 mg vitamin CRUCIFEROUS vegetables such as cauliflower, broccoli, sprouts and cabbage are excellent sources of vitamin C.
125%
Cauliflower rice is an easy way to include the veg in meals. Make your own by grating raw florets, or buy ready-made cauliflower rice which is available at most supermarkets.
Saute or steam in a covered pan for five minutes to cook - and serve in place of regular rice or mashed potatoes. A serving is low-calorie and provides 6 per cent of your daily fibre.
MANGO SORBET 125 g, 19.5 mg vitamin C FREEZING has been shown to be an efficient way to preserve the vitamin C levels in fruit and vegetables - a fresh fruit sorbet or fruit puree lolly can make a useful contribution towards your daily vitamin C intake - and counts towards your five-a-day.
49%
Look for citrus fruit, mangoes and berries, which are all particularly good sources of vitamin C.
Because the fruit is pureed or juiced - and often has sugar added - it's best to eat them as part of a meal, or keep as an occasional treat.
CHESTNUTS 50 g, 13 mg vitamin C NUTS don't tend to offer very much vitamin C, but chestnuts are the notable exception.
33% percentage recommended daily amount
They are also rich in gallic acid and ellagic acid - two anti-inflammatory compounds that increase in concentration when cooked. Fresh in season, or canned or vacuumpacked versions, can be used in stuffing, sauces or roasted and sprinkled over salads.
Try chestnut flour (which is glutenfree) for baking and thickening soups and stews.
SPAM LITE 50 g, 19.25 mg vitamin C VITAMIN C's antioxidant properties make it a great preservative, so you will often find generous amounts of it (often labelled as sodium ascorbate) in canned meat products such as Spam and other types of luncheon meat or ham, where it helps maintain the meat's pink colourand prevents the formation of carcinogenic nitrites.
48%
Red meat is also a good source of protein, but eating too much is linked to bowel cancer, so the NHS recommends that we limit it to 70 g red and/or processed meat a day.
YELLOW PEPPER
Half a pepper, 122 mg vitamin C BELL peppers are one of the richest sources of vitamin C, but the content varies with the colour. Half a green pepper provides around 53mg of vitamin C; half a red pepper, 94 mg; half an orange pepper, 105mg - but half a yellow pepper will give you a whopping 122mg of vitamin C, three times your RDA.
305%
It's also a good source of gut-friendly fibre and vitamin A (for vision). Have as crudités with hummus; or de-seed, fill with rice and bake.
FRESH LEMONADE 200 ml, 17.8 mg vitamin CITRUS fruit are packed with vitamin C, and their juices offer a concentrated source. The vitamin C content can vary depending on how the fruit has been processed and how long the drink has sat on the shelf.
45%
For the highest vitamin C content, try home-made lemonade (with lemon juice, water and a little sugar), or look for freshly squeezed lemonade in supermarkets and drink within a few days of opening.
The acid and natural sugars in lemon juice can be damaging for teeth, so sip water after it.
WE LOVE vitamin C, it seems - it's one of the most purchased supplements in Ireland (coming third after vitamin D and multivitamins), according to a recent survey.
Found mostly in fruit and veg, vitamin C is an antioxidant - i.e. it helps protect our cells from damage, working to neutralise harmful molecules that are a by-product of our metabolism, as well as environmental factors such as pollution.
Vitamin C also helps to maintain our bones, cartilage, skin and blood vessels and plays a key role in wound healing and immunity. Some studies suggest that it may also play a vital role in keeping depression at bay, improving cardiovascular health and slowing down cognitive decline as we age.
Vitamin C is not manufactured or stored by the body so we need to have it daily. But supplements may not be the best way to get it.
A recent study in the British Journal of Nutrition that compared the effects on mood, sleep and activity levels in people given either vitamin C-rich kiwi fruit, supplements or a placebo every day, found those eating the kiwi reported the most improvements in just four days.
The people taking supplements experienced only marginal mood improvements up until day 12, when their vitamin C was at an optimal level.
'Getting your vitamin C from food sources is always better, because you'll also ingest a raft of other beneficial nutrients such as fibre, vitamins, minerals and plant chemicals that you won't find in a supplement,' says leading dietitian Clare Thornton-Wood, In Iteland the recommended daily amount (RDA) for adults is 40 mg of vitamin C a day, which you can get from eating a large orange.
THIS level was set in the 1940s, based on the findings of a UK study which was aimed at establishing the minimum amount of vitamin C a wartime population needed to avoid scurvy.
Some experts believe that the RDA of vitamin C should now be as much as 200 mg a day for real health benefits. 'In the US the RDA is 90 mg for men and 75 mg for women - significantly more than ours,' says Nichola Ludlam- Raine, a dietitian and founder of www.nicsnutrition.com.
'As it is water-soluble, any excess vitamin C that's not needed would be removed in urine.'
Taking too much (the HSE says up to 1,000 mg a day is unlikely to cause harm) in supplement form can cause stomach pain, diarrhoea andflatulence for some people and has been linked to the development of kidney stones.
It's not just which foods we eat; how we prepare them matters, too. When a vitamin C-rich food is boiled, for instance, as much as 50 per cent of the vitamin content can be lost, says Nichola Ludlam-Raine.
'For optimal nutrient retention, choose fresh, frozen or canned produce,' she adds. This is because frozen and canned fruit and veg are often preserved quickly after harvest - just avoid anything in salty water or sugary syrups.
She adds: 'Avoid boiling or baking fruit and veg, and use methods that limit contact with heat and water, such as stir-frying or steaming.'
To find the vitamin C youneed, use our guide for some of the best - often surprising - sources.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Gentlemen's Joely gives tweedy look a hippy shake-up
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 3
Length: 254 words
Byline: Molly Clayton
Body


IN her latest role, Joely Richardson is the epitome of countryside aristocracy in buttonedup tweed and cashmere.
Off-screen, however, it seems that the actress's style is more bohemian chic after she was seen stepping out in a hippystyle ensemble. The 59-year-old star wore a pair of loose-fitting red camouflage trousers, flipflops, a baggy zip-up jumper and a beanie hat as she walked in London.
In Guy Ritchie's Netflix comthe edy drama series The Gentlemen, in which she plays Lady Sabrina Horniman, Ms Richardson has a distinctive look.
Her character can be seen wearing a tweed buttoned jacket from outdoor brand Welligogs, costing (EURO)450, and another by Cordings, for (EURO)380.
The silk scarves she wears in series are from Clare Haggas and cost upwards of (EURO)75 each, and she pairs most of her outfits with lace-up Ilse Jacobsen boots at around (EURO)170.
The Gentlemen is a spin-off from director Ritchie's 2019 film of the same name. It follows an aristocrat who inherits the family estate only to discover it's home to an enormous cannabis empire - and its proprietors aren't going anywhere.
The high fashion worn in the series costs hundreds of thousands of euros, but that hasn't stopped fans emulating the characters' style, with online searches for the country aesthetic sky-rocketing as they seek out tweed jackets, flat caps and vintage watches.
Ms Richardson herself comes from acting aristocracy - her mother is Vanessa Redgrave and her father was the film director Tony Richardson.
High fashion costs thousands

Graphic


Country style: Starring in The GentlemenBeanie hat and flip-flops: Joely Richardson in London

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Hate law is anti-women, no matter how you dress it up
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; OPINION, COLUMNS; Pg. 12
Length: 876 words
Byline: BRENDA POWER
Body


IF Simon Harris really is determined, as he says, to press on with the 'hate speech' law, he may be about to get a sneak preview of what lies ahead.
Our Scottish neighbours boldly went before us, yesterday, when they enacted their own version of our Criminal Justice (Incitement to Violence or Hatred and Hate Offences) Bill, creating the wonderfully vague crime of 'stirring up hatred', which could see the culprit jailed for seven years.
It doesn't explain what exactly 'stirring up' means, nor, like our own proposed law, does it seem to define 'hatred'. Helen McEntee's Bill simply states that 'hatred is hatred', which is about as helpful as telling us that 'durable relationships are durable relationships and the courts will decide what that means'.
Violence Like our own Bill, the Scottish law is very protective of 'gender' but not of 'sex'. Our Bill defines 'gender' as 'the gender of a person or the gender which a person expresses and the person's preferred gender or with which the person identifies and includes transgender and a gender other than male and female'. Good luck figuring that out - does it mean 'transgender' is actually a separate gender in itself? Who knows, but what it certainly doesn't mean is that biological sex is a protected characteristic. So it will be a crime to offend a 'transwoman', or a male who feels that he's a woman, but it won't be a crime to target a biological woman with hatred.
Basically, then, it will be carte blanche for those 'trans activist'
misogynists, here and in Scotland, abusing, threatening and even assaulting women who dare to campaign for single-sex sports, changing rooms, domestic violence refuges or prisons. Under our law, and the Scots' version, the man in the dress who says he's a woman will have more rights as a woman than an actual woman. And if our Bill proceeds, I could potentially be prosecuted for writing that last sentence. I could be prosecuted for saying that Gabrielle Alejandro Gentile, who now goes by the name of
Barbie Kardashian and has one of Roderic O'Gorman's genderrecognition certificates, is actually a violent male who threatened to rape his own mother and should never have been placed in a Limerick female prison.
But whether or not I will actually be prosecuted for being a 'gender-critical' (AKA sane) female, for not using Barbie's 'she/her' pronouns, or refusing to accept that a man in a dress on the board of a women's charity or NGO is a woman, will depend a lot on what happens to JK Rowling this week. Yesterday, as the Scottish law came into force, the Harry Potter author invited the police to arrest her by posting details of a number of 'transgender women' on social media. She cited 'lovely Scottish lass and convicted double rapist Isla Bryson', who 'found her true authentic self shortly before she was due to be sentenced'.
She referenced 'Samantha
Norris', accused of exposing 'her penis' to two 11-year-old girls and then convicted of possession of 16,000 images of children being raped. She mentioned 'Amy George', a butcher who abducted an 11-year-old girl and sexually abused her over a 27-hour period. And she included our own Guilia Valentino, the large bald male who was photographed playing Gaelic football with a girls' side in Dublin and who was profiled by Image magazine in its 'women in sport' slot.
Guilia, Ms Rowling wrote, 'wanted to play on the women's team because of sisterhood, validation and political visibility'.
She added: 'Naturally she was given some boring cis girl's place - Yay for inclusivity.'
But having listed several such 'women', she posted: 'April Fools! Obviously, the people mentioned in the above tweet aren't women at all but men, every last one of them.' Scottish lawmakers, Ms Rowling went on, 'have placed higher value on the feelings of men performing their idea of femaleness, however misogynistically or opportunistically, than on the rights and freedoms of actual women and girls'. She added: 'I'm currently out of the country, but if what I have written here qualifies as an offence under the terms of the new act, I look forward to being arrested when I return to the birthplace of Scottish Enlightenment.'
Seismic If JK Rowling is arrested for saying that a man in a dress is not a woman - or, if you prefer, stating a basic biological fact - the national and international backlash will be seismic.
And if she is not arrested for 'stirring up hatred' against these 'transwomen', since that is what she has clearly set out to do, then the new Scottish law is exposed as a cowardly, meaningless exercise in woke, performative virtue-signalling.
They'd better be prepared to jail her, then. And Simon Harris better be similarly prepared to jail 'gender-critical' women like me: for the avoidance of doubt, Simon, Barbie Kardashian is not a woman, but a dangerous man, and his rape threats would never be recorded under 'female crime statistics' by any justice system that truly cared about violence against women.
It's just as well that Harris doesn't believe in the idea of 'female prisons', then. If, as I suspect, the 'gender-critical' brigade includes a large chunk of the 74% who voted to keep the word 'woman' in the Constitution, he's going to need every available inch of jail space to lock us all up.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



HOW HAITI TURNED INTO THE LAWLESS DYSTOPIA FROM MAD MAX; Corpses rotting in the streets. Gangs ruling by terror and police so impotent they've had to team up with ruthless vigilantes
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 13
Length: 1470 words
Byline: Tom Leonard
Body


HAITIANS have little to cheer about at the best of times - but a fortnight ago, the inhabitants of the capital Port-au-Prince erupted on to the streets in celebration.
Tragically, it was for the most macabre of reasons. Two suspected members of a local criminal gang that had been the smart neighbourhood of Petion-Ville had been captured by and their bloody corpses were being dragged down a street to be lynched. They had been shot dead minutes earlier in a gun battle with police.
As shocking video footage of the incident confirmed, one of them - the gang's leader, known as Makandal - had already had his hands hacked off.
Excited children mingled with men brandishing machetes in the large crowd that accompanied the grim procession, as people chanted 'Viv la polis!', or 'Long live the police!'. The bodies of the two men were set on fire minutes later to cries of 'Ole, ole, ole!' from bystanders.
It was a bloody denouement in the nearcivil war now raging between warring gangs on one side and police and vigilantes on the other in this blighted Caribbean country. Such is the anarchy and carnage that has engulfed this impoverished land that a horrified United Nations boss has compared it to a scene from the movie Mad Max.
Gang leader Makandal and his associate had received justice from a new civilian vigilante movement called Bwa Kale. The situation's so desperate, some hail this terrifying development as the only solution to the heavily armed gangs who now control an estimated 80% of the capital.
POLICE, desperately outgunned and under-manned, are openly colluding with the vigilantes. They have reportedly taken on the gangs together in joint operations in which the so-called 'self-defence brigades' are sometimes armed only with machetes, hammers and even just their bare hands.
On occasions, the vigilantes mount roadblocks so streets and houses can be searched for gang members. If men are judged to be members, they are burned, sometimes alive.
Critics decry the Bwa Kale killings - which have left a tell-tale trail of charred patches of ground across the city - saying innocent people are losing their lives, and this is just another form of gang warfare that will only spark even worse violence.
Haiti, the poorest country in the Western hemisphere, has long been dysfunctional and violence-plagued. To make matters worse, Portau-Prince still hasn't recovered from a 2010 earthquake that killed more than 220,000 people.
Now, with the capital in a state of emergency and under a nighttime curfew, the city is once more strewn with corpses decomposing in the tropical heat. Passers-by pause only long enough in the dangerous streets to cover up the blood-spattered remains with cloths and cardboard boxes - to spare passing children the gruesome sight.
The gangs are an old menace in Haiti. Thousands of their members - many still in their teens - roam the streets, some with a red cloth wrapped around the muzzles of their guns, following a voodoo superstition that the colour will protect them from bullets. They are often as poor as the rest of the population but their guns - assault weapons, high-powered rifles, pump-action shotguns and pistols - all look brand new.
Most of the guns have been bought from the US, then smuggled into Haiti on container ships. In 2022, Haitian officials even found a haul of weapons hidden in a shipment going from Florida to a local Episcopal church.
Schools and businesses remain shuttered for fear of crossfire or being subjected to extortion, and many people are trapped in their homes by the fighting. But even there, they aren't safe, as gangs burst in, ransacking them and raping women.
The UN last week said more than 1,500 people have been killed in gang violence so far this year, in what it called a 'cataclysmic situation' in which the country's state institutions are 'close to collapse'. UN expert William O'Neill said Haitians are trapped in an 'open prison', cut off from the world.
Leaving their homes to go to the market 'is a life-threatening venture for them', while the police may not be able to resist the gangs much longer, he added.
The gangs are blocking off all roads into the city, as well as the port, which has cut off supplies. Shops are running out of food, petrol stations out of fuel, banks out of money and hospitals are now low on blood supplies.
In fact, only one public hospital in Port-au-Prince remains open. Medical staff who are caught treating police or rival gang members risk being killed.
Armed gangs have played a brutal role in Haitian politics ever since the 29-year dictatorship of the notorious 'Papa Doc' Francois Duvalier and his son, Jean Claude, or 'Baby Doc', which used the deeply sinister Tonton Macoute, a voodoo-influenced paramilitary secret police that killed with impunity. The gangs survived the end of Duvalier rule in 1986, and were patronised by other unscrupulous politicians who used them to massacre their opponents, break strikes and terrorise the general electorate.
US officials estimate that more than 300 gangs with a combined 7,200 members have now put aside their usual rivalries to unite against the common enemy of the dwindling forces of law and order. Haiti's police force is nominally just 9,000-strong to serve a country of 11million people.
The recent carnage came after its beleaguered prime minister, Ariel Henry, flew to Kenya to persuade the African country to speed up its UN-approved donation of 1,000 police officers to help bring order to Haiti.
The gangs exploited his absence
REUTERS
Pictures: to go on the rampage, storming two of Haiti's biggest prisons and freeing more than 4,000 prisoners, burning down government buildings and attacking a dozen police stations in a concerted strike. They even assaulted the airport, leaving the building pock-marked with bullet holes.
Meanwhile, Ariel Henry, a neurosurgeon who'd failed to get the help he needed from Kenya, was stranded in Puerto Rico. His brief leadership of the country began under bloodied duress when, in 2021, Haiti's then president, Jovenel Moise, was assassinated.
Henry has antagonised many Haitians - including the gangs - who accuse him of increasing poverty and regarded him as politically illegitimate. They have condemned him for delaying new elections - including for Moise's successor as president - to the point that the terms of all elected officials have now run out.
Almost three weeks ago, still unable to return to Haiti, Henry bowed to a popular clamour for his resignation, and said he would step down after a transitional presidential council was put in place and an interim leader selected.
The violence only worsened and spread into the city's more upmarket neighbourhoods - such as Petion-Ville, where the latest two vigilante lynchings occurred - as Jimmy 'Barbecue' Cherizier, one of the most powerful gang leaders, extends his reign of terror to the 'stinking bourgeoisie' he so despises.
Claiming to be a revolutionary and champion of the common people, the bloodthirsty ex-cop has threatened to attack hotels where 'the traditional politicians' may be staying. Last week, he declared that he will only consider a ceasefire if armed groups are allowed to take part in talks to establish a new government.
An eyewitness to the bloodshed in Petion-Ville, home to embassies and upmarket hotels, said he was almost shot himself as gangster looters entered the district.
'I saw a group of guys holding 9mm guns,' he told the Mail. 'I was lying behind a tree trying to get cover. Those guys asked no questions. They just came and shot people.'
Hundreds of thousands of Haitians have fled their homes, but most have nowhere to go. The airport and seaport are closed, and the only alternative is a risky journey along roads patrolled by the gangs to the border with the Dominican Republic.
Last month also saw helicopter evacuations from Port-au-Prince as the remaining Americans were flown to safety in the Dominican Republic.
So what next for Haiti?
Given the way the country is going, 'Barbecue' Cherizier could be its next leader. Four years ago, he pledged to sweep away Haiti's despised political elites in an 'armed revolution', vowing: 'We will put guns in the hands of every child if we have to.' But he is charismatic as well as ruthless, announcing the coalition's formation on YouTube wearing a three-piece suit.
He insists that his nickname is just as charming, coming from his mother's famous grilled chicken - not from his predilection for setting fire to his enemies' homes with them inside, as is reputed.
Portraying himself as the saviour of Haiti, he wants there to be elections, but many suspect the presidential candidate he has in mind is none other than himself. Even for Haitians struggling just to stay alive, that must be a sobering thought.
Additional Reporting: WILNER BOSSOU in Port-au-Prince

Graphic


Warfare: Ruthless gangs rule the streets, outnumbering the Port-au-Prince police, insetREUTERS Pictures:

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



How MI5 and the FBI were behind the 60s drugs raid that saw Jagger jailed and started those rumours about Marianne Faithfull and the Mars
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 20,37
Length: 2527 words
Byline: Philip Norman
Body


LATE in the afternoon of February 11, 1967, a convoy of police vehicles left the quiet West Sussex town of Chichester, heading for the nearby seaside village of West Wittering. It carried 18 officers, led by a chief inspector in full dress uniform complete with ceremonial baton.
The size of the task force suggested a swoop on some terrorist group already guilty of multiple atrocities and likely to be planning more. Which was very much how the cops themselves saw it, for they were on their way to bust Rolling Stones Mick Jagger and Keith Richards for drug possession at Richards' country cottage, Redlands.
So was launched the Swinging 60s' most lurid scandal, soon to be the subject of a new film, which will join Oscarwinning director Sam Mendes's four Beatles biopics, Trevor Beatty's Midas Man (about the Fab Four's manager, Brian
Epstein) and a slew of other dramas portraying pop's superheroes back in the so-called 'decade that never dies'.
Today, the three surviving Stones are national treasures almost on a par with royalty or Shakespeare. But as a five-piece band in the mid-60s they were a running story of rebellion and outrage with their shaggy hair (erroneously thought to be full of fleas), their lack of matching shiny suits like The Beatles and sarkiness or sullenness with the media.
Above all, frontman Jagger, with his girlish frame and oversized lips pouting soft-porn chart-toppers like Little Red Rooster, Satisfaction and Let's Spend The Night Together, seemed a prancing, sneering devil incarnate.
What was about to unfold was a concerted act of revenge against him and Richards by the police, the judiciary and - as I was the first to discover - both Britain's and America's security services.
In the 21st century, Press stories about pop stars are generally exercises in sycophancy. In the 60s, however, the stars were under constant attack for their indulgence in drugs and incitement of their fans to follow their lead.
H
AVING recorded a song called Get Off Of My Cloud, Jagger appeared a pre-eminent example. Actually, the supposed wild man of rock 'n' roll was innately cautious and nervous about drugs, preferring the 'high' of mingling with High Society.
Nonetheless, when the News Of The World mounted a sting operation against drug-soused pop idols, Jagger was their primary target. This being long before the phone hacking and illegal surveillance which would lead to the
Sunday paper's closure, the only way of 'naming the guilty man', in its own sanctimonious phrase, was to confront Jagger in person.
Accordingly, two reporters visited a favourite pop star hangout, Blaises club in Kensington, spotted a familiar Rolling Stone in the semi-darkness and asked him point-blank if he took drugs.
Their quarry freely admitted that he did and even invited them to join him for 'a smoke' (to share a joint). Unfortunately, neither could tell one Rolling Stone from another and in mistake for Jagger, they had been quizzing the band's lead guitarist, Brian Jones.
The paper's 'expose' on Jagger the following Sunday was thus a gross libel for which there could be no possible defence.
The only way it could avoid paying him massive damages was to establish that, its Blaises blunder notwithstanding, it had still fingered the right person.
Jagger's wisest move, knowing the News Of The World's reputation for dirty tricks, would have been to lie very low until his libel action came to court.
Instead, with uncharacteristic naivety, he accepted an invitation for himself and his pop chanteuse girlfriend Marianne Faithfull to spend the next weekend with other friends at Richards' cottage - and there take his first LSD trip.
Besides Jagger and Richards, the party included one other double A-list musician - Beatle George Harrison with his wife, the fashion model Pattie Boyd.
Of Richards' other five house guests, two were Rolling Stones followers, the gifted young photographer Michael Cooper and a painter and 'flower child' called Nicky Cramer.
Two more were somewhat older, upper-class types addicted to the thrill of hanging out with such social pariahs. Christopher Gibbs ran an exclusive antiques shop in Chelsea while Robert Fraser was a high-end art dealer whose louche lifestyle had earned him the nickname 'Groovy Bob'.
Last, and most important, was an American with dark curly hair and an aquiline profile who'd insinuated himself into Richards' entourage only about a week previously. Known only as 'Acid King David', he was both to supply and dispense the LSD which was to be the weekend's highlight.
He'd brought with him a lavish supply of a new variety called Sunshine which provided the mildest of trips, guaranteed to be without the drug's possible nightmarish after-effects.
This the Acid King took around to the others on the Sunday somewhat in the spirit of early morning tea, since all were still in bed.
After a lazy day in the acid's gentle afterglow, Harrison announced that he was bored so he and Pattie were driving back to their home in Esher, Surrey.
It would later be claimed that the police waited for him to leave rather than bust a nationally adored Beatle.
The others gathered in the highraftered living room watching an old film on television at the same time as listening to Bob Dylan at maximum volume on the hi-fi while Fraser's Moroccan valet, Ali, prepared a buffet supper.
Marianne Faithfull had just taken a bath and, with her clothes muddied after a country ramble, had wrapped herself in a fur rug she'd found on one of the beds.
'It was,' Gibbs recalled, 'a scene of pure domesticity.' Despite the fame, or infamy, of its owner, Redlands possessed no security measures in the form of CCTV or alarms and no one realised the police had arrived until they were pouring through every door.
Jagger's dismay can only be guessed at. 'Poor Mick,' Faithfull reflected later. 'The first time he tries acid, half the coppers in Sussex come after him.'
To the raiders, the sight of a gorgeous young woman, naked but for a fur rug, alone with seven men, one of them the most blatantly sexual being on the rock stage, spelt only O.R.G.Y. Afterwards a rumour would sweep the country that Jagger and Faithfull had been interrupted during a sex act involving a Mars bar with their friends as slavering voyeurs.
Just one of the officers, a sergeant, had had any training in drug recognition and their search of the cottage was bizarrely selective. They ignored the briefcase containing the residue of the LSD that Acid King David had left in plain sight in the sitting room, instead pouncing on a few shreds of cannabis in an ashtray and four tablets in a pocket of a green velvet jacket belonging to Jagger.
These were merely a travel sickness medication whose amphetamine content made them illegal in Britain although nowhere else in Europe. They had actually been bought by Faithfull, who'd left them in Jagger's pocket without his knowledge. But with the unselfishness of which the egomaniacal star could sometimes be capable, he saw how damaging this could be to her image.
'He decided his career could stand a drugs bust but mine couldn't,' she recalled, 'so he said the tablets were his.'
The police made an automatic distinction between the older, conservatively attired Gibbs and Fraser and the youthful swingers in their garish Carnaby Street threads. 'Anyone can see that you're a gentleman,' one of them told Fraser, little suspecting he had 20 heroin pills in one pocket of his gentlemanly blazer. Indeed, Fraser almost persuaded him the pills were merely aspirin. 'Then he said, "We'll just keep one for analysis",' Fraser would recall. 'And I knew I'd had it.'
The next Sunday's News Of The
World carried an exclusive report that 'two nationally famous names' had been caught with drugs while a third (Harrison) had left just beforehand.
All in all it completely vindicated that previously untenable story about Jagger's drug use, for which his libel action now wouldn't have a prayer.
Initially there was some hope that Jagger, Richards and Fraser could bribe their way out of trouble. A drug dealer friend of Richards' named 'Spanish Tony' Sanchez claimed to have a contact inside the police who could arrange for the various samples collected in the raid to be 'lost' before they could be analysed.
A bung of £7,000 ((EURO)117,000 today) was paid via Spanish Tony, but failed to prevent the samples from reaching the police lab.
Despite the News Of The World's claim to sole authorship of their misfortune, Jagger and Richards began to suspect someone inside Redlands had betrayed them.
Suspicion fell first on the Chelsea flower child Nicky Cramer, for no good reason other than his being not such a close friend as
Fraser or Gibbs. So a thuggish associate of the Stones named David Litvinoff invited Cramer to his flat where, helped by the band's driver, Tom Keylock, and an actor-cum-gangster named John Bindon, he began scientifically beating him to a pulp.
When this failed to elicit a confession, Cramer was pronounced in the clear.
The other possible informer was Acid King David, who'd joined Richards' entourage only a few days prior to the raid and whose highly visible briefcase full of LSD had mysteriously failed to attract the police's attention.
BUT the Acid King had hurriedly flown back to his native America that same night and now seemed to have completely vanished.
It soon emerged that the Redlands raid had been only the first phase of an official effort to roll away the Stones.
On the same day Jagger and
Richards made their preliminary appearance at Chichester magistrates court, Scotland Yard's drugs squad raided Brian Jones's Chelsea flat.
Their search quickly uncovered a bowling ball-sized lump of hashish and a glass phial containing traces of cocaine.
However, Jones's trial, conviction and subsequent tragic physiactually cal and mental decline would be overshadowed by Jagger and Richards' appearance at Chichester Crown Court in July 1967, midway through that grievously mistitled Summer Of Love.
Though the supposedly Neanderthal Stones were docile and co-operative throughout, Jagger at one point was paraded handcuffed to his co-accused, Fraser, like some Victorian felon awaiting the noose.
The jury consisted largely of local dignitaries who would have viewed rock 'n' roll with disfavour if not disgust. The judge's surname was Block, which as the trial proceeded increasingly seemed an accurate description of his head. Jagger pleaded not guilty to possessing illegal amphetamines, saying his doctor had prescribed them to help him stay awake during long hours in the recording studio.
But since this had been only on the telephone and after the raid, Judge Block ruled it not to be a valid prescription, so no defence to the charge. The jury retired and after only six minutes returned with a guilty verdict.
Richards' time in the dock brought the first detailed account of the swoop on Redlands and 'the girl in the fur rug' who constituted its most compelling detail.
Marianne Faithfull's name wasn't mentioned but she was in court in support of Jagger every day, recognised as the rug-wearer by every journalist present and implicitly on trial for sexual voracity that had only ever existed in the minds of the police.
Richards delivered the best line when asked by prosecuting counsel if he saw nothing odd in a semi-nude young woman being alone with seven males. 'We are not old men,' he replied. 'We're not worried about petty morals.'
Richards having also been found guilty, Block sentenced the two Stones in tandem. For possession of the amphetamine-based travel sickness pills, Jagger received three months jail with a £200 fine and Richards a year plus a £500 fine for 'permitting' cannabis use on his premises.
Prison terms for first-time offenders on counts that normally would have rated only probation drew a wail of anguish from the fans crowding the public gallery and shocked even the police ushers. Indeed, the pair were treated like hardened criminals, separated to minimise their troublemaking potential and consigned to two of London's toughest prisons, Brixton for Jagger, Wormwood Scrubs for Richards.
The inference was that it would teach them respect for authority and get their hair cut.
Here at last sanity finally began to take hold, even in quarters not naturally well-disposed towards Rolling www.Stones.No less an establishment figure than the editor of The Times,
William Rees-Mogg (father of Tory politician Jacob) wrote a leader in the newspaper condemning Judge Block's treatment of Jagger, headlined by a quotation from the great 18th century satirist Alexander Pope: Who Breaks A Butterfly On A Wheel?
The Stones were released from prison, Jagger's sentence reduced to a year's conditional discharge and Richards' was quashed (though Fraser, having no campaign behind him, went inside for six months with hard labour).
Until the News Of The World's closure in 2011, it remained hugely proud of its role in taking them down, however temporarily. But, as I discovered while researching my biography of Jagger, far more sinister forces were also at work.
In January 1967, a little-known US actor named David Snyderman passing through Heathrow had been caught with a large quantity of LSD in his luggage.
The customs official who made the discovery had called in some intimidating men who said they belonged to Britain's internal security service, MI5, and told Snyderman there was 'a way out' of his predicament. This was to infiltrate the Rolling Stones inner circle, push his acid to Mick Jagger and Keith Richards, then contrive to get them busted. In return, the charges against him would be dropped and he'd be allowed to leave the country.
M
I5 were merely intermediaries for America's Federal Bureau of Investigation, specifically an offshoot known as Cointelpro (Counterintelligence Program) set up by the FBI's founder J. Edgar Hoover in the 1920s to combat 'subversive' elements by means often outside the law.
In 1967, the term subversive had come to include rock stars - The Rolling Stones above all. For their joint ringleaders to have criminal convictions would guarantee they were denied visas for US tours into the foreseeable future.
Although Snyderman had carried out his mission and afterwards maintained the lowest possible profile, as his Cointelpro handlers instructed, relocating to Los Angeles and changing his surname to Jove, the end result had been what he termed 'a lifetime of fear'.
Even after Cointelpro was disbanded following a Senate investigation into its methods in 1971, he'd expected that one day somebody would come after him to make certain he could never 'rat' on it. Jove kept his secret until his death - from natural causes - in 2004.
Mick Jagger and Marianne Faithfull ceased to be a couple in 1970 but each retained a lingering curiosity about the true identity of Acid King David.
It wasn't until the late 70s that a film agent named Maggie Abbott, who represented Jagger in Hollywood and was one of the few people in whom Jove had confided, finally enlightened him.
And to this day, the Mars bar story still circulates.
? Philip Norman's biography George Harrison: The Reluctant Beatle is published by Simon & Schuster, (EURO)30.

Graphic


Lurid claims: Rolling Stone Mick Jagger with girlfriend Marianne Faithfull in 1967, the year of the Mars bar drug bust Picture: MMMEDIA ARCHIVE/ICONICPIX

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



How to cope with a serious diagnosis that comes out of the blue; viewpoint
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 35
Length: 791 words
Byline: MARTIN SCURR
Body


SOMETIMES the health problems that afflict us can be down simply to bad luck. Clearly we can - and should - do everything we can to minimise the risk of ill-health: eat a balanced diet, take exercise; get enough sleep; and all the other 'right things', according to what the medics tell www.us.No one wants to get ill, after all.
But that's not necessarily going to be rewarded by good health. I am thinking of the Princess of Wales and King Charles. Let me stress that none of us should be speculating about the nature of their cancer diagnoses.
There is a famous principle in psychiatry known as the Goldwater Rule, which states that psychiatrists should not 'diagnose' public figures.
The same is true for medical doctors - and that includes trying to guess the nature of an undisclosed illness.
But I feel I can say that the recent news, that tests after the Princess of Wales' abdominal surgery revealed the presence of cancerous tissue, is deeply shocking - and most of all, naturally, to the princess and her family.
These kinds of diagnoses are a bolt out of the blue for anyone, but perhaps arguably even more so for someone who has a healthy lifestyle, and who appears to have always done all that they can to remain in good health - and who is also so young.
We've all read stories of centenarians who attribute their long life to a regular tipple, or claim to have smoked since adolescence - but we all know these are the exceptions, rather than the rule: Looking after yourself is important - however, it is not always a guarantee.
Clearly the Princess of Wales had symptoms that led to her surgery: and the findings, detected post-operatively on the basis of laboratory analysis, have revealed some malignancy.
As I've seen on so many occasions, the time a patient spends waiting for results is a time of great anxiety, buoyed up by hope: life seems put on hold.
Why does it take so long to get the results? It is because laboratory studies can be complex, and often a number of experts are involved, multi-disciplinary team discussions are held - all very necessary to ensure accuracy in presenting what will be lifechanging information to the patient and their family.
ALONG with dealing with the anxiety and fear of the diagnosis itself, there is also the anxiety and fear of coming to terms with life not as you had planned.
Suddenly, the automatic assumption that one will have many long and healthy years ahead is eroded. And a cancer diagnosis is something more and more of us are going to have to face at some point.
As a medical student 50 years ago, I was taught that one person in five will develop cancer in some shape or form at some stage.
Now, as many as one in two will get some form of this disease, according to the NHS - and while we tend to think of cancer as a disease of older age, younger people are increasingly developing it. Although diet, lifestyle and environmental factors are being linked to this, it's really not at all clear what's going on.
Set against this worry, however, are the outstanding changes in cancer treatment with highly sophisticated radiotherapy to target solid tumours, highly effective chemotherapy and, in more recent times, the stunning advances of immunotherapy, harnessing our own immune systems to eradicate cancer cells.
So there is much positive news to cheer. But if taking care of yourself isn't a guarantee for preventing cancer, I believe it's important to try to encourage anyone diagnosed with the disease to make lifestyle changes that enable them to enhance their own immune responses, and minimise any side-effects of their treatment.
This means trying to exercise, even something as simple as a gentle walk, if that's all you can manage - research increasingly suggests that exercise can help reduce the risk of recurrence, and the side-effects of chemotherapy such as nausea. Eating well and getting enough rest and sleep should also help.
Another cornerstone we should not forget is emotional support - a serious diagnosis can be life-changing and, in my view, seeing a counsellor can be very helpful in coming to terms with what it means for your life now. Or you might prefer to talk to family and friends.
Whatever your choice, the important thing to know is that you're not alone - the very words the Princess of Wales herself used in her broadcast.
As she has faced her own serious diagnosis, she has shown incredible fortitude and resilience beyond measure.
And the example she has set - at a time when she has had to cope for weeks with the burden and fear of her diagnosis, along with the trauma of starting and enduring chemotherapy - will be therapeutic to many people who are going through similar experiences to her.
What the Princess of Wales has achieved is incalculable.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Howard out to improve Premier strike rate
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 540 words
Byline: Daragh Ó Conchúir
Body


Róisín Howard insists Tipperary's camogie squad will focus solely on the controllables as they prepare for the Very National League Division 1A final against three-in-row chasing Galway at Croke Park on April 14.
For Denis Kelly's panel of players, that is about knuckling down in the trenches from first minute to last.
This will be Tipp's first appearance in a national final since losing the 2009 league decider to Wexford, while they will be attempting to bridge a 20-year gap since their last top-level success - their league and championship double in 2004.
The Premier side won a fifth All-Ireland in six seasons that September but have endured fallow times since, albeit the improvements have been evident in recent years.
They cemented their progress with a 4-19 to 0-7 victory over relegated Clare at Cusack Park last weekend.
While that result was expected, they had to make sure they treated the Clare challenge with respect, particularly having endured so many heartbreaking defeats when on the brink of a major breakthrough in recent years - and the scoreline was evidence of their dedication.
'Through the years we've come out on the wrong side of things by the smallest of margins so we didn't change anything going into the game,' Howard explained.
'We kept the same mindset and were very focused going in so we got the job done and that was the main thing.
'There's only two national titles in a year and when you're in a position to go for those titles or to get to the finals, you absolutely want to do it.
'We were in that position so we definitely wanted to when the opportunity was there.'
They did it the hard way, turning their fortunes around following a stuttering defeat to Waterford.
The only three counties to win national senior titles since Wexford completed their All-Ireland three-in-a-row in 2012 were next up but Tipp overcame the odds to beat them all.
'It was a disappointing start against Waterford and it wasn't likely that we would make a final when you're told you've Cork, Galway, Kilkenny in the next three games,' Howard admitted.
'But on the following Tuesday, when we went training, the attitude and the application of all the players was just really good. We just didn't lie down.
'Going into the second game against Galway, we were giving ourselves every opportunity to compete in that game by the energy and the attitude that was brought to training after the Waterford loss.'
Tipperary have appeared in nine league finals but won only two.
They will face a stern examination from Galway, who they defeated by three points at The Ragg in the group stages, as they bid to improve that strike rate.
'We've come across Galway a good few times in the last few years playing league and championship.
'They have great players and classy players all over the field.
'In the backs they have Áine Keane, around midfield you have Aoife Donohue, and the McGraths and Carrie Dolan up front.
'They're good players and they bring great energy and workrate.
'But we've good belief in what we have inside in our own dressing room too. On the day we'll just look for a huge will to work. Games take a life of their own as well so we'll control what we can control going into the game and on the day itself and see where it takes us.'

Graphic


Eyes on the prize: Tipperary star Róisín Howard

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



I didn't think it was illegal ... but I am haunted by what was lost; Jailed crypto king's remorse over firm's $8BILLION losses
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 11
Length: 428 words
Byline: Elena Salvoni; Paul Farrell
Body


DISGRACED former crypto billionaire Sam Bankman-Fried has said that he is haunted every day - in his first interview since being jailed last week.
Bankman-Fried, 32, was sentenced to 25 years for stealing $8billion ((EURO)7.4billion) from unsuspecting customers.
His crimes emerged with the collapse of FTX, once one of the world's most popular platforms for exchanging digital currency.
As he was convicted of seven counts of fraud, conspiracy and money laundering, the judge said Bankman-Fried's remarks never conveyed 'a word of remorse'.
But the former poster boy for cryptocurrency, who also used his money to gain access to celebrities, has now insisted he is 'of course' remorseful for his actions. He told ABC News from his cell in the Metropolitan Detention Centre in New York, that what happened still 'haunts' him and that 'it's most of what I think about each day'.
During his correspondence with ABC, he admitted that FTX's insolvency was the result of 'bad decisions' he made in 2022. Bankman-Fried said: 'I never thought that what I was doing was illegal. I tried to hold myself to a high standard, and I certainly didn't meet that standard.'
He added: 'I'm haunted, every day, by what was lost. I never intended to hurt anyone or take anyone's money. But I was the CEO of FTX, I was responsible for what happened to the company, and when you're responsible it doesn't matter why it goes bad.
'I'd give anything to be able to help repair even part of the damage. I'm doing what I can from prison, but it's deeply frustrating not to be able to do more.'
More than a million customers face potential losses as a result of FTX's sudden collapse in November 2022.
Victims say they are still owed more than $19billion ((EURO)17.7billion) based on current crypto prices - though Bankman-Fried insisted during his sentencing that victims can get their money.
He also claimed in court that customers could have been paid back 'long ago' had he or another former colleague remained in post and the FTX exchange been restarted.
The judge flatly denied his assessment, saying: 'The defendant's assertion that FTX customers and creditors will be paid in full is misleading. It is logically flawed, it is speculative.'
Judge Lewis Kaplan recommended a medium-security jail for Bankman-Fried's sentence and ordered him to pay $11billion ((EURO)10.2billion) for stealing $8billion from customers, $1.7billion from investors and $1.3billion from lenders.
Bankman-Fried pleaded in court for a more lenient sentence and has vowed to appeal.
news@dailymail.ie
'I never intended to take money'

Graphic


Guilty: Sam Bankman-Fried. Left: With Tony Blair and Bill Clinton at a 2020 event

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



I spent (EURO)10,000 in Turkey to have saggy skin removed after weight-loss op - and it's left me in total agony; Risk of dire complications from overseas procedures
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 34
Length: 1096 words
Byline: JULIE COOK
Body


HANNAH THOMPSON has a single word for what it took to get her size 10 physique: 'Hell'.
It was not the weight loss itself, though - because Hannah, 31, a beautician, had bariatric surgery which was rapidly effective. However, her weight loss left her with 'large' amounts of saggy, irritated, excess skin. 'My stomach sagged, my breasts were empty pockets that hung to my stomach and my arms had bingo wings,' she says. 'I had flaps of excess skin all over.'
But Hannah found herself unable to get the surgery needed to remove the excess skin.
'I was told it was "cosmetic" and they wouldn't help me,' she says.
After the pregnancy with her youngest child made the loose skin even worse, she ended up paying thousands of euro to go to Turkey to have the surgery there.
It was a decision she now bitterly regrets. Not only did she wake from her 11-hour operation in unbearable pain, Hannah says she has 'permanent nerve damage in both arms'.
'I have pain down my arms like I'm being stabbed, and bad pins and needles constantly. I cannot even lift my arms to certain positions,' says Hannah, whose children are now aged 12, six and four.
Experts say they are seeing increasing numbers of cases like Hannah's, and are warning people who are considering weightloss surgery to be aware of the potential downsides.
Around 70 per cent of patients who have bariatric procedures will need to undergo 'body contouring' surgery afterwards (i.e. removal of excess skin), says Mark Soldin, a plastic surgeon.
A high percentage of these patients will develop complications, he warns. While most of these will resolve, he says, there are also stories such as Hannah's.
The mother-of-three had no idea what lay ahead before her bariatric surgery in 2016.
She'd gained weight after the birth of her first child, James, going from a size 14 to a size 28. At one point her weight reached 21st 7lb. At 5ft 4in, her BMI was above 51 and she was classed as 'morbidly obese'.
DIETING didn't work, and eventually she asked her doctor about having weight-loss surgery. At the age of 24, she underwent a gastric bypass - where a pouch is created at the top of the stomach, then connected to the small intestine to bypass the stomach.
'When I came to, I felt relief that at last I'd start losing weight,' says Hannah.
'I was warned about excess skin, but as I was young I thought it wouldn't be that bad.'
Hannah found 'the weight fell off' - indeed, she lost 12st in less than two years. But losing weight so quickly came at a price.
'I had lots of excess skin,' she says. 'I tried to hide it by wearing tight clothes. But the minute I took my clothes off, my skin would hang in flaps around my body. I felt awful.'
Excess skin is a common sideeffect of substantial weight loss, as the once-stretched skin becomes 'deflated'.
A number of factors can contribute to this, explains Mr Soldin, including genes, age (younger skin is more elastic) and speed of weight loss (the skin is more likely to cope if weight loss is more gradual).
'This is not about feeling embarrassed undressing in front of your partner or not liking the look of yourself in the mirror,' says Mr Soldin.
'It's about significant functional concerns, such as infections in the folds of skin and abscesses, or an inability to exercise because the skin is too wobbly.'
Even then, surgery doesn't usually cover all four areas where saggy skin typically occurs - the stomach, inner thighs, inner arms and breasts, says Mr Soldin. 'It will usually cover only the areas the surgeon feels meet the criteria for body contouring.' Hannah was told she wasn't eligible for the surgery as her problem was 'cosmetic' and wasn't affecting her quality of life - 'even though it was affecting my mental health'. 'I was in despair, as I'd lost the weight but still looked horrendous,' she says.
To have surgery on these four areas privately costs around (EURO)35,000 in Ireland, so it is not surprising people are tempted to go abroad for their surgery.
In 2022, Hannah saw ads on social media for the surgery in Turkey. 'It cost a third of the price of that at home, and people were posting pictures looking incredible afterwards,' she says.
Hannah opted for a breast lift and to have the sagging skin on her stomach and bingo wings removed at a clinic in Ankara. Her parents said they would foot the (EURO)10,000 bill.
'When I came to, I heard a woman screaming in agony - and realised it was me,' Hannah recalls. Despite being in terrible pain and 'convulsing with the shock' due to dangerously low iron levels, the hospital wanted to discharge her that same day.
'But I refused and made them keep me in until the next morning,' Hannah says.
She flew home five days later. Cosmetically, the surgery was largely a success. 'My stomach was flat, my breasts perkier and all the excess skin had gone,' Hannah says. 'My arms had terrible scars but were taut and slim.'
BUT over the next few months, she developed agonising pain in her arms. However, because the operation had been carried out abroad, her GP told her the public system was unable to help.
Hannah saw a plastic surgeon privately five months ago, who diagnosed nerve damage. 'But they couldn't do any surgery on my arms as it would worsen the pain,' she says.
Mr Soldin says plastic surgeons are seeing more and more similar cases. 'The complication rate of this type of surgery is massive: probably between 50 and 100 per cent of patients will get complications after body contouring following weight loss,' he says.
That's true both in Ireland and Britain and elsewhere, he adds, but the key is the availability of follow-up care.
'This type of surgery needs close, continuous follow-up care from a qualified team that includes nurses, physiotherapists and surgeons,' Mr Soldin explains.
'When people go abroad, they can't get that. Three or four days after the operation, these patients are back on the plane, often with drains hanging out of their bodies, and the advice they're given is to go and see their GP for any concerns.
'But the public health system doesn't take on people who have complications from surgery in the private sector unless they are going to die from those complications [such as open wounds or infections].
'Follow-up treatments should be agreed between the patient and surgeon before the initial operation. Unfortunately, patients are often not aware of this.
'With the high complication rate of body contouring surgery, you're throwing loaded dice if you travel to another country.'
So what can those affected do? 'Either live with it or pay for it - there's no magical solution,' says Mr Soldin.

Graphic


Painful legacy: Hannah Thompson. Right, before her bariatric surgeryPicture: GLEN MINIKIN

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



If you feed Erling he will thrive (just like City's bonsai tree in the treatment room)
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 55
Length: 1040 words
Byline: JACK GAUGHAN
Body


AboSAI tree stood in the physio room at Manchester City's training ground last year, the centrepiece of an area that became a hub for Pep Guardiola's players. It can be quite busy in there and most of the squad made sure to spray their little seedling when walking through.
'Erling's idea,' John Stones smirks. Given what we know about Erling Haaland - the meditation dedication and a zen approach to life - bringing in that Japanese tree feels perfectly in keeping. As City stormed to the Treble, the bonsai gave them a common cause away from the grass.
'Everyone bought into it, everyone took care of it,' Stones adds. 'It became a thing that if you'd come in and not watered it, you'd be a bit angry with yourself.'
They're all arms and legs, the bonsai. A bit like its owner. 'I've kind of got responsibility for it,'
Haaland says. 'Give it what it needs, feed it. It needs the right light. We get the energy from the bonsai tree. We drag the energy out and it breathes into the body. It brings us good luck.'
Unwittingly, Haaland is describing himself. Describing what he is to this City team. A bonsai needs an exact environment to thrive in and so too does the man who wears No 9 for the best side in the world. Neither require much upkeep but they do require something.
Whether he is being afforded that regular supply, little and often, is up for debate and when that dries up, someone like Roy Keane will merrily provide disingenuous commentary on how Haaland resembles a League Two striker.
'His general play for such a player, it is so poor,' Keane said after the goalless draw with Arsenal where Haaland was reduced to 23 touches. 'He has to improve that, he's almost like a League Two player.'
Given his long-running history with the Haaland family, Keane's comments felt somewhat performative. He, like all of us, had witnessed Haaland be engulfed by two of the continent's best central defenders in a system far removed from Mikel Arteta's usual philosophy. City had little space to work between the back four and midfield, no alleyways to drive down. Haaland occupied both William Saliba and Gabriel in away that might have allowed others to take charge elsewhere, yet Declan Rice covered that ground manfully.
City face this sort of entrenched defence on a weekly basis at the Etihad Stadium but with the meanest back line in the division, Arsenal's ability to keep teams at bay is significantly higher than others like Nottingham Forest, Brighton and Everton, who all performed admirably on the day but ultimately lost while conceding a couple. Haaland netted in all three of those - switching off against him once can be terminal.
HAALAND will be acutely aware of his recent Premier League form, however. He's still top scorer, but it's only four goals in his last 11 appearances - two of those against Everton - and the Norwegian admitted recently that he is squandering too many opportunities. 'I'll probably miss a big chance in the future as well, and people are going to criticise me,' he said after the glaring miss during last month's Manchester derby. 'But what can I do? Should I think of that?
'It's with everything in life, if you overthink something it's not good, if there's stress in your life it's not good. It's a mental thing, it's something I've been working on.'
The bonsai - a story told in the new Netflix documentary on Manchester City, Together, released today - was probably a method of relaxation within the work environment. As a kid, Haaland used to cry when his teams lost but he is easy-going these days. More comfortable in his own skin, even if some pundits who should know better cannot fathom why somebody the height of a shed might occasionally mix his feet up in a split-second decision. It's a long way down from brain to toes.
And Haaland this season is City this season. Good without exploding yet, derailed by injury - like a fair few others - and something of a victim of last year. 'Just because your name is Haaland everyone thinks you'll score five every game,' one source said recently.
They are right and when he doesn't, people go looking for reasons. He doesn't link play well enough - well, that has improved on last season. He can't head it - well, actually, he won five aerial duels on Sunday, two more than Saliba and Gabriel combined. Six assists thus far is in line with the nine recorded in his debut season.
What Guardiola will want more of is the intensity in pressuring defenders out of possession. It was a hallmark of City's false nine era, and there is an acceptance of how that alters with a giant man up front, but there are improvements to make in that department. Haaland admits as much himself. He's won the ball back 16 times in the final third, eight fewer than Julian Alvarez. More than Darwin Nunez and the same as Rasmus Hojlund.
He's 23, he will naturally become smarter in that area of his game. And there is give and take here.
Did City's creators do enough to find Haaland on Sunday?
How many of 31 crosses were appetising for the Norwegian to attack? As much as he might give more when City aren't on the ball, they are built not to require his services until the very last moment.
So when he is followed by two centre backs, the onus is on others to wriggle through in a way that Ilkay Gundogan did to such great effect in his later years. If a midfielder takes matters into their own hands against Arsenal, as Gundogan so often did, then nobody is talking about Haaland and the fourth division.
This is now Guardiola's challenge, to dial their level up from good to champion. Given all the tactical mastery, Guardiola's man-management can often get overlooked but there were plenty of moments last year when he inspired his players to greatness. After the league hit them with an unprecedented number of charges for alleged financial breaches, Guardiola delivered one of his all-time team talks.
'Support me unconditionally,' he demanded with a crazed look in his eye. 'I want this Premier League (title) more than ever. Everything we have won, has been on the pitch, always. I love the club. I love you too. I want my warriors.'
They went and beat Aston Villa 3-1. Then they won it all. Warriors then, while Guardiola needs gardeners now. The bonsai has gone a bit dry.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



iranian general killed by suspected israeli airstrike on syria consulate
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 6
Length: 209 words
Byline: Andy Jehring
Body


A TOP Iranian general has been killed in a suspected assassination by Israel as it steps up its war in the region.
General Mohammad Reza Zahedi was at the Iranian consulate in Damascus, Syria, when it was flattened by an IDF airstrike yesterday, according to Lebanese security sources. A senior commander in the Islamic Revolutionary Guard
Corps (IRGC), he was previously the head of its air and ground forces. At least seven people were killed in the airstrike. In a call with his Syrian counterpart, Iran's foreign minister Hossein Amir-Abdollahian blamed Israel, calling it 'a breach of all international conventions'. Syria's foreign minister Faisal
Mekdad said: 'We strongly condemn this heinous terrorist attack that targeted the Iranian consulate building in Damascus, killing a number of innocent people.'
Israel has stepped up its attacks on Iran's proxies in Lebanon and Syria since October 7 because the Islamist regime backs Hamas. The IRGC supports the government of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad. The strike comes after the IDF killed another general, Sayyed Razi Mousavi - who co-ordinated the military alliance between Syria and Iran - on Christmas Day.
An Israeli military spokesman said they don't comment on 'reports in the foreign media'.

Graphic


Struck down: Mohammad Reza Zahedi was killedFlattened: Rescuers pick through the rubble at the Iranian consulate yesterday

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Jail time awaiting Sutton after going on run
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 394 words
Byline: ALANMORRISSEY
Body


CAMERON Sutton has turned himself in, ending a weeks-long search for the former NFL defensive back who was wanted on a domestic violence warrant.
The Hillsborough County Sheriff's Office announced the 29-year-old Sutton arrived at a jail in Tampa, Florida, on Sunday night, nearly a week after it said his attorney informed authorities that the former Detroit Lions and Pittsburgh Steelers standout would turn himself in.
'After weeks of evading law enforcement, this man has finally made the right choice to turn himself in,' Hillsborough County Sheriff Chad Chronister said.
'Domestic violence has no place in our community, and no one is above the law here in Hillsborough County. My thoughts are with this woman as she continues to heal from this man's gruesome actions.'
Sutton's initial arrest warrant charged him with a felony, but prosecutors said he was being formally charged with misdemeanour battery, which carries a maximum one-year jail sentence. Sutton was released from jail on Monday, the state attorney's office said.
The sheriff's department responded to a call about domestic violence in progress involving Sutton and a female at around 5am on March 7. Nearly two weeks ago, the sheriff's office asked for help in finding Sutton.
A short time later, Lions president Rod Wood said Sutton had been at the team's training facility just outside Detroit.
'We learned about the warrant at the same time everybody else did on social media,' Wood told the media last Monday.
'We were able to speak to Cam because he was actually in our building.
'We found him. He was down with our strength staff. He kind of showed up unexpectedly to work out.'
The Lions released Sutton on March 21 after news of the warrant surfaced. Detroit signed Sutton to a $33 million, threeyear contract a year ago. He helped the franchise win a division title for the first time in three decades along with two play-off games in one postseason for the first time since 1957.
He started in all 17 regularseason games, making a careerhigh 65 tackles and one interception, and in each of Detroit's three play-off games.
Sutton started 31 games for the Steelers during the 2021 and '22 seasons with five interceptions with 95 tackles. Pittsburgh drafted the former Tennessee star, who is from Jonesboro, Georgia, in the third round in 2017. He has nine interceptions in 101 games over his career.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Jessie ready to answer Gleeson's call
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 51
Length: 328 words
Byline: MARK GALLAGHER
Body


JESSIE Stapleton is only in the early stages of her professional career, but the 19-year-old is already getting a bird's-eye view of what can happen when the business side of the game goes wrong.
Signed from Shelbourne, West Ham have loaned out the teenager to Reading in the Championship to get some game-time. And she has played every game for the Royals since the move. But the club is currently lurching from one crisis to the next, with the men's team having been deducted 18 points for financial mismanagement while the women's side went part-time after last year's relegation from the WSL.
However, as beleaguered Chinese owner Dai Yongge has introduced loads of cost-cutting measures, things have often taken a farcical turn. The heating has been turned off in the training ground while the usual club caterers no longer provide food, leading to some of the women's team getting ill after a meal following a FA Cup game against Wolves.
The supporters of this one-time Premier League club have been out in force in protest, with some wearing clown masks to show how they feel about how the club has been mismanaged. But Stapleton insists the club is not a laughing stock.
'I wouldn't say it's like a joke shop. It's still a professional environment because we're still footballers. The stress of the business side doesn't help but we're still professionals who turn up to training every day. Hopefully, we'll have a bit of certainty going into the last three games of the season.'
Before those games, Stapleton has an exciting international double-bill against France and England to prepare for.
Ireland manager Eileen Gleeson rates the young Dubliner highly and suggested at last week's squad announcement that she could be a regular of the back line if Ireland reach the Euros next year. 'I was delighted with the comment,' Stapleton said of Gleeson's forecast. 'These two games are massive. But we're Irish, we like to put up a fight and we don't want to go down easy.'

Graphic


Prospect: Stapleton

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



ONWARDS TO SUMMER WITH A SPRING IN OUR STEP; Five lessons we should learn from the climax to the National Leagues...
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 943 words
Byline: MICHEAL CLIFFORD
Body


THE Allianz Football League is over for another year, but this one sent the game hurtling towards the summer with a big, giddy smile on its face.
That was primarily down to an extraordinary match which, when taken in isolation, would suggest that the game can heal itself without the GAA appointing a committee to do so.
As ever, one swallow does not make a summer. That may be one of a number of lessons to be absorbed after the League finals weekend.
Mail Sport picks out five to chew on...
1 DOES DESSIE NEED TO DO A
Jim? If there was a tipping point when football became a more cautious game, the 48th minute of the 2014 All-Ireland semi-final was as good as any.
As Dublin pressed up on a Paul Durcan kick-out, Michael Murphy flicked it on to Neil Gallagher in oceans of space behind the press and, with a two-man overload, Colm McFadden clipped the ball to the net for a killer goal.
Seven years passed before Dublin were beaten again; Jim Gavin learned his lesson - subsequently deploying of Cian O'Sullivan as a sweeping presence - and applying them to football's greatest team with devastating consequences.
There were more than faint echoes of that 2014 semi-final in Dublin's defeat to Derry on Sunday, Brendan Rogers' catch-andrelease for Eoin McEvoy's first of two goals exposing the cavernous space the Dubs left in front of their posts that helped facilitate six goal chances for the opposition.
Farrell suggested afterwards that playing aggressively on the front-foot is the only way to deal with the Oak Leafers' threat.
'Derry are the type of team that if you try to play with a sweeper they are very good at exposing that in terms of overloads along the channels,' he said.
'It was more kick-outs that were causing us problems than the man-on-man situations as in kick-outs you are setting up in different formations and that is probably something we will take a lot from,' he claimed That review will almost certainly see them drop off on Derry kick-outs the next time they face up and if they do, expect the terms of engagement to change.
Farrell suggested that defeat would kill all talk of Dublin's name being on Sam Maguire but, more importantly, he also knows now how not to set up against Derry.
2 DERRY SHOOT-OUT TRIUMPH NOT REALLY A WIN Having been through hell and back in three penalty shootouts, it is understandable Armagh manager Kieran
McGeeney takes the view that those losses don't count as defeats.
On that basis, it can be argued that winning a penalty shootout does not count as a victory, even when validated with a cup.
While the shoot-out on Sunday delivered the right result - Derry being by far the better team - it begs the question as to why they had to go through all that drama.
That, in the main, was down to missed chances, but the manner in which they were turned over at the end of normal time for the equalising score and their concession of a goal from a hit-andhope centre at the end of extra time should be a concern.
Few doubt that Derry are good enough to bridge a 31-year gap and win a second All-Ireland, but are they ruthless enough?
They were the better team in last year's semi-final against Kerry, but still came up shy and they were the better team for vast swathes of 90-odd minutes against Dublin, but did not win in the conventional sense.
Beating the best in Croke Park is still the nut that Derry must crack.
3 ARMAGH NEED TO LEARN - AND FAST?
The biggest surprise on Sunday was that it was the headline event rather than the curtain raiser that went to a shoot-out - given Armagh's presence in the former.
However, Armagh's defeat to Donegal underlined their attraction to late drama.
Outplayed for the bones of an hour they only stirred themselves when it was too late setting up a finale in which they were once again squeezed out by a sliver.
Far from this being an extension of their misfortune, it is becoming part of their DNA.
In last year's All-Ireland quarter-final, when the game was there to be won with Monaghan having a player in the sin bin, Armagh kept the handbrake on.
For most of Sunday, until they realised it was almost gone, they appeared more content to stay in the game than chase it.
Rarely does such a policy reward.
4 WESTMEATH ARE THE TAILTEANN CUP'S PERFECT POSTER BOYS If there were any doubts as to the benefits of winning the Tailteann Cup, Westmeath blew them away at the weekend.
Last year, they backed up that success by defying their status as the lowest ranked team in the Sam Maguire to come within a kick of the ball of reaching the last 12.
Last Saturday night, they claimed more silver by winning the Division 3 final, which means that they start out next season as a bona fide Sam Maguire team.
Right now, as a result, they are in the All-Ireland series this summer but the fact that this is not a certainty, brings us to our final lesson.
5 PROTECT THE LEAGUE BY SEEDING THE PROVINCIAL CHAMPIONSHIPS Unless they find a way of making it to the Ulster final, Down will play in the Tailteann Cup this summer.
Unless Clare find a way of not making it to the Munster final, they will play in the Sam Maguire Cup this summer.
When Down and Clare met in what was in effect a sudden death promotion play-off in the final round of Division 3, Down won by 11 points.
That was no surprise because Down are clearly better than Clare yet because the latter have been drawn against two Division 4 teams in Munster, they will take Down's place.
If the GAA does not have the courage to break the link between the provinces and the All-Ireland series, at least they should ensure the provincial championships are seeded on the basis of league status.
It is a solution that is staring them in the face.

Graphic


Spot on: Derry's Shane McGuigan scores from a penalty in the shootout against DublinDrama: Kieran McGeeneySilver service: Westmeath's Kevin Maguire

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Pair charged over stabbing of teen boy are freed on bail
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 19
Length: 219 words
Byline: Rebecca Black
Body


A YOUNG man and woman have been released on bail after being charged in connection with the stabbing of a teenage boy in Co. Down at the weekend.
The charges facing Joseph Skelly and Holly Kilmartin, both 20, and both with an address given as Hillcrest Drive, Ballynahinch, Co. Down, were heard at Lisburn Magistrates' Court yesterday morning.
The pair were charged following the incident in Ballynahinch on Saturday night. The boy was taken to hospital.
Mr Skelly was charged with grievous bodily harm with intent, attempted grievous bodily harm with intent, possession of an offensive weapon with intent to commit an indictable offence and common assault. Ms Kilmartin was charged with grievous bodily harm with intent and possession of an offensive weapon with intent to commit an indictable offence.
The court heard police received a 999 call at around 7.25pm on Saturday reporting a boy, aged 16, had been stabbed behind a community centre in Ballynahinch. The victim was stabbed in his lower abdomen.
The boy had to have part of his small bowel removed after the attack, the court heard. Witnesses alleged Mr Skelly had been the perpetrator of the stabbing and attacks on two other young people, accompanied by Ms Kilmartin, who was described as his girlfriend. The two accused are due in court again on Thursday.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Patient passports for gynaecological oncology rolled out at St James's
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 32
Length: 363 words
Body


The Trinity St James's Cancer Institute (TSJCI) has announced the roll-out of 'My Gynaecology Patient Passport,' a resource for patients diagnosed with, or undergoing investigation for, gynaecological cancer which will be carried by patients throughout their cancer journey.
The first of its kind in Ireland, the patient passport will be provided to patients being treated for ovarian, uterine, cervical, vaginal and vulval cancers during their first visit with the St James's Hospital Gynaecology Team.
The document, which is filled in collaboratively by patients and their clinicians, will include important information and visual aids related to the patient's diagnosis and care plan, and will provide helpful resources to support patients both before and after treatment. It has been designed to allow patients to take ownership of their care and improve communication between patients, specialist healthcare teams and primary care physicians.
Dr Catherine O'Gorman, consultant gynaecological oncologist at the TSJCI, said: 'We are really pleased to have developed this simple but effective document that aims to empower patients with a clearer understanding of their diagnosis and care...Patients diagnosed with gynaecological cancer can understandably be fearful and overwhelmed by the information they receive during their initial appointments.
'We hope that the patient passport will improve how information is absorbed and shared with family or other healthcare practitioners.'
Clinicians at the TSJCI treat approximately 300 gynaecological cancer patients each year and, as treatments for gynaecological cancers improve, focus is turning towards cancer survivorship.
'Given the growing number of cancer survivors in Ireland, survivorship is regarded as a distinct phase in a patient's cancer journey,' said Professor John Kennedy, clinical professor of oncology at TCD and co-director of the TSJCI.
'Initiatives such as the gynaecology patient passport and our recently opened Gynae Oncology Survivorship Clinic, which caters for the holistic needs of patients, underline how important all elements of cancer care are, not just surgical, radiation or medical oncology treatments.'

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Patten in line to make her debut against France
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 223 words
Byline: MARK GALLAGHER
Body


ANNA Patten has been given the green light to make her Ireland debut in Friday's opening Euro 2025 qualifier against France after her international clearance was confirmed by FIFA yesterday.
The 24-year-old Aston Villa defender needed to be allowed to change associations by FIFA as she has represented England at underage level, captaining their Under 19 and U23 sides. However, she is now eligible for the daunting Group A3 double-bill against France in Metz before the European champions come to Lansdowne Road next Tuesday.
Patten's Irish heritage come from her grandfather Donald Coyle, who hailed from Falcarragh in Donegal, and grandmother Bridie
Coyle (nee Conroy), who was from Lettermore in Galway and she highlighted that pair's influence on her career.
'I'm delighted to be in with the Ireland squad,' she said. 'I was super excited when Eileen Gleeson gave me the call and now to have the clearance come through is great. This a really strong squad and I just want to bring what I can to it to help the team.
'My grandparents have always been my greatest supporters and they have motivated me to work hard to succeed in my career.' Patten joined the squad yesterday and there may yet be an opportunity in the Irish defence as Liverpool captain Niamh Fahey remains a doubt for Friday's game with a calf injury.
WNT COVERAGE, SEE PAGE 51

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PEPPER PASTA TRAYBAKE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 38
Length: 201 words
Body


Serves 4 1 red pepper, cut into strips 1 yellow pepper, cut into strips 1 green pepper, cut into strips 100g cherry tomatoes, halved 2 red onions, sliced 30g fresh basil leaves 1 tbsp olive oil Salt and pepper 125g mozzarella ball, drained 4 garlic cloves, sliced 300g farfalle 2 tbsp red wine vinegar 20g Parmesan (optional)
1Preheat the oven to 180?C/160?C fan/ gas mark 4.
2 In a large, roasting tray add the peppers, tomatoes, red onion and basil leaves.
Drizzle with olive oil and season with salt and pepper. 3 Make some space in the centre of the tray, and place the ball of mozzarella in the space. Scatter the garlic over the mix, add a drizzle of olive oil, and roast for 30-35 minutes, or until the vegetables are soft.
4 Cook the pasta according to pack instructions. Drain but reserve some pasta water.
ON 5 Remove the tray from the oven and stir in the red wine vinegar. Add the pasta and a splash of the pasta water to the tray and toss everything together.
6 Add the Parmesan, toss again, and serve.
Per serving 470kcals, 13.3g fat (5.4g saturated), 71.2g carbs, 9g sugars, 20.2g protein, 5.8g fibre, 0.289g sodium easyFood SPRING SALE NOW!
In association with find us at www.easyfood.ie
HEALTHY
AND
HEARTY

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 48
Length: 375 words
Body


GREATEST HEISTS WITH PIERCE BROSNAN, 9PM, BLAZE
IF YOU had to pick an actor to front a show about jawdropping heists, then former 007 star Pierce Brosnan (pictured) would be close to the top of the list. The 1999 movie The Thomas Crown Affair proved that he loves an intricate law-breaking scheme, after all, and he clearly relishes his twinklyeyed role presenting and narrating this new-to-Freeview documentary show about high-profile heists. And there are some brazen criminals caught red-handed in this eight-episode series, from the Italian ring of thieves who pulled off the largest-ever diamond heist in Antwerp, Belgium, to the robbers disguised as coppers who walked out of a Boston art gallery with half a billion dollars' worth of paintings. First, though, there's the men who tunnelled into a bank vault deep beneath London's Baker Street ? but were unaware that an amateur radio enthusiast had tuned in to their walkie-talkie wavelength. (Freeview 64, Freesat 162, Sky 164, Virgin 174)
ART PIONEER Mary Cassatt: Painting The Modern Woman, 8pm, Sky Arts THE U.S. painter Mary Cassatt had a significant impact on how women are represented in art ? her prints, sketches and paintings include many images of mothers and children ? though she never married or had children herself. This interesting new documentary explores the impressionist's influence.
KINGS & QUEENS Royal Autopsy, 9pm, Sky History PATHOLOGIST Brett Lockyer dissects the prosthetic 'bodies' of monarchs in this innovative and sometimes gross dive into the lives of kings and queens past. As Dr Lockyer proceeds with his grisly work, Professor Alice Roberts (pictured) asks questions about why they died. Series one covered Charles II and Elizabeth I, while the new, second series finds Henry IV, Mary I, Queen Anne and, in this first episode, George IV on the slab.
EIGHTIES SITCOM No Place Like Home, 8.20pm, BBC4 A RARE repeat for the comedy following the trials and tribulations of Arthur and Beryl Crabtree (William Gaunt and Patricia Garwood), who think their four children have flown the nest and are looking forward to some peace and quiet ... Look out for a young Martin Clunes as their son Nigel, and new memories from Gaunt before the show itself. Continues next week.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV; GREATEST HEISTS WITH PIERCE BROSNAN, 9PM, BLAZE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 42
Length: 355 words
Body


IF YOU had to pick an actor to front a show about jawdropping heists, then former 007 star Pierce Brosnan (pictured) would be close to the top of the list. The 1999 movie The Thomas Crown Affair proved that the Navan man loves an intricate lawbreaking scheme, after all, and he clearly relishes his twinkly eyed role presenting and narrating this documentary show about high-profile heists. There are some brazen criminals caught red-handed in this eight-episode series, from the Italian ring of thieves who pulled off the largestever diamond heist, in Antwerp, Belgium, to the robbers disguised as coppers who walked out of a Boston art gallery with half a billion dollars' worth of paintings. First, though, there's the men who tunnelled into a bank vault deep beneath London's Baker Street - but were blissfully unaware that an amateur radio enthusiast had managed to tuned into their walkie-talkie wavelength. (Sky 164)
ART PIONEER Mary Cassatt: Painting The Modern Woman, 8pm, Sky Arts AMERICAN painter Cassatt had a significant impact on how women are represented in art - her prints, sketches and paintings include many images of mothers and children - though she never married or had children herself. This interesting new documentary explores the impressionist's influence. EIGHTIES SITCOM No Place Like Home, 8.20pm, BBC4 A RARE repeat for the comedy following the trials and tribulations of Arthur and Beryl Crabtree (William Gaunt and Patricia Garwood), who think their four children have flown the nest and are looking forward to some peace and quiet ... Look out for a young Martin Clunes as their son Nigel, and new memories from Gaunt before the show itself. Continues next week. KINGS & QUEENS Royal Autopsy, 9pm, Sky History PATHOLOGIST Brett Lockyer dissects the prosthetic 'bodies' of monarchs in this dive into the lives of kings and queens past. As Dr Lockyer does his grisly work, Professor Alice Roberts (left) asks questions about why they died. Series one covered Charles II and Elizabeth I, while the new, second season finds Henry IV, Mary I, Queen Anne and, in this first episode, George IV on the slab.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PUBLIC URGED NOT TO IGNORE SYMPTOMS OF BOWEL CANCER
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 24
Length: 453 words
Body


ALMOST one in three people experiencing symptoms of bowel cancer have put off seeking help because of perceived long waits in the public system. That's according to new research published today by the Irish Cancer Society, marking the beginning of Bowel Cancer Awareness Month.
The survey, carried out by Core Research, also finds that one in three haven't made a medical appointment because they don't think their symptoms are serious enough. While 1 in 4 are putting off a hospital or GP visit because it's too expensive.
Around 2,500 people will be diagnosed with bowel cancer each year and it is the second most common cause of cancerrelated death in Ireland. The earlier bowel cancer is detected the better the outcome for the patient.
Signs and symptoms of bowel cancer include: lasting change in your bowel habit, blood in your poo or bleeding from your back passage, a lump in your tummy area or rectum, or pain or discomfort in your tummy area or back passage.
Some risk factors include family history, dietary habits, smoking, alcohol, obesity and inactivity.
Jennifer Deegan, 45, urges anyone with signs or symptoms to seek help immediately. 'Before I was diagnosed, I was one of many my age and younger, who were not aware of the signs and symptoms of bowel cancer - many of which only show at a later stage. I want people to hear my story and think 'this could be me' and to get themselves checked out at once if they notice anything out of the ordinary - my persistence is what has saved my life.'
Dr Grainne O'Kane, Consultant Medical Oncologist, Trinity St. James's Cancer Research Institute, says: 'It's really concerning that there are people sitting at home with persistent symptoms of bowel cancer and are putting off going to their GP. My message is very clear, although most of the time these symptoms can be caused by other conditions, it's so important to get checked out.
'As an oncologist we are also particularly worried about the significant increase in bowel cancer in people under 50 around the world, so no matter what your age, the sooner you are seen by a doctor, if you have symptoms, the better treatment options and outcomes.
Dr O'Kane also urged people in the relevant age group to take up the opportunity to be screened for bowel cancer.
'Bowel screening is available for anyone aged 59-69 and it's really important that those eligible are taking up the opportunity to be screened. It is clear that we need to lower the age for screening as soon as possible In line with international guidelines.'
The Irish Cancer Society is urging anyone with symptoms to visit their GP. You contact the Irish Cancer Society's Support Line on 1800 200 700 or visit www.cancer.ie/ bowel for more information.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Ramsdale set to reunite with mentor Howe
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 52
Length: 261 words
Byline: SIMON JONES
Body


NEWCASTLE UNITED have rekindled their interest in Arsenal goalkeeper Aaron Ramsdale ahead of the summer window.
The 25-year-old is keen to play regular Premier League football again after being reduced to an understudy role following the arrival of David Raya from Brentford, and is assessing his options.
Newcastle have Martin Dubravka in goal currently, with No1 Nick Pope set to return from a dislocated shoulder at the end of the month. Dubravka is 35 and Pope turns 32 this month, so Newcastle want a younger option.
Manager Eddie Howe is a big admirer of Ramsdale. He signed him at Bournemouth from Sheffield United and gave the keeper a second chance after he over-slept and missed the bus for a Carabao
Cup tie at Chelsea in 2018. Ramsdale was fined and sent on loan to AFC Wimbledon, but later credited Howe for the manner in which he managed the situation, describing it as a 'penny-dropping moment'. Ramsdale was bought back by Sheffield United for £18.5million before being sold to Arsenal in 2021 for £30m. Despite his outstanding first season with the Gunners, Mikel Arteta brought in Raya this season for his better distribution.
Mindful that Ramsdale is preparing to leave, Arsenal have been looking at Columbus Crew keeper Patrick Schulte, 23, who is being monitored by Manchester United. The Old Trafford club have offered to meet Jason Wilcox's buy-out clause at Southampton in the hope of having the director of football in place to mastermind their summer transfer business. United have agreed to pay Saints 12 months of Wilcox's wages as compensation.

Graphic


Toon interest: Ramsdale

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Russian sonic beams blamed for 'Havana syndrome'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 6
Length: 217 words
Byline: Miriam Kuepper
Body


RUSSIAN intelligence is behind a mysterious illness striking down US diplomats and spies, an investigation has found.
'Havana syndrome' - so-called because it was first reported by US embassy officials in Cuba in 2016 - leaves victims with migraines, nausea, memory lapses, hearing loss, poor balance and dizziness.
US intelligence previously dismissed claims a foreign adversary was responsible, but now research by The Insider, a Russia-focused investigative media group, has laid the blame on the secretive Russian military intelligence unit 29155.
The group, which has been blamed for the poisoning of Sergei Skripal in Salisbury, England, is said to have caused the condition by firing sonic weapons at victims' brains.
The Insider report said the first incident of 'Havana syndrome' symptoms may have happened earlier than 2016, when US embassy staff in Cuba started complaining about pain in their ears and strong pressure in their heads.
It said there were 'likely attacks two years earlier in Frankfurt when a US government employee stationed at the consulate there was knocked unconscious by something akin to a strong energy beam'.
Military investigator Greg Edgreen told US TV show 60 Minutes that all of the victims had 'worked against Russia'. Last night, Russia called the allegations 'groundless'.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Sacks appeal: Bin bags and glad rags as racing ladies chase clouds away
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 19
Length: 219 words
Byline: Alanah Khosla
Body


THE weather might have been grey and dreary at Fairyhouse yesterday, but glamorous racegoers proved that every cloud has a silver lining... or, in this case, a black bin liner.
Hundreds braved the wet weather to conclude their Easter celebrations, and, hopefully, win a few bob too.
Yesterday marked the final day of the racing festival that offers live entertainment on top of the National Hunt racing, with over (EURO)1million in prize money up for grabs.
Racegoers huddled under waterproof jackets, giggling together despite the wet conditions. Posing for a group photo as they arrived, one chic group of women braved the cold in bright bodycon dresses as they entered the Meath venue.
Wearing a stylish jumpsuit, one particularly glamorous spectator looked perfectly put together in shades of blue.
Meanwhile, another opted for a cream halterneck dress, bringing out her sleek brunette tresses, which she styled loosely curled and to one side.
A third donned a bright turquoise backless dress with a chic gold wristwatch, while the final member of the party looked sophisticated in a lilac bandeau dress.
Guests didn't let the gloomy weather dampen their outfits either - with one duo rocking summery shades and another glamorous spectator opting for a bright pink dress with a rose print.
(EURO)1million in prize money

Graphic


Using their heads: A group of glamorous racegoers don their bin liner 'fascinators' yesterday

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Shatter eyes Europe seat, saying 'truth matters'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 11
Length: 425 words
Byline: Brian Mahon
Body


FORMER justice minister Alan Shatter is weighing up a bid for the European Parliament, saying Fine Gael has 'lost its moral compass'.
Mr Shatter, who has been a lone voice in Irish public discourse in defending Israel's right to defend itself against Hamas, said on X, formerly Twitter, that he was considering the move. He tweeted: 'Thank you to all of those urging me to be a Dublin candidate in the June Euro elections. I share your criticism of the Dublin MEPs expected to seek re-election and their failure to represent the moderate, common sense, pro business, pro-Europe views of many. I'm reflecting on doing so.'
He added: 'The truth matters.
Too many of those representing
Ireland as MEPs have a difficulty telling the full truth about complex issues or just engage in politically self-serving voter seducing fabrication. The result of the two recent referendums proves most voters value truth over fiction.'' Speaking to the Irish Daily Mail, Mr Shatter said: 'Having been urged by a number of unconnected people to stand as an Independent Dublin candidate, I am reflecting on it and discussing it with my family.'
He said 'no decision' had been made yet, adding: 'I ceased to be a member of Fine Gael in spring 2018 due to my belief the party had entirely lost its moral compass and its abject - still continuing - failure in Government to competently address a variety of issues.' Mr Shatter recently criticised Sinn Féin's glorification of the late IRA bomber Rose Dugdale, while at the same time distancing itself from Provo gardakiller Pearse McAuley, following his death in recent weeks.
He tweeted: 'The tricolour adorning Rose Dugdale's coffin Wed was no less offensive than it adorning Pearse McAuley's coffin. Whilst SF is trying to distance itself from the murderous
McAuley, yesterday it embraced & eulogised Dugdale's terrorist atrocities. Her atrocities exceeded McAuley's.'
Mr Shatter's potential candidacy would add yet more intrigue in what will likely be a heavily contested field in Dublin.
Ciarán Cuffe of the Greens, Fianna Fáil's Barry Andrews and Independent Clare Daly will all be seeking re-election, with Senator Regina Doherty standing for Fine Gael in a bid to retain the seat won last time by retiring MEP Frances Fitzgerald.
Independent Ireland, headed up by Independent TD Michael Collins, is expected to stand a candidate, with Bríd Smith TD set to run for People Before Profit and Aodhán Ó Ríordáin standing for the Labour Party.
Finian McGrath is also seeking a seat as an Independent.
'Party has lost its moral compass'

Graphic


No decision yet: Alan Shatter

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



TD denies he 'promised' more money to fund special school; Staff paid late at centre facing (EURO)1.7m crisis
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 712 words
Byline: Brian Mahon
Body


A GOVERNMENT TD has rejected claims he told 'mistruths' about additional funding plans for a special needs centre now facing a financial crisis.
Joe Flaherty, a Fianna Fáil TD from Longford, was accused by his fellow local, Fine Gael senator Micheál Carrigy, of telling 'mistruths' in the Seanad last week.
Mr Carrigy raised the issue of funding for St Christopher's Special School in Abbeycartron, Co. Longford, which was founded by parents to provide much-needed community-based services for people with intellectual difficulties.
Mr Carrigy told the Seanad: 'There is currently a significant deficit of (EURO)250,000 per month. This will decrease to (EURO)140,000 per month when the 8% increase for section 39 organisations that was agreed prior to Christmas comes into play.'
He said a 'significant number' of staff left the centre a number of years ago to work in the HSE as a result of wage disparities.
'In recent months, to my understanding, there have been a number of issues around delays in pay,' he said. 'Staff have contacted my office about the matter. Issues around pension contributions not being forwarded to various companies and so forth came to the fore in recent weeks.'
He said he had met with management and spoke to members of the board of directors to discuss the issue.
'This organisation is at crisis point,' he added.
'When the wage increase comes into place, there will be a deficit of (EURO)140,000 per month. That amounts to almost (EURO)1.7million by the end of the year.'
Mr Carrigy said of Mr Flaherty, who is the only Government TD in Longford: 'In 2022, Government TDs in our county made promises of additional funding to cover wage increases.
'The board of directors made a decision to increase the wages of staff in light of the high numbers that were leaving the organisation. It did so on the basis that it was told that funding would be made available to cover the increase. That promise was made by a local TD in Longford. It is now early 2024.'
He said staff have not been paid on time in recent months, and that in recent weeks, it was discovered there was a 'significant financial shortage'.
The HSE has now had to come on board to 'front-load money' from the end of the year to allow the school to get over its immediate financial difficulties.
Mr Carrigy said St Christopher's Special School's funding woes were caused by 'false truths' told to staff and the board that 'money was in place'. He added: 'As someone who represents the people of Longford, I need to know what the facts are because those involved are not being told the facts by another public representative in the county. They are being told lies. They were informed that money was put in place and that is not the case.'
Mr Carrigy clarified his claims about 'lies' after being warned by the chair of the Seanad.
Instead, he said they were being told 'mistruths'.
Sources have insisted the board is clear 'no assurances' were given by Mr Flaherty.
Responding to the claims, Mr Flaherty said 'serious financial issues' at St Christopher's Special School began to emerge in 2023, leading to Revenue getting involved. He said the HSE had injected around (EURO)3.5million into the organisation so far.
'I have never made a political football out of the service,' said Mr Flaherty.
'Regardless of baseless jibes, what matters is the service to service users and the staff.'
He said the 'only one' making the allegation that promises were made by senior people to St Christopher's to allow it to increase its spending on salaries was Senator Carrigy.
'The HSE is getting to the bottom of it,' he responded when asked how the organisation had got itself into a financial crisis.
St Christopher's did not respond to the Irish Daily Mail's request for comment.
Meanwhile, Disability Minister Anne Rabbitte also denied making any additional service funding promises.
A spokesman for the Fianna Fáil TD said: 'Minister Rabbitte has made no verbal assurances to St Christopher's regarding funding for salaries.
'Such issues in the first instance would be a matter for the provider to engage on with the HSE. Any such agreement would be between the provider and the HSE, not with the minister or department.'
brian.mahon@dailymail.ie
'Never made it a political football' 'Currently a significant deficit'

Graphic


Strong words: Joe Flaherty, left, was accused by Senator Micheál Carrigy, right, of telling 'mistruths' about fundingChallenges: St Christopher's Special School in Co. Longford

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



TELEVISION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 40,41
Length: 259 words
Body


FOOD & DRINK Aldi's Next Big Thing, 8pm, Ch4 RETURNING for a new series, Anita Rani and grocer Chris Bavin present the Dragons' Den of the supermarket world. A carefully selected batch of 36 food and drink producers will be given the opportunity to pitch to retail behemoth Aldi, which will choose one product to feature on its shelves. Each week, presentations take place in different categories, and it all kicks off tonight with Dinnertime; that means a ready meal pitched by rapper Stormzy's personal chef, plus a variety of meats and colourful burgers. Of the six options Aldi's managing director of buying Julie Ashfield (pictured with Bavin and Rani) has to choose from, only two will be invited to develop their products, and one will be given the kind of order that will take their business from small fry to big deal in one fell swoop.
CAFÉ CULTURE Interior Design Masters With Alan Carr, 8pm, BBC1 SWANSEA is the destination for a challenge that involves transforming a café, but just because we're at the seaside, don't expect the weather to be kind. The six remaining designers will be working in pairs, and will have to listen to what the owner wants, but one in particular can't resist putting his stamp all over it, just as he has every week. It all gets rather heated...
FILM CHOICE Creed, 9.30pm, RTÉ2 THIS compelling Rocky spin-off stars Michael B Jordan (right) as the son of the late boxing champion Apollo Creed. When he decides to carry on the family tradition, he seeks help from his dad's old rival in the ring (Sylvester Stallone).

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



TELEVISION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 46,47
Length: 268 words
Body


FOOD & DRINK Aldi's Next Big Thing, 8pm, Ch4 RETURNING for a new series, Anita Rani and grocer Chris Bavin present the Dragons' Den of the supermarket world. A carefully selected batch of 36 food and drink producers will be given the opportunity to pitch to retail behemoth Aldi, who will choose one product to feature on their shelves. Each week, presentations take place in different categories, and it all kicks off tonight with Dinnertime. That means a ready meal pitched by rapper Stormzy's personal chef, plus a variety of meats and colourful burgers. Of the six options Aldi's Managing Director of Buying Julie Ashfield (pictured with Bavin and Rani) has to choose from, only two will be invited to develop their products, and one will be given the kind of order that will take their business from small fry to big deal in one fell swoop.
CAFÉ CULTURE Interior Design Masters With Alan Carr, 8pm, BBC1 SWANSEA is the destination for a challenge that involves transforming a café. And just because we're at the seaside, don't expect the weather to be kind. The six remaining designers will be working in pairs, and will have to listen to what the owner wants. But one in particular can't resist putting his stamp all over it, just as he has every week, and on the sofa, it all gets rather heated.
FILM CHOICE Mary Queen Of Scots, 11.15pm, BBC2 (not N. Ireland) SAOIRSE RONAN plays Mary Stuart, whose cousin Elizabeth (Margot Robbie) sees her as a threat to her rule in this lavishly costumed historical drama. It's a tour de force from the two leads (pictured), and even imagines a tense meeting between them.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Tomb with a view.. like a building site; OPW criticised for state of vandalised cairn
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 10
Length: 316 words
Byline: Ian Begley
Body


GARISH gates and warning signs that have blocked public access to an ancient Neolithic burial site in response vandalism last year, have left the monument looking 'like a building site'.
One of the passage tombs in Carrowkeel, Co. Sligo, which is around 5,300 years old, was defaced by vandals in October last year.
A stone which formed the entrance of a cairn had been knocked over, while the interior walls of the farthest tomb had been scratched with graffiti.
In response, rusted crush barriers were placed across the entrances by the Office of Public Works (OPW). Numerous signs erected also state 'No entry', 'Danger - keep out' and 'Do not enter cairns'.
Anthony Murphy, a tour guide, author and curator of the website Mythical Ireland, said shutting off access to monuments en masse isn't the right response to vandalism. He told the Mail the gates and signage around the tombs are unsightly and unwelcoming for any visitor to the area.
'This is what you might call a very poor reaction to an incident of vandalism last autumn. The cairns at Carrowkeel are actually older than Newgrange and for years have been accessible, but this all changed after some vandals scratched symbols and other things on to the stones.
'I don't have an immediate solution, but we have to do better than putting gates and signs around the passage tombs. It's unsightly and makes the place look like a building site.
'Places like Carrowkeel and Loughcrew in Co. Meath, which was also subject to vandalism, aren't given enough protection and attention. I just think closing these sites is an appalling way to respond to vandalism. Where are the resources and staff, and why isn't the Government taking a better interest in these moments?'
In a recent statement, the OPW and National Monument Service said repair works are underway at Carrowkeel, which is a 'highly complex' task.
news@dailymail.ie
Unsightly and unwelcoming

Graphic


Grave concern: Anthony Murphy, left, and the cairn in Carrowkeel, Co. Sligo

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Tractor Boys dig deep and remain top of the table
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 53
Length: 561 words
Byline: DAVID KENT
Body


KIERAN McKenna hailed his comeback kings as Ipswich dug deep to seal a jaw-dropping 3-2 stoppage-time victory against Southampton to go back top of the Sky Bet Championship.
A pulsating Easter Monday clash at a packed Portman Road went down to the wire after Che Adams and Adam Armstrong had put Saints in the driving seat, having been hit by a Leif Davis' stunner.
Nathan Broadhead levelled for Ipswich and, after Southampton full-back James Bree was sent off, fellow substitute Jeremy Sarmiento snatched victory in the seventh and final minute of stoppage-time.
That goal sparked bedlam, sending Town back to the Championship summit as McKenna's men took their points tally from losing positions to a remarkable 31.
'It was right up there,' the Ipswich boss said. 'It was another brilliant day, brilliant match to be involved in.
'A really high level, fantastic performance. Both teams did so many good things and a great day to be involved in.
'Of course when you win it with the last-minute winner like that, it's a moment to really cherish.
Put to the former Manchester United coach that Fergie time is fast becoming McKenna time, he said with a laugh: 'It's a good habit. It doesn't happen by chance.
PW DL F AGDPts Ipswich .. .. .. .. 40 26 95 84 51 33 87 Leeds .. .. .. .. .. 40 26 86 75 31 44 86 Leicester. .. .. . .39 27 48 77 35 42 85 Southampton .3822 8 87651 2574 West Brom .. .. .40 19 11 10 62 39 23 68 Norwich. .. .. .. .40 19 7 14 72 58 14 64 Coventry .. .. .. .3916 12 11 63 46 17 60 Preston .. .. .. .. 39 178 14 52 55 -3 59 Middlesbro .. .. 40 17 7 16 56 53 3 58 Hull. .. .. .. .. .. . .3916 10 135451 3 58 Cardiff .. .. .. .. . .40 17 5 18 45 54 -9 56 Bristol City .. .. .40 15 8 17 44 45 -1 53 Sunderland .. . .40 15 6 19 51 50 1 51 Watford .. .. .. . .40 12 14 14 57 55 2 50 Swansea .. .. .. .40 12 11 17 49 60 -11 47 QPR .. .. .. .. .. .. 40 12 1018 39 51 -12 46 Blackburn .. .. .40 12 9 195666 -1045 Stoke .. .. .. .. . . .40 12 9 193854 -1645 Millwall .. .. .. .. 40 11 11 18 38 53 -15 44 Birmingham ...40 11 9 20 44 61 -17 42 Plymouth .. .. .. 40 10 11 19 55 65 -10 41 Huddersfield .. 40 8 1616 44 65 -21 40 Sheff Wed .. .. . .40 11 6 23 31 64 -33 39 Rotherham .. . .40 4 11 253281-4923 'I've spoken with that before, everyone knows that doesn't happen by chance and there's a lot of work goes into it but yeah, it's a great way to win again.'
Leeds United kept the pressure on the leaders with a late winning run themselves, Crysencio Summerville netting from an 88th minte penalty before Dan James made it 3-1 deep in injury time against Hull.
Southampton, meanwhile, were again left wondering what might have been.
Saints boss Russell Martin said: 'We were the best team, we didn't deserve to lose. We came here, we had 17 shots on goal. Five huge chances, we missed three. They had relatively little until late on.'
Earlier, Leicester boss Enzo Maresca admitted relief as his side completed a 3-1 victory over Norwich.
Maresca's side had to come from a goal down before making sure of a result which put them back on top of the table before the evening fixtures.
Norwich's Gabriel Sara opened the scoring before Kiernan Dewsbury-Hall, Stephy Mavididi and Jamie Vardy were on target for Leicester.
Maresca's relief came after a poor six-game run and he said: 'It was especially for the moment, because for different reasons, we didn't win so many games.'

Graphic


Bolt from the Blues: Nathan Broadhead nets for Ipswich

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Tragic Sarah stabbed to death by her boyfriend, say US police; Man brought 2 knives into bar, says witness
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 5
Length: 726 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


AN IRISHWOMAN stabbed to death in a New York bar was attacked by her boyfriend, according to reports in the US.
Sarah McNally, 41, was stabbed in the neck at the Céilí House pub, in Queens, on Saturday evening, with local police sources saying the assault was 'domestic' in nature.
Originally from Longford, Sarah moved to New York City around ten years ago but kept in regular contact with her friends and family back home.
After Ms McNally was stabbed, the man who attacked her then turned the blade on himself, local media reported.
'She was just standing there talking, her boyfriend came in and he just walked right in and stabbed her,' an unidentified female witness told the New York Post. 'Then he started trying to stab himself. Horrible. Just horrible.'
The suspect allegedly had a knife in each hand and was bleeding from self-inflicted wounds when police arrived.
Officers told him to drop his weapons and tasered him when he refused to comply. Both individuals were taken to NYC Health and Hospitals in Elmhurst in critical condition where McNally died from her injuries.
NYPD said the investigation remains ongoing and no arrests have been made. Ms McNally had reportedly been living with her boyfriend and had no history of domestic violence.
Mike Lambe, a 62-year-old who lives in the neighbourhood, told the New York Post Ms McNally was a 'sweet, innocent girl from Longford' who had worked at the bar for less than a year.
McNally's aunt Mary McNally wrote a touching post on Facebook which read: 'Rest in peace my beautiful niece Sarah, we are heart broken, love you always.'
Another aunt of Ms McNally, Margaret Gaffey, wrote: 'My beautiful niece taken too soon.'
Longford Municipal District Cathaoirleach Cllr Martin Monahan said: 'The people of Longford will be saddened and shocked by the sudden demise of a young life, someone who has made a life for herself in New York. For such a young life to be so tragically ended in such violent circumstances, our thoughts and prayers go out to the people in the
Queens area of New York that knew her and her mother and father in Longford as well as her extended family.'
Fianna Fáil TD for Longford- Westmeath, Joe Flaherty, described Ms McNally as a 'wonderful young woman, bright, vivacious, witty and charismatic', who went to the US 'full of hope', adding: 'By all accounts, it was a very happy life and everything was going well for her in New York, which makes this news all the more harrowing and upsetting for people that know her.
'I cannot imagine a worse call for a parent to get. It's truly traumatic and I understand her heartbroken mother is flying out to be with Sarah this morning and that's a journey that no parent wants to have to undertake,' he told RTÉ's News At One.
Longford councillor Seamus Butler said she had grown up in the county before moving to the USA several years ago.
'She grew up here, alright, and was a student of Scoil Mhuire there as well so there would be a lot of people in the area that knew her,' he said.
'It appears that she went over some years ago to live and that she had a partner over there. That's what we know anyway. I'd like to offer my condolences to her family and friends here.'
A spokesperson from the New York Police Department Deputy Commissioner for Public Information said: 'On Saturday, March 30, 2024, at approximately 18.34 hours, police responded to a 911 call for an assault in progress at 69-56 Grand Avenue within the confines of the 104 Precinct.
'Upon arrival (at the Ceilí House Irish pub on Grand Avenue in Maspeth), police observed a 41-year-old female with a stab wound to the neck and an unidentified male with a stab wound to the back and neck. EMS (emergency medical services) responded and transported both aided individuals to NYC Health and Hospitals/Elmhurst in critical condition. The 41-year-oldfemale was subsequently pronounced deceased. The investigation remains ongoing.'
Just last October, Denise Morgan, 39, a mother of one from Co. Louth, was found dead in Queens. Her partner Joed Taveras was found dead in the same property with a gun beside him.
Police responded to the location in Glendale after neighbours reported hearing shots fired.
Parish priest Sean Dooley expressed hope at the time her death would contribute to a better understanding of the 'scourge of domestic violence'.
'He just walked in and stabbed her'

Graphic


Horror: Police arrive at the Céilií House pub in QueensCharismatic: Sarah McNallyVivacious: Sarah McNally left Longford for New York

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



TRUST IN O'SHEA; Let interim Irish manager carry on, insists Duff 'Future and quality of Irish side will depend on LOI'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56,50
Length: 500 words
Byline: PHILIP QUINN
Body


AS the search for a new Republic of Ireland manager extends beyond Easter, Damien Duff believes John O'Shea should be left in charge.
Amid speculation that Gus Poyet has turned down the job, the Shelbourne boss feels the FAI could make the interim manager permanent.
'John O'Shea is there. He is a classy guy, has surrounded himself with a good background team. Why not leave him at it?' said Duff.
'I love the Irish international team the same as everyone else. I hope they do well. I hope John gets the job. If he doesn't, I hope the person comes in does a good job.'
'Gus (Poyet) turned it down. Or did he turn it down? I don't know.'
Duff, who was overlooked by the FAI headhunters, said he would 'be crazy to walk away' from Shelbourne, who drew 0-0 with Derry City at Tolka Park, for the Ireland job.
'I am so transfixed on the league. I love it. This has been the best two and a half years of my life TURN TO PAGE 50, COL 1
From Back Page and again people might say, "What is Duffer saying?" But I mean it. This has been amazing fun.
'I don't even know what to say about the international scene. It don't want it to come across that I am bashing it. I am not.'
'The grass is not always greener. I am surrounded by players I trust. Trust goes a long way with me. I work with a lot of quality people that I love, I trust, I care about it.
'I would be crazy to walk away from something like that, something
I love.' 'I adore football, I love my national team. Like I always say it's got to be "the league, the league, the league".
'The future and the quality of the Irish team in the next five, ten years is going to come from the league. I stand over what I said. Watching games, the bit that gives me hope and pleasure is watching the league, not the international break.
'I absolutely believe that a lot of football fans around the country were waiting for the league to come back and the international window to finish.'
Shels are unbeaten in eight games with Drogheda away on
Friday to complete the first series in the 2024 Premier Division season.
'Somebody asked me if I was surprised by our start, of course, not many teams win six in a row, it's an incredible stat. It's not the business end. Round one finishes on Friday and it's paramount we finish round one off well.
'We've a big points total that we need to get to. If we get to it, it's because we've won games.'
While the Shels camp was struck by a bug, the pock-marked Tolka pitch didn't help the game yesterday, 'It's an issue, yeah, it's poor. End of story. I'll cut it myself if I have to.
'My dad (Gerry), he bought a lovely ride-on five, ten years ago, it's still in good nick and he'd give it to me, I'll bring it down. I'll do anything to make this club a success.
'I'll do it. I'm not joking. I'll do anything.'
Duff saluted his players for battling through a bug.
'A few of the guys were in separate dressing rooms earlier, I'd to change the team a couple of times, squad, bench everything, so the effort they put in, they're absolutely heroes.'

Graphic


Table topper: Duff

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Two drivers an hour stopped by gardaí in Easter crackdown
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 6
Length: 588 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


TWO people every hour were stopped by gardaí for either drink or drug driving over the bank holiday weekend, in which another three people lost their lives on our roads.
There have been 58 fatalities on the country's roads so far in 2024 - a rate of 1.5 every day.
This is 16 more than in the same period in 2023, itself the worst year for a decade. Yesterday, gardaí released statistics on their weekend crackdown on drug and drink driving, with a sen- ior officer warning the detection rate was 'alarmingly high'.
Incoming Taoiseach Simon Harris echoed those words, and warned progress on safety made in recent years is in danger of being reversed. He intends to meet gardaí and the Road Safety Authority in the coming weeks in a bid to reduce the carnage.
In total, there were 140 people arrested for intoxicated driving over the weekend, gardaí said.
However, the operation was still ongoing last night and up-todate and complete figures are due to be published by gardaí this evening. The figures are on track to match or exceed the numbers who were detected for driving under the influence over the St Patrick's Day weekend.
In the course of that operation, 175 people were arrested for suspected drink or drug driving.
Inspector Padraig Sutton, from the Roads Policing Unit in Co.
Limerick, said the clampdown is a reminder 'that we are out there'. 'It's a trend which is a real concern for me and for my officers here in roads policing and community engagement units, and it's something we're doing everything we can to reverse,' he said.
Speaking to reporters yesterday, Mr Harris said he was 'very concerned about the trends we're seeing in relation to road deaths', adding: 'How could you not be?
'When we talk about road deaths and we talk about numbers and statistics... each of those numbers is a heartbroken family, is a lost life. I do think the gardaí have done an excellent job over the weekend. But we have seen an alarming, to use their word, number of arrests when it comes to people driving under the influence of either drink or drugs.
'I think we are at a real risk in this country of seeing a reversal of the very significant progress that has been made over many years in relation to road safety, and this will be a priority issue for me in the days ahead.'
Vakaris Gudaitis, 17, was among those who died on our roads at the weekend. He lost his life on Saturday after he was hit by a car on the N17 in Co. Mayo.
On Friday, pregnant mother-ofone Claire Kavanagh, 37, died after a crash on the N24 in Co.
Tipperary, and a cyclist in his 60s lost his life after he was knocked off his bike in Knocknagee, Co. Kildare, on Sunday morning.
Tributes have been paid to Vakaris, who was originally from Lithuania. He was a former pupil at St Colman's College in Claremorris, and the school released a statement on his death.
It wrote: 'It was with deep sadness that we learned about pastpupil Vakaris Gudaitis (17) who was fatally injured on Saturday night... Our thoughts and prayers are with the Gudaitis family at this very difficult time. May Vakaris rest in peace.'
These fatalities followed the deaths of Una Bowden, 47, and her daughters Ciara, 14, and Saoirse, ten, in a crash last Tuesday outside Claremorris, Co. Mayo.
Mrs Bowden's husband and the girls' father, David Bowden, had been abroad with the UN in Ethiopia when the tragedy happened. It is understood the crash victims had been travelling home from visiting Una's dad John Carlin in Raphoe, Co. Donegal.
garreth.macnamee@dailymail.ie
'Priority issue' for Harris

Graphic


Tragic: Vakaris GudaitisHeartbreak: Claire Kavanagh

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Underdog tag will be to our advantage; Carusa backs Irish in tough group
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 51
Length: 759 words
Byline: MARK GALLAGHER
Body


IRELAND striker Kyra Carusa will hope to draw on the experience of playing for HB Koge in the Champions League when facing into the team's Nations League Group of Death.
Eileen Gleeson's side will face three of the top five sides in the world in France, England and Sweden in Group A3, which also doubles as the qualifiers for Euro 2025 in Switzerland. It is a daunting task for Ireland, but Carusa has been in this position of being heavy underdogs before.
The Denmark champions were given a similarly difficult task in the group stages of the 2021-22 Champions League when they were drawn against Barcelona, then the holders, Arsenal and Hoffenheim. And while Koge lost all six matches, they did cause a few issues for their more vaunted opposition, only losing 2-0 at home to Barca.
And the 28-year-old forward, who has returned home to the
US to play with San Diego Wave, feels those matches in the Champions League has improved her overall game.
'I have grown a lot as a player,' she said. 'It doesn't happen overnight or I don't think it is something you can even necessarily pinpoint and say this game changed everything. But a lot of it happened when I started playing Champions League with my club in Denmark and we are drawn in a group with the likes of Hoffenheim, Arsenal and Katie [McCabe] and Barcelona. And you just think "well, it is the Champions League".
'But after playing those games, I became a very different player in a sense. I felt my shoulders pull back a bit more. Coming into the Irish team, you get luck sometimes. Certain styles are played, coaches favour you, coaches don't, but after that Champions League experience, I felt at the end of the day I know I'm good and I know what I can bring to the table.'
Carusa learned an awful lot about herself in those six games for HB Koge, even if some of the lessons were harsh at the time. And starting this Friday evening in Metz as they meet a very talented
France side, this campaign could also lead to this Irish team learning something about themselves.
'There is a sense that it could have been a different draw. But what would be the point in sitting here and wishing for different, it's been drawn.
'It is so competitive to get to the Euros and we always knew that no matter whatever team you're drawn, it's going to be the best of the best.
'This is the challenge before us but why not change the narrative and say that it is an exciting thing that we are playing these teams.'
Ireland's best performance in the last campaign was a 1-1 draw with Sweden in Gothenburg, while they also secured their World Cup playoff win against Scotland in Hampden
Park. So, this team have a recent history of performing when the odds are stacked against them and Carusa believes they should bring that mentality into the daunting task that awaits them in Metz.
'I think in terms of where we are from playing those games to now, I think we have developed a lot as a team in terms of our confidence and ability, the difference-makers that we have. You could see with the top nations at the World Cup they have those players who can change a game for them, score winners and that's something that we're incorporating more.
'A huge part of it is having the confidence that you know you can win a game like that. You know Ireland, we are always difficult to beat. When we got the draw, my Swedish team-mates looked at me and it was 'honestly, anyone but you guys'. Because they know, we've been in competition with them recently, no one wants to have to play us. That's such a huge advantage to us, but also we have the ability to win a game like that. We have the quality and the belief that we can score a goal and that we have the difference-makers.'
And Carusa is developing into one of those big-game performers. From her thankless task during the World Cup last summer, when she looked isolated at times in ploughing a lone furrow up front, she had a lot more support in the last Nations League campaign, from the more advanced Denise O'Sullivan and Katie McCabe and from the likes of Lucy Quinn. She doesn't cut a lonely figure at the top of the Irish attack any more.
Friday might call for more of what Carusa had to do in the past, though.
Rolling up her sleeves and the blue-collar work of holding the ball up, acting as a valve to release the pressure. But if a chance does fall her way, the San Diego native is confident of taking it. That is how she has grown as a footballer - and there will be more growth over the six games in this Group of Death.
"We have the quality and belief to score goals"

Graphic


Control: Kyra Carusa of Ireland takes on Wales' Josie Green

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Waiting lists discouraging those with cancer symptoms; People urged to avail of BowelScreen or visit GP if any signs of disease materialise
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 19
Length: 587 words
Byline: Helen Bruce
Body


ONE in three people with symptoms of bowel cancer are putting off going to their GP because they are worried about long waiting lists, a study has found.
The Irish Cancer Society (ICS) survey, carried out by Core Research, also found that one in three has not made a medical appointment because they do not think their symptoms are serious enough.
One in four is putting off a hospital or GP visit due to the expense, the study revealed.
At the start of Bowel Cancer Awareness Month, the ICS warned that around 2,500 people will be diagnosed with bowel cancer each year and that it is the second most common cause of cancer-related death in Ireland.
Bowel cancer patient Jennifer Deegan, 48, has urged anyone with signs to seek help immediately.
'Before I was diagnosed, I was one of many my age, and younger, who were not aware of the signs and symptoms of bowel cancer - many of which only show at a later stage,' she said.
'I want people to hear my story and think "this could be me" and to get themselves checked out at once if they notice anything out of the ordinary - my persistence is what has saved my life.'
Dr Gráinne O'Kane, consultant medical oncologist at Trinity St James's Cancer Research Institute, said: 'It's really concerning that there are people sitting at home with persistent symptoms of bowel cancer and are putting off going to their GP.
'My message is very clear: although most of the time these symptoms can be caused by other conditions, it's so important to get checked out.'
She said oncologists were particularly worried about the significant increase in bowel cancer in people under 50 around the world. 'So no matter what your age, the sooner you are seen by a doctor, if you have symptoms, the better treatment options and outcomes,' she added.
Bowel screening is available for anyone aged between 59 and 69. Those over 60 account for three in four diagnoses of bowel cancer.
Mary Kennedy, from Castleknock in Dublin, had her bowel cancer detected when she took her first test aged 61.
She said: 'I want to shout about BowelScreen from the rooftops.
'I had no symptoms, I was walking, swimming and enjoying my retirement. I wasn't losing weight or fatigued and I didn't see blood when I went to the loo. I had keyhole surgery to remove the cancer and, thankfully, I didn't need further treatment.'
She said she 'got the all-clear three-and-a-half months after my first BowelScreen test', adding: 'Even though I had cancer I feel so lucky. I'm so glad I chose to take the BowelScreen test, and my cancer was discovered early.'
The HSE said people can register online at www.Bowelscreen.ie to find out more and take part. The testing kit test is sent to your home, and is then posted back to BowelScreen in a plain freepost envelope. The results are then sent out within four weeks.
Professor Padraic MacMathuna, clinical director of BowelScreen, said: 'For the majority of people the FIT [faecal immunochemical test] kit will be the only test needed. About 4% of people are referred for a follow-up colonoscopy. This is where we look for and remove pre-cancerous changes, called polyps, from the lining of the bowel. We know that most bowel cancers develop from polyps so by doing this we can prevent cancer.'
Signs and symptoms of bowel cancer include: a lasting change in your bowel habit, blood in your stools or bleeding from your back passage, a lump in your tummy area or rectum, or pain or discomfort in your tummy area or back passage.
helen.bruce@dailymail.ie
'I'm so glad I chose to take the test'

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



We look like April fools; Irish football a laughing stock as sorry saga drags on COMMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 52
Length: 903 words
Byline: Philip quinn
Body


THE 'tip-off' yesterday from a reliable contact in German football was akin to a thunderbolt.
'Jurgen Klopp is to become the next manager of the Republic of Ireland. It will be announced by the FA of Ireland later this month. Ignore all the other noise,' he said.
As I scrambled to make sense of the sensational news, my friend provided context.
He told me how Klopp, exhausted by his club demands, had been assessing his options since revealing on January 26 he would leave Liverpool at the end of the season.
The part-time aspect of international football greatly appeals to him, he said.
Also, he continued, he's from Stuttgart, and the impressions made by the Irish supporters there in the finals of Euro 1988 have never left him.
'He feels an affinity to Ireland. He saw Whelan, Houghton and Aldridge, play against England that day in the Neckerstadion and has been obsessed with the deep Liverpool-Ireland connection,' he added.
Aware the FAI was searching for a new manager, Klopp discreetly reached out via an intermediary and made himself available, but not until June 1, according to my source.
'Jurgen is planning for his final game as Liverpool manager to be in Dublin on May 22 for the Europa League final. It's the perfect stage for 'auf wiedersehen und willkommen', said my friend.
'He is excited about leading your boys out against England in the Nations League in September. He believes Ireland would be perfect for him to begin the next phase of his career.'
But the FAI is broke, it couldn't possible afford Klopp, I blurted.
'Don't worry.
Jurgen is not motivated by money. The FA of Ireland told him they had a new sponsor and could offer a performance-related deal. All is in place.'
Alles ist fertig. My Leaving Cert German came back to me briefly. I was stunned.
Jurgen for Ireland. Not Carsley, not Poyet, not Sagnol, not Keano, but Klopp. The big, bearded Bavarian with the charismatic personality and a star-studded CV.
Of course, in all the excitement, it took me a while to remember the day that was in it.
A day for pranks and wind-ups - after a weekend of revelations with more red herrings than a morning haul in Howth.
The words from the Paul Simon song, 50 Ways To Leave Your Lover keep coming into my head, tweaked for Irish managers past, and possibly future, too.
'You just slip out the back, Jack Make a new plan, Stan,
You don't need to be coy, Roy Just get yourself free Hop on the bus, Gus
You don't need to discuss much Just drop off the key, Lee And get yourself free.' I've long felt Gus Poyet was stringing the FAI along, using them as leverage for a new deal with the Greeks.
Also, I couldn't fathom why the FAI would offer Poyet a deal that hinged on Greece losing their Euro 2024 play-off?
Would any top club, or any leading football association, offer a manager's job to someone on the condition that they lose a game? Surely, not.
And the same applied to Georgia coach Willie Sagnol, or 'Willie Spag Bol' as I heard him called over the weekend.
Was the FAI really waiting on the outcome of that play-off before a grand announcement? Talk about putting your Easter eggs into one basket.
I'd always felt Lee Carsley held 'the key' for the job but he stayed loyal to the England Under 21s, where he's under contract.
With 'Geezer' out of the running and Poyet hopping on the bus, I felt it was time for the FAI to stop being coy about Roy.
Firstly, the man is a legend in football. Secondly, he's available. And thirdly, he wants the job. He would shake up the dressing room with his presence alone.
And yet, the FAI's head-hunters, ruled him out while waiting for Gus, or maybe Willie, to alight at Lansdowne Road and have their ticket punched walking into the Aviva Stadium.
I awoke yesterday feeling rather weary about the lengthy process to find a new manager, and a little disillusioned, too.
In my mind, the Poyet retreat pushed John O'Shea, decent skin and interim boss recently, to the fore.
Only a thought nagged at me. Would the FAI go for O'Shea, who wasn't on its master interview sheet, and has two games on his managerial CV.
Keano has a lot more than that and he also had three chats with the FAI about the job. Keano, with O'Shea, Brian Kerr and Co too. I liked the thought of that.
But that had all changed after the morning phone call. After my friend's astonishing news about Klopp, I put on the kettle for a badly needed cup of tea.
Waiting for it to boil, It struck me how the FAI so often made a mess of appointing a manager. Bob Paisley was supposed to get the job over Jack Charlton.
Paddy Mulligan lost out narrowly to Eoin Hand because an FAI blazer thought Mulligan had once thrown a bun at him on a bus on an away trip.
Kevin Moran missed out to Mick McCarthy in 1996 because one of the selection committee didn't turn up for the vote.
As for the 2018 succession stakes, with McCarthy back to hold the fort until Stephen Kenny followed him, that was a cockamamie idea by the FAI to beat them all.
Yet, here they were, after all that's gone on, about to land the catch of all time in Klopp.
What was it Fergie said back in 1999? Oh yeah, football eh, bloody hell.
I wondered how long it has been since Stephen Kenny departed and checked the calendar on the kitchen wall.
Kenny left on November 22, all of 131 days ago, through November, December, January, February, March until yesterday, April 1.
We look like the ultimate April fools.
The FAI has so often made a mess of hiring a new manager

Graphic


Red Herring: Liverpool boss Jurgen Klopp

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



What DID they do to my boy?; Mail writer Christopher Stevens' son David is so severely autistic he had to go into residential care at 13. But after his home was taken over by private equity, standards went through the floor. Soon he was covered in livid bruises, being fed Haribo for breakfast and chips and crisps for lunch - and even sleeping in the garden. His father's devastating account of his fight to protect him will fill you with anger and despair
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 26,31,32
Length: 2550 words
Body


THIS is the stuff of nightmares.
Blood on the walls. rotting food trodden into the floor. Torn bedding and dirty toilets. Over-flowing bins. Broken furniture. The sound of shrieking and sobbing.
My adult son had to exist in this sheer squalor for a nightmare year. The care home on the outskirts of Cardiff where he had lived for eight years descended into hellish conditions that defied belief.
My wife Nicola and I made ceaseless, desperate efforts to rescue our son and restore
good care. Yet his situation remained so horrific that for many months we lived in dread and expectation of a phone call to tell us that he had died.
Even if this was an isolated case, it would be disturbing. But it is far from unique.
what happened to our son is a direct result of a broken care system.
Nationwide, migrant workers with little training, less English and no motivation are increasingly being employed on contracts below the minimum wage, while managers are rewarded for undercutting budgets.
Conscientious staff are undervalued and overworked, and all too often leave, exhausted
and disillusioned. Any who speak out risk being dismissed and silenced.
David is 27 and profoundly autistic. he is unable to use language with much meaning - he can't tell you where he has a pain, or answer any basic question such as, 'what did you do today?' Though he can parrot words, he doesn't really understand what they mean.
Despite this, he has always been a happy, affectionate young man. he's sweet-natured with a mischievous sense of humour, and a passion for Disney VhS videos. But he has no sense of danger and, after a series of serious incidents as a child, including a house fire, he could no longer safely remain at home. After five years at a residential school from the age of 13, he moved to adult care in 2015, at a home called the Old Vicarage in Cardiff.
when he arrived, the facility was run by Orbis Education and Care, a small independent company. At first the care was excellent, but the
Old Vicarage was bought up in 2017 by a private equity investment company, August Equity, and the turnover in management was frequent.
W
E wErE assured that this would have no significant effect on the day-to-day running of the home, but it gradually became apparent that increased pressure on budgets was having a disastrous impact.
Many of the longer-serving carers left, some of them telling us that working conditions were becoming unbearable. we saw an increased reliance on temporary staff from agencies who had little time to get to know our son or understand his needs.
David kept his spirits up, even during the upheaval of Covid. But his behaviour changed completely in September 2021, when he began to self-harm violently - smashing his head against walls, windows, lampposts and other hard objects.
The head-banging was so hard and frequent that thick layers of contusion built up on his forehead. At the back of his head, the hair was worn away from repeated blows, and the skin was split, bleeding daily.
Previous limited instances of self-harm had only ever indicated pain, such as toothache - it isn't
normal behaviour for David, and it isn't 'caused' by autism.
we assumed he was in pain
again, but repeated medical examinations and even a brain scan could find nothing physically wrong with him - and David was unable to tell us what was
upsetting him so badly.
But after a visit to our home the next month, the intensity of his headbanging was worse than we had ever seen.
It erupted as he left. with his carer in the driving seat and David in the back of the car, he
started smashing his skull against the rear window so hard that the whole door buckled outwards.
Less than an hour later, two police officers knocked on our front door. My first thought, when I saw the uniforms, was that there must have been a crash.
In fact, a member of the public had cal led 999 to report a suspected abduction involving David's car (a Motability vehicle registered to our address).
while the car was stopped at traf f ic l ights, our son was screaming in the back seat,
thrashing his head and feet against the windows. A passer-by assumed David was fighting to get out and escape.
The headbanging continued for months, and a psychiatrist employed by Orbis recommended doses of lorazepam, a heavy-duty tranquilliser, to be given as required. This was in addition to a cocktail of other drugs, administered to manage his behaviour rather than to understand it.
The more heavily he was sedated, the more confused he became, and the bouts of headbanging could last for three hours or more.
He began sobbing uncontrollably
in the mornings, fat tears rolling down his face. This was something he had never done before.
One carer who had known him for years, and who was deeply distressed to see him like this, witnessed David having a fit or panic attack that left him trembling all over.
Two years on, we can quote the health watchdog guidel ines: 'Abuse should always be considered as a cause of unexplained emotional or behavioural change.' Al l behaviour is a form of
communication - and David's behaviour was unlike anything he
had shown in his life before.
It was now that bruises began to appear all over his body. By the summer of 2022, we were seeing purple marks that lingered for weeks on the back of his legs and his upper arms.
He was covered in bruises - what looked like grip marks up and down his arms, and shoe prints on his legs. When we begged to be told what was happening to him, we were invariably told these were self-harm injuries. David was certainly self-harming, by banging his head, though we never saw him pinch or grip himself, or stamp on his own legs.
We asked whether David was being restrained - held down, for example, in the prone position by two staf f - and we wer e repeatedly assured that this never happened (though a BBC report in June 2021 had made allegations of prone restraint at another Orbis home, with the online headl ine 'Whist leblowers claim children with autism "abused" at care home').
Searching for answers, we pleaded for outside assistance. Social services, who had funded the placement from the beginning, refused to take any interest in him. After much urging and intervention, specialist nurses and therapists were assigned.
But by now, David was almost catatonic - sleeping all day, awake but hiding in his bed or bathroom during the day. And then it got worse.
A new manager was appointed, and the standards of care became at rocious. David appeared unwashed and unshaven. His bedding was rags, with a pillow that had been torn open and shredded, though not by David. According to daily diet sheets that we obtained later, he was being given Haribo sweets and fries for breakfast and lunch.
E
very day staff recorded what David was given to eat and drink. This was called 'my food and fluid record'. On one typical Wednesday in July 2 0 2 2 , the r e cord shows :
'Breakfast- 1x jam tart, 1x rolos, 1x Haribos, 4x Jaf fa Cakes. Lunch - 2x fries, 2x Quavers, 2x cookies. Dinner - 2x fries, 2x jam tarts, 3x Jaffa Cakes. Supper - declined. Fluid throughout the day: 1x mi lkshake, 2x Fruit Shoots, 5x squash.'
After repeated requests from staff for 'pocket money' for David, we asked to see the accounts. Our son's own money had been used to buy bedding, apparently for other residents, including a pillow that supposedly cost £50 ((EURO)58).
When we visited, we often found a staff member sitting idle outside his bedroom door. The filth inside
the room was indescribable. Some communication aids, the symbols on walls that help David understand the daily routine, were defaced - horns and a moustache drawn on one photo, for instance.
At the same time, the unexplained injuries were getting worse. We tried to photograph them, but David had recently become very distressed when a phone camera was pointed at him.
Of course, he isn't able to explain why this was so upsetting. On one occasion, we did manage to take a picture of what looked like a shoeshaped bruise on the back of his badly contused legs. We also took pictures of livid little bruises in pairs, the size of grapes, on his arms and abdomen.
On another visit, my wife Nicky noticed David was limping badly. She pointed this out to the manager, who told her: 'David has always walked like that.'
When we insisted on a medical examination, the GP diagnosed heavy bruising or a possible bone fracture in the upper groin area. Again, we were assured this had been sustained during a bout of self-harm.
N
OW Da v id be g a n shutting himself in his bathroom for days on end. Staff responded by using the toilet as a table, placing food and drink on the lid and leaving it there. Spillages were left untouched for days. The toilet itself was sometimes in a foul state.
He beat his forehead until it bled, leaving rows of bloodstains al l around the wal ls of his
bedroom. These remained there for many weeks because, in spite of our constant complaints, no one saw fit to wash them off or paint over them.
One visiting occupational therapist observed that David was physically inactive almost all the time, and left the house for only 1 per cent of the time. His weight ballooned by more than 40lb. Previously, he was active and fit, with daily outings - shopping, swimming, walks, even horse riding.
But however much we pleaded for better care, we were met with indifference, excuses and an increasingly hostile attitude. Another manager was appointed, yet standards remained atrocious.
We sent photos of the squalor to senior executives at August equity, the private equity company that owned the home. That did bring a reaction: an investigation by the Orbis ' independent qual ity adviser', Alan rosenbach.
I did not think his findings could be called 'independent', since they were submitted to both the Orbis senior management and the August equity board members before we were able to see them.
Among his conclusions were cautious admissions that 'there had been erroneous use of David's funds due to failure to follow policies arising from a lack of training and oversight' and 'the care and support for David and
TURN TO NEXT PAGE
from previous page the management of his environment has at times fallen short of acceptable standards'.
The CEO of Orbis at the time, Suzanne Lawrence, also wrote to offer 'sincere apologies' and to accept responsibility: 'I am 100 per cent accountable for each and every instance where care has fallen short within Orbis,' she stated.
Standards of hygiene, she admitted, were 'clearly unacceptable and would not have been tolerated by us in our own homes and therefore should not have been in David's home'.
By now we were searching constantly for an alternative home that could meet David's needs. One seemed promising but fell through. Others were too far away. We visit David weekly at least, and frequently more often than that. We wanted him closer to home, not further away.
We continued to hope that we could force improvements. We made multiple allegations
to the council safeguarding team that David was suffering poor care and neglect, documented by multiple images.
But then a truly chilling fact became plain.
On the rare occasions that David left the home, he was willing to walk or drive away from it - but his protests on the way back to the house were frantic and desperate.
After a trip to the dentist, he refused to leave the clinic for hours. Back at the house, he wedged himself into the car and would not come out. Then he began lying down in the care home's back garden, clinging to the large wooden swing and screaming if staff tried to move him.
David was terrified of going into the Old Vicarage building. He couldn't tell us why, but he was doing everything possible to make people understand. Shortly before Christmas 2022, we sought advice about his bruises from his GP, who advised us to call the police and the safeguarding services.
On Christmas Eve, we were contacted by
the safeguarding team, asking if we wanted to remove David immediately, that night, but no suitable alternative placement was available.
Orbis's own 'positive behaviour support' care plan emphasised that David was not to be manhandled or physically restrained. Despite this, one junior staff member was alarmed to see a male carer, senior to her, seize David by the upper arms and push him backwards across a room. She phoned the Old Vicarage manager who came in, on her day off.
The end result was that the male carer was exonerated but told, at our insistence, not to work with David again. The female carer left Orbis shortly afterwards.
While Newport police investigated our fears, David spent almost every day and many whole nights curled up on that swing in the garden,
rather than consent to go into the care home. He was subject to constant sedation, with doses of the tranquilliser lorazepam administered up to three times daily.
Despite this, if he had to go inside the house, he headbanged with such force that we were afraid he mi g h t f r a c t u r e h i s s k u l l Consequently, a 'best interests' meeting decided it was safer for him to remain outside, even at night in sub-zero temperatures.
A
tent was erected over the frame of the swing. Conditions inside were as squalid as they had been in his bathroom. On one occasion we found food and soiled clothes scattered inside and outside the tent, and a plate smeared with mud - while two temporary staff members sat in a nearby wooden hut, looking at their phones. They ignored us and appeared not to understand us when we addressed them.
By the end of February, Orbis managers served notice on David. They claimed their relationship with us, David's parents, had broken down. We were told that, by involving
the police, we were upsetting staff, and were given four weeks to find a new placement for David - despite Alan Rosenbach's written assurance to us, less than three months earlier, that there was 'no intention of serving notice' on our son.
This appears common in the care sector. Relatives are often too afraid to complain about poor standards, for fear that their loved one will be evicted.
Thanks to diligent efforts by nurses, therapists and commissioners, whom we cannot thank and praise enough, another placement was found for David. He transferred there at the end of June 2023, and the staff at his new home have made extraordinary efforts to win his trust and help him to feel safe.
The police were unable to find any conclusive proof that David had been physically abused.
Orbis have always strenuously denied that he was subject to physical restraint or abuse, and insisted that all the bruising on his body was due to self-harm.
David will never be able to tell us what was really happening. All we know is that, literally from the day
he arrived at his new home, there have been no new bruises. The grip marks on his arms, the black-andblue discoloration on his legs, the livid little bruises like pinch marks around his stomach, all vanished and have not returned.
Our son is being patiently nursed back to health in a setting that truly deserves to be called a 'care home'. His cheerful, affectionate, mischievous character is re-emerging and he is happily enjoying a range of activities.
Some mornings, though, he wakes up screaming and shaking.
The carers talk to him and comfort him until he calms down. They believe he is having nightmares.

Graphic


Ordeal: Some of the unexplained bruises David's parents found all over his body, and the bathroom he refused to leave for daysAffectionate: A young David with his dad Christopher

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Why Geri's pool plans have sent some locals off at the deep end; They try to keep villagers onside with Fortnum & Mason hampers, but the Horners' latest grand design is ruffling feathers
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 14,15
Length: 2043 words
Byline: Sarah Rainey; Ross Slater
Body


THERE are fewer than 200 residents in this picturesque parish in rural Northamptonshire in England, where the gardens of thatched cottages are blooming with spring snowdrops and primroses.
There is no pub, no shop, no village post office; just a winding country road along which you'll meet an occasional local walking their dog or riding their horse.
If you're really lucky (a sentiment not every villager shares), you might come across the parish's very own celebrity: the former Spice Girl Geri Halliwell, who keeps 14 horses at her sprawling farmhouse in the village.
Geri, 51, and her husband Christian Horner, 50, the boss of the Red Bull Formula 1 team, own a Grade II-listed former vicarage worth (EURO)1.9million in this idyllic spot, and have been splitting their time between this property, a home in North London and another pile in Hertfordshire for almost a decade.
Christian bought it in the 2000s and today it's a country retreat for their blended family: he, Geri, their seven-year-old son, Monty, Christian's daughter Olivia, ten, and Geri's daughter Bluebell, 18.
The singer's social media portrays an enviably wholesome and bucolic family life here: Geri is pictured tending to the horses, goats and donkeys; cuddling her chickens; knocking up a peach crumble in the Aga; and even honing her skills on a vintage sewing machine.
But beyond the wrought-iron gates and stone walls that protect the property from prying eyes, it's a somewhat different story.
Not only has the couple's marriage been under intense scrutiny after a tumultuous few months in which Christian was accused - and subsequently cleared - of 'inappropriate behaviour' towards a female employee (who is appealing the decision), but now a spat with their neighbours is threatening to blight their tranquil country existence.
At the root of it all is a planning application, in which the pair propose to build an outdoor swimming pool - 40ft by 16ft, with a deep end of 6ft - in the grounds of their country home, along with a fountain, decorative topiary and surrounding sun-loungers.
The plans, drawn up by Oxfordbased Riach Architects, went under the radar when they were lodged on January 2, days after Christian had been named in the UK's New Year Honours List for services to motor sport.
They were accompanied by letters of support from the parish council and conservation office.
But a series of strongly worded objections from irate neighbours has since appeared on the local council website, suggesting that not everyone is quite so content for the Horners' lavish plans to go ahead.
The main bone of contention is the location of the proposed pool, which would be just over the boundary wall and directly across the road from the 13thcentury church and graveyard.
'It would be the height of disrespect to be standing in the churchyard during an internment, to be distracted by screaming, shouting and splashing from a short distance away,' writes one objector.
'This is a tiny but particularly beautiful village in a rural community with its own cricket team. I request that the peace of the area is preserved as it is now, so that locals and visitors can continue to enjoy a village that they chose for its beauty and peacefulness.'
Another angry neighbour writes: 'This end of the village is a conservation area and buildings are listed. It has historically been a peaceful and quiet part of the village.'
This local also objects to the installation of a red telephone box, which the Horners reportedly had winched into their garden last year.
'[It is] visible over the wall and can be seen from the road,' the complaint reads. 'It is out of place and its colour does not fail to catch the eye.'
Of course, some will regard all this as ocean-going Nimbyism and mean-spirited nit-picking.
But village gossip is a virulent thing and there is little else on the lips of locals this week.
After all, it is not often that controversy comes to roost in this serene spot - far less one that makes national headlines.
Though their names have been redacted on the council website, the Mail tracked down one of the objectors to the Horners' swimming pool plan and spoke to them at their home.
'They do whatever they like,' the villager (who didn't want to be named) says of Geri and her husband, whom she married in 2015.
'They replaced a lean-to with a giant greenhouse and now they want a swimming pool on the other side of the wall.
'They have so much land where they could put it, but they chose to put it as close to their neighbours and the church as they could go. There will be noise pollution from the pump to heat the pool and noise pollution from people jumping in and out, [as well as] children screaming. We don't want that.
'When everyone else in the village has plans to float, they have to put up a notice [outside the property] announcing their intention and keep it up for six weeks.
'I have not seen the Horners do that. We actually found the planning officer doing this for them - sticking the notice about the swimming pool to a telegraph pole.'
One might think that Geri and
Christian would be adept at navigating the planning process by now.
After all, Christian has made no fewer than 38 planning applications for the property and its gardens since 2007, including building a tennis court, an orangery and indoor swimming pool.
Since Geri moved in, there have been another five. In 17 years, only one - an application to build a dry-stone wall in place of a fence - has been refused.
The neighbour whom the Mail spoke to this week alleges there is 'favouritism' being shown by the council towards the celebrity couple.
'I rang up the planning officer who happened to tell me he was a petrolhead and a massive fan of Formula 1,' they said.
'We know people in the village who have made small alterations to their gardens and had to jump through hoops to get approval from the council.
'In some cases it takes 18 months, but when the Horners do anything it is waved through in a matter of weeks, even if it is retrospective approval.'
The villager insists they used to have a good relationship with Geri and Christian, but things have soured due to the couple's 'disrespect' of the area.
When the family are in residence (for weeks at a time, mostly during school holidays), there are often large gatherings which have rubbed some locals up the wrong way.
There was an opulent party for Geri's 50th birthday in 2022, and the couple host one to mark the British Grand Prix every year - after all, Silverstone is not too far away.
Others report seeing helicopters landing on or near the property. In 2022, the couple enjoyed a 'date night' helicopter flight to the Glastonbury Festival. Though they may not live there permanently, their presence seems hard to miss.
'They have floodlights on every corner of the house and it obliterates the night sky,' one neighbour complains. 'It's like Colditz.
'As a keen astronomer, I can tell you there are no stars to be seen when they are at home.'
Not everyone feels quite so hostile towards their starriest residents, however.
Indeed, amid a chorus of birdsong and the distant hum of mowers on a spring afternoon in the village this week, there were plenty of residents willing to voice their support - and give their names to the Mail.
Ina Fox, 45, a brand strategist who lives down the road from the Horners, says the complainants are simply 'jealous'.
'If they want to improve their home and make it better and build something to give them pleasure, then what is the problem?' she asks.
'They are preserving an old building and adding to it for future generations.
'I have been in the village for six years and I don't know if there has been a funeral in that time, so the chances of their swimming pool disrupting one seems very slim to me.'
Neighbour Camilla Arthur, 60, agrees. 'I have found them to be very friendly,' she says.
'I've been round for supper. They are absolutely lovely. I can't believe anyone has complained. It's not like they are proposing a 50-metre pool that will be seen from far and www.wide.No one will know this is there.
'And this is Britain - there will probably be only five days in the year when you'd want to use an outdoor pool.'
Another neighbour, a 41-yearold woman who didn't want to be named, describes Geri and Christian as 'simply the best neighbours that you could wish to have'.
'They are very thoughtful people,' she adds. 'They turn up at all the village celebrations and show their faces - they don't have to do that.
'When they do throw parties, they give hampers from Fortnum & Mason to all the near neighbours to compensate for any noise.'
A resident of a Jacobean mansion on the other side of the church, owned by descendants of the Duke of Wellington, brands the planning objections 'absolute nonsense'.
'There are four other outdoor swimming pools in the village, and ours is only 20 yards from the church door - even closer than the Horners',' he says.
'My children play in it every day in the summer and we've never had any issue with noise.'
Of his famous neighbours, he insists: 'I have never heard a bad word from anyone in the village about them.
'This is their second home ... they are good, community people and very friendly.'
But this isn't the first time Geri and Christian have found themselves on the wrong side of some locals as they renovate their house - something Christian has described as his 'hobby'.
In 2022, they made headlines after they built a barn for Geri's horses, for which the council granted part-retrospective planning permission - despite, villagers alleged, staunch opposition. The barn, which replaced a previous structure, was described in letters of complaint to the council as 'hideous' and was said to obstruct mobile phone signals in the area.
Neighbours claimed the couple had re-routed public footpaths to suit their needs, installed gates that were out of keeping with the approved style, and described their horses as 'a menace on the footpaths to the public'.
Then, as now, the council was accused of showing 'favouritism' towards the Horners.
One resident asked, in a letter of complaint: 'What is it with this council - do they cave in to the rich because they don't have money to fight them in court?'
Another said: 'Don't the council care of the favouritism being shown to the wealthy here? Unacceptable.'
The former Ginger Spice is not unfamiliar with these sorts of accusations.
In 2007, before she met Christian, she had a fallout with residents of her leafy London street after building a 12ft brick wall around her (EURO)4.7 million house.
She had planning permission for the structure, but locals were up in arms, describing it as a 'monstrosity' that made her house 'look like a prison'.
Perhaps, having been through all this before, planning objections - and the accompanying local furore - are just water under the bridge.
After all, having a celebrity couple, with a reported joint fortune of (EURO)58 million, among your inhabitants can be no bad thing for a small parish like this.
Villager numbers have fallen by 10% since a 2001 census - and there's no draw like that of an A-lister in residence, particularly one prepared to spend, spend, spend.
There are no costs listed in the latest plans, but the average fee for building an outdoor swimming pool is up to (EURO)175,000 - surely a boon for local trade and construction companies.
The overseeing council said it was unable to make detailed comments on an ongoing application, but that all relevant factors would be considered before making a decision.
A spokesperson added: 'All planning applications are assessed and determined on their own merits in line with local planning policy.'
Riach Architects did not respond to requests for comment, nor did representatives of Geri or Christian Horner. To date, they have not spoken about the plans.
With the gates of the Horner house firmly shut last week, the couple did not appear to be at home - although, they may yet make an appearance in the coming days.
If they do drop by, locals will be eagerly awaiting an update on the swimming pool furore - and perhaps a delivery of one of those posh hampers to make up for all the fuss.
'Simply the best neighbours you could wish for' 'Other people have to jump through hoops' Some will see the complaints as mean- spirited

Graphic


Picture: MIKE MARSLAND/WIREIMAGEMaking a splash: Geri and Christian Horner and their home at the centre of the pool row

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



WHY YOU STILL HAVE nightmares about exams EVEN LONG AFTER YOU'VE LEFT SCHOOL; …and the trick to interpreting your most troubling dreams - as revealed by an eminent brain surgeon
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 16,17
Length: 2281 words
Byline: RAHUL JANDIAL
Body


WHO knew that nightmares could be passed down the generations, as neurosurgeon Professor Rahul Jandial explained in yesterday's Mail Here, in the final part of his engrossing series, he reveals how dreams inspired not just Salvador Dali, but the invention of the sewing machine ... DREAMING is often dismissed as irrelevant and unimportant because it occurs while you're asleep or lacks the logic that guides you during waking hours.
But that is a huge mistake. We should see dreams as a different form of thinking. Each night, the brain - from which our consciousness and self-awareness arise - liberates us from the constraints of habit and the limits of our daily existence.
When we dream we are in a world completely of our own making, so much so that we are never more alive than when we're dreaming. As our imaginations are driven to an intensity not possible during our waking life, our minds pulse with cerebral activity: seeing vividly, feeling deeply, moving freely.
And the very wildness of dreams gives them the potential to be transformative. Dreaming gives us the mental capacity to improve the versatility of our thinking, emotions and instincts.
It can help us solve a problem; learn a musical instrument, a language or a dance move; practise a sport; give us clues about our health; and make predictions about the future.
Above all, dreams can offer the great gift of self-knowledge, giving us insights we wouldn't otherwise discover and helping us explore our emotional life in new and profound ways.
Some dreams, I must admit, are not worth trying to interpret. In my research, I break down dreams into five manageable categories, beginning with unemotional dreams. These are the ones to which you attach little or no emotion - the ones that don't stir you or have any lasting effect, and in my opinion the introspection needed to interpret them is not worth the effort.
Then there are overt dreams where the meaning doesn't take much working out. If you're taking a test the following day and you dream the alarm didn't go off, that's down to stress about the exam. The same goes for dreaming about giving a speech naked or missing an important flight, when both are impending events in your waking life.
Genre dreams are tied to profound life changes, such as pregnancy and death. Pregnant women report communicating with their baby in their dreams, even of the baby announcing its name to its mother. For the dying, dreams of dead family members, pets or other members of the family are common. They can be very comforting. A woman in a hospice dreamed of her dead sister sitting beside her bed. A man nearing death dreamed of his long-dead mother soothing him and saying: 'I love you.' He could even smell her perfume.
However, interpretation gets more complicated with universal dreams, such as nightmares and erotic dreams, which we all experience at some time in our lives.
Nightmares often reflect anxiety and depression, whereas erotic dreams are the product of the imagination unleashed without judgment. Crucially, infidelity dreams do not signal unhappiness in a relationship, nor do they necessarily suggest an attraction to the focus of your dream's desires. But the category of dreams that matter most are the emotional ones. These have a coherent narrative and a distinct central image and are the richest source of insight, providing a portal to your deepest psychological world.
All of us have awoken sad, anxious or elated after a particularly moving dream. Maybe we've awoken thinking about the dream, or find ourselves reliving it during the quiet moments of the day. Dreams like this may be impossible to ignore. They demand an attempt at interpretation.
To go about this, you first need to remember your dream in some detail, which is not always easy. Who hasn't had the experience of trying to recover a dream, only for it to slip away?
So when you wake up, before thinking about the day ahead, before checking your phone or putting on the light, write down what you experienced while asleep. You've got a minute or two before the rational part of the brain kicks in. We need to circumvent our neurobiology, at least momentarily, to keep one foot in the dream world.
When it comes to then working out the meaning of a dream, I have a two-step approach, focusing on its emotional and visual content. First, look at the dominant emotion and the emotional intensity of the dream. Was it anger, anxiety, guilt, sadness, helplessness, despair, disgust, awe, hope, relief, joy or love? How intense was the emotion?
If you are stressed or anxious, your dreams will likely reflect this, and you're more likely to have disturbing dreams. But the images and the plot in that dream may have little to do with what is actually stressing you out. Fear of starting a new job might elicit a dream of a hike along a dangerous mountain path.
During a market crash, stockbrokers didn't dream of money or share prices but had a spike in dreams where they were falling or being chased.
The second step in interpreting a dream is to focus on its central image. But think of what you are visualising not as how it appears, but as a metaphor - as an image that serves as a symbol for something else.
For example, a sexual assault survivor may dream of being swept up in a tornado, an image that evokes the same sort of fear and helplessness as the attack.
In one case study that illustrates this point, a man scheduled for major heart surgery had a dream that a carcass of beef had been delivered, and he, his daughter and an ex-boss were deciding how to cut it up to preserve it.
It's hard to interpret this as anything but a dream about his impending surgery.
Often, it seems our dreaming mind searches for other times when we experienced the same sort of emotion and conjures images from that experience.
American veterans of the Vietnam War going through the stress of marital troubles years later, were more likely to dream about their time fighting in South-East Asia. It was a metaphor for the current state of their marriage.
The Covid lockdowns were less likely to produce dreams about viruses or pandemics, and more likely to be ones where the dreamer is trapped - in one example, in a supermarket that turned into a labyrinth.
The scientific literature recounts the dream reports of two women a week after their mother's death. One dreamed of an empty house, without furniture, the doors and windows open and wind blowing through it; the other of a large tree that fell in front of the house. Both were symbols of their grief and loss.
Nelson Mandela had a similar recurring dream after his mother and eldest son died while he was imprisoned in South Africa. In it, he found himself released from prison and walking through the streets of Johannesburg, which were deserted. He arrived at his home in Soweto only to find 'a ghost house, with all the doors and windows open, but no one at all there'.
Let us consider a very common dream relating to an exam in school. You overslept and missed it, or arrived late, or at the wrong classroom, or found you had studied the wrong material. Maybe you showed up for the test nude, or it's written in a language you don't understand.
If you have this dream the night before an exam, it is clearly a simple product of your anxiety about the test. But this dream persists for many people well into middleage. Why do we have this dream long after we've left school - and how could dreams like these be not only unsettling but relevant?
The answer is that, just as the Vietnam veterans returned to war dreams when they faced marital troubles, anxiety is prompting you to latch onto another time in your life when you were anxious about something.
An exam is a time when we are being evaluated by an authority figure, where we may for the first time be experiencing success or failure based on performance. The image of an exam may be a proxy for something going on in our lives where we are feeling tested or judged. If you have this dream, it makes sense to ask yourself if you are worried you're not meeting someone's expectations.
School may also be the place where we first experienced other deep feelings, such as embarrassment, stress and www.inadequacy.No wonder school and tests serve as a metaphor, no matter how old we are. One of the functions of dreams is processing memories and gauging how new experiences fit with old. Taking the time to consider the meaning of your dreams requires introspection and selfawareness. Dreams invite us to look deeper into ourselves and examine what they are telling us.
Some people claim they never dream. In reality, virtually everyone does, though not everyone, of course, remembers. The fact is that we do not choose to dream.
We need to. As a species, we have evolved to dream.
In their wildness, dreams give us an important evolutionary advantage - an adaptive mind. But what other biological and behavioural benefits can we possibly get from spending years, maybe decades, of our lives dreaming?
We all dream of being chased, so one possible explanation is that dreams exist as a kind of threat rehearsal, a way to practise recognising and responding to danger in a safe way. Dreams are where we test different responses and imagine the consequences, making us better at managing real world threats.
They may also be a means of exploring different personal scenarios in our real lives, delivering an incredible range of plots, both realistic and implausible, in which we imagine how they play out.
How well we interact with others is vital from an evolutionary perspective. It helps us get along in a group and find a mate so the species can procreate.
But perhaps their greatest function - and fundamental evolutionary reason - is that they are sources of creativity and insight. Dreaming allows us to explore offthe-wall ideas we'd dismiss out of hand when we're awake.
The far-fetched associations played out in dreams may unearth a nugget of gold deep in the mud - the answer to a problem we've been struggling with, or perhaps a new insight into a work relationship or a lover.
Creativity can be stirred by dreaming. Great leaps in art, design and fashion are built on the type of divergent thinking that comes naturally in dreaming. Dreams led to the discovery of the periodic table of elements, the double-helix structure of DNA, and the sewing machine.
They have frequently served as inspiration for film directors, who have shot scenes that first appeared to them in dreams. For writers, too.
Novelist Graham Greene would write 500 words a day, which he would read over just before bed, relying on his dreams and sleeping mind to continue the work. John Steinbeck called his overnight problem-solving 'the committee of sleep'.
The surrealist artist Salvador Dali recognised the fuzzy intersection of the dream world and the waking one as a rich source of creativity, and he developed a technique to take advantage of it.
He would sit in a chair holding a large key between his thumb and forefinger above a plate on the floor. When he nodded off, he'd drop the key on the plate, which would wake him up and he would immediately sketch the hallucinatory vision that came to him as he was entering sleep.
Dali called this the 'secret of sleeping while awake' and he used this to inspire his art.
In my brain surgery, I try something similar. The night before a challenging operation, I review images of the patient's brain and, while falling asleep, I imagine rotating the tumour, paying particular attention to the surrounding brain tissue I must either avoid or traverse.
As I'm waking up, I take a few minutes to revisit the shapes and contours of the planned surgery.
This practice has served well to give me the spatial awareness of the anatomy on which I need to perform.
? ADAPTED from This Is Why You Dream by Rahul Jandial (Cornerstone, (EURO)22.99).
© Rahul Jandial 2024.
How amputees become able-bodied in dreams
IN DREAMS, we can make ourselves whole in ways that seem impossible. In their dream bodies, amputees talk of their missing arms and legs having been restored. Even though the sleeping brain is receiving no signals from the amputated limbs, the dreaming brain is able to use these non-existent limbs as though they had never been lost.
A man with one arm dreamed of smashing a mosquito with both hands, shifting gears as he drove a Ferrari Testarossa and pouring a drink for a friend, holding a champagne bottle in his right hand and a glass in his left hand.
A woman with most of one leg amputated dreamed she ran from a plane after it flew too low overhead.
When dreams make us whole, what occurs in the dreamscape is nothing short of magic. Two women confined to wheelchairs with chronic spinal cord injuries independently reported having dreams that included their wheelchairs. However, they were rarely seated in them but pushing them.
For patients of conditions such as Parkinson's, dreams enable them to overcome the limitations of their waking bodies. By day, their limbs may be rigid and tight, their movements slow, almost ossified. This isn't for lack of will. The signalling from the brain to the body is breaking down.
But when these Parkinson's patients dream, their movements are not slow or jerky, as you might expect, they can move quickly and fluidly. The tremors, weakness and rigidity they experience while awake are gone. Their voices, too, are transformed. Quiet and tremulous by day, they are now loud and clear as they shout in their sleep. How this is possible remains an enigma.
Dali's 'sleeping while awake' inspired his art Dreams offer the great gift of self-knowledge Some people claim they never dream Their greatest function is as sources of creativity and insight

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



'Remarkable': Leo hails 75th anniversary of the Republic
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 5
Length: 180 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


LEO Varadkar yesterday hailed the official 75th anniversary of the Irish Republic as a milestone achievement.
The country was officially declared a republic by then-Taoiseach John Costello on Easter Monday, April 18, 1949.
In a statement yesterday, Mr Varadkar said the formation of the country we know today was a 'remarkable achievement'.
The outgoing Taoiseach said: 'The Inter-Party Government was making a powerful connection with the 1916 Rising and the revolutionary struggle it inspired. The Republic of Ireland Act was supported by every party in the Dáil, and it passed without difficulty. Seventy-five years on, it is still a remarkable achievement and one that belongs to all of us.'
Mr Varadkar said Ireland has 'worked to fulfil our destiny as a free, independent country, playing our part on the world stage, promoting democracy and freedom and defending human rights'.
The Fine Gael leader added: 'We joined the United Nations in 1955, and our proud history of involvement in UN and EU peacekeeping missions around the world is a testament to our global outlook and vision.'

Graphic


'Destiny': Leo Varadkar

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



30-SECOND CHALLENGE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 90 words
Body


START on left with number given and follow instructions as you go across. In 30 seconds, beginners have to complete their own challenge; intermediates have to complete their own challenge and the beginner's; advanced players have to complete their own challenge and the intermediate's.
YOUR ANSWERS
SOLUTION BELOW http://www.30secondchallenges.com
Beginner 50 -6 ö4 +2 ?3 +10 ö7 ?12 ½ OF IT ö3 Intermediate 36 75% OF IT +30 2/3 OF IT +10 7/12 OF IT ?5 3/10 OF IT -3 5/13 OF IT 20% OF IT +4 4/13 OF IT +5 12/19 OF IT
Advanced 17 ?7 +6 ?8
LESS 17 ½%

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



After Derry defeat, Farrell may [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 15 words
Body


After Derry defeat, Farrell may need to reopen the Gavin playbook for Dubs GAELIC GAMES PAGE 49

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Bacharacn International Limited, having ceased [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 88 words
Body


Bacharacn International Limited, having ceased trading, having its registered office at Termini, Suite One, RBK, Ground Floor, 3 ArWe Road, Sandyford, Dublin 18 and having no assets or liabilities exceeding (EURO)150, has resolved to notify the Registrar of Companies that the Company is not carrying on business and to request the Registrar on that basis to exercise his powers pursuant to section 733 of the Companies Act 2014 to strike the name of the Company oil the Register.
BY ORDER OFTHE BOARD Mr.James Daugherty, Director

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



BRAINTEASER OF THE NIGHT: With [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 47
Length: 42 words
Byline: CHRISTOPHER STEVENS
Body


BRAINTEASER OF THE NIGHT: With specialist rounds including questions on the composer Clara Schumann, Ancient Greek poet Sappho and French revolutionary the Marquis de Lafayette, no one can say the Mastermind Grand Final (BBC2) was dumbed down. Magnifique!

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



BRIDGE MASTERCLASS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 161 words
Byline: PETER DONOVAN
Body


A8 ?Q6 ? A J 10 9 5 2 ?AQ7
YOU open 1?, and LHO overcalls 1?. ?. What do you bid next after partner bids 2? and next hand passes? Understanding the significance of partner's 2? will make your choice of bid now much easier. HE could have passed, so his free bid is forcing at least to 3? ? the level you would have to reach if you were minimum and single-suited. He will therefore have either a good five-card suit with diamond support or a longer heart suit, if he's short in your suit ? something like: ?x-x-x, ?A-K-x-x-x, ?K-x-x and ?x-x, or ?x-x-x, ?K-J-10-x-x-x, ?K-x and ?x-x.
You'd have had to bid 3? with one of your aces less. So, with this good hand, you have to make a stronger bid. The answer is a cue-bid of the opponent's suit ? 3?. You could bid 4?, or worse still 4?, but why not take the guesswork out of the situation and ask partner what type of hand he holds? He may turn up with ?Q-x-x, ?K-J-10-x-x, ?K-x-x and ?x-x, and 3NT would be the best option.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Cannabis is now legal in Germany
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 98 words
Body


GERMANY yesterday became the biggest EU country to legalise recreational cannabis, with thousands flocking to Berlin's Brandenburg Gate on Sunday night to light up joints in celebration.
But the new law has been met with fierce objections from opposition politicians and medical associations.
From yesterday, Germans over the age of 18 can have 50 grams of the drug at home and can smoke it in public so long as they are 100m away from schools, playgrounds and sports centres and not in the 'immediate proximity' of minors.
It also means that they can carry 25 grams of cannabis on the street.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Chef De PartJe required to [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 58 words
Body


Chef De PartJe required to work at Doll- Italia Pasta bar based in 2 Bloom Ln, North City, Dublin, D01 XF21. Must have at least 2 years' experience In similar role. Duties are preparation, cooking, presentation of various dishes and preparing menus. Salary: (EURO)34,030 per annum. Hours: 39 per week. Apply to: AUiia Antal at attilapaslabar@gmail.com

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Choc full of health benefits
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; OPINION, COLUMNS; Pg. 12
Length: 147 words
Byline: BRENDA POWER
Body


IF YOU ate your body weight in chocolate on Sunday, well done you - not only have you helped defend your brain against Alzheimer's, you've even boosted your weight-loss regime. Well, probably. According to Chinese researchers, a chemical called theobromine, found in cocoa beans and abundant in both milk and dark chocolate, helps the body break down fats. It also protects the kidneys, boosts your mood, and, as it has antioxidant and anti-inflammatory properties, is thought to guard against dementia, strokes and depression. The boffins are so impressed with its beneficial qualities that they even suggest that it be used as a daily health supplement to boost the immune system, prevent obesity, maintain cardiovascular health and prevent cognitive decline. Chocolate as a daily health supplement? I think most of us are ahead of you there, lads, all we needed was a good excuse.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Clarifications & corrections
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 77 words
Body


¦If you feel any report in the Irish Daily Mail has been incomplete or inaccurate you can email Corrections and Clarifications at corrections@dailymail.ie ¦This publication supports the work of the Press Council of Ireland and the Office of the Press Ombudsman, and our staff operate within the Code of Practice. You can obtain a copy of the Code, or contact the Council, at www.presscouncil.ie, PH: (01) 6489130, Lo-call 1890 208 080 or email: info@presscouncil.ie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



DO THIS...
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 34
Length: 72 words
Body


PRIORITISE sleep to improve your immunity. A study in Germany showed people who slept for eight hours had betterfunctioning immune T-cells. Blood tests showed their T-cells worked as they should, following instructions to go to lymph nodes where they're 'trained' to fight infections, reports the journal Brain, Behavior, and Immunity. The researchers said compounds that are raised in blood during sleep are responsible for this effect.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



DUBLIN CITY COUNCIL We Dublin [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 120 words
Body


DUBLIN CITY COUNCIL We Dublin Electrical Wholesalers Ltd of 5807582 North Circular Road , Dublin DO1RP63, Intend to apply for retention permission for 8 number vertical fighting columns to front and side and selected wall light fittings along front and side to Illuminate main signage and associated works. This application may he Inspected or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of maki ng a copy at the offices oil Dublin City Council during its public opening hours and a submission or observation In relation to the application may be mads to tne authority In writing on payment of the prescribed fee within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by trie authority of the application.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



DUN LAOGHAIRE RATHDOWN COUNTY COUNCIL [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 130 words
Body


DUN LAOGHAIRE RATHDOWN COUNTY COUNCIL Permission is sought for the demolition of the existing single storey extension and partial demolition of the existing Double storey return to the rear and construction of partly single party double storey extension to the rear, bay window to the front and ancillary works at 5 a Joseph's Terrace,Tivoli Road, Dun Laoghalre, Co Dublin, A9BFSO0.
By Charles and Walthea Patterson Tne planning application may be Inspected or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy at the offices of the Planning Authority, County Hall, Dun Laoghaire during its public opening hours.
A submission/observation may be made on payment of (EURO)20 within a period of 5 weeks from the date the application is received by the planning authority

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Enis Takeaway Limited, UNfT 6, [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 52 words
Body


Enis Takeaway Limited, UNfT 6, IDEAL SHOPPING CENTRE, CURRYHILLS, PROSPEROUS, CO KILDARE, W91 HT35 is looking to recruit a Chef De Partie (2 positions available} to work In busy place, work 39 hours per week and salary between 30,000-35000 Euro per annum please send In CV by post or emailatenistakeaway@gmail.com

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Expert tips on how to [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 21
Length: 5 words
Body


Expert tips on how to banish wind 5

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Expert tips on how to [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 27 words
Body


Expert tips on how to banish wind
Surprising ways to load up on essential vitamin C
How to cope with an unexpected serious diagnosis
Good Health 12-page pullout inside

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



FRED BASSET
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 44
Length: 1 words

Graphic


LIMITED graham alex

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



GET YOUR BRILLIANT DIGITAL EDITION [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 9 words
Body


GET YOUR BRILLIANT DIGITAL EDITION www.mailsubscriptions.ie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Health Cars Assistants required at [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 157 words
Body


Health Cars Assistants required at Heritage Homecare Ltd, located at 13 Clarinda Park North, Dun Laoghaire, Co Dublin. These roles are within domiciliary services and based within the South Dublin community. Duties and responsibilities include: Assisting clients with personal and practicaf needs, monitoring clients health 1 well-being, assistance with activities of daffy living such as shopping, housework, meal preparation and feeding, medication prompting, transferring clients with poor mobility using the hoist and assistance with short walk, ensuring dent safety through a high level of observation skills, accurate recording & reporting. Must have experience In a similar role, knowledge of the healthcare system an advantage. Must also have a QOI Level S healthcare qualification In progress or completed or healthcare related degree. Salary (EURO)30,000 per Anum. Hours: 39 per week. Apply to: Jobs9 herttagehomecare.i e/01 -2987655.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Horticulture Workers wanted to work [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 68 words
Body


Horticulture Workers wanted to work full time at 5111 Is Green Veg, Sillis, Qlaslough, Co. Mcnaghan. 39 hour week. Salary (EURO)30,000.
Horticulture workers wanted to work full time on the grounds of a busy vegetable processing plant En North Monaghan. Under the direction of a supervisor, horticulture works will Include, but not limited to the growing of plants and crops. Apply with CV to aine@sllllsprepveg.ie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



HOTSPOTS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 51 words
Body


WORK WHISPER SAY YOU'LL NEVER (Wolverhampton, 6.30) WEIGHTING GAME SMART CHAMPION (Wolverhampton, 7.30) Down 21lb from last winning mark. BURNT FINGERS STILL STANDING (Wolverhampton, 4.55)
CAPTAIN HEATH TRIO ELEGANT ERIN (nap) (Pontefract, 3.15) GOOBINATOR (nb) (Pontefract, 2.45) THRONE HALL (Pontefract, 2.15)

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Injury woes to ponder for Leo; RUGBY
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 102 words
Byline: AOIFE ENGLISH
Body


LEINSTER head coach Leo Cullen has a plethora of injury headaches ahead of Saturday's Champions Cup Round of 16 match against Leicester Tigers in Aviva Stadium.
Both Luke McGrath and Robbie Henshaw w i l l be assessed further before the weekend. Further checks are needed on Ciarán Frawley (foot), Hugo Keenan (hip) Garry Ringrose: (shoulder) and Andrew Porter (shoulder). Charlie Ngatai (calf) and Jimmy O'Brien (neck) will also be assessed ahead of return. Reserve scrum-half Cormac Foley has returned to full training this week.
Over 30,000 tickets have been sold for the game, which will be shown live on RTÉ2.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



IT'S ALL KICKING off!
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 10 words
Body


LISTEN TODAY ON APPLE, SPOTIFY OR WHEREVER YOU GET YOUR PODCASTS

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Kinahan's crimes against writing
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; OPINION, COLUMNS; Pg. 12
Length: 142 words
Byline: BRENDA POWER
Body


IT SOUNDS like a fairly obvious April Fools' Day prank news story - the Kinahan crime boss with a busy side hustle as an online restaurant www.reviewer.No wonder most newspapers have all but abandoned the old tradition of running bogus stories on April 1, though, since you couldn't compete with the craziest truths - Christy Kinahan, right, really does fancy himself as a bit of a 'fayne dayning' expert. Despite being one of the world's most wanted men with a $5million bounty on his head, he's written over 200 reviews of restaurants and hotels since 2019. Among them was his verdict on a five-star hotel in Sharm el-Sheikh, where he attended a UN humanitarian conference - see what I mean about April Fools? - in which he wrote: 'I thought service was helpful and good as was value for money.' AA Gill he ain't - I would say stick to the day job...

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Lisnagarvey in Euro win
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 84 words
Byline: SAM LOVETT
Body


ANTRIM club Lisnagarvey were last night crowned EuroHockey Club Trophy winners for 2024 after beating Cardiff & Met 4-2 in the final in Portugal. The Welsh side took the lead in the 4th minute but Lisnagarvey responded immediately when Andrew Williamson scored. Cardiff restored their lead in the 11th minute at half-time the socre remained 2-1. Ryan Getty equalised after the break then captain Andrew Williamson made it 3-2 in the 36th minute and Oliver Kidd sealed it from open play in the 40th minute.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



LUDLOW RTV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 38 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 2.00 Gastibelza 2.30 Easy Peasy 3.00 El Saviour 3.30 Jacamar 4.00 Passing Kate 4.30 Iskandar Pecos 2.00 Terresita 2.30 Get Sky High 3.00 El Saviour 3.30 Kestrel Valley (nb) 4.00 Balhambar 4.30 Iskandar Pecos

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Media targeted at dissidents' Rising march
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 131 words
Body


A VAN was set on fire yesterday following a dissident march in Derry to mark the anniversary of the 1916 Easter Rising.
Petrol bombs were also thrown at media covering the event, as police warned the public to avoid the city's Creggan area. The march, organised by the Derry 1916 Commemoration Committee, started in the Central Drive area of Creggan before making its way to the Derry City Cemetery. People wearing face coverings, sunglasses and paramilitary-style dress carried the Irish Tricolour while a number of young people with masks carried crates of petrol bombs and lumps of masonry.
Wreaths were laid at the republican plot at cemetery. A police helicopter was in the sky throughout proceedings, and a drone issued a warning to those assembled that it was an unnotified parade.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Mescal's normal days are over
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; OPINION, COLUMNS; Pg. 12
Length: 148 words
Byline: BRENDA POWER
Body


IT'S a measure of how far Paul Mescal has come in the four years since he charmed a locked-down world as Connell in Normal People that he's now got A-listers such as Nicole Kidman fangirling him. He's been telling Jimmy Kimmel that while performing in A Streetcar Named Desire in London, the backstage area was 'pretty starry', with lots of celebs turning up to pay homage. After one show, he said, there was a knock on his dressing room door, and he assumed it was the stage manager, but when he opened it, wearing just his sweaty underpants, there's Nicole herself coming to congratulate him on the performance. It was 'incredibly undignified', he said; he had to rush to pull on his trousers, and said it's 'not a look you want to be caught in'. He doesn't like to be reminded of this, I know, but if Nicole saw Normal People then Paul in his jocks practically counted as being overdressed.

Graphic


Naked truth: Paul Mescal in Normal People and, below, Nicole Kidman

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Money bags!; Ben and Jen step out with luxury luggage worth up to (EURO)93,000
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 175 words
Byline: Jennifer Ruby
Body


A MARRIAGE of two A-list stars can be a battle of the egos. But for Jennifer Lopez and husband Ben Affleck, it was the battle of the (very pricey) bags.
The couple, who rekindled their romance in 2021 after nearly two decades apart, looked like they were going to a business meeting rather than an Easter lunch in New York.
Oscar-winner Affleck, 51, clutched his (EURO)2,300 Globetrotter Caviar attache briefcase, which he used with a (EURO)145 extendable 'magic handle'.
Ms Lopez, 54, managed to upstage him with her pricier brown crocodile Hermes Birkin bag, which can cost between (EURO)23,000 and (EURO)93,000.
The singer and actress has an extensive Birkin collection, estimated to be worth upwards of (EURO)460,000. Over the years she has been seen with numerous versions of the bag in red, black, white, green and yellow.
The couple were first engaged in 2002 but postponed their wedding in 2003 with just four days' notice, before splitting in January the following year.
After reuniting 18 years later, they finally made it down the aisle in 2022.

Graphic


Briefcase encounter: Ben Affleck and Jennifer Lopez in New York

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Mullins picks up a quiet treble on final day By EOGHAN O'BRIEN
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 127 words
Body


AFTER a fivetimer at Fairyhouse on Sunday, it was a slightly quieter afternoon for the all-conquering Willie Mullins on the final day of the Fairyhouse Easter meeting. The Closutton representatives were out of luck in the Grand National with 20-1 chance Minella Cocooner faring best in third under Danny Mullins. But it was still a hat-trick of winners for the champion trainer, after Implicit got him off the mark in the opener before he finished with a double in the two races that brought the curtain down on the card.
It was Minella Cocooner's rider who got Macdermott (5-1) home in front in the Envirogreen Building Services Handicap Chase over three miles and half a furlong. Jody Townend then took the INH Flat Race with Redemption Day (2-1 jointfavourite).

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



O'Connor Software Development Services Limited, [...]; LEGAL NOTICES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 91 words
Body


O'Connor Software Development Services Limited, having ceased to trade, having Its registered office and principal place of business at 30 Lily's Way. Ongar G r a n , Dublin 15 and having no assets or liabilities exceeding (EURO)150, has resofoed to notify the Registrar of Companies that the company Is not carrying on a business and to request the Registrar on that basis to exercise his/her powers pursuant to section 733 of the Companies Act 2014 to strike me name of the company off the register.
By Order of the Board Aiden O'Connor Director

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S RADIO
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 48,49
Length: 176 words
Body


THE LIFE SCIENTIFIC, 9AM, RADIO 4
DINOSAURS continue to fascinate us, and today's guest, the fossil hunter Dr Nick Longrich (pictured), has discovered more than a dozen new species, from Mexico to Morocco to the Isle of Wight. He talks about his work in the field, and also the less glamorous task of sifting through long-forgotten bones in museum cabinets and drawers that have set him off on searches. Now based at Bath University, he grew up the son of a fisherman in Alaska, where he spent much of his childhood out in nature. 'It was a lot like Lord Of The Flies - good times.'
÷
ALTHOUGH it's far smaller than Russia, Belarus is said to have three times as many political prisoners as its neighbour. Many are women, including the activist Maria Kolesnikova, who has not been heard of for over a year. In an eye-opening report for CROSSING CONTINENTS (9PM, RADIO 4), Monica Whitlock brings some of these forgotten women's stories to light, with details of the harsh conditions they are detained in - but also of the camaraderie that has built up among them.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 46
Length: 165 words
Body


BEN FOGLE: NEW LIVES IN THE WILD, 9PM, CH5
BEN returns to Sri Lanka this week, to catch up with Janey Lowe (pictured right) and the veterinary clinic she set up to help the island's many street dogs. Janey visited Sri Lanka while she was backpacking in 2014 and decided to stay. As a vet back home in the UK, she didn't feel she was making much of a difference, but now, 'I'm saving lives every day and it feels like this is being a vet.' But it comes at quite a price, with Janey working stressful 16-hour days. Ben shows real concern, becoming a bit of a therapist to Janey (who's now 35), especially when she's moved to tears recalling the hardships of coping during the extreme isolation of the pandemic. But Ben also offers some more practical help and gets stuck in nursing the 25 dogs recovering from operations, joins Janey on rescue missions, and assists with an outreach project to manage the dog population. For more of Ben's adventures, head to the Channel 5 catch-up service My5.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S TV; CÚRAMÓIRÍ, 7.30PM, TG4
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 40
Length: 139 words
Body


THERE have been plenty of documentaries about the work of the medics and police who deal with emergencies, but the people who provide long-term care can sometimes be overlooked. This series sets out to put that right, as it explores the crucial role played by family members, professional carers and dedicated organisations who help those who need it most. In the opening episode, viewers are introduces to Diarmuid Mac Dubhglais from Dublin, who provides food for the hungry, and Úna O'Kane (right), a palliative care nurse at the Galway Hospice. Una works closely with patients, their families and other healthcare professionals to create tailored care plans that meet individual needs. Through her expertise and experience, she helps patients and their families navigate the difficult journey of living with a life-limiting illness.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PLUS: OSCAR CAINER'S HOROSCOPES
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 7 words
Body


SEE ALL YOUR FAVOURITE CARTOONS ON PAGE 44

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



PONTEFRACT RTV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 57 words
Body


1.45 Dandy Devil 2.15 Clan Chieftain 2.45 Goobinator 3.15 Vintage Clarets 3.45 South Shore 4.15 Flying Scotsman 4.45 ON THE RIVER (nap)
ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 1.45 FEDERAL ENVOY (nap) 2.15 Throne Hall 2.45 Maxident (nb) 3.15 Vintage Clarets 3.45 South Shore 4.15 Bustaam 4.45 Star Shield NORTHERNER - 4.15 BUSTAAM (nap); 4.45 Star Shield (nb).

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Protect our freedoms; LET TERS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 188 words
Body


IN the aftermath of the overwhelming recent rejection of both referendum proposals, a growing number of TDs are calling for the Hate Speech Bill to be amended or scrapped in it's entirety. This is to be applauded due to the curtailment of a person's right to freedom of speech . There is another Bill that is progressing through the Dáil which curtails a person's right to free assembly, namely the so-called Safe Access Zones Bill, which will criminalise any person engaging in a peaceful pro-life protest within 100 metres of any facility which provides termination of pregnancy services.
A newspaper article last month referenced a Fine Gael TD, who stated that the Department of
Health has had no requests from any abortion provider to develop such legislation. This is yet another example of the Government being lobbied by publicly funded NGOs to enact legislation to curtail a person's right to peaceful protest and assembly.
You may not agree with a person's viewpoint, but this should not give you the right to censor their freedoms, as this is the essence of a democratic society.
EAMONN O' HARA, Manorcunningham, Co. Donegal.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Raffles is a National treasure!
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 3 words
Body


FULL REPORT PAGE 47

Graphic


Number one: JJ Slevin celebrates winning the Irish Grand National on Intense Raffles at Fairyhouse yesterday

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Stauntons Qpurattons Limited T/A Stauntons [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 52 words
Body


Stauntons Qpurattons Limited T/A Stauntons On The Green Is hiring Chef De Partie at S3 ST Stephens Green Soul Dublin 2 Dublin Ireland. Duties: Preparation, cooking, presentation of dishes & maintaining good hygiene. Salary (EURO)34,000 RA, 39-hours P.W, 2-Vears Contract. Forward CVs to john@stauntonsonthegreen.ie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Straight to the POINT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 102 words
Body


÷
OSCAR Cainer's Libra prediction last Wednesday read: 'As the dust settles, not only is a new horizon coming into view but you are beginning to focus in a clearer way.' Thanks, Oscar. I had my cataract procedure the next day and can see much more clearly now.
Name and address supplied.
÷
ABOUT every six days, Israel replicates the numbers killed in the October 7 massacre.
MR D. HARTLEY, by email.
÷
WHY has the word 'encourage' been replaced by 'incentivise'?
÷
MICHELLE RICHARDSON, by email. ¦ WHEN younger, I was in a team, not on it; and if I played well I was excited, not super-excited.
THOMAS SHARDLOW, by email.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Surprising foods full of vitamin [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 21
Length: 6 words
Body


Surprising foods full of vitamin C 13

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Teach your old dog some new tricks... and help it live longer!
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 5
Length: 168 words
Byline: Xantha Leatham
Body


ANYONE who has ever owned a pet dog knows how hard it is to watch them grow old.
But researchers have now found social enrichment can bring benefits for ageing pooches' brains - suggesting it really is a good idea to teach an old dog new tricks.
Scientists used MRI scans to measure changes in the brain structure of 43 middle-aged beagles over three years. The dogs were exercised daily, played with a range of toys and had 'free play' with other canines for 30 minutes per day. Analysis revealed the volume of the hippocampus - the brain region linked to cognition - increased for all the dogs at an average rate of 1.74% per year.
Previous studies of beagles showed the volume of this brain area usually declines over time.
The researchers, from the University of Kentucky and the University of California, published their findings in The Journal Of Neuroscience. They added that cognitive decline is similar in dogs and people - and therefore, older dog owners may also see benefits from playing with their pets.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Terex MDS (TM Murray Design [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 107 words
Body


Terex MDS (TM Murray Design Services) are looking to recruit experienced industrial Welders onto their team. Based In Magheracloone, Co Monaghan Term MDS are offering permanent and full time employment to suitable candidates who will be part of the team who manufacture mobile screening equipment. Working 40 hours per week, positions are available on day shift (6AM to 2:30PM Monday to Friday) and evening shift [2:30PM to 1AM Monday to Thuraday). Starting rate of pay Is (EURO) 16.50 per hour, depending on experience. Applications should be made In writing addressed to the HR Department, Terex MDS, Magheracloone, Carrickmacross, Co Monaghan.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



The benefits of living alone
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 68 words
Body


I CAN identify with TV presenter Fern Britton, who recently said that she doesn't want to live with anyone again. I was widowed four years ago, after nearly 50 years of marriage. I have never lived on my own before, and I feel guilty for enjoying it so much. I miss my husband, but it is liberating not to have to worry about another person's wants and needs, and I love the peace and quiet.
O. NOEL, by email.

Graphic


Changes: Fern Britton

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



The House of Nails is [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 173 words
Body


The House of Nails is looking for an International Business Sales Executive to work at 10 Tuckey st, 1st floor, Cork, T12WCD8. The candidate must have at least 2 years; experience related to the role, must speak Portuguese [Brazilian) as the salon provides several Brazilian beauty services and products. The duties will be: Discusses customer requirements and advises them on the capabilities and limitations of the sale of composite packages to Brazilians customers interested In beauty services; Quotes prices and payment arrangements; Mates follow up calls to ensure customer satisfaction and to obtain further leads; Stays abreast of advances and updates in field and suggests possbte Impfovsmcfrts to s&rvtcG] Maintains records and accounts of sales made and handles customer; Complaints Discusses business methods and services and targets customer group with employer ln order to identify marketing strategies. Hours of work: 39 hours. Remuneration: £34,000 per annum. Please contact Agnieska Deryng [tiehousecifnall3cork9gnnail.com).

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Two (02) Welders required to [...]; RECRUITMENT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 136 words
Body


Two (02) Welders required to work at James J. O'Donnell General Engineering Works Limited at Atlas Avenue Dock Road, Limerick, V94 VW71, Ireland. Must have relevant experience In the role. Duties: selects appropriate welding equipment such as electric arc, gas torch, etc.; connects wires to power supply, or hoses to onygen, acetylene, argon, carbon dioxide, electric arc, or other source and adjusts controls to regulate gas pressure and rate of flow; cuts metal pieces using gas torch or electric arc; guides electrode or torch along line of weld, bums away damaged areas, and melts brazing alloy or solder into joints; deans and smoothes weld; checks finished workpiece for defects and conformity with specification. Salary: (EURO) 34,000 per annum. Hours: 39 per week. Apply to: Ted Grace at Info Bijodonnel Lie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Well said, Mary; LET TERS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 77 words
Body


I HAVE long considered Mary Carr to be a fine journalist who calls a spade a spade, and her article in the Mail yesterday just reinforces my opinion.
Eamon Ryan has no idea what it is like to live in rural Ireland, and I thank God for Mary Carr for calling him out on his 'polluter pays' scheme to reduce private car use. She says that without an adequate public transport system, it will not work. Well done,
Mary, hope he reads your article!
MARIE McCARTHY, Limerick.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Were you April fooled?
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 101 words
Body


DID you spot our April Fool in yesterday's paper?
It was the tale about Kate Moss and Simon Cowell's visit to a karaoke bar and how he might be helping her to launch a pop career. In fact, it wasn't either of them in our pictures, above.
They were created with the help of Denise Ohnona, who was labelled 'fake Kate' following a viral video of her attending Paris Fashion Week, and Cowell lookalike Andy Penfold.
The byline Flora Pilo was an anagram of April Fool. Daryl Falopios, quoted in the story, was an anagram of April Fool's Day. Other clues included fictitious former record company executive Joe King.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



What do YOU think?
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: LETTERS; Pg. 39
Length: 68 words
Body


The Irish Daily Mail aims to have the most informative, intelligent and entertaining letters page in Ireland but we need your help. Contributors should also provide a daytime number (for verification only, not publication). Otherwise publication cannot be guaranteed. Please write to us at: Irish Daily Mail, Two Haddington Buildings, 20-38 Haddington Road, Dublin 4, D04 HE94 or email us at letters@dailymail.ie

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



WHY DID PEP FEEL NEED [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 21 words
Body


WHY DID PEP FEEL NEED TO LECTURE GREALISH?
listen today on apple, spotify or wherever you get your podcasts
IT'S ALL KICKING off!

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL We, Bray [...]; PLANNING APPLICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 45
Length: 133 words
Body


WICKLOW COUNTY COUNCIL We, Bray Wanderers FC, are seeking Planning Permission at Carlisle Grounds, Quinsborough Rd, Bray. Co. Wlcklow. A9B PD61, The proposed devetopmerrt will consist of the construction of 4 No. Padel courts as well as associated lighting and fencing in the existing pitch to the front of Carlisle Grounds and all associated siteworks. The planning application may be Inspected or purchased at a fee not exceeding the reasonable cost of making a copy at the offices of Widdow County Council, County Buildings. WkMow during Its public opening fours and a submission or observation in relation to the application may be made to the authority in writing on payment of the prescribed fee within the period of 5 weeks beginning on the date of receipt by the authority of the application.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



WOLVERHAMPTON SSR
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 2, 2024 Tuesday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 46
Length: 63 words
Body


4.55 Virtual Hug 5.30 Red Hatter 6.00 Pique' 6.30 Say You'll Never 7.00 Bella Bisbee 7.30 Tamaris 8.00 Strategic Fortune 8.30 Trojan Truth ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 4.55 Virtual Hug 5.30 Bitcoin Profit 6.00 King's Coronation 6.30 Horse Whisperer 7.00 Bella Bisbee 7.30 Smokey Malone 8.00 Muhalhel 8.30 Calcutta Dream NEWMARKET - 6.00 KING'S CORONATION (nap); 7.00 Bella Bisbee (nb).

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



...and good news for parents applying for school places
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 6
Length: 355 words
Byline: Brian Mahon
Body


THE Department of Education is examining proposals to develop a common application process for post-primary schools across the country.
Each secondary school has its own application process, which has created problems for parents in urban areas who are applying to multiple schools amid a shortage of places.
Fine Gael Senator Emer Currie recently called for the Government to introduce a 'common application process' which would streamline post-primary school admissions, alleviating stress for parents and students, and giving clarity to the
Department of Education on overall shortages. She said: 'The lack of integration across local schools results in applications to post-primary overlapping, leaving many students uncertain as to whether they will secure a place in their area, sometimes right up to August.
'A common applications process, similar to successful models in North Dublin and Limerick, could address current difficulties and I have raised this matter in the Seanad,' she added. 'A common application form with a single deadline would be used, allowing families to apply to schools in their area simultaneously, but also giving them the opportunity to list their preferences.'
She said there was 'no substitute' for the Department of Education staying on top of population growth and demand for places. She added: 'Existing legislation states that the minister may, following consultation with the patron or patrons and the boards of the schools concerned, direct two or more boards to co-operate with each other.
'It makes absolute sense for the minister to set up exploratory talks with each of the patrons and boards of management in Dublin West about the benefits of such a common approach, and I have written to her to request her consideration of this without any delay.'
Senior Government sources have told the Mail that they are 'definitely looking' at the proposal, but cautioned that while the Government funds schools, it does not manage them. They said that parental choice was paramount, with schools also in competition with each other for student numbers which would enable them to apply for more funding.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



A big effect of our possessions
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 40
Length: 1027 words
Byline: Charles Legge
Body


QUESTION
Why are the belongings of the deceased referred to as their 'effects'? IN Hamlet we find: 'Forgive me my foul murder? That cannot be; since I am still possess'd Of those effects for which I did the murder.'
'Effects' is derived from the Latin 'facere', to do or to make. It's a common root that gives us the suffix 'fy' (as in verify 'make true') as well as words such as 'fact' and 'feat'. In this sense effect is 'something acquired on completion of an action'.
Sam Gale, Radstock, Avon.
QUESTION
Did George Lucas sue a beer firm for inserting adverts into his films? IN December 2003, Chile's Channel 13 aired three adverts produced by Cerveza Cristal, a famous South American beer company established in 1850. Instead of taking traditional ad breaks, the 30-second commercials were woven into scenes from the original trilogy of Star Wars.
In an iconic scene from Star Wars: Episode IV - A New Hope, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Alec Guinness) moves over to a chest to retrieve Luke Skywalker's birthright, his lightsaber, but instead pulls out an ice-cold beer.
This is followed by a muscular 1980s rock jingle proclaiming 'Cerveza Cristal!'
In The Empire Strikes Back, an exhausted Luke, following a training session with Yoda, reaches for a beer instead of his lightsaber, and in Return Of The Jedi, following a tense exchange with Luke, the Emperor Palpatine uses The Force to levitate a cold one into his hands.
The campaign - known as La Fuerza está con Cerveza Cristal (The Force is with Cerveza Cristal) - won an award at the 2004 Cannes Lions International Festival of Creativity for its creators, ad agency OMD Santiago.
It was rather wonderful, but Star Wars creator George Lucas wasn't happy with this collaboration. He filed a grievance with the Chilean Council for Self- Regulation and Advertising Ethics in 2004 and they pulled the ads from the film.
Kathleen Edwards, Swansea, Wales.
QUESTION
Which was the first British cinema to be converted into a bingo hall? IT IS hard to pinpoint an exact building. But many cinemas became bingo halls after the partial legalisation of gambling by the Betting and Gaming Act
Compiled by Charles Legge 1960 which came into effect in January 1961.
The cinema industry had been in trouble for years. The market was saturated and it was under threat from television. The major groups Rank (Odeon and Gaumont), Associated British
Cinemas (ABC), Granada, and Essoldo began closing cinemas in the mid-50s.
Some were demolished, others became dance halls, concert halls, and bowling alleys.
It was bingo that came to the rescue. Bingo had been popular in clubs and bars from 1929, but gambling on the game wasn't officially legal. The Gaming Act gave an opportunity to monetise the buildings. Success was instant.
Some provincial cinemas were quick off the mark. The Shaftesbury Cinema in Portsmouth was closed in 1959, and was converted into a bingo club in early 1960, as was the Hippodrome Theatre in Bishop Auckland, County Durham.
ABC named their first conversion Alpha Bingo Club. This was in March 1961 at the former Dominion Cinema in Walthamstow, East London. This fine Art Deco building, latterly a Mecca Bingo hall, was demolished in 2020.
Rank converted two big London cinemas - the Odeon Hackney Road and the Gaumont Peckham - to bingo in May 1961, under the banner of Top Rank Social Clubs.
The classic Art Deco Odeon at Kingstanding, Birmingham, became Top Rank Bingo in 1962. It's now a Mecca.
Granada's first conversion was at Kennington, South London, in October 1961, the start of their Gala chain. Wrestling was held on selected days. Essoldo Bingo's first conversion was the old Savoy Cinema, Burnt Oak in North-West London in October 1961.
Edward Baker, London.
QUESTION
Are there many remixes that became a bigger hit than the original song? FURTHER to the previous answer, even one of the biggest names in the history of pop music has found his original songs upstaged by remixes.
Elvis Presley's A Little Less Conversation was originally released as a single in 1970 but was far from one of his biggest hits and likely would have remained an afterthought in his back catalogue were it not for the 2001 movie Ocean's Eleven.
Its use in the caper flick gave it a new lease of life and the following year, Dutch DJ Tom Holkenborg released a remix of the track, credited to Elvis vs JXL, which was short for Holkenborg's stage name of Junkie XL.
The upbeat, pounding dance remix was a monster hit, going to No.1 in 13 countries, including here in Ireland.
It was the first time the Presley estate allowed an outsider to remix one of Elvis's songs and it was so popular that the track was even a late inclusion on the successful compilation ELV1S: 30 #1 Hits, as track 31.
British DJ Paul Oakenfold attempted to repeat the trick the following year with his remix of Elvis's 1969 B-side Rubberneckin' and while this one was far from the worldwide smash that A Little Less Conversation was, it still far outperformed the original version and reached the top 10 in the charts in six countries, including getting to No.10 in Ireland.
Danny Cullen, Templeogue, Dublin..
QUESTION
Has an artist deliberately parodied the work of another? FURTHER to the earlier answer, a modern example is Czech artist Kristyna Milde, who recreates some of history's most famous paintings, such as Venus With A Mirror by Titian, using posed Barbie dolls as models.
Frances Thorpe, Braunton, Devon.
? Is there a question to which you have always wanted to know the answer? Or do you know the answer to a question raised here? Send your questions and answers to: Charles Legge, Answers To Correspondents, Irish Daily Mail, DMG Media, Two Haddington Buildings, 20-38 Haddington Road, Dublin 4, D04 HE94. You can also fax them to 0044 1952 510906 or you can email them to charles. legge@dailymail.ie A selection will be published but we are not able to enter into individual correspondence.
questions
Q: Was the grave of Charlie Chaplin robbed?
Q
Janet Dovey, Horley, Surrey. : What is the story of the original London Kit Kat Club? Lawrence Jenkins, Cheltenham, Gloucestershire. : What stunts did director Alfred Hitchcock pull?
Q
Neil Walker, Ely, Cambridgeshire.

Graphic


Affecting: Ruth Negga took on the mighty role of Hamlet

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



A day full of memories... including the 1916 Proclamation off by heart
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 522 words
Byline: Gráinne Ní Aodha
Body


HUNDREDS of people gathered yesterday in Dublin city centre for a ceremony marking 108 years since the Easter Rising.
President Michael D Higgins and Taoiseach Leo Varadkar led the annual State commemoration, as Sinn Féin leader Mary Lou McDonald said that the Proclamation still resonates over a century later.
Army personnel and the brass and pipe bands lined up outside the GPO on O'Connell Street for the ceremony, which involved an Army flyover and the President laying a wreath for those who died.
The 1916 Proclamation was read out in full by Captain Paul Murphy - the former Kilkenny hurler and four-time All-Ireland winner - who learned it off by heart. '[There were] a lot of trips to work reciting it in the car, a lot of moments brushing my teeth in the mirror learning it,' he told reporters afterwards.
'It's a very important day in Irish history and I wanted to give it the deference and the weight it deserved,' he said. 'I'm sure the men that day would be more than privileged to know that it's still a seminal day in Irish history.'
President Higgins laid a wreath to commemorate those who died in the 1916 Rising and stood as a minute's silence was observed.
At the end of the ceremony, the flag was raised to full mast, the National Anthem was played, and the Air Corps flew overhead.
Among those in attendance were the incoming taoiseach - Fine Gael leader and Further Education Minister Simon Harris - along with the North's First Minister Michelle O'Neill and Sinn Féin leader Ms McDonald.
Mr Harris was seen speaking to former President
Mary McAleese and Ms O'Neill.
Mr Harris, who said when he put this year's 1916 Easter Rising commemoration in his diary that he didn't expect to be attending it as Fine Gael leader, said it was a 'really important' day.
'I remember when the whole decade of centenaries started, there was a lot of debate in Ireland as to how
Ireland would handle commemoration - would we do them well? And I must say, I'm really proud,' he told reporters.
'I was just in the GPO behind us there and meeting young boys and girls wearing their great-great-grandfathers' medals on their own jumpers, and that sense of pride and history and connection.
'So I think today is really important. I think it's done very well, and I think it's a real opportunity for the next generation to continue to be kept informed of our history.'
Ms McDonald and Ms O'Neill greeted the public and posed for photos after the ceremony ended.
'I think Easter is a time of remembrance but it's also a time of huge hope for people,' Ms McDonald said, adding that she felt 'an appetite for change' on days like yesterday.
'On a day like this we remember the brilliant, brave, courageous things that Irish people can do when they have their minds to it and I think that's the sense of optimism that I'm picking up today. I think the whole Proclamation resonates and matters today as much as 108 years ago.'
Tánaiste and Defence Minister Micheál Martin, Transport Minister Eamon Ryan, Enterprise Minister Simon Coveney and Housing Minister Darragh O'Brien were also in attendance.
Mr Ryan said the ceremony was 'very moving' and 'beautiful'.

Graphic


Proud moment: Capt Paul Murphy reads the ProclamationSpecial day: Taoiseach Leo Varadkar yesterdaySalute: President Michael D Higgins yesterday

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



America's pastime faces battle with a familiar foe...; ON THE BOX
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 50
Length: 1044 words
Byline: MARK GALLAGHER
Body


JUST like the freshlycut grass on the first day of Championship, baseball's opening day conjures up all sorts of images and evokes all kinds of feelings. It is about tradition and timelessness, a sense of belonging.
Mike Trout captured all this and more on the evocative video that was put out on www.MLB.com last week.
Trout is a multiple All-Star and one of the faces of the sport, so his words carried extra weight.
'I love baseball,' the Los Angeles Angels star intones. 'I love scoring from first base, cutting the bag so fast that you feel like you are flying, the thrill of turning a home run into an out, the feeling when you catch a pitch dead solid.'
All these words can carry you off on a wave and make you understand why baseball is still called America's pastime, even at a time when its profile has suffered in the shadow of the NFL's staggering popularity. But, wait, there's more from Trout.
'If you love baseball like I do, you know there is one day you love it unlike any other and that is opening day. A new beginning, a fresh start, a new hope that this is the year.
'Opening day is our baseball holiday and, like all holidays, it never gets old. And now I am about to play in my 12th opening day, I feel the same way as the first day of Little League season.
'Stepping into the box for the first time, feel like a kid on his birthday, like you're a kid again and the world is full of possibilities.'
AH yes, just as we all feel in the first day of Championship even in a year like this when there is an inevitability that Limerick and Dublin win it all out again. Trout went from that video to nailing the first home run on opening day.
But nobody was really talking about that last Thursday. Everything revolved around Trout's old team-mate, Shohei Ohtani, who moved across LA to the Dodgers and was made the highest-paid player in the history of American professional sport in the process, with a complex deal worth $700 million that includes deferred payments so his team doesn't break the spending cap.
Ohtani is considered the Babe Ruth of the modern age, in that he is both a pitcher and a slugger.
But, as many pointed out, baseball is a much different game to when its most famous player was at his peak. For the Japanese superstar to be able to do both in this day and age, and be among the best in the game in both, is truly extraordinary.
Until this season, Ohtani had spent his entire time in the US with the Angels, a franchise considered the poor relation to the more glamorous Dodgers.
Even with Ohtani and Trout, the Angels never even made the post-season, meaning the business end of the baseball season played itself out without the sport's biggest name.
Ohtani is the best player in baseball, many argue that he may be the greatest ever - not even Babe Ruth could pitch and hit with such sustained excellence at the same time.
He is a mega-celebrity in Japan where his every swing is documented on television. On Thursday, when he played his first home game for the star-studded Dodgers, it was Hollywood royalty in the shape of Bryan Cranston who announced his name to the expectant crowd.
But a cloud hung over Ohtani onopeningday. A week earlier, a story broke on ESPN that his name had been connected to wire transfers totalling $4million to an illegal bookmaker in California - one of 12 states in the US yet to legalise gambling.
The story goes that Ippei Mizuhara, Ohtani's long-time translator and confidante, had taken the money from the superstar's account, without his knowledge, to pay off his gambling debts. But the whole story makes everyone in baseball uneasy.
Gambling has dark connotations in baseball, going back to the Black Sox scandal of 1919 when 'Shoeless' Joe Jackson and seven other Chicago White Sox players were accused of accepting $5,000 each to throw the World Series against the Cincinnati Reds.
'Say it ain't so, Joe' remains an iconic phrase in American popular culture.
To now have their biggest star, the face of the entire sport, implicated in an unsavoury story like this did little for the credibility of a sport still trying to prove itself to be whiter than white considering its shady recent past which has seen some of its biggest names in the noughties implicated for steroid use.
Ohtani took the lead from the FAI playbook in how to deal with a crisis.
Last Monday he walked out for a press conference broadcast live on all major US news channels and took no questions, simply issuing a statement through a new translator.
'I never bet on baseball or any other sport. I have never asked someone to do that on my behalf. I never went through a bookmaker to bet on sports. Ippei has been stealing money from my account and told lies. I never agreed to pay off the debt or make payments to the bookmaker.'
It was remarkable the ease with which Ohtani was able to throw his one-time closest friend under the bus, but he clearly wanted to remove himself from the stench.
But, as American sports have wholeheartedly embraced betting, this should stand as a cautionary tale of how crippling this addiction can be.
ON this side of the pond, football, especially the Premier League, has snuggled up to the betting companies for years now and the chickens are coming home to roost.
We had the absurd situation of Ivan Toney, a self-confessed gambling addict, returning from a seven-month suspension for placing bets on football and wearing a betting company's name across his chest.
On the same evening that baseball had its opening day, further information emerged about Newcastle United's recent signing Sandro Tonali and the extent of his gambling problem, with the Italian placing bets on games in the days leading up to his current suspension.
Gambling is everywhere in sport and it is going to be difficult to extricate one from the other. Baseball's mythology is based around what can happen when the integrity of the sport is threatened with the 1919 World Series, and now, at a time when the sport is trying to make itself relevant in American life again, the biggest star that the sport has had in decades finds himself entangled in a gambling story.
As lovely as Mike Trout's words about opening day were, baseball, like all sport, lost its sense of innocence a long time ago. And there is no getting it back.

Graphic


Betting probe: Baseball's superstar Shohei OhtaniChildlike anticipation: Mike Trout is raring to go again

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



AN CAN train yourself to turn your night mares happy dreams; Those terrors that wake you in the early hours with heart pounding could have been passed down to you by previous generations of your family. But as an engrossing new book by a leading brain surgeon reveals... Ancient Egyptians had sleep temples to help them with important decisions
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; TEASERS; Pg. 20,37,41
Length: 2694 words
Byline: RAHUL JANDIAL
Body


DON'T panic! When we dream of cheating on our partner it doesn't necessarily mean we want to leave them, so said leading brain surgeon Professor Rahul Jandial in the first part of his fascinating book on the meaning of dreams, in Saturday's Irish Daily Mail. Today, in the second part of our series, he explains the therapeutic power of nightmares…
N
OVELIST Stephen King, the so-called 'King of Horror', was asleep on a transatlantic flight to London when he had a nightmare about an insane woman
who held captive and mutilated her favourite writer.
The result was the bestselling book Misery and later a film that won an Oscar for Kathy Bates for her chilling performance as the mad woman.
The Shining, director Stanley Kubrick's masterpiece with the unforgettably scary Jack Nicholson in the lead role, was similarly inspired. King and his wife were the only two guests in a mountain resort hotel as it was closing for the season. There he had a dream that his three-year-old son was running through the halls screaming as he was being chased by a fire hose.
The nightmare woke him up, sweating. King recalled lighting a cigarette and looking out the window: 'By the time the cigarette was done, I had the bones of the book firmly set in my mind.'
For him, these were the benefits that can come from nightmares.
This was not the case for Julia (not her real name), in a classic example of the harm nightmares can do that I came across while researching the whys and wherefores of those mysterious outpourings
we call dreams.
She was living a tranquil life by day, teaching yoga and spending her leisure time gardening and hiking. Yet for years she had horrific and violent dreams that seemed to come from nowhere, such as seeing her parents beheaded, or stabbing someone with a knife.
As she recounted in a US science podcast, she'd wake up shaking, the disturbing details difficult to forget. When the day began and some of the emotions of her grisly dreams faded, she couldn't help but reflect on the macabre scenes her brain could conjure at night.
Increasingly, the nightmare residue lingered. She would wake up shaky or with her face wet with tears. The following day she would be anxious, and the intense emotion of the nightmare would stay with her.
Julia was living a perplexing double life. Her days were filled with positive emotions built around habits of well-being, but her nights were filled with imagined violence. She was deeply troubled that such violent thoughts lurked within her. She couldn't understand why she was having these nightmares.
How could her dream life be so different from her waking life, and how could it turn so macabre? Where did these violent nightmares come from?
Some cultures attribute nightmares to evil spirits, demons and other malevolent beings.
Others, though, don't even have a term for nightmares, and instead consider them windows to the edges of consciousness. The truth is that nightmares, like dreaming, are the product of our brains. Ultimately, nightmares' dark visions are our own.
To many of us they are an unwanted side effect of sleep that fill us with heart-pounding terror and wake us up. You may dread them. They may haunt you. Each of us could probably name a nightmare that has recurred periodically throughout our lives, startling us awake and shaking us to the core the following day.
They shouldn't be confused with a bad or unpleasant dream, one in which, say, you miss a bus or have a row with a colleague. Nightmares are characterised by long, vivid, frightening dreams that
always wake us up.
They usually involve a threat to our survival, physical integrity, security or self-esteem, and they fill us full of dread. They can also produce intense feelings of fear,
anger, sadness, confusion and even disgust. By definition, nightmares also force us to vividly recall the frightening events.
Normal dreams tend to be more metaphorical than literal, while nightmares are often more literal than metaphorical. We are menaced in some real way - our dreamself comes under attack.
And whereas in dreams we can generally infer the motives and emotions of the other characters, in nightmares we lose this mindreading ability. Faced with a realistic threat from an unreadable foe, your sense of self is heightened. In nightmares, it is you versus an 'other'.
A popular and persistent myth says it's not possible to die in a dream, or that if you do you'll die in real life. The truth is you can
die in a dream but you almost always wake up before that happens.
We should not, though, underestimate the stress to our bodies caused by a nightmare as the amygdala, the part of the brain that processes emotional experiences, throbs with activation. Breathing becomes rapid and irregular, we may start sweating and our heart rate can spike alarmingly. One person's heart rate during a nightmare was recorded skyrocketing from 64 to 152 beats a minute.
Yet most nightmares leave no lasting mark on our bodies, even when their content is burned into our www.psyche.No matter how a nightmare disturbs you, shakes you or changes you, they remain to a
large degree a mystery. The source of thei r disturbing power is hard to pin down and quantify. They are a subjective, private, visual and emotional rollercoaster experienced during sleep and evaluated by our subjective consciousness when we're awake.
As far as scientists can tell, they are universal, and have always been part of the human condition. They are not an aberration, randomly
affecting some people and not others. Everyone has nightmares. They aren't limited by life experience, or diet, or age, or personal habits.
The gentlest of childhoods is no barrier against nightmares. Their themes are also not random but predictable.
The five most common themes across the world and over time are the same - failure and helplessness, physical aggression, accidents, being chased, and health-related concerns or death.
Nightmares are also much more heavily populated with unfamiliar characters than our normal
dreams, in which people we know tend to figure.
AT FIRST glance, nightmares make no sense. They are the most intense of our dreams and the hardest to forget.
They are unpleasant and don't appear to have any value for our waking life.
But troubling as they are, nightmares are not a glitch. They are vital to our development in ways you may never have imagined. They may even be beneficial, as they train the mind in ways lived experiences simply can't, helping to shape us and forge our egos. It is my belief they help us not only as individuals but as a species.
This begins in childhood, the period in our lives when we typically experience five times more nightmares than when we are adults. Across all cultures, children dream of monsters, demons and supernatural beings.
How can this be? How can children with little experience of the world and reared with love, who are nurtured and protected, still somehow conjure up monsters?
The answer is that nightmares proliferate at a time when children are getting their first sense of who they are in the world through an explosive growth in language and social interaction with family and friends. From the age of five, they are also having dreams in which they start appearing as figures in the story.
This is when nightmares begin - as we forge a sense of ourselves as
independent minds, separate from others. Research confirms this. In surveys, young dreamers say that when monsters attack them in their dreamscape, they feel these frightening creatures are trying to
invade their minds and their sense of self is threatened.
What is happening, however, is all just part of the natural process of their minds maturing and taking shape. And it's something we have to go through as we grow up.
In a nightmare the self faces some kind of outside, existential threat. It's essentially a battle of self versus other, and a powerful way to instil the notion in a child that they are separate beings with their own will and their own place in the world.
Nightmares cultivate young minds, and having done their job they fade for almost all of us as we move to adulthood. At around the age of ten, the number of nightmares begins to diminish. At 12, girls are more likely than boys to
have nightmares. Girls' nightmares tend to be dominated by humans and small animals as aggressors, while boys more often find themselves facing monsters and big animals. With adolescence, friends and social drama play a larger role in dreams, which become more sexual. Nightmares become less frequent, and in adults they may occur no more than once a month, generally brought on by stress and anxiety.
The themes of our nightmares also change as we transition to adulthood. The monsters of childhood recede, replaced by themes of fai lure, helplessness and strained personal relationships. But whether a nightmare is the
result of a monster or a sense of helplessness, one element remains the same through childhood into adulthood - the dream-self is always under threat.
Nightmares also have a capacity to endure by becoming lodged in the brain's neuronal architecture. Specific, terrifying scenes take root in the cerebral cortex and are encoded in a way that means the identical story can be recalled again and again.
Amazingly, it seems that we could be passing the scripts of
classic nightmares from generation to generation.
A clue to this is that most nightmares have nothing to do with daytime trauma but seem to follow well-worn narratives of terror and heart-pounding fear.
A wild beast is chasing us. We're falling off a cliff. We're being attacked. Are those scripts woven into our genetic code?
I believe nightmares have persisted as part of the human condition because of their utility. They're emphatically not some cerebral relic, an unnecessary appendage like the appendix, once useful and now just along for the ride. They serve a purpose.
Consider how much precious energy we expend on nightmares. Our bodies wouldn't do this if they weren't somehow useful.
The idea is not so far-fetched. Passing beneficial behavioural traits from one generation to the next is the central tenet of evolutionary psychology, which argues that behaviour is subject to the same natural selection as physical traits. Given that a predisposition for nightmares can be passed from parent to child, one can't help but wonder if our ancestors' dreams still ripple in some way through our sleeping minds.
FOR those who are troubled by frequent nightmares, the crucial issue is what they can do to minimise them and, preferably, stop them altogether. One common response is avoiding sleep. After all, you can't have a nightmare if you don't fall asleep. Unfortunately, this type of self-induced insomnia only further misaligns
our circadian rhythms, resulting in more nightmares.
There's also a danger of entering into an unhealthy spiral of nightmares and stress.
In the day after a nightmare, most people are more anxious and on a less stable mental footing. In one study, nurses had more nightmares after a stressful day and more stressful days after nightmares. It was a vicious circle.
To tackle recurring nightmares we first need to remember that dreams are an extraordinary act
of imagination. As our most elaborate dreams, nightmares are the ultimate imaginative act.
When we dream, our attention is turned inward and the imagination network in our brains is activated. But that doesn't mean it is operating autonomously - it is the product of our brain and affected by our state of mind. This means that we can play an active role in our dreams through autosuggestion, or dream incubation, to steer dreams in a certain direction.
This is how it works: as you go to sleep, simply make a verbal statement: 'I want to dream about X.' Better yet, create a mental picture of the person or question you want to dream about. You can also place a picture of who or what you want to dream about beside your bed.
Dreams are visual. Do any of these and you are speaking the language of dreams.
A calming bedtime ritual such as meditation or yoga is also thought to help, given how dreams reflect our emotional state.
If we change how we're feeling before we fall asleep, we are likely to prime our dreams.
Take the case of Julia, whose nightmare existence we examined earlier. After a lifetime of frequent, violent nightmares invading her otherwise peaceful life, at a friend's suggestion she went to see a therapist who taught her something cal led Imagery Rehearsal Therapy.
Its aim is to de-fang a nightmare by rewriting it. Nightmares, like all dreams, are the product of our
imaginations. The same imagination can be used to break their terrible spell. We can treat wild and dark flights of imagination with a sunnier version of the same tale.
For Julia, the therapy required her to think of a recurring nightmare she'd had and change the plot from one of violence and terror into something more pleasant, happy even. Then she had to repeat that story to herself while she was awake.
Julia decided to try this technique on a particularly upsetting recurring nightmare. Like many nightmares it starts as a normal dream, one in which she's walking in a picturesque town in southern
Spain with her best friend. Then bombs start falling, causing may TURN TO PAGE 41
IN TOMORROW'S MAIL WHY EVEN AS ADULTS WE STILL DREAM ABOUT OUR DREADED SCHOOL EXAMS
Continued from Page 37
hem and bloodshed. Julia and her friend run in panic, trying to escape, but never find a way out.
Using Imagery Rehearsal Therapy, Julia rewrote the script of her nightmare, adding sensory details such as smell, touch and taste.
The reimagined dream started the same, a walk in a beautiful Spanish town, but instead of bombs dropping on the old houses, she and her friend sat in a park full of flowers and beautiful old trees, feeling a
warm wind on their faces. Julia typed up the new, pleasurable version of the nightmare and read it to herself every afternoon for a couple of weeks, picturing it in vivid detail.
To begin with, she was sceptical. Could there really be such a simple solution to calm her nightmares?
But it worked. The nightmare vanished and her walk in the park became just that - a walk in the park.
She tried using this method on other nightmares that plagued her. In one where
a man followed her on an empty street at night, she reimagined it so that he was no longer out to harm her but was trying to return something she'd lost.
With the new plots, Julia's nightmares start the same way, but the ending is changed to one that is benign or pleasant.
In the four years since she undertook Imagery Rehearsal Therapy, Julia rarely has nightmares. Ultimately, the source of
her nightmares was never clear. She appeared to live a life largely free of the anxiety and stress that can trigger nightmares, she did not report being depressed, nor did she talk of trauma in her life, which can cause its own nightmares.
Her problem began as a child, and she may simply be one of those unfortunate people for whom the nightmares of childhood simply never go away, a cognitive process that burned brightly in her youth but, unfortunately, was never fully silenced.
It must have been a relief for her to find a solution - one, in fact, with a long history.
Ancient Egyptians built sleep temples where people would stay overnight in the hope of inducing dreams that might cure
an illness or help them with important decisions. In ancient Greece, too, people would go to special temples where they would pray for a dream that would solve a problem.
Today, research tells us that dream incubation like this is more than an antiquated practice built on faith - there's real science behind it.
Although by no means a foolproof process, simply by stating your intention to dream about a certain person or a particular subject, you can often nudge them in a different direction and rescript your most terrifying nightmares. © Rahul Jandial, 2024 l Adapted from This Is Why You Dream by Rahul Jandial (Cornerstone, (EURO)22.99).
all dreams, are the product of our  Place a picture of who you want to dream about by your bed How could her dream life be so different from her waking life? Terrifying scenes can take root in the cerebral cortex

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



AROUND THE GROUNDS: ALL YOU NEED TO KNOW ABOUT SATURDAY'S ACTION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 32,33
Length: 814 words
Byline: JOE BERNSTEIN a
Body


ASTON VILLA 2 WOLVES 0
YOU would be misguided to think the unfailingly polite Unai Emery is a soft touch, even if he lacks the growl and glare of his top-four rival Ange Postecoglou at Tottenham. Midfielder Morgan Rogers, signed from Middlesbrough in January, offered a fascinating insight into Emery's tough love after Villa doggedly overcame Wolves to stay in the box seat for automatic Champions League qualification. 'He likes to mention I'm a Championship player a lot,' said 21-year-old Rogers, somewhat surprisingly. 'He's trying to push me because he wants me to get to the next level and it's about showing me I can.
'That's the kind of relationship we have. It's motivational, not a negative thing. If I'm not 100 per cent at the level every day in training, he will be the first one to let me know.
'I wouldn't want to change that. He pushes me and I feel I'm getting better.'
Rogers was excellent on Saturday evening in only his second Premier League start and part of a Villa side who shook off a slow start to score in each half through Moussa Diaby and defender Ezri Konsa. The latter is on cloud nine after making his England debut against Brazil in the recent international break. Villa remain three points above Tottenham but face a tricky trip to Manchester City next and await news on top scorer Ollie Watkins, who was withdrawn at half-time after feeling discomfort in a hamstring. Emery hopes the medical advice not to take any risk will have averted a more significant injury. Wolves played well but lacked cutting edge without Hwang Hee-chan, Matheus Cunha and Pedro Neto. In their absence, 18-year-old Leon Chiwome was thrown in for his top-flight debut. Gary O'Neil's coaching ability has caught the eye of Manchester United and he can use that as leverage to try to persuade Wolves to build a deeper squad next season.
'Injuries have depleted us,' he admitted.
BOURNEMOUTH 2 EVERTON 1
IT HAS been an emotional time for Bournemouth's Ukraine defender Illia Zabarnyi who has enjoyed a transformative year for club and country. The 21-year-old played the full 90 minutes in the Euros play-off wins against Iceland and Bosnia, before returning to club duty and helping the Cherries beat beleaguered Everton. Zabarnyi has played every minute of his side's 29 league games this season and is thrilled to have helped war-torn Ukraine qualify for a major tournament. 'I am proud and our qualification was for all the people in Ukraine,' he said. 'They deserve it. When I played at the previous Euros I had only just started in the team, but now I feel established and I want to help show the world how Ukraine can play.'
Everton, meanwhile, have equalled their worst ever run of 12 Premier League games without a win and striker Beto, who scored the Toffees goal, said: 'There is a sad mood in the dressing room.'
TOM PRENTKI
SHEFF UTD 3 FULHAM 3
RAW emotion was evident after a dramatic second half which saw Sheffield United almost lose a game they should have won from 3-1 up. But for Blades striker Oli McBurnie, it went deeper. A key protagonist in the six-goal thriller, he revealed the battle younger brother Xander, 26, is facing after being diagnosed with Hodgkin's lymphoma. The former Bradford City academy prospect, now at nonLeague Buxton, is having chemotherapy. McBurnie said: 'My little brother got diagnosed with cancer a month ago and it puts everything into perspective. You think it's hard being at the bottom of the league but he does chemo every Friday - that's hard. We've got the best job in the world and my goal was for him. After defeats, you think it's the end of the world. It hurts but my brother is the strongest kid I know. He's fighting, so why wouldn't I fight on the pitch?' It is Liverpool away next for the rock-bottom Blades and McBurnie added: 'What is there to fear? Everyone thinks we're the worst team in Premier League history, so let's show that we're not.'
ROSS HEPPENSTALL
NOTTM FOREST 1 C PALACE 1
NOTTINGHAM FOREST'S Morgan Gibbs-White starred in this absorbing draw, notching a sixth assist of the season with a sublime cross for Chris Wood's equaliser. Everything good about Forest came through him, but his desire to be involved in every play saw him dragged out of his No 10 position at times. Spotting this, manager Nuno Espirito Santo dropped his star into a deeper quarterback role, where he was able to show off his impressive vision and passing array in the hunt for the leveller against Palace. It meant substitutes
Anthony Elanga and Gio Reyna stayed higher up the pitch, and allowed playmaker Gibbs-White to exert his influence. Wood took his league tally to 10 this season with a flicked header just past the hour mark, his sixth goal in seven games under Nuno.
After their four-point penalty, the creativity of Gibbs-White and goals of Wood will be crucial to Forest's survival bid over the last eight games.
DOMINIC HOGAN

Graphic


Packing a punch: Diaby celebrates his goal PA

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Arteta: We've shown we can take the heat
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 24
Length: 300 words
Byline: JACK GAUGHAN
Body


MIKEL ARTETA believes Arsenal have now proved they are capable of handling the heat of a Premier League title race ? but still wants more from his squad.
While the Gunners had only 28 per cent of possession against Manchester City yesterday, they restricted the defending champions to a handful chances in earning a deserved point.
Arteta insisted the draw showed how his side have become serious challengers. 'We are improving, we are competing better and we are understanding how to compete in these games,' he said.
'There's another step to make to win championships and that's that you have to win. Today were able to draw and we have to improve a lot still to win. 'The downside is that we had some situations to score. We didn't make the most out of it. The next step is to have composure with the ball.' Arsenal lost 4-1 at the Etihad during last year's run-in but nullified City this time in a display that showcased the defensive partnership between Gabriel and William Saliba. Arteta added: 'Eleven months ago we were here and the story was very different. You have to make steps as a team and we've done that. We still have many more to come. You want to win the game. You prepare to win it. If you cannot win it, make sure you draw it. We did that.
'City are the best team in the world, in my opinion, by far. They have the best manager in the world by far. To catch up and try to be better than them is the challenge ahead of us.' Pep Guardiola has seen City fail to beat any of the top five teams in league games this season, with Arsenal keeping two clean sheets in taking four points from the champions. But the City boss said: 'The numbers are here, but except for Arsenal away, in the others we were really good.
'Villa away (a 1-0 defeat) was the worst. The rest we've played really well.'

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Bang-average Blues too reliant on Palmer power
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 34
Length: 621 words
Byline: KIERAN GILL
Body


CHELSEA 2 BURNLEY 2
GREGG ERNST is credited with lifting the heaviest weight by any human. Two Ford Festivas including the drivers weighing 2,422kg in total, for those curious, with the Canadian, now 62, having warmed up for that record in 1993 by balancing two oxen on his back.
Someone ought to alert the adjudicators at Guinness World Records to the carrying that is being conducted by a 21-year-old Englishman at Stamford Bridge.
Cole Palmer has taken the tonnage of Chelsea Football Club on his shoulders this season and, thankfully for a stretched medical department, their £42.5million summer signing has shown no signs of buckling under the strain.
Manager Mauricio Pochettino admitted after this disappointing draw that when his team have nowhere to turn, their solution is to 'give the ball' to Palmer.
Palmer's back strength is in spite of a few Chelsea fans suggesting this was a 'spineless' showing against Burnley, who had to play the second half without defender Lorenz Assignon following his second yellow and manager Vincent Kompany after his red card for protesting.
Palmer gave them a 1-0 lead - a penalty from which he confirmed his status as the coolest man in Chelsea as he produced a
Panenka after waiting four minutes and 19 seconds for the refereeing team to get their act together - then the 10 men of Burnley made it 1-1 via Josh Cullen. Palmer made it 2-1 when substitute Raheem Sterling flicked the ball in behind for him to apply the finish, only for the visitors to equalise again through Ireland's Dara O'Shea.
It would be harsh to say the weight on Palmer includes more passengers than Ernst in those Fords. Chelsea's young players are trying to compete, but there is no escaping the naivety in the way they have surrendered leads in each of their last five home games. Right now, Palmer is one of a few making a ticket to Stamford Bridge appear less doomed than the one Abraham Lincoln picked up at the box office of the aptly named Ford's Theatre.
Palmer carries a calm demeanour, as if nothing irks him and never will, but speak to those who know him and they say he is not afraid to speak his mind. He was frustrated after seeing his side blow those two leads to Burnley, fronting up for the TV interviews while not hiding his disappointment in the dressing room either.
Neither did Pochettino, who is usually a picture of serenity post-match. Here, he accused his players of lacking the head and heart required to win this match.
'He scored twice and he is a good example for the rest,' Pochettino said of Palmer. 'From day one, he took responsibility for penalties, for the game. When you see the team struggles to find solutions, they give the ball to him to solve.'
Burnley never gave up, perhaps sensing a fragility in Chelsea. Even with 10 men, they created chances, with Cullen's strike the best of the bunch. Kompany avoided the media in the aftermath of his red card, instead leaving it to assistant Craig Bellamy, who suggested the league's youngest team are getting to grips with the challenge as we enter the season's final stages. CHELSEA (4-2-3-1): Petrovic 5.5; Gusto 6 (Gilchrist 87min), Disasi 6, Badiashile 6, Cucurella 6; Caicedo 6 (Sterling 73, 6.5), Fernandez 6.5; Palmer 7.5, Gallagher 5.5 (Madueke 62, 6), Mudryk 7; Jackson 5.5. Scorers: Palmer 44 (pen), 78.
Booked: Cucurella, Gallagher. Manager: Mauricio Pochettino 5. BURNLEY (4-4-2): Muric 7; Assignon 4, O'Shea 7, Esteve 6.5, Vitinho 6.5; Larsen 6 (Taylor 46, 6), CULLEN 8, Berge 7, Odobert 7 (Gudmundsson 70, 6); Amdouni 6 (Brownhill 46, 7), Foster 7 (Rodriguez 70, 6).
Scorers: Cullen 47, O'Shea 81. Booked: Assignon, Cullen, Esteve. Sent off: Assignon.
Manager: Vincent Kompany 6.5. Referee: Darren England 6.
Attendance: 39,535.

Graphic


Heart and soul: Palmer enjoys the moment after his first-half Panenka GETTY IMAGES

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Can a walk in the woods CURE ALL YOUR ILLS?; Well it can't hurt - and Dr Mark Rowe insists forest bathing and other nature-based immersion could be the key to living longer The little spring buds are making me feel true joy
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 16,17
Length: 1785 words
Byline: Lisa Brady
Body


KATE Garraway swears by it, Gwyneth Paltrow also dabbles and Justin Bieber gets high on a green supply.
Before you get any other ideas, I am referring to forest bathing, the practice of immersing yourself in nature - fully dressed, no soapy water is involved - as a way to find calm and increase the wellbeing in your life.
But don't be fooled into thinking this is a woo-woo fad made good by Hollywood and social media - this is one wellness trend that actually has kudos.
Forest bathing - or to use its Japanese name, shinrin-yoku - might sound a little wacky but it's far from it. The idea originated in Japan in the 1980s when, following a swathe of deaths from karoshi (overwork), Dr Quing Li brought stressed businessmen into the woods for therapeutic walks to help improve their health. The results were immediate - a slower pulse rate, lowered cortisol and blood pressure alongside increased feelings of vigour and vitality.
Today in Japan, soaking up the sights, smells and sounds of a natural setting to promote health is seen as so important, it's become a way of life. The Japanese government has spent millions funding research and promotion of it has become so commonplace it's even covered by most health insurance policies there.
Like the best things in life, it's free and accessible to all - yes, even us non-celebrity lay people - and it really does work.
I try it in the beautiful, tranquil setting of Mount Congreve Gardens in Waterford. I'm taking part in a wellbeing masterclass courtesy of Dr Mark Rowe, a GP, author and TEDx speaker.
He has been prescribing time in nature for his patients at his busy medical practice, Waterford Health Park, which is a stunning, converted old convent that even encompasses a Healing Garden in the cloister courtyard.
'Once I understood the science - as a medical doctor, everything I do has to be rooted in science - and experienced the benefits after struggling with burnout myself, I had to share it,' says Rowe, who additionally studied lifestyle medicine at Stanford, and now incorporates it into his medical remit as much as he can, from mindfulness to meditation, gardening and even strength training.
'I have a 15kg dumbbell in my GP office and it's a conversation starter for sure,' laughs Rowe. 'Strength training is so important, or muscle mass, for longevity.
'Movement is medicine,' he adds, citing a Smile study in Duke
University that showed how exercise was just as effective as antidepressants, although Rowe adds that of course, in some cases, medication may be indeed necessary and often saves lives.
He has, he says, 'a strong desire to support people to become more active participants in their own wellbeing' and thereby changing the culture of 'a pill for every ill'.
'I went off to Harvard and I met Herbert Benson, who founded the whole idea of mind/body medicine in the 1950s at a time when it was considered completely taboo,' he says. 'I learned about the relaxation response and I started seeing that happen and bringing it into my practice.'
As a result, Rowe is a big believer in the myriad health benefits that come with the great outdoors.
'Time in nature quietens the busyness of what I call the "merrygo-mind" with its always-on inner chatter,' he says.
'We have about 6,000 thoughts a day, and most of them are negative. These garden paths are a balm for the body and mind.
'Studies have shown the association between time spent in nature and the reduced risk of 15 chronic health conditions. For every extra 1 per cent of green space within 300m of where you live, you reduce the prevalence of mental health conditions by 4 per cent,' he continues.
In fact, there's a scientific term given for our biological need to connect with nature. It's called biophilia, coming from the Greek phrase meaning 'love of life and the living world'. Unfortunately, a lot of us today are experiencing the opposite, what Rowe refers to as 'nature deficit disorder', which is simply a lack of getting out and about in green spaces at all.
As we start our mindful walk at Mount Congreve's Dutch Steps - chosen by Rowe as an ideal starting point to 'step' into a more mindful experience - I'm starting to feel something shift already.
My phone on silent and firmly in my pocket, there's a quietening of sorts, my endless to-do lists retreating as I make a conscious effort to actually notice what's happening around me.
We are encouraged to use all five senses while we walk. From seeing the pink magnolia starting to bloom, the branching fractals of leaves in trees (which, incidentally, are similar in patterns to the neurons in our brains), from feeling the velvety moss underfoot, hearing all the birdsong, feeling the sunlight dappling on my skin and even tasting the rain in the spring air - it's a sensory adventure.
Rowe's often poetic musings alongside his medical observations and gentle encouragement make this ramble through woodland very special indeed. One particulary poignant stop is the final resting place of Ambrose Congreve, who died aged 104, which is in a temple overlooking his gardens and the River Suir below.
'Just focus on the the constancy of change, as the river flows - from the past, through the present moment and into the future, just like your life is a cycle of continuous changes, nature's continuously changing,' says Rowe, before guiding us mindfully to the next stop - viewing the river through a moon window.
Here, we are reminded about kindness and in particular how it can play a part in our health.
'Kindness starts in the heart, acts through your mind and is seen through your eyes, the window to your soul,' Rowe explains. 'So this idea is of looking through a window, what do you see and how does it make you feel?'
Again Rowe has science to back up his thinking, and cites the transformative paper of US environmental psychologist Roger Ulrich, who discovered that patients who were placed beside a window which overlooked a green space in hospital had substantially quick recovery times and needed less medication than those with a view of a brick wall.
At certain times we are also instructed to close our eyes and simply breathe, focusing on the sound bath of nature. Mindful breathing - or the pause method - is something Rowe loves to arm his own patients with and will often teach it to them in a regular consultation.
'What's interesting is how the breathing centre in the brain is so close to the red button, the amygdala. When you're breathing away, maybe 15 times a minute, we don't think about it as automatic. But we can consciously slow down our breathing to four or five breaths per minute, that can be an instant circuit breaker on stress.'
Other favourite parts of the walk included spotting a bright, colourful Chinese pagoda in the centre of an old quarry, the trickling sounds of a rock waterfall and coming face-to-face with a Coast Redwood, otherwise known as a Sequoia tree, which can grow up to 300ft high.
I'd never had myself down as much of a tree hugger but I couldn't help but feel a sense of overwhelm and awe for this majestic beauty. There's something very beneficial and connecting about feeling just a little bit tiny in the world sometimes, as Rowe explains.
'An awe experience is self-transcendent, meaning it shifts the attention away from ourselves, and makes us feel like we are part of something greater than ourselves,' he says. 'It's the small selfeffect compared to the vastness of nature around you - and there's a comfort and generosity in that.'
When walking back towards where we first began, we are encouraged to notice different elements on this journey - and I do, as nothing stays the same.
I feel a palpable sense of gratitude too, which is humbling and welcomed, just to be alive, to sense and see all of this.
It's nothing short of amazing, to the point where I'm wondering if there was anything mind-altering in the Kombucha I sipped before we set off.
The little spring buds trying desperately to be seen among freshlysmiling daffodils are making me feel something like true joy.
That's exactly what we are looking for, says Rowe, those micromoments of positivity, and although it helps, you don't have to be meandering through a forest to get the benefits.
'Nature now is basically going out in your garden, to the local park or wherever you might be,'
he says. 'If you see a lovely little plant or a flower, take a picture on your phone, so you can look back later on and remind yourself how you felt.
'You can have a little indoor plant, and keep a screensaver on your phone or your computer with a view of nature - this has all been shown to lower stress.
'There's so many ways we can continue more into the natural world and so we don't even need to go in for fancy forest therapy. Everybody, every day can stop and smell the roses a little bit more.'
When it comes to gardening, Rowe says it can be a life enhancer - and prolonger.
'It's that proverb - if you want to be happy all your life, plant a garden,' he says. 'I mean, the evidence is there.
'There's bugs in the soil called mycobacterium that have been shown to boost serotonin, which is one of the chemicals involved with confidence and feeling better in yourself.
'Gardening is a brilliant mindful hobby and a form of exercise as well. It's not coincidental that a lot of people that have a very keen interest in gardening, live long, healthy lives - that's been one of my little observations in my practice, anyway.'
Ireland currently faces many challenges - loneliness and obesity being hugely detrimental to our health, or social media in particular for youths and children, alongside our reliance on ultraprocessed food. However, Dr Rowe says the figures are good when it comes to life expectancy and that 80 is the new 50.
'In the early 1970s in Ireland, the average life expectancy was early 70s. Now it's 82, and there's lots of factors there, such as stopping smoking and medical advances but a lot of it is education and a more holistic approach to health. There's definitely a movement in this country to people being more proactive towards their health.'
As a doctor, Rowe is adverse to 'toxic positivity' and says it's important that young people especially understand that life is always going to throw you curveballs and bad days.
'It's about having a toolkit to help you,' he says. 'There's no point pretending everything is great or perfect, but we have some very powerful antidotes at our fingertips to help, if we just seek them out.'
? DR MARK'S next Wellbeing Masterclass at Mount Congreve, with talks and lunch, will take place on May 25.
Tickets at www.mountcongreve.com
EVERYBODY, EVERY DAY CAN STOP AND SMELL THE ROSES A LITTLE MORE I SUPPORT PEOPLE TO BECOME MORE ACTIVE IN THEIR OWN WELLBEING

Graphic


Taking steps for good health: Dr Mark Rowe

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Crackdown on shoplifters selling stolen goods online
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 597 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


GARDAÍ are to crack down on the trade in illegal goods that have been shoplifted and advertised for sale online.
Professional shoplifters are targeting shops with no security to pilfer specific goods which are now finding their way onto platforms such as Facebook Marketplace as well as other social media sites.
Some of the most stolen items include home cleaning supplies such as dishwasher pods and washing detergent. Many of these end up on market stalls and car boot sales, sources have said, although many of the big-ticket items are usually sold online.
These include cosmetics and baby supplies. Cosmetics are often some of the most stolen items due to their small size, making them easy to conceal. These are then sold in online sales portals by people who have created fake accounts.
Gardaí have warned that many of these vendors seem totally genuine, with accounts 'set up to look like official businesses'.
One source explained: 'What we have seen since Covid is an increase in the number of items being sold online, especially through Facebook Marketplace.
'People set up profiles during this time and are still active today. It makes them seem legitimate. It's not a new profile, it's someone who has been selling online for a long time.
'This makes them seem more legitimate to those buying the products as it's not a new account that has no interaction. What gardaí are now doing is working with retailers to try to catch these people. Of course, lists of products that are stolen are always taken by the investigating garda but these are now being collated and sent to officers who have been specifically tasked to find where these products are being sold.
'And it's people out there who are accidentally breaking the law.
You go online and you see washing-up tablets, for example, and they're half the price they usually are. You need to ask yourself why. The answer is usually that they are stolen and you've now purchased stolen goods.'
According to Meta, the company that owns Facebook, anyone with any information regarding stolen goods for sale should take screenshots and contact police.
Its policy reads: 'If you see an item on Marketplace that you think was stolen, we recommend that you contact your local law enforcement.
'When you contact your local law enforcement to file a police report, you may want to share: 'Screenshots of the listing and/or seller profile. Any messages you received from the seller.'
The news comes after shopkeepers urged gardaí to give them mugshots of convicted thieves to help them reduce the number of thefts.
Vincent Jennings of the Convenience Stores and Newsagents Association said that the financial loss to small shops could mean the difference between them staying in business and shutting their doors for good.
Mr Jennings also said that staff in retail businesses are being physically assaulted as well as subjected to vile racist and misogynistic abuse. He pleaded for more help to be given to these struggling businesses.
'If there's one thing that I noticed, there's a number of things that I can say. I think we really have a need to adopt a zero tolerance policy. I think that we really should be allowed to have the gardaí share images of convicted shoplifters, and most certainly, one of the things that could help is for a policy from the guards that they would return stolen property promptly,' Mr Jennings said.
Statistics released by the CSO last week showed that theft and related offences were up by 12%, or 8,169, to 74,144 incidents in the last quarter of 2023.
garreth.macnamee@dailymail.ie
'It makes them seem legitimate'

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Crime dining; Cartel boss Christy Kinahan posted hundreds of restaurant reviews while on the run with $5m bounty on head
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 11
Length: 333 words
Byline: Eirian Jane Prosser
Body


CRIME boss Christy Kinahan has been leaving restaurant reviews across the world - despite the $5million reward for his capture.
Kinahan, 67, one of the world's most wanted men, has posted hundreds of reviews on Google, rating restaurants, hotels and even a supermarket.
Yet the US State Department has placed a bounty on his head for drugs and arms trafficking.
The Dubliner's cartel, now headed by his son Daniel, has links to cocaine gangs in South America, jihadists in Asia and intelligence services in Russia and Iran. Under the alias Christopher Vincent, he has penned 200 reviews, with 1,100 photographs and four videos, since April 2019.
They were posted from South Africa, Hong Kong, Zimbabwe, Turkey, Belgium, Holland, Hungary, Egypt, Spain and Portugal.
In a five-star appraisal of the Steigenberger Alcazar hotel in Sharm El-Sheikh, where he attended a UN Global Humanitarian Conference, he said: 'I thought service was helpful and good as was the value for money.'
He added: 'I stayed for three days and whilst I didn't use any of the pools I did notice that there were families enjoying all facilities and evening entertainment.'
The Sunday Times said he would recommend the Aurea Ana Palace Hotel in Budapest 'without hesitation' and he would 'definitely return' to the Cycle Bistro on the Jumeirah coast of Dubai.
But a Covid testing centre, Lancet Laboratories in Johannesburg, got a one-star rating because of the 'contempt' he claimed management held 'us sheep in'. He blasted a Tim Horton's Coffee Shop in Dubai for 'soggy' biscuits and said service at PF Chang's in Dubai was 'a little tardy'.
The drug-trafficking cartel has long been the focus of various international police organisations. Kinahan and his two sons
Daniel and Christopher Jr fled from Marbella in Spain in 2016.
The Irish Government has lobbied for the return of the Kinahans to face justice, but there is no extradition treaty between Ireland and the United Arab Emirates.news@dailymail.ie
'The service was a little tardy'

Graphic


Customer is kingpin: Christy Kinahan, circled above, at Cycle Bistro in Dubai, which he rated highly

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



De Zerbi warns Brighton to match his ambition
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 31
Length: 357 words
Byline: NATHAN SALT
Body


ROBERTO DE ZERBI has warned Brighton they must show greater ambition to be sure of him staying for next season. De Zerbi's managerial future is being closely monitored by a number of clubs heading into the summer, with his admirers not limited to Liverpool and Bayern Munich.
The Italian has two years left on his contract at the Amex Stadium and revealed that, while it is not a foregone conclusion he will leave, it will come down to how ambitious owner Tony Bloom is with his plan for Brighton.
'What's the target? What are we playing for?' De Zerbi said, when asked what had given him doubts at the start of the season. 'I have already spoken with Tony and in the future we will speak about the next plan and the next season and to organise the next season and then we will find the solution. We both have to be happy (about the targets) - myself and the club.
'I have another two years on my contract and to work next season at Brighton I don't need to extend another year or another two years.
'I can stay, I can work at Brighton with an extension, without an extension, nothing changes. At the moment we've finished the discussion about the contract. But not because I've decided to leave, no, no. 'My focus is on Brighton for this season and next season - but next season, before starting that, I would like to speak and listen to the plan for the team. It's a serious thing.'
For Liverpool manager Jurgen
Klopp, there was immense pride at the calmness his players showed following the early setback of Danny Welbeck's goal.
'It was our best performance against Roberto's Brighton,' he said. 'More possession, better possession, and a really good rhythm in the game. The boys were really calm and I liked that a lot.'
On the prospect of winning the title, he added: 'It will be tough and, yes, it's sometimes nerve-wracking, my heart-rate will be 180 or 200 from time to time. But if we enjoy this all together, we have a chance. It's a great situation the boys have us in.
'We are there, up with two other teams, fighting for the biggest prize in English football and we'll see how it ends up. 'I've decided I will try really hard to enjoy it.'

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Does March 19 hold the clue?
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 39
Length: 206 words
Body


CHRISTOPHER Halliwell is serving life for killing Sian O'Callaghan and Becky Godden-Edwards, who were both abducted after leaving nightclubs in Swindon, Wiltshire.
Halliwell murdered Becky, 20, in 2003 and buried her in a field, where he led detectives after being arrested for the murder of office worker Sian, 22.
But a judge ruled the confession to Becky's killing breached police rules and was inadmissible. Her case was dropped in 2012 while Halliwell was convicted of Sian's murder. It took four years for him to be prosecuted for her murder after officers failed to follow up leads and tell prosecutors about old evidence, the Independent Office for Police Conduct found.
Ex-police intelligence officer Chris Clark and crime writer Bethan Trueman claimed in their book in 2021 that Halliwell could have had 27 more victims linked to the March 19 date - when Sian disappeared. It is significant for Halliwell as he was dumped then in the 1980s by an ex-girlfriend.
It is the date Claudia vanished, but DS Wayne Fox said Wiltshire Police and North Yorkshire Police 'reached a position in which we concluded it to be unlikely that Halliwell left the Wiltshire area, or was present in North Yorkshire, at the time of Claudia's disappearance'.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Driven to drink by prices; letters
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; LETTERS; Pg. 41
Length: 208 words
Body


IS Diageo's latest 6c increase in the price of a pint of Guinness an April Fools' joke? It will leave a bitter taste in the mouths of drinkers just as summertime arrives and with it the thirst for long, leisurely evenings and a pint of plain al fresco.
This latest increase, added to 12c and 4c increases in 2023, is enough to drive anyone to drink. The average price of a pint will rise to at least (EURO)5­.70 from April 15­. And as publicans' overheads have also increased, the price could exceed (EURO)6 in urban areas.
My late father described our family pub as 'an oasis of social interaction and erudite conversation'. His ideal customer was one who drank two or three pints of Guinness while enjoying the company of his fellow drinkers. When the price of the pint was increased, Dad reluctantly broke the bad news, placing the blame firmly at the door of Diageo, a tactical exercise in damage limitation. Despite the increase, the porter continued to flow.
Danny, a regular, was playing cards by the glowing fire when
Dad asked, 'Will you still follow the pint at the new price, Danny?' 'My dear man,' replied Danny, 'I'll follow it to Hell. Drinking the juice of the barley in such congenial company is priceless.'
BILLY RYLE, Tralee, Co. Kerry.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



England on fire as Scots put it up to the French
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 55
Length: 242 words
Byline: AOIFE ENGLISH
Body


CENTRE Helena Rowland has been ruled out for the rest of England's Women's Six Nations with a broken finger.
Rowland played through a leg knock in her side's 48-0 win over Italy in the opening round, but fractured her finger in the same match.
She did not feature in Saturday's 46-10 victory against Wales at Ashton Gate and has been advised that surgery will be needed.
Megan Jones and Tatyana Heard were paired in midfield against the Welsh and could now get further opportunities alongside Emily Scarratt.
In Saturday's other game, Scotland went down fighting in a 15-5 defeat in Edinburgh as France maintained their winning start to the tournament.
Looking to build on their narrow victory over Wales in round one, the hosts established a 5-3 lead when hooker Ellis Martin touched down six minutes before the interval.
Molly Wright came on to replace Martin, but she had only been on the pitch for seconds when she was injured in a tackle and, following a lengthy delay while she received treatment, she was taken off.
France responded better to the stoppage by quickly taking the lead through a Kelly Arbey try in the 53rd minute.
The visitors finished the game strongly and were rewarded when Emeline Gros crossed in stoppage time, denying Scotland the bonus point they deserved.
'It was really encouraging. We are going places. England here next. I know we will put in another performance that will make us all proud,' said Scotland head coach Bryan Easson.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Geri and husband all hugs and smiles at the races
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 300 words
Byline: Matthew Lodge
Body


AFTER weeks of scrutiny over the fate of their marriage, Chris-­ tian Horner and Geri Halliwell appeared in good spirits at the races on Easter Saturday.
The couple held hands as they watched their horse Lift Me Up compete at the Kimblewick Races in Buckinghamshire, as the fallout from Horner's sexting scandal continues. Ms Halliwell, 51, and the Red Bull Formula One (F1) boss were delighted when the horse - named after her 1991 solo chart topper - won its race. The former Spice Girl was pictured holding the trophy with husband Horner, 50, and posed with the horse and its jockey, Jack Edwards.
Formula One has been rocked by the allegations of inappro-­ priate behaviour against Horner, made by a female colleague at Red Bull. Netflix has said it will cover the furore in the next Drive To Survive series.
The Red Bull team principal, who shares son Monty, seven, with Ms Halliwell, has since been cleared of misconduct by an independent panel and has denied wrongdoing.
But he remains under scrutiny after 79 screenshots of text messages between him and what appeared to be a female colleague were leaked in an email received by FIA president Mohammed Ben Sulayem and F1 boss Stefano Domenicali.
Horner's accuser has been suspended by Red Bull, sparking fury from campaign groups who claim 'women just don't have confidence that their complaints will be investigated properly'. Ms Halliwell has backed her husband throughout the ordeal and made a high-­profile show of support at both the Bahrain and Saudi Arabian Grand Prix last month.
Last week James Gay-­Rees, the producer of Drive To Survive, told the Daily Telegraph that the scandal 'will have to be referenced in some capacity' in the F1 documentary, adding: 'It's about treading that line to keep everybody happy.'
'They were holding hands'

Graphic


Delight: The couple's horse wonHorsey Spice: Geri Halliwell at Kimblewick Races

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Gritty Gunners show they have finally escaped Pep's psychological stranglehold
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 22,23
Length: 1325 words
Byline: OLIVER HOLT
Body


MAN CITY 00
ARSENAL
THE daffodils that crowd the central reservation of Princess Road, the artery that flows into Manchester from the south and skirts Moss Side and Manchester City's old home at Maine Road, are beginning to fade and wilt, the clocks have gone forward and, today, April is upon us.
It is the season of rebirth and English football is waiting for Pep Guardiola's side to put the hammer down and accelerate away from the rest of the field at the top of the Premier League because that, too, has become one of the rites of spring in the age of sky-blue domination.
City have not lost for 117 days so they are doing their bit but there is something different about this year. For all their usual indomitability, they cannot see their rivals in the rear-view mirror yet. Because something else has changed, too. Arsenal are not going away.
Sure, if anyone 'won' this dour 0-0 stalemate at the Etihad yesterday, it was Liverpool. If Jurgen Klopp was delighted at the end of his team's 2-1 win over Brighton a couple of hours earlier, he was even happier when this draw between his team's closest rivals left Liverpool two points clear at the top.
This game was enthralling at times and turgid at times. And if it was rarely thrilling, it was still a high-quality match between two sides who looked so nervous of the consequences of losing that they were unwilling to commit everything to winning.
City were the more positive side, of course. Arsenal retreated to a low block and challenged City to break them down. 'When they hardly allow you to enter the box,' Guardiola was asked in the press conference after the match, 'what's the solution?'
Guardiola barely missed a beat. 'Kill someone?' he said.
Short of utilising that option, City probed and probed at the Arsenal defence without being able to find a way through.
Still, Guardiola was far from disheartened. He spoke eloquently afterwards about the inevitability of other sides closing the gap on City year-on-year, but when he was asked who of the top three were playing at the highest level, he was unhesitating. 'Man City,' he said.
It was way too early for it to be a title decider but Arsenal stopped City scoring at home for the first time in more than two years. It showed a different dimension, a different level of grit and character in Mikel Arteta's team. It will have left Liverpool and Arsenal more encouraged than Guardiola's men.
At this stage last season, don't forget, Arsenal's title challenge crumbled. They had lost 3-1 to City at the Emirates in February and then capitulated 4-1 to the champions here in April. If there was one thing to take away from this game, it was that the gap between these teams has now narrowed significantly.
Arsenal beat City at the Emirates in October and kept another clean sheet here. They have snapped the losing pattern against City and released themselves, for now, from Guardiola's psychological stranglehold. After the game, Arteta talked City up. 'They are the best team in the world by far and they have the best manager in the world by far,' said the Arsenal boss.
'To get anything here, you have to ask, "Are you ready to follow 30 passes and then when you lose the ball are you ready to follow 30 passes again?"' Arsenal, who had won all eight of their Premier League games in 2024 before this match and are still in the hunt to win the Champions League for the first time, look way too good a side to crumble now.
That is partly down to the presence of Declan Rice and William Saliba, who was injured for Arsenal's run-in last season. Arsenal parked the bus yesterday and they parked it meticulously and efficiently. Even City could not find a way through.
And so the run-in quickens. Some say City have it easiest but it is hard to pick when you analyse the fixtures of the top three. So many games have hidden dangers at this stage of the season. Liverpool have the advantage because they have the points on the board.
There were enthralling contests everywhere at the Etihad, notably between Rodri and Rice, who were, by some distance, the best players on the pitch.
Gabriel marked Erling Haaland out of the game, Ben White even managed to wear down the brilliant Bernardo Silva in a war of attrition. That was generally Arsenal's modus operandi: they wore City down. City had begun the match still ruing the loss of players who suffered injuries during England's international break. Any team, however deep their squad, are going to feel the absence of defenders of the importance of John Stones and Kyle Walker. City were also without goalkeeper Ederson again, even though there had been hopes he would be fit.
Gabriel Jesus, playing against his old club, was fortunate to escape a booking inside the first three minutes for a cynical foul on Silva after the Portugal midfielder had slalomed through the Arsenal defence. A few minutes later, Jesus nearly made an impact at the other end, peeling away from Manuel Akanji at the back post, taking a cross on his chest and volleying just wide.
City came close to scoring after 15 minutes when Kevin De Bruyne swung in a corner to the congested near-post area and
Nathan Ake rose highest amid the hordes. Ake was only four yards out but he did not get the cleanest contact on his header and it hit David Raya on a knee before the keeper gathered the ball gratefully.
If City had not been deprived of enough defenders already, Ake limped off to be replaced by Rico Lewis. City's patience began to be tested as Silva and De Bruyne were subjected to a series of fouls and Anthony Taylor's yellow card remained resolutely in the referee's pocket.
Half-chances were few and far between. One clever Arsenal move found Jesus on the edge of the City area but he dragged his shot across Stefan Ortega and wide. The other side of half-time, Mateo Kovacic curled a shot just wide of Raya's left-hand post.
Seven minutes into the second half, though, there were the first signs that the match was coming alive. When Josko Gvardiol lost the ball deep in his own half, Martin Odegaard worked it quickly to Bukayo Saka and Saka slid it across goal. It only needed a touch to finish it off but Jesus, sliding in at the back post, could not quite apply it.
City tried to hit back and Arsenal cut them down with a quick-fire series of fouls that particularly enraged De Bruyne, who waved three fingers in the referee's face to suggest he should show three yellow cards.
After an hour, Guardiola went for it. He brought on Jack Grealish for Kovacic and Jeremy Doku for Phil Foden, who had a quiet game. Arteta reacted with two like-for-like substitutions, bringing on Thomas Partey for Jorginho and Takehiro Tomiyasu for Jakub Kiwior.
Ironic cheers rang around the ground midway through the half when Taylor finally brandished a yellow card, booking Jesus for kicking the ball away. Jesus appeared to find his caution bitterly funny, as if Taylor had told him a bad joke. His yellow card was long overdue.
Six minutes from the end, it seemed City might be about to break the deadlock at last.
Gvardiol flicked on a corner at the near post and Haaland ran on to it at the far post. Raya came out to try to block a shot but Haaland seemed to miskick the ball or anticipate a challenge from the goalkeeper that never came.
The Norwegian failed to make contact with the ball. It was the game's last chance.
THE RUN-IN
LIVERPOOL: P29, 67 POINTS
REMAINING PL FIXTURES: Sheffield United (H), Manchester United (A), Crystal Palace (H), Fulham (A), Everton (A), West Ham (A), Tottenham (H), Aston Villa (A), Wolves (H).
ARSENAL: P29, 65 POINTS REMAINING PL FIXTURES: Luton (H), Brighton (A), Aston Villa (H), Wolves (A), Chelsea (H), Tottenham (A), Bournemouth (H), Manchester United (A), Everton (H).
MAN CITY: P29, 64 POINTS REMAINING PL FIXTURES: Aston Villa (H), Crystal Palace (A), Luton (H), Brighton (A), Nottingham Forest (A), Wolves (H), Fulham (A), Tottenham (A), West Ham (H).
«
RICE AND RODRI'S BATTLE ROYAL: GO TO PAGES 4-5

Graphic


ARSENAL goalkeeper David Raya (above) blocks City defender Nathan Ake's close-range header and (below) in a game of few clear-cut chances, Gunners striker Gabriel Jesus can't get on the end of Bukayo Saka's cross MISS 2Old pals: Arteta (left) and Guardiola embrace SHUTTERSTOCK

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Harris boost for students who work while at college; Parting gift from Higher Education Minister before taking the top job
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 6
Length: 870 words
Byline: John Drennan
Body


HIGHER Education Minister Simon Harris has a final gift for college students before he becomes taoiseach - they'll soon be able to work more without losing out on grants.
Currently, students can earn up to (EURO)6,552 a year without it affecting their grant payments, but this will increase by (EURO)1,373 to (EURO)7,925 under proposals from the new Fine Gael leader.
A senior Government source told the Mail: 'The increase is designed to help small businesses and students and will see students eligible to earn more without it affecting their grant.
'It will rise from (EURO)6,552 to (EURO)7,925 allowing them to work more.'
The source also outlined a programme of priorities that will be closely monitored by Cabinet ministers ahead of an expected reshuffle.
They said: 'Minister Simon Harris intends to prioritise several key initiatives as taoiseach including law and order, with additional supports for gardaí, the rollout of body cams, and tougher sentencing laws. He also wants to see a reduction in the cost of childcare, including fasttracking legislation to extend childcare supports to childminding in the home. And further reductions in the cost of education, with some measures for third-level students.'
The source added: 'Housing and health will be key features. There will be also be a focus on farming and small businesses as two areas which will need significant support across the remainder of the year.
'The Fine Gael leader has been engaging with parliamentary colleagues across the country and will meet the Agricultural and Business committees of the party next week.'
They said Enterprise Minister
Simon Coveney will be asked for 'direct proposals on supporting businesses within the first six weeks in office.'
The request will add to speculation that the ministerial career of Mr Coveney is 'hanging by a thread', while Helen McEntee's status as Justice Minister is also under 'serious threat', senior figures within Fine Gael believe.
Uncertainty about Mr Coveney's future has been exacerbated by the promotion of his key adviser, former Newstalk presenter Chris Donoghue, to Government press secretary.
One source close to the Fine Gael power game said: 'It's been a week, and he has already given Coveney's deputy leadership job to Heather [Humphreys] and poached Simon's chief adviser. If that is not telling Simon he will soon be sleeping with the fishes, I don't know how many more signals are needed.'
There are concerns about moving someone of Mr Coveney's seniority, but one source said that Harris 'needs a display of authority and to show things will not continue as before.
'Leo lost momentum from the moment he kept the old guard.'
One Fine Gael source warned: 'The reshuffle will be an interesting test of his temperament. If Harris does not make changes, this is the moment where the spell will be broken.'
Apart from Mr Coveney, those who are believed to be in greatest peril are Ms McEntee and Government Chief Whip and
Super Junior Minister Hildegarde Naughton.
Anger is especially high over Ms McEntee, with her colleagues unhappy at her proposals on hate-speech legislation and her handling of crime in Dublin city.
'McEntee has done more damage to Fine Gael than any justice minister in living memory,' one party source said.
'There is going to have to be a change of emphasis in Justice. We need to chase the votes of those who might vote for Fine Gael as distinct to the votes of those who will never vote for us.'
They added: 'We need to get back the disengaged Fine Gael base. Simon knows Helen McEntee won't do that.'
Another senior source predicted: 'There has to be a head but one (Coveney) might be enough. Helen might get away with a snub or demotion. Maybe back to European Affairs to make way for Jennifer Carroll MacNeill.'
Ms Carroll MacNeill, along with Longford-Westmeath TD Peter Burke, are the favourites to be promoted to the Cabinet.
One source said: 'Simon is going to prioritise youth. He is looking to figures like Jennifer and the juniors, Alan Dillon and Emer Higgins.'
Josepha Madigan's decision to quit, combined with the expected promotions of Peter Burke and Ms Carroll MacNeill, means that Mr Harris has three junior ministerial posts available.
One source noted: 'The destination of the third will be interesting. Youth and idealism can have its fling but if Simon is seeking an enforcer, that requires a different CV to tweeting out
Instagram photographs.'
There has been speculation that Mr Harris is considering annexing Heather Humphreys' Rural and Social Affairs ministry as a campaigning vehicle.
One source said: 'It would be the perfect campaigning vehicle, Simon going around the country opening community and play centres five days a week.'
However, a Fine Gael TD warned against that, saying: 'Taoiseach or not, Heather would scratch his eyes out.'
A senior Fine Gael figure close to the new leadership team warned: 'Nothing is set in stone when it comes to the cabinet. The new leader's priorities have been to stabilise the Government, re-engage with the party and prepare for a defining Ard www.Fheis.No decisions will be made about the Cabinet until that firefighting is done.'
news@dailymail.ie
'She would scratch his eyes out' 'McEntee is under serious threat'

Graphic


Change: Simon Coveney, left, and Simon Harris at the Easter Rising ceremony yesterday

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Harris has a tough task proving he is a new broom
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 12
Length: 1115 words
Byline: dermot ahern
Body


NOW that the dust from the Leo Varadkar earthquake has settled, the reality of post-Leo life is beginning to dawn on anyone interested in politics. Will Simon Harris represent a change?
Varadkar came in thinking he and his younger Fine Gael cohort would sweep all before them. However, reality kicked in very quickly. It's not a bed of roses, being in Government. One has to make hard decisions that will not go down well with some sections of the population.
That will certainly test Harris's resolve. It is often said that he has a history of liking to be all things to all men and women.
Varadkar soon learned that life in Government is a rollercoaster. Great one day, awful the next. Plus, he was hit by suckerpunches such as Brexit, Covid, and war breaking out in Ukraine, to name but a few.
Ageist Will Harris fare any better? While he was crowned with universal acclaim among the Fine Gael faithful, it will quickly dawn on him that, more than any recent taoiseach, he has a tough job ahead of him to prove he is fit to lead this country.
Without being ageist, I get the feeling from talking to people that many feel he may be too young and inexperienced for the job, at least at this stage.
Political history shows it is preferable for rising politicians to get experience before they ascend to high office.
Many political careers have failed due to talented but inexperienced politicians being plucked out of nowhere without sufficient experience. Previous taoisigh tended to favour TDs who had done their time before making them ministers.
Harris certainly has ministerial experience. There's hardly a better grounding in difficult politics than a stint running the Department of Health.
But it's often said that a minister needs experience in charge of an economic department before being considered for the top job.
Granted, Harris did two years as a junior minister in Finance, with responsibility for the Office of Public Works. But that's hardly being immersed in high finance.
Given that he has 12 months to prove himself, at most, it will be a tall order for him to get Fine Gael back to the heady days of the early Enda Kenny era.
It's all very well rousing the Fine Gael faithful at party meetings. It's quite another thing to convince the rest of the floating vote that he is a new broom.
People thought Varadkar was that, but ended up disappointed. Indeed, Harris's main target should be those voters who have recently tended to float between Fianna Fáil and Fine Gael. Remember 'Big' Phil Hogan who, following the financial crash, pleaded with disaffected and disillusioned Fianna Fáil voters to 'lend' their vote to Fine Gael? Well, a good few of those votes have drifted back to Fianna Fáil, mainly due to the assured performance of Micheál Martin.
Harris has the difficult job of demonstrating to Middle Ireland that he is a better bet than the tried and trusted Micheál.
And he has to halt the exodus of Fine Gael TDs. Not an easy task. Nearly one-third of its TDs are retiring. Many will have already made up their minds and nothing Harris can do will change their decision - not even the promise of ministerial office. Indeed, if he were to try that it would cause ructions in his parliamentary party.
And, he also has to handle the difficult task of a Cabinet reshuffle. Will it be a relatively conservative one? Or will he make his mark from day one?
Varadkar surprised and annoyed many by doing the bare minimum when it came to Cabinet formation. Already, there is clear leaking that certain incumbents are for the chop. You know the leak is coming directly from anonymous Government sources when you see what particular media organ the story appears in - or what particular journalist is running with it.
That type of leaking, in itself, can cause reverberations well after the new government is formed. Harris has to watch his political back, while at the same time giving younger TDs some hope for their futures.
In the next 12 months, he will have to tour the country gladhanding the Fine Gael faithful, something which, by all accounts, Leo did not do well enough.
He also has to make his mark from a policy point of view. Already, we have leaks from sources close to Harris that he wants a few budgetary sweeteners - especially for small businesses - delivered earlier than Budget Day in October.
However, he will come up against tough opposition from officials in the Department of Finance, who have a pathological hatred of budgetary announcements being made outside of Budget Day.
While Fianna Fáil Finance Minister Michael McGrath has made soothing remarks in this respect, I doubt it will be enough to convince voters that Harris has made a difference. Indeed, there is a danger that if it were to be done solely for small businesses, and not the rest of the voters, such a pre-emptive move could backfire on the Government politically.
Hamstrung Indeed, Fine Gael's Paschal Donohoe will not be much help in this regard because, since he capitulated to Harris in the Fine Gael leadership stakes, his star has been somewhat on the wane.
Generally, when it comes to policy, Harris is hamstrung by the insistence of both Micheál Martin and the Greens' Eamon Ryan that the Programme for Government agreed with Leo Varadkar cannot be changed.
While Ryan and the Greens might make sweet noises in order to be seen as helpful to Harris, you can take it that they will not be for budging.
And why would they, especially if the result could assist Fine Gael's rise, and therefore weaken their own electoral chances?
And all the while, Harris will be leading a Government that still has to make its mark on ongoing problems such as health, housing, homelessness and immigration. One way or the other, we can expect that Harris will make a big attempt to claw back Fine Gael's rather tarnished recent performance in the law-and-order area to keeps supportive Independent TDs on side.
Harris has more than enough on his plate over the next months, without having to spend a lot of time rejuvenating his own party. And then there is always a crisis that comes out of left field. And we've had a few of them recently.
So Simon Harris is between a rock and a hard place. Does he try to show, between now and the general election, that he can make a difference? Or does he play a long game by just treading political water?
A lot will depend on the outcome for Fine Gael of June's local and European elections.
They could be difficult for Fine Gael. Most likely Harris's elevation will not give the party a bounce in Europe. That will mean that Fine Gael TDs, in turn, will be nervous about their own political skins on the way to the general election.
There will be an interesting few months ahead.

Graphic


Tough job: Simon Harris enjoys a coffee break, but there isn't much rest ahead for him

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Harte puts Dubs on spot; Derry can now dream big as veteran manager inger inspires brilliant win
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 52,53
Length: 1065 words
Byline: MICHEAL CLIFFORD
Body


NFL DIVISION 1 FINAL
DUBLIN 2-21 AET Derry win 3-1 on pens 3-18 DERRY
IN the end, it took a lottery to deliver justice. And if history truly rhymes, Derry have good reason to dream big this year, and beyond.
Twenty-one years after winning his first national league title, Mickey Harte won his second yesterday, but even in his storied career, he had never won a game like this.
History will record that his team prevailed in a penalty shootout, but the reality was his team won the same game of ball four times over, before they went and pulled out the winning ticket.
In that, there is both comfort and concern for Derry but ultimately this was one of those rare and giddy football days in Croke Park that invited only one question. Crisis? What crisis?
This is what the game can look like when released from its straitjacket by the two best teams in land, both cemented in the belief that ball in hand rather than magnets on a tactical board is still the best way to win a game of ball.
In the process, they offered up a game infected by chaos and sauced with such cliff-hanging drama, it felt more like a Netflix bingefest series than a game of ball.
Even so, it had one pervasive plot line that ran right through; Derry kept getting to the finishing line, but Dublin, somehow, kept moving it.
With the exception of half-time, when Dublin arrived at the interval level (1-7 to 0-10) having played into the hellish breeze at the Hill 16 end, this was always Derry's to lose.
They dominated the secondhalf to such a degree that they created half a dozen goal chances but in taking only two - a converted penalty and the first of two sublime finishes by the outstanding Eoin McEvoy in the third quarter - they kept Dublin in it.
And for all their serial success, what astonishes about the champions is just how instinctive their survival skills are.
Out of sorts and out of shape for long periods, when normal time came down to its final play, all that was asked off Derry as they led by a point, 2-16 to 1-18, was to hold on to a short kick-out to kill the clock, but somehow John Small managed to flick the ball out of Donncha Gilmore's hands and set up a play that ended with Conor Doherty fouling Dublin's excellent full-back Cian Murphy for a match-saving free.
In extra time, when McEvoy nailed his second goal, Derry moved four clear (3-18 to 1-20) with seven minutes left on the clock, to set up a frantic finale in which it appeared as if Dublin had lost their heads, with Brian Fenton seeing a seeing a straight red and Paddy Small following him with two cautions.
But it was Derry that would lose a lead after dropping a ball into the square on a wing and a prayer, which somehow substitute Gary McEaney answered by getting his hands on the ball and finding enough wriggle room to fire high into the roof of the net.
Which meant that even after missed kicks from Con O'Callaghan (hit the crossbar)
and Lorcan O'Dell (saved by Odhran Lynch), the expectation was that they would still find away to trip up Derry, despite McGuigan, Conor Glass and Ethan Doherty all being foot-perfect from the spot.
In the end, Tom Lahiff rolled his effort against the post and this crazy thing was done, but the sense is that is more the start than the finish of something.
Dublin have sustained themselves in the recent past by feeding off the rivalries of those who were almost their equals in Mayo and Kerry, and it is likely they will see Derry as the same.
This was their fourth meeting inside 12 months with the battle of the tape now set at two wins apiece, and the sight of them engaged in a couple of late melees suggests that both now recognise that they are a long way down the road to becoming the best of enemies.
More than the silver pot Derry picked up yesterday, it was who they wrestled it away from that furnished it with true value.
Dublin, after all, are not in the habit of losing national finals in Croke Park. Including the breakthrough 2011 All-Ireland win, up until yesterday, in league and championship, they had played in 17 national finals with the 2017 league final defeat to Kerry the only time they had to stand on the Croke Park pitch and watch as their opponents thanked them for the game and the cup.
Harte is around long enough to ensure that Derry will not be losing the run of themselves on the basis of this, but more than the trophy, the team he inherited needed more than anything to win big in Croke Park.
All-Ireland semi-final defeats to Galway and Kerry sandwiching a Division 2 league final mauling from Dublin last year raised questions as to if they really do have the head for heights?
If nothing else they buried that here because they did not just beat an in-form Dublin here, they beat an in-form Dublin team who wanted to win.
What will nag at them is that despite being so clearly the better team, they made such a struggle out of it.
All the top individual performances were on their side, with Conor Glass, Brendan Rogers, Ethan Doherty, Odhran Lynch and Lachlann Murray - the scorer of three sublime points - all pushing McEvoy for the manof-the-match performance, and yet they failed to find separation on the scoreboard.
It is likely privately Dessie Farrell will welcome the contradiction to the narrative that the championship was theirs to lose, and will take his comfort that when you are playing poorly and still drawing, there are worse places to be. And perhaps that is fitting on an afternoon when there really were no losers.
DUBLIN: E Comerford; C Murphy, E Murchan (T Clancy, 80), S McMahon (C O'Connor, HT, ET); J Small, B Howard, T Lahiff; B Fenton, K McGinnis (P Mannion, 53); S Bugler (G McEneaney, 87), C Kilkenny, R McGarry (K O'Gara, 70); N Scully (L O'Dell, 57), C O'Callaghan, C Basquel (P Small, 57).
Scorers: C O'Callaghan 0-5 (5f), C Basquel 1-1, G McEneaney 1-0, R McGarry, C Murphy, T Lahiff, and K O'Gara 0-2 each, B Howard, S McMahon, S Bugler, K McGinnis, N Scully, P Small, P Mannion (free) 0-1 each.
DERRY: O Lynch; C McCluskey, C McKaigue (D Cassidy, 80&1), D Baker; C Doherty, E McEvoy, P McGrogan (G McKinless, HT, N Toner, 53); C Glass, B Rogers; P Cassidy (D Gilmore, 70), C McFaul, E Doherty; N Loughlin (C Murphy, 66), S McGuigan, L Murray (E Bradley, 78).
Scorers: E McEvoy 2-2, S McGuigan 1-4 (1, 1 M), L Murray 0-3 ( 1M), N Toner, N Loughlin, C Glass ( 145) 0-2 each, E Doherty, B Rogers, C Doherty 0-1 each. Referee: C Lane (Cork).

Graphic


Intense: Derry and Dublin players clash in yesterday's final in Croke Park (left); Derry goalkeeper Odhran Lynch saves a penalty from Lorcan O'Dell of Dublin during the shootout (above) and delighted Derry manager Mickey Harte celebrates victory (right)

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



If this is what the 1980s were really like, maybe they're best forgotten!
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 47
Length: 446 words
Byline: CHRISTOPHER STEVENS
Body


TEENAGERS, on no account hang on to your diaries and journals as you grow up. Bin them. If you don't, one day you will surely suffer an excruciating embarrassment ... hearing someone read your adolescent poetry aloud.
Few things can be more blood-curdling. It's bad enough if your mum discovered those verses when you were 17 - how much worse would it be if your own children found them 30 years later?
You can only feel pity for Dante (Levi Brown), whose inner poetry voice supplies the narration for This Town (BBC1), a coming-of-age drama set amid the ska music scene of Birmingham and Coventry in the early 1980s.
'I love you baby, I can't quite say it/ If I had a heart I'd bloody play it,' he inwardly recites, mooching heartbroken around the streets of Handsworth after a girl at college turned down his plea for a date.
As he wanders into a street riot, with cars on fire and bricks flying, the doggerel continues: 'Before I saw you, I didn't know it/ But now I discover I'm not a bad poet.'
Thankfully, at this point someone lobs a petrol bomb in Dante's direction. You can't say he didn't deserve it.
Steven Knight, the 65-year-old creator of Peaky Blinders, intends this six-part drama as a fond celebration of the West Midlands, where he spent his adolescent years. He's got some funny ideas about nostalgia - what he remembers most affectionately is the violence and the crime. That explains why he revered his fictional gangster clan, the Shelbys.
Dante's brother Gregory (Jordan Bolger) is caught up in another riot, on the Falls Road in Belfast. Both young men are daydreamers, with a tendency to forget the fighting and listen to birdsong instead.
Meanwhile, their cousin Michael, a champion Riverdancer in Coventry's insular Irish community, is being dragged into IRA activity by his leather-coated father, Eamonn (Peter McDonald), who is more interested in the money-making potential of organised terror than the bombing.
You might feel, with some justification, that the troubled home life of terrorists and their families is a dubious choice for a BBC drama. Knight is good, though, at depicting the moral complexities of lives caught up in violent crime without always glorifying it (though certainly he sometimes does).
Dante, Gregory and Michael are all mad about music, and there's a strong soundtrack from Desmond Dekker, UB40, Toots and the Maytals, and other reggae acts of the era.
There are flashes of bitter humour, too: a riot girl setting her petrol-drenched sleeve ablaze when she lights a joint, children laughing as a squaddie aims his rifle at them and shouts, 'Bang-bang!'
But if this is the best nostalgia 1981 has to offer, maybe it's best forgotten.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Ireland blow a golden chance; More positive signs from Bemand's team bm but errors allow Italians to take command
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 54,55
Length: 1010 words
Byline: RORY KEANE
Body


NOT a day of resurrection for this Irish team, but another performance which suggested that better days are ahead.
Scott Bemand's side will be kicking themselves when they pour over the tape of his performance. They finished with a final tally of three tries, but they left at least three others out on the pitch. This is Test rugby and such profligacy will be punished by proper teams like Italy.
The grim post-match stat of 27 handling errors tells its own story. You simply can't make that many mistakes at this level.
The visitors were cannier, tougher and, ultimately, more experienced. And it showed.
There will be no shortage of Irish regrets. They began this Six Nations encounter in top gear and finished like a runway train, camped on the Italian line chasing a late match-winning try.
It was the middling second and third quarters that nuked any chances of a first victory in this championship since 2022. A day which began so promisingly in front of a record crowd of 6,605 souls ultimately fell flat.
There were definite signs of progress on the attacking front but indecision and indiscipline derailed a lot of promising raids.
By close of business, the gulf in class was apparent. Ireland are ranked 10th in the global standings, lest we forget. They finished with the Wooden Spoon in last year's championship. They competed in WXV3 - keeping company with minnows such as Colombia and Kazakhstan - the lowest tier in World Rugby's new global tournament last year.
This is Ground Zero stuff. Ireland are rebuilding from the lowest of bases. This is clearly going to take some time.
Bemand and his coaching staff are clearly making a big difference. And Ireland have some real talent in their ranks. They have the capacity to close the gap on their major rivals, but it's not going to happen overnight. You feel they will have to go through some more pain in the coming months for the greater good.
Bemand may have taken a quick glance at the scoreboard just before he wandered down to the dressing room at the half-time break and wondered how his side were eight points in arrears.
Ireland had made a blistering start. Good things are clearly being done on the training pitch in Abbotstown. The shape, cohesion and intent in the Irish attack was impressive as they probed from touchline to touchline.
The likes of Christy Haney, Sam Monaghan and Dorothy Wall were making dents in the Italian defence, while the impressive Aoife Wafer, Eve Higgins and Béibhínn Parsons were causing havoc in the wide channels.
The early penalty try was due reward for all the Irish intent and enterprise. The stats after just 11 minutes were positively startling.
After 11 minutes, the home side had made 35 carries and 244 metres with ball in hand. Impressive stuff.
We wondered if Ireland could deliver on the offensive side of things after last weekend's impressive rearguard effort in Le Mans. They can clearly play. The big question was whether they could convert all this possession and territory into points on the board.
The Italians, meanwhile, were startled. They had lost Vittoria Minuzzi to a yellow card after the full-back had illegally foiled a certain try for Parsons. They lost flanker Francesca Sgobini to a
HIA, while their loosehead prop Silvia Turani wouldn't last the half after coming off second best in a collision with Parsons.
All the momentum was with the Ireland cause. After such a bright start, the hosts began to make errors, however. The penalty count began to creep up, too. Too many botched opportunities as well. Wafter couldn't get her hands on an Enya Breen crosskick with the try-line in sight, Wall dropped a ball deep in Italian territory, while Dannah O'Brien knocked on and then compounded that mistake by failing to find touch with a penalty.
In the midst of this malaise, Italy plundered a try through hooker Vittoria Vecchini via a powerful lineout maul. A few minutes later, the visitors' power game yielded another close-range effort from lock Valeria Fedrighi.
It was utterly ruthless. Ireland had little to show for their efforts. Italy lived off scraps but feasted on their scant opportunities - two visitors to Irish territory yielding a brace of tries.
The sight of Ireland full-back Lauren Delaney trying to run a ball out from her own goal-line before being swarmed, isolated and fully penalised summed up a stuttering second quarter. When Italy midfielder Beatrice Rigoni bisected the hosts with the ensuing penalty, you sensed a big shift in the power balance.
The half-time break couldn't come soon enough. Ireland needed an early foothold and they received an absolute gift from Ilaria Arrighetti. What was going through the Italy No8's head when she decided to punt the ball across field deep in her own half?
Quite the brain fade, that. It almost led to Katie Corrigan scoring in the corner.
At 15-7, Bemand's side desperately needed something. Parsons will be haunted by her fumble with the whitewash at her mercy. You would have bet half the Real Estate in Ballsbridge on the wing collecting Breen's pass for the easiest of finishes. Yet again the killer pass had eluded Ireland.
A few minutes later, Vecchini bulldozed her way through three weary defenders to score what felt like the match-winner. When Aura Muzzo scooted over for the bonus point try, it was curtains for Ireland. Or so we thought?
Soon, the outstanding Neve Jones was touching down from a rolling lineout maul and, when Corrigan seized a late intercept and finished under the posts, a late smash and grab was on the cards. All the usual suspects like Jones, Monaghan and Hogan laid siege to the Italian line but yet another handling error put paid to a late victory.
They will be heartened by that late flourish, something positive to take into the clash with Wales in Cork in two weeks. Finding that elusive ruthless edge is going to take some time, however.
'I can't fault the effort of our players, but our handling let us down,' Monaghan, the Ireland captain, rued afterwards. You can't argue with that.
'You simply can't make that many mistakes at this level'

Graphic


Determined: (clockwise from left) Ireland's Eve Higgins is tackled by Vittoria Vecchini; Aoife Wafer is tackled by Alyssa D'Inca; and Ireland's Fiona Tuite and Wafer celebrate after Neve Jones' try

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Ireland rue missed chances after Italy defeat; 'We're honest... if we're not winning, we're learning'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56,55
Length: 589 words
Byline: RORY KEANE
Body


IRELAND head coach Scott Bemand was left to rue a lack of clinical edge in attack as the hosts blew a glorious opportunity to secure a first Women's Six Nations victory in almost two years.
Bemand's side crossed for three tries in a hard-fought encounter but they failed to finish a number of tryscoring chances - with wing Béibhínn Parsons dropping the ball with the line at her mercy - as an experienced Italian team claimed a maiden championship win on Irish soil.
Ireland dominated territory and possession for long swathes of the contest but a whopping 27 handling errors put paid to several attacking raids.
'I think it's probably a little bit of confidence and belief, that you can actually see it out,' Bemand noted, following yesterday's 27-21 defeat in Dublin.
'The Italians, we knew what game they bring, they won't give up, they're dogged and determined, and you have to go out and beat them.
'They don't give up in tackles, and you look at the possession, the territory, how much time we spent in their 22. We've just got to learn to be under that pressure and be clinical under that pressure.
'The handling errors… it's certainly an area of our game to get after. It's just being confident in that pressure.'
Roared on by a record crowd at the RDS, Ireland made a storming start, and were rewarded with an early penalty try. But the
TURN TO PAGE 55, COL 2
From Back Page visitors then took control of the contest with a brace of tries from hooker Vittoria Vecchini and another from lock Valeria Fedrighi edging them into a 22-7 lead.
Late tries from Neve Jones and Katie Corrigan set up a grandstand finish but the Italians held out to consign Ireland to a seventh successive loss in the Six Nations, a streak which stretches back to April 2022.
However, Bemand believes this youthful collective is making progress. 'As a group, we've said we go for performance, and we definitely haven't shied away about talking about winning,' the Ireland boss added.
'We're pretty disappointed not to win the game. There's plenty of moments that gave us opportunities to do that. We'll dust ourselves down, we have two big games back in Ireland, and obviously the one away in England. If we're not winning we're learning, and we'll go after the learning.
'It does feel like a missed opportunity, but those are the experiences and those are the learning we've got to take.
'We're creating a really honest group, so there was some reasonable stuff said after the game last weekend. We went after ourselves pretty hard this week to see where we could improve.'
Bemand also provided an injury update on Ireland full-back Lauren Delany, who left the field on a stretcher after suffering an injury in the first half.
'Thankfully she was up and fine at halftime. Obviously, the precautionary side of the game, it's absolutely right to look after players. She was back on her feet and in the dressing room at half-time.'
Meanwhile, midfielder Enya Breen was proud of her team-mates' efforts against an Italian side ranked three places above them in the global standings.
'Obviously, we're disappointed with the result, but proud of the performance we showed,' she said. 'We didn't give up the fight, right up to the last second, and put ourselves in positions to score.
'Unfortunately, that's the winning and losing of the game, isn't it? If you take those opportunities you're on the other side and it's a very different mood in here.
'Disappointed with the result but can't fault the fight the girls showed.'
'When we got on top, we just couldn't finish it out.'

Graphic


Progress: Ireland coach Scott Bemand

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



It's a Mac Allister MASTERCLASS as Liverpool take top spot
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 26,31
Length: 1190 words
Byline: LEWIS STEELE
Body


LIVERPOOL Diaz 27 Salah 65 2
BRIGHTON Welbeck 2 1
IN a world where his former midfield partner Moises Caicedo went to Chelsea for £115million and Argentina colleague Enzo Fernandez moved to the same club for £107m, Alexis Mac Allister for a paltry £35m could be the signing of the season.
He might not get the headlines of Mohamed Salah or beam out from Manhattan billboards alongside LeBron James like Virgil van Dijk, but Mac Allister is the player driving Liverpool's quest for a record-matching 20th English league title.
For five Liverpool matches in a row, his metronomical midfield prompting has yielded a goal or an assist, starting with that 99th-minute eye-of-the-needle pass at Nottingham Forest and ending here with a similarly deft assist for Salah.
Until then, his old team Brighton were going toe-to-toe with the Reds. Maybe not in terms of shots or chances created, but there were times when the visitors caused waves of anxiety to ripple around Anfield in a match that had been dubbed a job audition for their boss Roberto De Zerbi.
By the end, every punter in the stadium was praising Mac Allister, be it fans on the Kop or those in the away end. The feeling was reciprocated, as he went over to the Albion faithful at full time.
De Zerbi said before the match that Mac Allister (below) was a 'special guy' for the way he'd handled his exit, before firing an indirect dig at 'others who did not' - cough, Caicedo, cough - with Jurgen Klopp also hailing
Mac Allister as a 'difference maker'.
He was just that here, with a lovely, caressed pass into the path of Salah for the winning goal. That was one of 12 shots for Salah on a day where he could have racked up a hat-trick.
If this was indeed De Zerbi's audition for one of Europe's elite jobs, it was not a failure. His team were brave, energetic and, with a bit more luck, could have left with a point despite the Reds having 30 goal attempts.
The Italian patrolled his technical area like a man possessed, kicking every ball. He shaped to charge down the touchline when his side scored but, by the end, was on his knees as chances went begging. Brighton started at their exhilarating, slick best with heavy-metal counter-attacking football, while Liverpool looked weak in defence.
Klopp had admitted on Friday that even top teams like his had to alter their system to play against De Zerbi's 'different and unique' style. That was the case here, with the Merseysiders' average position map representing more of a 2-4-4 shape.
It made for a fascinating, catand-mouse battle as the two managers tried to out-think one another. Brave Brighton allowed Liverpool 14 first-half shots but had expanses of space to exploit in return, and one such break led to their early goal.
The space behind Liverpool's defence was exploited clinically with less than 90 seconds on the clock, as a zapping attack down Brighton's left saw Simon Adingra get the better of Conor Bradley and tee up Danny Welbeck for a thumping finish.
Liverpool have made a theme of fighting from behind in games this season, with 26 points now won from losing positions and this a seventh victory after going 1-0 down.
They racked up chance after chance, albeit without seriously troubling Bart Verbruggen.
They finally found the golden touch after 27 minutes to pull level through Luis Diaz, though the goal was rather scrappy. It came after Brighton had failed to clear and Salah headed a ball back into Diaz's path, via Joel Veltman, with the Colombian poking it in on the stretch.
Liverpool could have been home, hosed and on the sofa ready for
Manchester City v Arsenal if they had been more clinical. Salah had seven of Liverpool's 14 first-half shots as he looked close to full match sharpness again after a long-term injury.
This was his first Premier League start since New Year's Day, with Salah asking to sit out Egypt's recent international camp. Instead, he stayed on Merseyside for daily gym work.
But though he looked at his best physically, he was perhaps a bit off colour in front of goal. It says a lot, then, that Liverpool's talisman still left this match having scored one and contributed to the other, despite hints of rustiness.
Salah fired the Reds ahead after 65 minutes after a lovely team move. Dominik Szoboszlai drilled a pass to Mac Allister, who cushioned the ball through to Salah to pass into the far corner.
With a bittersweet tone, De Zerbi hailed Mac Allister after the game and said: 'He became a great player. The assist was incredible. I am proud of him. He deserves to be an important player in a big team.'
He is definitely that. As far as summer signings go, few have made a bigger contribution. The 25-year-old is building a trophy room at his new abode in the North West, and kisses his World Cup winner's medal every day.
If he continues like this, that room will soon have some new silverware.
LIVERPOOL (4-3-3): Kelleher 7; Bradley 6, Quansah 8, Van Dijk 6, Gomez 7; Szoboszlai 7 (Gravenberch 90+3min), Endo 6.5, MAC ALLISTER 8.5; Salah 7.5, Nunez 5 (Elliott 82), Diaz 7.5 (Gakpo 88). Booked: Mac Allister, Van Dijk, Gomez, Endo, Gakpo. Scorers: Diaz 27, Salah 65.
Manager: Jurgen Klopp 7. BRIGHTON (4-4-2): Verbruggen 7; Veltman 6, Dunk 7, Van Hecke 7, Estupinan 6 (Barco 90+1); Lamptey 5 (Buonanotte 69, 6), Baleba 7, Gross 7, Adingra 7 (Ferguson 83); Welbeck 7, Moder 6 (Lallana 83). Booked: Gross, Welbeck. Scorer: Welbeck 2.
Manager: Roberto De Zerbi 7. Referee: David Coote 5. Attendance: 60,061.
THE PREMIER LEAGUE IN SIXTY SECONDS By AADAM PATEL
REDS LOVE A COMEBACK WIN 26
LIVERPOOL have now won 26 points from losing positions in the Premier League this season. That's three more than anyone else. Yesterday was the seventh time they have come from behind to win in the top flight in 2023-24 - their most ever in a single Premier League season.
COLEMAN CALAMITY 358
ON his 358th Premier League appearance for Everton, Séamus Coleman scored his sixth own goal to consign the Toffees to yet another defeat. Only four players have scored more own goals in the history of the Premier League.
PLAYER OWN GOALS Richard Dunne 10 Jamie Carragher 7 Phil Jagielka 7 Martin Skrtel 7 Séamus Coleman 6 Jonny Evans 6 Ryan Shawcross 6 WesBrown 6 Frank Sinclair 6 Lewis Dunk 6
SHOOT ON SIGHT 51
THERE were 51 shots between Chelsea (33) and Burnley (18). Only one Premier League game on record (since 2003-04) has seen more attempts at goal - QPR v Leicester in November 2014 (52).
WOOD USES HEAD 5
CHRIS WOOD has scored more headers (five) than any other top-flight player this season. His goal for Forest against Palace means he has now scored at least 10 Premier League goals in five different seasons since 2017-18.
10-PLUS IN A SEASON
Since 2017-18 No of seasons Son Heung-min 7 Mohamed Salah 7 Harry Kane 6 Jamie Vardy 6 Sadio Mane 5 Raheem Sterling 5 Chris Wood 5
MAGIC MAC 5
ALEXIS MAC ALLISTER has already provided as many assists for Liverpool in the Premier League (five in 24 games) as he did for Brighton (five in 98 games).
HIS LAST FIVE STARTS: n ? Nott'm Forest (A) - Assist ? Sparta Prague (A) - Goal and assist ? Manchester City (H) - Goal ? Manchester United (A) - Goal ? Brighton (H) - Assist

Graphic


LIVERPOOL'S Dominic Szoboszlai picks out Alexis Mac Allister on the edge of the box with a drilled pass. The Argentine kills it with one touch then threads a beautiful pass through the Brighton defence into Mo Salah's feet. Salah bends his shot home in a move that is the difference between one point and three.Mo-mentum: Salah fires the winner past Verbruggen GETTY IMAGES

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Johnson warming to his supersub role for slow-starting Spurs
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 32,33
Length: 440 words
Byline: MATT BARLOW
Body


TOTTENHAM 2 LUTON TOWN 1
ANGE POSTECOGLOU rejected the idea of a trend. 'They're all a bit different,' he said but it is difficult to escape the recurring pattern of Tottenham's recent home games and Brennan Johnson's impact from the bench within that.
Spurs have won six of their last seven at home despite conceding first in five of them and Johnson has three goals and four assists.
Against Luton, he made the difference after replacing Dejan Kulusevski at half time. It was his cross to force the equaliser, an own goal by Issa Kabore, and his lay-off for Son Heung-min's 86th-minute winner. He also came agonisingly close to his fifth league goal of the season, when technology showed the ball was millimetres from crossing the line.
'Brennan was excellent,' said Postecoglou. 'We felt bringing him on and playing with him and Timo Werner wide would stretch them. Both wingers were outstanding in the second half. It's great for Brennan. The challenge for him is to maintain that consistency and make an impact whenever he plays.' Johnson, a £47.5million signing from Nottingham Forest last summer, has developed a fine understanding with right back Pedro Porro, whose vision and passing range complements the winger's extreme speed. The Welshman has become increasingly influential and arguably more dangerous from the bench when defenders are tiring and Spurs' blur of pace and mobility tests their concentration levels. He also scored when starting at Aston Villa, the second in a 4-0 win, but seems at his most potent coming on, especially when Spurs are kicking towards their South Stand.
Against Palace last month, they were trailing when Johnson entered with 27 minutes to go and he created goals for Werner and Son in a 3-1 win. Against Brighton, he came on at 1-1 and scored the winner. Against Brentford, he came on at half time and changed the game, scoring in a 3-2 win. This is genuine supersub territory and Postecoglou deserves credit for using Johnson's talents to such great effect. His contributions helped former club Forest climb out of the bottom three, above Luton on goal difference.
It was sickening for the visitors. They had taken an early lead through Tahith Chong, resisted pressure and forced a couple of saves from Guglielmo Vicario. But they have not won since January, are seriously depleted by injuries and have slipped back into the drop zone. 'I'm not constantly looking at the table,' said Luton boss Rob Edwards, whose next two away games are at Arsenal and Manchester City. 'I'm not overly concerned. The players are giving me everything. In terms of the table, I'll worry about that in the final week.'

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Judge lambasts using the courts to 'threaten or intimidate people'; Man's case against high-profile figures called 'an abuse'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 9
Length: 650 words
Byline: Helen Bruce
Body


THE Appeal Court has said the judicial system must not be used 'to threaten or intimidate people'.
Judge Charles Meenan said the role of the courts was to resolve disputes and vindicate people's rights.
He said that, in a recent case, a man had sued the Tánaiste, two high-ranking politicians, the Garda Commissioner and a former attorney general, in what was a 'clear abuse of process'.
He said John Cronin had caused Micheál Martin, Justice Minister Helen McEntee, former agriculture minister Barry Cowen, Garda Commissioner Drew Harris and former AG Paul Gallagher to incur considerable expense and had wasted court time.
'This is compounded by the fact that the appellant engaged in intimidatory correspondence with the Chief State Solicitor's Office and wrongfully attempted to subject the staff of the Central Office [of the High Court] to a Garda investigation,' he said.
Judge Meenan said he had been asked to rule on an appeal by Mr Cronin, after the High Court had struck out all proceedings.
Giving the case's background, he said Mr Cronin and his brother had been directors of a company, J&J City Ltd, which carried out civil engineering works.
In 1999, the company was a subcontractor to Irishenco Construction Ltd, which had been awarded a contract for extension works to be carried out to the pier in Dingle, Co. Kerry.
The works to be done by J&J City Ltd included dredging.
'Whilst the appellants' company had been subcontracted to dredge some 8,500 cubic metres, it was claimed that it in fact dredged some 14,500 cubic metres,' the judge said. 'There then followed the inevitable dispute over payment.'
He said Mr Cronin's company first sued Irishenco, 'but for some reason, which is not entirely clear, these proceedings did not progress to a trial'.
Mr Cronin then launched the cases in question. The respondents applied to the courts to have them dismissed, saying there were no grounds and they were frivolous and vexatious.
In the case against Mr Cowen, the judge said Mr Cronin complained that the knock-on effects of the payment dispute were 'catastrophic'.
His legal papers stated: 'Revenue froze his company accounts; he was red-flagged in every company or Government department he contacted looking for help. His marriage failed due primarily to the stress of these events and the wrongdoings against the plaintiff and his family. The plaintiff believes he was failed by all the Government departments involved. The plaintiff believes that this orchestrated campaign against him was due to the fact that he would not let this breach of contract go unanswered. To this day he is still owed monies for his work in Dingle Harbour.'
He said the same claim was made against Mr Martin - sued as taoiseach at the time.
The case against the Minister for Justice and the former AG related to events arising in family law proceedings after the end of Mr Cronin's marriage.
Mr Cronin was found to be in contempt of court and was imprisoned for 28 days, the judge said, during which time he claimed he was assaulted and that he went on hunger strike -
he sued over an alleged breach of his constitutional rights.
The final set of proceedings, against Commissioner Drew Harris, concerned an alleged failure by gardaí to investigate Mr Cronin's complaint against officials in the Central Office of the High Court, the judge said.
Judge Meenan said Mr Cronin had not put forward arguments against the striking out of his cases, other than to say the trial judge was wrong or confused.
Judge Meenan said the trial judge had correctly pointed out Mr Cronin's failure to identify any breach of duty by any of the respondents.
He said he would dismiss the appeal, and that Mr Cronin should pay all the respondents' legal costs. Mr Cronin has 14 days to contest the court's order by way of a written submission to the Court of Appeal.
helen.bruce@dailymail.ie
28 days in prison was Cronin's punishment for contempt

Graphic


Appeal: Judge Meenan

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



KENNY SETS OUT GOALS FOR YEAR; On-loan Rovers striker's tally hope
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 35
Length: 657 words
Byline: Philip quinn
Body


AS Johnny Kenny waited to talk to the media in Tallaght on Friday night, he had the phone out and was chatting to Liam Scales, the Celtic and Irish defender.
Kenny was on the mark in the 3-1 win over Bohemians and Scales was impressed with his contribution.
'He (Scales) reckons I was robbed for Man of the Match!'
quipped Kenny, who regards Scales as 'my inspiration coming through'.
'He had the same path, played for same club (Rovers). He's one of Celtic's top players this season, fair play to him. He's done incredible since Brendan (Rodgers) took over.'
According to Kenny, Scales is 'good friends with Conor Kearns, so he's an eye on Shelbourne too. I'm going to tell him he'll have to pick one or the other now,' he said.
Kenny is on loan from Celtic and follows their games avidly. 'I'll try to get over before the end of the season, hopefully the (Scottish) Cup final at Hampden,' he said.
While on call for Rovers, 2024 is about being more clinical in front of goal and contributing more minutes as the champions push for a fifth successive title.
The personable Irish U21 striker from Celtic has scored two goals in the past two games for the Hoops and is targeting a 15-goal return along with a more central part on stage - too often last season, he was a supporting actor.
'My groins were very bad last year. I couldn't really complete full games and it was at me the whole way since Dundalk in the first win of the season,' he recalled.
'Once I had my problem, I kind of battled on. I wanted to win my first league title. Poor performances were on me,' he said candidly.
'I played three-quarters of the season with that, went back to Celtic in the off-season, got a little procedure done, they worked a lot on it and thankfully I'm nearly 100 percent. 'In terms of fitness, I feel like I can last longer.
Repetitive sprints and repetitive movements last year were tough, because you'd be blowing and sore, but this year I feel a lot freer.'
Kenny would not have been pain-free to play twice over the weekend but that could change as the Hoops visit Waterford today (5.0) on the back of putting Bohemians to the sword.
'Early in the first-half, I think I was way off it with fitness, but as the game went on, I came into it.'
Of his lead goal early in the second half, he said: 'I was anticipating a rebound off the keeper, but luckily enough the ball hit me on the shin and stopped in front of me, so all I had to do then was put it in the net.
'I had big opportunities last year to hit 15 goals and didn't take them. Hopefully, this year I can push on,' said Kenny, son of the former Sligo Rovers speedster Johnny.
Rovers manager Stephen Bradley reckons he has a new player on his hands in Kenny.
'I said last year that Johnny has the potential to score a lot of goals because his running ability, both feet and his bravery. He puts himself in situations. When you have that as a centre-forward, you'll always score goals.
'When centre-forwards have the mentality of no fear of missing, they're very dangerous. He's very similar to (Patrick) Hoban in mentality. He's also come back physically in a different place to last year.'
Rovers are 10 points behind Shelbourne but Bradley isn't perturbed.
'I think there's so much more to come from this team. We're only getting started to be honest.
'I sense a freedom around the players that I didn't sense last year, which is nice. I think when we get to our level, it's going to be interesting.'
Bradley recognises the improvement of Shelbourne under Damien Duff.
'Damien works as hard as anybody in the game. They've got momentum. They're the team in front. They've beaten us and most in front of them. All you do is respect him (Duff) and say well done.'
The teams meet again in three weeks, closer to the halfway mark of the season.
If the gap between the old Ringsend rivals is still 10 points after that, the drive for five will carry greater intrigue.
"He's also come back physically in a different place"

Graphic


Inspiration: Liam Scales

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Looks like Simon thinks Kate Moss has the X factor to launch a singing career
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 3
Length: 421 words
Byline: Flora Pilo
Body


SHE has been top of the pops in the world of modelling for three decades.
And now, it seems, Kate Moss has proved to Simon Cowell that she's got the X factor when it comes to singing, too - after she was spotted serenading him in a karaoke bar this weekend.
Speculation was rife yesterday that the Britain's Got Talent judge might even be about to launch a music career after exclusive photos and video obtained by the Mail show the supermodel belting out a string of singalong favourites to the mogul.
Kate is no stranger to singing for a crowd: She first sang professionally on Primal Scream's 2002 cover of Some Velvet Morning and later provided vocals for former boyfriend Pete Doherty's band Babyshambles, regularly joining them on stage when they were a couple.
She's also performed at charity gigs alongside the likes of Pink Floyd's David Gilmour and legendary rock chick Chrissie Hynde. But a solo recording contract, so far, has evaded her... perhaps until now.
It wouldn't be the first time Cowell has supported an unexpected new venture in showbiz - he masterminded actors Robson and Jerome's superhit Unchained Melody in 1995 and signed former RTÉ puppets Zig and Zag for two singles in the same year.
Stunned onlookers did a doubletake when Cowell and Kate arrived at the Lucky Voice bar in Islington, London, on Saturday afternoon, where the supermodel, 50, belted out Gloria Gaynor's I Will Survive, Papa Don't Preach by Madonna, and Queen's Don't Stop Me Now.
Daryl Falopios, a regular at the bar, said: 'It was unbelievable. Kate was really getting into it and dancing around, despite Simon making some typically caustic comments. When she sang When Will I Be Famous by Bros he quipped, "You won't." 'But later she did Wannabe by The Spice Girls and he seemed impressed, I heard him tell her, "Okay, let me stop you right there. I really didn't like that - I absolutely loved it!" ' It's not the first time Cowell, 64, has tried to launch Kate's singing career. After hearing her sing with her ex, Doherty, in Dublin in 2006, he said: 'I would like to offer Kate Moss a recording contract, whether she can sing or not.
'The thing about Kate is that she's a star - it's the "Kate factor". People attach themselves to her and instantly become interesting.'
Former record company boss Joe King told the Mail that a Kate Moss version of Simon and Garfunkel's April Come She Will or The Who's Won't Get Fooled Again could storm the charts. 'As ever, not everyone will buy it - but some will,' he said.
'Not everyone will buy it'

Graphic


Karaoke Kate: The model sings for CowellDouble-take: Kate Moss and Simon Cowell on Saturday

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Maanum scare mars Arsenal joy; Midfielder stable after collapsing as Hayes and Eidevall clash WOMEN'S LEAGUE CUP FINAL
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 25
Length: 471 words
Byline: KATHRYN BATTE
Body


ARSENAL WOMEN 1 CHELSEA WOMEN 0 (after extra time)
THERE is often a question mark over how much the League Cup means to clubs.Well, this final showed that it means absolutely everything to the players, who had to cope with the awful sight of Arsenal midfielder Frida Maanum collapsing on the pitch.
Then the managers got involved in a touchline spat after the Gunners had claimed victory.
In the 95th minute, Maanum went down and after a worrying nine-minute stoppage, she was taken off on a stretcher with an oxygen mask.
She was later up and talking, in a stable condition.
Deep into extra time, Stina Blackstenius won it for Arsenal and both managers' tempers flared. Chelsea boss Emma Hayes shoved her counterpart Jonas Eidevall after he had fronted up to Blues midfielder Erin Cuthbert in the final seconds.
'There's away to conduct yourself on the touchline,' Hayes said. 'I'm not down for male aggression on the touchline. Fronting up with players, for me that's unacceptable. I don't think it's OK to behave like that. He got a yellow card and in fact he should probably have been sent off. It's not the first time he's been told about his behaviour on the touchline.'
'I don't think it's the truth,' Eidevall responded. 'I definitely don't see me as aggressive in that situation, that's very irresponsible putting that label onto it.
There is definitely a way you behave in the technical area, there is also a way you behave after the game, being a good winner, but you also need to be a good loser and be responsible in both those situations.'
Chelsea had been on course for a quadruple. For Arsenal, this was the only trophy they could realistically win. After both teams had won in the WSL this season, there was little to choose between the sides here.
Chelsea had the ball in the net midway through the first half but Mayra Ramirez's strike was ruled out by VAR after Cuthbert handled in the build-up.
Extra time was approaching when Maanum collapsed off the ball. Eidevall signalled to the medics while Ireland captain Katie McCabe also shouted for attention. Molineux fell silent as paramedics worked on the midfielder for nine minutes, before she was taken off.
'This is probably one of the hardest situations because it looks very scary when Frida goes down,' Eidevall said. 'Of course, it's very easy to get thrown both with focus and emotion to that point. But the reality of it is that we have a great medical team.
'There's nothing we can do in that moment to improve that situation, but we can have control over how we're playing football and that's what we needed to control. That's what Frida wanted us to do as well, to be able to make her a champion.'
Arsenal did just that when Blackstenius provided the game's only moment of quality in the 116th minute, finishing past Hampton after meeting Caitlin Foord's cut-back.

Graphic


Worry: Blackstenius rushes to stricken team-mate Maanum FOCUS IMAGES

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



MAKE IT COUNT!; Derry need to build on thrilling victory over Dubs - Harte We will come back stronger for this experience, vows s Dublin boss
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56,52,53
Length: 597 words
Byline: MICHEAL CLIFFORD
Body


MICKEY HARTE has called on Derry to kick on and not let a first national title in 16 years become a 'noose around their necks' for the Championship.
Derry stunned All-Ireland champions Dublin in a penalty shoot-out to win their first League title since 2008 before an attendance of 33,000 at Croke Park yesterday, with their manager Harte admitting it was a 'bigger' game for his team than it was for the All-Ireland champions.
But mindful that last year's League winners Mayo were dumped out of Connacht, he warned his players to prepare for an opening-round Ulster meeting with Donegal - winners of yesterday's Division 2 final - later this month.
'We needed the win more than them because it was going to be a case of "we put up a good fight but the experience told in the end". That's what you were going to listen to if we hadn't made it.
'Now, it's a fine line between winning that and using it positively, or it being a noose around your necks. We can't even begin to think about anyone TURN TO PAGE 52, COL 1
From Back Page other than Donegal at this moment in time. It has to be good for confidencebuilding for our players. They have done plenty in their careers but to win a major title like that in an epic encounter has to stand to them,' added Harte.
Meanwhile, Dublin manager Dessie Farrell claimed yesterday's result will correct the narrative that had them as shoo-ins to retain their All-Ireland title.
'We came here today to win the game, we didn't do that so, naturally, there will be disappointment and a sour taste.
'There had been a bit of shadowboxing going on in the League. We had beaten teams who had been very depleted in terms of player who were available to them, or resting players, dead rubbers, whatever it might be.
'There's a lot for us to take from today and we would be grateful for that because you can't conjure that up in internal games or challenge matches.
'We will pick that apart and hopefully come back a bit stronger for it.' vowed Farrell, who confirmed Dublin will see if there are any grounds to contest the one-match ban that could rule Brian Fenton out of this month's Leinster SFC clash against either Meath or Longford, after the two-time player of the year was sent off in the final minute.
Meanwhile, Donegal manager Jim McGuinness admitted that the season couldn't be going much better as an Ulster Championship showdown with champions Derry looms on the horizon in just under three weeks' time.
At Croke Park yesterday, his team rounded off an encouraging spring Allianz Football League campaign by being crowned Division 2 champions, Aaron Doherty firing the late winner that secured the trophy after Armagh fought back from four down to take the lead approaching full-time.
'We'd a lot of young lads on the bus today heading to Croke Park for the first time,' he explained. 'Getting game time in Croke Park for the first time as well.
'With the injury list that we had, trying to manage that, we're delighted to get the result, first and foremost.
'I felt we controlled a lot of the game as well. At 0-12 to 0-8, it probably shouldn't have been as tight as it was in the end. That being said, you always find out more about your team, and from four points up, to one point down, we managed to go a point up, and that's a big positive for us - the young lads finding their feet and a bit of character and stuff like that.
'It's been a very good League in that we've come together and are still very much in the process of doing that.
Getting to Division 1, and now a trophy, that's brilliant for the young lads.'
Additional reporting Philip Lanigan

Graphic


Spot kings: Derry celebrate their win over Dublin in the Division 1 League final at Croke Park yesterdayLessons to learn: Dublin manager Dessie Farrell

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



McGuinness makes his mark as Donegal seal thrilling victory
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 53
Length: 894 words
Byline: PHILIP LANIGAN
Body


NFL DIVISION 2 FINAL
DONEGAL ARMAGH 0-15 0-14
THE 2012 summer hit may be resurrected again: Jimmy's back winning matches. For Donegal supporters, this was like a throwback to the past and a glimpse into the future, all at the same time.
Here was the county saviour and guru, back guiding a Donegal team up the steps of the Hogan Stand, just as he did before. In a matter of months of competitive action, Jim McGuinness has a county dreaming once more.
A sun-splashed but cold Croke Park on Easter Sunday might be a world removed from high summer and the All-Ireland series but this Division Two trophy success will do just fine.
It felt all so familiar as McGuinness and his 2024 edition of troops gathered around in front of the Hogan Stand for the trophy presentation.
Such is the GAA that one of the opposition player's fathers - Jarlath Burns - was handing over the trophy as GAA www.president.No doubt it was a day of mixed emotion on a day when his son was parachuted into the team and looked like he might win it for Armagh on his own early on with a couple of points as it went score for score for the first half.
A third-quarter scoring burst was key to victory, Donegal surging 0-12 to 0-8 ahead before losing concentration just when it looked like the hard work had been done. Rian O'Neill's introduction was the spark that lit Armagh's comeback, another substitute Stefan Campbell producing a stunning solo run and equaliser before Oisin O'Neill dared to put Armagh ahead with four minutes of added time to come.
How Armagh lost from that position will be a source of huge frustration for manager Kieran McGeeney as he watched Donegal hit three of the last four scores to sneak the win. Yet again, his side had come up agonisingly short when it mattered. That lack of killer instinct, or ability to stand tallest on the biggest days is a little ironic given how Geezer fashioned his own career as Armagh's All-Ireland-winning captain on just those values.
At this stage, his team are running out of hard luck stories. Especially considering Donegal were down a whole host of firstteam regulars due to injury.
But they only had themselves to blame - again. A string of poor wides in the third quarter - three in a row from Darragh McMullen - proved costly and outside of that flurry of excitement that brought the loud Armagh support to their feet in the final 10 minutes, it was hard to argue with the idea that Donegal deserved this on the balance of play.
'The Cup is going to the Hills of Donegal,' declared Jarlath Burns as he handed it over to one of Donegal's stars on the day, captain Ciaran Thompson. On his 100th competitive appearance, he produced four points, three of them top-quality scores from play.
Oisin Gallen was another to really impress up front. He also finished with four, grabbed the first of those from a mark after barely 20 seconds.
Donegal almost found the net soon after. Another high ball in actually bounced in front of the livewire Niall O'Donnell, who showed quick hands to lay it off to Kevin McGettigan, who had joined the attack. His first goal shot hit the covering defender and when he got a second bite, his scuffed effort along the ground was saved by Blaine Hughes.
Armagh manufactured their own goal chance when Oisin Conaty bounced out of a cluster of Donegal players looking to hold him up and scooted into space. He went for goal but Caolan McGonagle came flying across to make a superb diving block. It was one of a number of important contributions from the Donegal defender.
Rory Grugan then cleverly chipped the breaking ball to the back post where Burns shaved the crossbar with a rifled effort.
Grugan also provided a touch of class to Armagh's attack with two sublime scores.
Armagh were not too smart though in allowing Donegal space inside the 45 - too many players ball watching and sitting just too deep.
Twice Ciaran Thompson just dropped off and kicked identikit scores from outside the top of the 'D' - eyeing up the wall of bodies in front of him and measuring a left-foot kick from 40 metres.
He actually went so far as to add a third just before half-time to sneak his side into a 0-8 to 0-7 lead.
Donegal's third-quarter surge put them four ahead before Rian O'Neill brought a directness to Armagh's play and helped inspire that mini revival that saw the team hit five in a row and edge ahead in the 68th minute.
Caolan McGonagle made a big play to equalise, Oisin Gallen kicked a huge point and even when Oisin Conaty levelled in a thrilling finale, up popped Aaron Doherty to kick the winner. DONEGAL: S Patton; M Curran, C Moore, C McColgan (J Mac Ceallabhuí 61); K McGettigan (J Brennan h-t), C McGonagle, S O'Donnell; L McGlynn (O Doherty), M Langan; P Mogan, C Thompson, J McGee (H McFadden 42); A Doherty, O Gallen, N O'Donnell (C Mac Aonghusa 61). Scorers: C Thompson (1f), O Gallen (1m, 1f) 0-4 each, N O'Donnell 0-3, P Mogan, S O'Donnell, C McGonagle, A Doherty 0-1 each. Yellow card: O Caulfield 45, O Doherty 64. Wides: 5 (5). ARMAGH: B Hughes; P Burns, A McKay, P McGrane; G McCabe, A Forker (S Campbell 42), D McMullan (O O'Neill 60); C Mackin (J Duffy 69), B Crealey; J Og Burns, R Grugan, J McElroy (R O'Neill 49); C Turbitt, A Murnin, O Conaty. Scorers: C Turbitt (2fs), R Grugan (2fs) 0-4 each, J Og Burns, O Conaty 0-2 each, O O'Neill, S Campbell 0-1 each. Wides: 4 (4). Referee: P Faloon (Down).

Graphic


Pedigree: McGuinness yesterdayGripping: Caolan McGonagle of Donegal takes on Armagh's Conor Turbitt yesterday

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Minister, your version of 'polluter pays' is just piffle
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 13
Length: 871 words
Byline: Mary Carr
Body


ONE of the pillars of EU environmental policy, the polluterpays principle, has had mixed success. It is rightly credited with removing the scourge of plastic bags from everyday circulation by charging for them rather than, in timehonoured tradition, giving them away for free.
In a win-win for the environment and for the consumer, shoppers got into the habit of bringing their own bags to the store or else investing in a reusable one at the till.
The plastic bag example illustrates key features of the polluter-pays principle - a financial incentive for consumers to be environmentally conscious, underpinned ideally by the presence of a handy alternative to give them that extra nudge to do the right thing.
THE former is the easy part when it comes to changing behaviour. The latter - creating alternatives so that people can easily quit their environmentally ruinous habit - is the challenge.
We can see this with Transport Minister Eamon Ryan's wildly optimistic plans to introduce the polluter-pays principle to reduce private car use. Proposals to slap higher taxes on SUVs and larger vehicles are an obvious move because drivers who baulk at the punitive rate have always the choice of buying a more modest Ford Fiesta to get around in.
But how does the polluterpay principle play out when it comes to the not insignificant number of drivers of ordinary vehicles that the minister wants to get off the road altogether, or to reduce their journeys by 20% by 2030 to meet climate targets? Put simply, it doesn't, if fairness is a consideration.
Cheaper car tax and insurance may incentivise drivers to cut down on non-essential journeys, like driving to the nearest shopping centre for a packet of biscuits or a spot of window shopping. But without a decent public transport system, the fact is that for essential business like going to work or ferrying children to school, ruraldwellers are utterly reliant on their cars, and the Government would rightly suffer a huge backlash against any attempt to penalise them for their higher mileage.
It is true that as a society we often seem wedded to our cars, and never more so than in the gridlock that forms outside suburban schools at opening and closing times, with lines of double-parked cars frequently trapping local residents in their homes. Yet paradoxically the evidence is that when given the option of public transport or private car, more of us are choosing the former.
While last year's National Household Travel Survey reaffirmed the car's dominance in Irish life (70% of trips were made in a private car) it showed a significant difference in travel patterns between people living in Dublin city and its surrounding suburbs and those living in rural areas, with car usage falling to 53% in Dublin, compared to 80% among rural-dwellers.
The survey also shows that only 9% of people in rural areas walked, compared to 32% of those living in the capital or the suburbs.
The higher preference among Dublin or suburban people for walking, and indeed cycling, was also highlighted in the National Transport Authority's recent survey of people in five Irish cities.
It found that walking and cycling take 680,000 cars off the roads every day in the five cities and that around half of the people surveyed would like to walk more, and a third to cycle more.
When people enjoy proximity to shops, schools and workplaces and a good public transport service, they are increasingly choosing to leave their cars at home. It's those of us who are geographically isolated, without a clean and reliable public transport who can't. Driving is now less about lifestyle choices and more about necessity.
The motorways and primary roads leading into Dublin are very often totally congested each rush-hour. A report from Transport Infrastructure Ireland (TII) on the National Roads 2022 showed that, unsurprisingly, the M50 is the most heavily used road in the country, with close to 145,000 vehicles including cars, vans and trucks travelling several sections of it on an average day.
Carlow is not far beyond the commuter belt but the cars leaving Carlow for offices in Dublin do so because the train will take them only as far as Heuston. After that it's a bus or a Luas into the city centre and another journey to the quays or to Ballsbridge or Mount Street where so much of the commercial property is. It's the same for Waterford commuters, while Wexford folk have it easier, with their train serving Connolly station. What these commuters need is a proper transport network covering all of the city, not just its tiny epicentre, with its tentacles spreading into all the suburbs so that drivers could leave their cars on the route knowing their final destination involves only a few changes.
What their families need are decent local bus services to bring their kids to school and matches, not a bus every two hours. It's also what our environment needs if pollution and CO2 emissions are to topple in line with international objectives.
It's time Eamon Ryan admitted that without revolutionising the public transport system, the polluter-pays principle will not wean people off their cars, and that all he's doing is putting the proverbial environmentally friendly cart before the horse.

Graphic


Wildly optimistic: Eamon Ryan

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



miserable monday!; Fuel price hike across Ireland from today
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 14
Length: 558 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


PRICES at the petrol pumps will rise from today as cuts to excise duty will be reversed, despite protests from opposition TDs and lobby groups.
The move means that 4c, 3c and 1.7c per litre will be added to petrol, diesel and marked gas oil respectively, in the latest blow to people struggling with the high cost of living.
This is the second-to-last restoration of excise duty rates, which were slashed as a result of spiralling costs brought on by the Russian war against Ukraine.
The final increase is set to be introduced in August.
The move by the Government has been fiercely criticised by both lawmakers and lobby groups, who said the decision will affect petrol and diesel prices nationwide, hitting motorists and households alike.
Fuels For Ireland (FFI) chief Kevin McPartlan described it as 'unwelcome news' for motorists.
He said: 'It is not an April Fool's story, and Irish consumers wake up to unwelcome news today as fuel prices surge across the nation.
'Effective immediately, petrol and diesel prices are set to increase as the Government reinstates excise duties on fuels.
'This decision signals a significant shift for motorists and households alike.
'The excise duty reinstatement is being rolled out on a phased basis, starting with a 4c per litre hike for petrol and a 3c increase for diesel.
'Despite our appeals at FFI to delay the implementation, the Government forged ahead, leaving fuel retail operators and forecourts with no alternative but to adjust prices from today.'
Mr McPartlan said he knows the price increase will burden consumers but added that this is a matter for Government. 'The immediate impact of this decision will be felt most acutely in border counties, where the price gap between Ireland and the UK threatens the viability of local forecourts. With further increases slated over the next 12 months, the prospect of a two-tier fuel economy looms large, exacerbating existing cost-of-living challenges for citizens.'
FFI said it has once again called on the Government to work 'collaboratively to navigate the current challenging landscape'.
Mr McPartlan added: 'Fuels For Ireland is calling for this to be the last tax increase on fuel before Budget 2025. We believe that this six-month window will give enough time for the Government to create the Expert Group on Taxation we have advocated for, to convene and provide recommendations to the minister.'
In response to the calls to keep the excise rates where they were, the Department of Finance insisted there will be no postponement of the rate increase.
Minister Michael McGrath said these temporary reductions were due to end initially on August 31, 2022, but following a review of fuel prices this was extended until February 2023, with a phased restoration beginning in June 2023, followed by a second restoration in September 2023.
Mr McGrath added that a final restoration of excise rates was due to take place on October 31, 2023, but in Budget 2024 this was extended until March 31, 2024.
He said: 'The reductions in excise duty have been worth (EURO)1.2billion to consumers. While I recognise that households and business continue to face challenges, the Government must strike the appropriate balance between providing support and avoiding fuelling cyclical inflationary trends.' garreth.macnamee@dailymail.ie
4c Will be added to petrol today and 3c to diesel

Graphic


Fuel up: Prices at the petrol pumps rise today and again in August

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Mortified Paul caught out in his smalls by A-lister Nicole
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 8
Length: 234 words
Byline: Rebecca Fisher
Body


ACTOR Paul Mescal has revealed he was left mortified after meeting a Hollywood A-lister while dressed only in his boxers.
The Oscar-nominated star from Maynooth is no stranger to getting his kit off on screen but was left embarrassed when he was caught in his smalls during an encounter with Nicole Kidman.
The Kildare actor appeared on US talk show Jimmy Kimmel Live, where he recounted some of his most embarrassing moments.
While performing a stage adaptation of A Streetcar Named Desire in London, Mescal revealed that several stars had attended and visited backstage - including Oscar-winner Kidman.
'It's been pretty starry backstage. Nicole Kidman came to the play,' he told the host. 'I didn't know she was in and then she came backstage and I was sharing a dressing room with Ralph (Davis)
and Eduardo (Ackerman) and we're getting changed and we're in our underwear. I'm not lying - this happened!
'We hear a knock on the door and we thought it was the stage manager and I go to open the door and it's Nicole Kidman, I'm standing there in sweaty underwear and the next step is to put on some trousers but there's something incredibly undignified about it.
'It's not a look you want to be caught in, so you half pull on your trousers and you're chatting about the play and you hug and you are like "thanks for coming!" The door shuts and you're just turning to each other like what the hell just happened?!'

Graphic


Dressing room: Paul MescalVisitor: Kidman

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



NAME GAME
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 27
Length: 238 words
Body


HIDDEN in the grid is the name of a singer. Answer the questions, then rearrange the letters corresponding to your answers to fill in the name. SOLUTION TOMORROW https://puzzle-pdf-generator.s3-eu-
BOX 1: Alesha Dixon (pictured) was a member of which girl group? Sugababes (T) Eternal (P) Mis-Teeq (N) BOX 2: What, in meteorology, does the word 'haar' refer to? A warm front (M) A cold sea fog (A) Very light rain (R) BOX 3: Which Merseyside sculpture by Jaume Plensa resembles the head of a young woman? Dream (H) Wake (I) Love (Z) BOX 4: Which American television sitcom features a voiceover throughout by the actor and film director Ron Howard? 30 Rock (L) The Big Bang Theory (D) Arrested Development (A) BOX 5: Which UK artist won Best Dance Act at this year's Brit Awards? Romy (F) Fred Again (J) Calvin Harris (K)
BOX 6: What is meant by the term 'soldier of fortune'? Thrill-seeker (S) Mercenary (O) Gold digger (V) BOX 7: British brothers Jonathan and Alistair Brownlee are decorated athletes in which event? Triathlon (N) Modern pentathlon (O) Decathlon (Y) BOX 8: Which of the following singers released the 2011 debut album Heaven? Jessie J (E) Meghan Trainor (K) Rebecca Ferguson (H)
BOX 9: Which author, the first sci-fi writer to receive a MacArthur Fellowship, wrote the novel Kindred?
Octavia E. Butler (A) N. K. Jemisin (W) Malorie Blackman (G)
Friday's answer: CHRIS HOY (1C, 2O, 3Y, 4S, 5H, 6H, 7I, 8R)
Picture: PA

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



No joking... scientists say chocolate could help you lose weight!
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 3
Length: 336 words
Byline: Chris Pollard
Body


GOOD news for those bingeing on Easter eggs - chocolate may help you lose weight.
It could also boost your brain and protect it from age-related cognitive decline.
Scientists say a chemical called theobromine, found in cocoa beans and abundant in milk and dark chocolate, has a range of potential health benefits.
They believe it is an underappreciated natural elixir with anti-inflammatory properties that could be used to treat Alzheimer's disease.
While the calories in an Easter egg probably outweigh any slimming benefits, theobromine was found to contribute to weight management by enhancing the body's ability to break down fats.
The researchers, from Zhengzhou University in China, said it also has protective effects on the kidneys, potentially preventing the formation of kidney stones and reducing fluid retention in the tissues.
After scoffing some chocolate, theobromine - a bitter-tasting alkaloid - quickly spreads throughout the body.
It can penetrate the blood-brain barrier and act as an adenosine receptor antagonist, potentially boosting mood and enhancing cognitive function. With antioxidant and anti-inflammatory properties, it may also protect against dementia and other neurological conditions.
The study, published in the Journal of Functional Foods, even suggests it could be used to treat brain diseases such as stroke, depression and Alzheimer's. The researchers wrote: 'Theobromine showcases neuro-protective attributes, enhances cognitive function and holds promise in mitigating age-related cognitive decline and neurodegenerative disorders.
'In daily life, theobromine can be used as a health supplement to help regulate immune function, promote fat metabolism and maintain cardiovascular health. It can also be utilised for the development of obesity treatment drugs or formulations due to its anti-obesity effects.'
The researchers added theobromine could be combined with other drugs to form a powerful treatment against a variety of illnesses.
news@dailymail.ie
'Enhances cognitive function'

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



North's leaders urged to keep it 'business as usual'; Shockwaves still being felt in wake of Donaldson's exit as DUP chief
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 8
Length: 795 words
Byline: Brian Mahon; John Drennan
Body


INCOMING taoiseach Simon Harris has praised the Stormont leadership for putting 'the people's business to the fore' in the wake of the shock resignation of Jeffrey Donaldson.
Mr Harris, who is expected to be voted in as the next taoiseach on Tuesday, April 9, said he spoke with First Minister Michelle O'Neill at the 1916 Easter Rising commemoration in Dublin yesterday.
Mr Donaldson shocked the political world on Good Friday when he resigned as leader of the DUP due to historical sexual allegations. He and his wife, Eleanor, have been charged and are expected to appear in court on April 24.
Asked about the resignation of Mr Donaldson as DUP leader, Mr Harris said: 'I'm very conscious that there is a criminal justice process under way.
'I'm very conscious of the need for everybody to respect that process and the sensitivities around it outside of political and media commentary.
'As a political leader, my priority is to continue to support the institutions of the Good Friday Agreement, to continue to engage on a north-south, east-west basis in every way that we can. I very much welcome the comments of the First Minister and the deputy First Minister in recent days in relation to ensuring that the people's business remains to the fore of all their minds.'
He said that from the Government's point of view, the priority would be to continue to work with all of the parties in the North and continue to work with the Executive. Mr Harris said: 'I certainly would welcome an opportunity to work closely in terms of the east-west as well and would hope to have an early engagement with the British prime minister.'
Eamon Ryan, the Green Party leader, said the message of stability from Stormont leaders in the wake of Mr Donaldson's resignation was 'really important'.
'I think the message from the various party leaders that they're going to provide that stability and continue delivering for the people up north is really important,'
he said yesterday. 'We have a North-South Ministerial [­Council] coming up and we'll be very much encouraging the use of the institutions, the need for political leadership.
'I think all the leaders up North and all the parties have an obligation, in my mind, to provide that now,' he added.
However the Irish Daily Mail understands there is concern in the heart of Government over the ability of the unionist centre 'to hold' under the interim DUP leader Gavin Robinson.
One source close to the crisis said: 'There are real concerns as to whether the centre will hold within unionism: there are a lot of big beasts in that party. Is Robinson up to it?'
While unionism remains divided over the post-Brexit deal that Mr Donaldson struck with the British government over the Irish Sea border, the return to Stormont has not prompted any resignations from the DUP.
But there are fears that his departure may open a schism within the party.
Mr Donaldson, who led his party for almost three years, took the DUP out of government - collapsing the Executive and Assembly. Not everyone in the DUP supported the return to Stormont earlier this year, but Mr Donaldson had so far held the party together.
The evolving relationship between First Minister Ms O'Neill and Deputy First Minister Emma Little-Pengelly of the DUP has seen the returned Assembly bed in successfully.
However, the departure of Mr Donaldson, who was perceived to be on the moderate wing of a significantly divided party, has generated significant concern across the Irish and UK governments and in the North over the ongoing stability of the fledgling institutions.
Citing the 'grotesque, unbelievable, bizarre, unprecedented' phrase used by Charlie Haughey, one Government insider said: 'There is a real sense of GUBU surrounding this.'
The current expectation is that the DUP - and Ms Little-Pengelly, a close ally of Mr Donaldson - will seek to distance themselves from the former leader and emphasise that it is business as usual.
In a statement on social media on Saturday, Ms Little-Pengelly said: 'I know many, many people are deeply shocked and devastated by this news, as I am.'
'Victims must always have the best opportunity for justice. This must be fully respected and supported', she said.
She added: 'I want to assure you that I am determined to do all I can to provide stability.'
One Government source said: 'The process is under real stress. There are real concerns about the capacity of the unionist centre to cohere. Can they stick together to make the deals they will have to make?'
They added: 'The hope is that it will bumble through, but if the unionist centre fragments, who can deliver a deal? What they are being advised from Dublin is: "Don't let the crisis spread."' brian.mahon@dailymail.ie
'Can they stick together?' 'A criminal justice process is under way'

Graphic


All change: Gavin Robinson, left, is the new DUP leader after the resignation of Jeffrey Donaldson, right

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



O'Donnell starting to feel the heat
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 35
Length: 240 words
Byline: PHILIP QUINN
Body


FOR Drogheda United, ninth of ten in the Premier Division at Easter is not a concern given Kevin Doherty's budget and the expectations of a resilient group that has finished seventh, eighth and seventh since 2021.
That Dundalk are the only club below Drogheda in the table heading into today's derby at Oriel Park (1.0) was something few foresaw. Two points out of 18 with just two goals scored is a huge worry for this decorated League of Ireland club, enduring their worst start to a campaign since 1972. Their plight is difficult to fathom, given the success between 2014 and 2020 when five league titles and three FAI Cups were added to the groaning trophy cabinet at Oriel Park. Manager Stephen O'Donnell, who played a crucial part in those glory years under Stephen Kenny, is starting to feel the heat. This is his third season at the helm. He has steered the club to third (2022) and fifth (2023) in the league, while not progressing beyond the last eight of the FAI Cup. After Friday's 2-1 loss to Shelbourne, the second half of a huge weekend for O'Donnell continues today against Louth rivals
Drogheda. The former midfielder accepts a club of Dundalk's status should be winning games. 'We've not started the season well, but are you going to dwell on it or are you going to get ready for the challenge ahead? 'I don't really get disillusioned in the sense that there's a job to do.' If results don't improve, the pressure will crank up.

Graphic


Pressure: Stephen O'Donnell

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; REVIEW; Pg. 44
Length: 383 words
Body


STEVE! (MARTIN) A DOCUMENTARY IN TWO PIECES, APPLE TV+
ARRIVING around the time his career is enjoying a late-stage high thanks to the success of Only Murders In The Building (three seasons to stream on Disney+), this pair of documentary films about stand-up legend, movie star and expert banjo player Steve Martin (pictured) comes at exactly the right moment. Part one deals with Martin's early days as he narrates an honest and emotional look back at his time as an emerging, mouldbreaking comedian in the mid-1970s, struggling with anxiety despite ? indeed because of ? the success that saw him making the leap to movie stardom. The second film jumps forward to examine his life in the present day, interviewing him about the films and shows that made him an international star as he goes about his life. Watched singly or as a pair, the two parts are equally fascinating in the picture they present of one of the world's funniest people.
DANCE PRODIGY Madu, Disney+ AT THE age of 12, Anthony Madu (pictured) had never left his home in a small town in Nigeria. Then he was offered a place at the Elmhurst Ballet School in England to study for seven years. This elegant, touching and often quite beautiful documentary follows Anthony as he embarks on a new life on a new continent, battling doubt and homesickness as he follows his dream of becoming a dancer. REALITY SHOW DIVAS Vanderpump Villa, Disney+ THE over-the-top drama and diva-ish romantic shenanigans of the Vanderpump Rules reality show are legendary. Set in and around the Hollywood nightclubs and restaurants run by Lisa Vanderpump, they set the highwater mark for glossy, steamy relationships between beautiful people as the series charts the on-off relationships of the staff and customers. This show may change the setting ? to a French chateau, as Lisa attempts to expand her business empire to include a glitzy hotel on the other side of the pond ? but otherwise it's business as usual as waiters, chefs and guests fall in and out of lust and love, with predictably fiery results. CRIME INVESTIGATION Trafficked: Underworlds With Mariana Van Zeller, 10pm, National Geographic THE bold journalist opens a gripping new series of investigations with a probe into the world of assassins. She starts in LA, before heading to South Africa.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF DIGITAL & ON DEMAND TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 48
Length: 383 words
Body


STEVE! (MARTIN) A DOCUMENTARY IN TWO PIECES, APPLE TV+
ARRIVING around the time his career is enjoying a late-stage high thanks to the success of Only Murders In The Building (three seasons to stream on Disney+), this pair of documentary films about stand-up legend, movie star and expert banjo player Steve Martin (pictured) comes at exactly the right moment. Part one deals with Martin's early days as he narrates an honest and emotional look back at his time as an emerging, mouldbreaking comedian in the mid-1970s, struggling with anxiety despite ? indeed because of ? the success that saw him making the leap to movie stardom. The second film jumps forward to examine his life in the present day, interviewing him about the films and shows that made him an international star as he goes about his life. Watched singly or as a pair, the two parts are equally fascinating in the picture they present of one of the world's funniest people.
DANCE PRODIGY Madu, Disney+ AT THE age of 12, Anthony Madu (pictured) had never left his home in a small town in Nigeria. Then he was offered a place at the Elmhurst Ballet School in England to study for seven years. This elegant, touching and often quite beautiful documentary follows Anthony as he embarks on a new life on a new continent, battling doubt and homesickness as he follows his dream of becoming a dancer.
REALITY SHOW DIVAS Vanderpump Villa, Disney+ THE over-the-top drama and diva-ish romantic shenanigans of the Vanderpump Rules reality show are legendary. Set in and around the Hollywood nightclubs and restaurants run by Lisa Vanderpump, they set the highwater mark for glossy, steamy relationships between beautiful people as the series charts the on-off relationships of the staff and customers. This show may change the setting ? to a French chateau, as Lisa attempts to expand her business empire to include a glitzy hotel on the other side of the pond ? but otherwise it's business as usual as waiters, chefs and guests fall in and out of lust and love, with predictably fiery results.
CRIME INVESTIGATION Trafficked: Underworlds With Mariana Van Zeller, 10pm, National Geographic THE bold journalist opens a gripping new series of investigations with a probe into the world of assassins. She starts in LA, before heading to South Africa.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 42
Length: 206 words
Body


ALONG with The Apprentice, this is one of the original reality contests, and while the UK Apprentice is on series 18, MasterChef is celebrating its 20th birthday (ignoring the Lloyd Grossman era of 1990-2001). John Torode is cool and collected as ever, while Gregg Wallace's manic grin is out in full force as the first hopefuls from a big batch of 58 contestants get cooking. 'This is when the wave of ambition hits the rock of reality for these amateur cooks,' says Gregg (pictured with John), 'and we are putting them through the most extraordinary challenges we've ever seen.'
Later in the series, those challenges will involve a trip to the culinary melting pot of Singapore and preparing a service at renowned restaurant Le Gavroche. But first, this week's six budding chefs get their MasterChef journeys under way by showcasing a star ingredient; next, the four who didn't win an apron have 45 minutes to prepare potato gnocchi with a sauce of their choice. And if you think this show can't still surprise, think again: one of the contestants makes all her own plates! Come back on Wednesday (9pm) as this week's heat continues, before Friday's quarter-final (7.30pm), when we'll find out who has made it through to Knockout Week.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S TV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 46
Length: 227 words
Body


MASTERCHEF, 6.30PM, BBC1
ALONG with The Apprentice, this is one of the original reality contests, yet unlike The Apprentice, which is based on a hit U.S. show, this is British born and bred. While the UK Apprentice is on series 18, MasterChef is celebrating its 20th birthday (ignoring the Lloyd Grossman era of 1990-2001). John Torode is cool and collected, as ever, while Gregg Wallace's manic grin is out in full force as the first hopefuls from a big batch of 58 contestants get cooking.
'This is when the wave of ambition hits the rock of reality for these amateur cooks,' says Gregg (pictured with John), 'and we are putting them through the most extraordinary challenges we've ever seen.' Later in the series, those challenges will involve a trip to the culinary melting pot of Singapore and preparing a service at renowned restaurant Le Gavroche. But first, this week's six budding chefs get their MasterChef journeys under way by showcasing a star ingredient; next, the four who didn't win an apron have 45 minutes to prepare potato gnocchi with a sauce of their choice. And if you think this show can't still surprise, think again: one of the contestants makes all her own plates! Come back on Wednesday (9pm) as this week's heat continues, before Friday's quarter-final (7.30pm), when we'll find out who's got the chops to make it through to Knockout Week.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PLAYER RATINGS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 23
Length: 537 words
Byline: JACK GAUGHAN
Body


MAN CITY (4-2-3-1) TEAM AVERAGE 6.2
ARSENAL (4-2-3-1) TEAM AVERAGE 6.4
STEFAN ORTEGA 6 One big take from a set play early on settled the nerves.
The German's distribution could have been crisper. MANUEL AKANJI 7.5 Giant performance again by Akanji. Strong in the challenge and good on the ball, he keeps standing tall.
RUBEN DIAS 7.5 Kept Havertz fairly quiet and followed him everywhere.
Reliable once again at centre half.
NATHAN AKE 5 Forced off with a calf injury after 27 minutes. Hadn't really got up to the pace of the game before then.
JOSKO GVARDIOL 5.5 Often the out ball for City. Went forward with purpose and completed a couple of big recovery tackles.
RODRI 8 Ran the game. Superb positioning when Arsenal countered and always City's driving force.
MATEO KOVACIC 5.5 A microcosm of the Croatian's debut season at City. Tidy enough, but a couple of mistakes and largely passive. BERNARDO SILVA 5.5 Quick start to the match, then faded slightly, before taking a more active role as the game opened up a bit in second half. KEVIN DE BRUYNE 6 Didn't get going until the final quarter, when his influence grew and he looked the most likely to win City the game.
PHIL FODEN 6 Probably unfortunate to be hooked. Looked bright without anything coming off for him in tight spaces.
ERLING HAALAND 6 Good when involved, but not involved enough and could not sort his feet out when a late chance came his way.
SUBSTITUTES Rico Lewis 7 (for Ake, 27 min); Jeremy Doku 6.5 (Foden, 61); Jack Grealish 6.5 (Kovacic, 61). PEP GUARDIOLA 6 Bold changes on the hour tried to force the issue but City did not really offer enough to deserve victory.
REFEREE: ANTHONY TAYLOR 6
DAVID RAYA 5.5 A few hairy moments, including one dropped cross, and may have started the Gunners' build-up better.
BEN WHITE 7 The most dangerous visiting player going forward, probing into promising areas behind City's back four.
WILLIAM SALIBA 7.5 Very smart covering play when City's midfielders attempted to find space in the inside channels.
GABRIEL 7.5
Clearly enjoyed the physical battle with Haaland and constantly found himself in the thick of things.
JAKUB KIWIOR 6 Solid enough but noticeable that Arteta substituted the Pole as soon as Doku came on for the champions.
DECLAN RICE 7.5 Always available and manfully matched City's tenacity. One big reason the hosts couldn't steam through the centre. JORGINHO 6 Tidy display, as you'd expect, without really standing out in midfield. Organised Arsenal in their low block.
BUKAYO SAKA 5.5 Left you wanting more. Put in one cross that Jesus might have latched on to but a quiet afternoon other than that. MARTIN ODEGAARD 5.5 Appeared a little loose on the ball when it mattered for the Gunners. He was hardly the only one, though.
GABRIEL JESUS 6 Enjoyed a couple of sights of goal coming off the left but lacked conviction to finish the chances.
KAI HAVERTZ 6 Arsenal's possession didn't stick enough with their centre forward but not all his fault. SUBSTITUTES Takehiro Tomiyasu 6 (for Kiwior, 66min); Thomas Partey 6 (Jorginho, 66); Leandro Trossard 6 (Jesus, 72); Gabriel Martinelli (Saka, 78).
MIKEL ARTETA 6 Set team up to sit in and try to nick something on the break.
Almost worked perfectly.
ATTENDANCE: NOT PROVIDED

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Police blamed Claudia by saying she had a 'complex and mysterious' love life. It wasn't true and it drained public sympathy; In a notorious and baffling unsolved crime, chef Claudia Lawrence vanished without trace on her way to work. Fifteen years later her mother, still trapped in a terrible limbo, says...
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 38,39
Length: 2098 words
Byline: Kathryn Knight
Body


THE moment she wakes up, and just before she goes to bed, Joan Lawrence says a little prayer. 'Sometimes during the day too, if I'm struggling,' she admits.
That prayer has never changed. It is a heartfelt plea for an answer to a question that has haunted her since March 19, 2009: where is her daughter Claudia?
Claudia was 35 when she disappeared from her two-bedroom terrace home on the outskirts of York in England.
To all intents and purposes, she vanished into thin air. Despite an extensive police investigation and a cold case review in 2013, no one has established what happened to her or where she might be.
It places Joan, now 80, in the small and unenviable group of parents of children who are missing but their fate unknown. 'The most terrible limbo,' as she calls it. 'You're grieving, but you can't grieve properly.'
Nor, like others in that same terrible limbo - among them Kate and Gerry McCann, to whom Joan has spoken in the past - can she ever give up hope of getting to the truth.
It is why she is talking to the Mail today, in a determined bid to keep Claudia's profile in the public arena and to appeal for any piece of information, however small, that might help to resolve the mystery.
There is another poignant reason too. For many years, it was Joan's ex-husband, Claudia's retired solicitor father Peter, who was the public keeper of Claudia's flame.
He died in 2020, going to his grave still not knowing what happened to his daughter, emboldening Joan - who had always campaigned tirelessly behind the scenes - to step forward into the breach.
'For so many years, I didn't have a voice,' she says. 'I have one now, but I didn't have one then and I will use it for as long as I can.'
It is a voice she is certainly using determinedly today in an interview in which she pulls no punches. Her anger about what she sees as police shortcomings is as strong as her grief is profound.
'Fundamentally, it's appalling that we are 15 years on and there are no answers,' she says. 'It's appalling it ever got this far and it needn't have been the case.
'I've been told many times I would make a much better detective than many of those currently serving in the police. There are some good police officers, of course, and I had a good relationship with some of those involved in the investigation over the years, but I have been badly let down.'
We meet in a popular pub near Joan's home in Malton, the handsome Yorkshire town where Claudia and her older sister, Ali, were raised, and in which memories of her younger daughter are everywhere.
'They were happy times,' she says. 'I consider myself lucky that I had Claudia for 36 years. Kate McCann had Maddie for only four, and others have had even less.'
LAUDIA and Ali were raised in
C what Joan, who takes great comfort from her faith, calls a 'Christian upbringing'. 'She knew right from wrong and we never had problems with her,' she says. It was comfortable, too. Before they divorced in 1996, the Lawrence family had a nice house, a large garden and assorted pets. Animal-loving Claudia grew up riding ponies and cuddling the family's King Charles spaniels. She attended private school in York, then catering college, eventually taking a job as a chef in the canteen at the University of York.
It was, as Joan puts it, a 'normal' life. That is, until that time in March 2009 that would turn Claudia's disappearance into one of the most baffling unsolved mysteries in Britain.
The facts are well documented. On Wednesday, March 18, the last day she was seen, Claudia finished her catering shift at 2pm and was recorded on CCTV making her way home to her cottage in
Heworth, which is around three miles from the city.
That evening she spoke on the phone to her father and her mother, the latter around 8.30pm. 'We were both watching the same television programme, Location, Location, Location,' Joan recalls.
Claudia told Joan she planned to get up around 5am the next day to walk to work as her Vauxhall Corsa was in a garage for repairs. It was a 45-minute walk.
Mobile phone records show she received a text message from a friend living in Cyprus just after 9pm, though she did not reply.
It would be the last ever communication. Claudia did not show up for work the next day or to meet her friend, Suzy Cooper, that evening at her local, the Nag's Head, just four doors down from her cottage.
When she failed to respond to calls, Suzy assumed she had fallen asleep, although Joan remains baffled as to why Suzy did not go to her house. 'It was just a few doors away - wouldn't you just pop down and try?' she asks. Either way, when she failed to respond to calls by Friday morning, Suzy called Claudia's father Peter, who used his own keys to enter her cottage.
Inside, there was no sign of a break-in. Claudia's bed was made, there were a few dirty dishes in the sink. Only her chef's whites, mobile phone and hair straighteners were missing.
Data later showed that her mobile phone never left the local area and was deliberately switched off some hours after she failed to turn up for work.
As it was Mother's Day, Joan was staying for the weekend with Ali, who was by then living in Derbyshire with her husband and young family. The first she heard of what was happening was on Friday afternoon, when Peter called and said: 'Claudia's disappeared.'
He had already alerted the police and, in retrospect, Joan finds even this puzzling. Why did both he and the police assume Claudia was missing before checking to see if Joan or Ali had heard anything from her?
'You would think that would be the first thing they would do' she says.
When I ask how mother and daughter responded to the news, Joan's eyes fill with tears. 'I can't talk about that,' she says. 'Some things must remain private.'
What she knows now is that it was the start of a nightmare from which she has never emerged, and which she believes has been prolonged by any number of police errors. She professes astonish- ment that the photo released by police showed Claudia with blonde hair, not dark brown with auburn streaks as it was when she went missing. 'I offered them an up-todate one but they didn't use it for four years,' she says.
Nor was any forensic search undertaken at her cottage for six weeks. Joan says, 'Everyone knows that the first few days after someone goers missing are crucial. And they messed it up.'
Perhaps most distressing of all, Detective Superintendent Ray Galloway - the man in charge of what was by then a suspected murder enquiry - made an appearance on BBC TV's Crimewatch and described Claudia's love life as 'complex and mysterious'.
Today Joan is clear she sees it as a form of 'victim-blaming' that drained sympathy for Claudia - who, like many women her age, had merely had a number of different partners in the years before her disappearance.
This information potentially alienated other witnesses. 'It was a lot of c**p that wasn't true,' she says firmly. 'He should never have said it. Everyone round here knew it wasn't true - it was a small community and people know what's true and what isn't.'
Galloway is now retired and Joan is withering in her assessment of his conduct. 'I met Galloway once for 15 minutes in the whole five years he was in charge,' she says. 'He walked into my house and didn't even say sorry for my loss. With that whole team, there was no sensitivity, no tact.'
S
HE points out that she was forbidden from even entering her daughter's home. 'I'm her mother, I was close to her,' she says. 'I could have spotted something that might have been useful. But more than that, where is the compassion?'
Nonetheless, for all Joan's anger, North Yorkshire Police did seem to leave no stone unturned. Over the next few months, they took 2,517 statements, checked 1,771 vehicles, searched 38 homes and business premises, examined 64 scenes and tested more than 200 items for DNA, all of which yielded no concrete evidence.
The assumption was that Claudia had probably been abducted and murdered shortly after leaving home on March 19 by a local man known to her.
The investigation had all but stalled when, in 2013, under the remit of a newly established Major Crime Unit, fresh eyes were put on the case under the supervision of Detective Superintendent Dai Malyn. Joan says: 'I felt he listened and had common courtesy.'
The team undertook a new forensic search of Claudia's home, and the discovery of a man's DNA on a cigarette butt in her car led to arrests, but no one was charged and Joan remains convinced other leads were missed.
'Claudia would not sit in a car with someone who smoked. She loathed the smell. She wouldn't stand anywhere near someone smoking, so that had to come from someone she didn't know, not an acquaintance,' she says.
Then, in August 2021, Joan learned that police, now led by Detective Superintendent Wayne
Fox, who was appointed senior investigating officer in October 2020, were searching a gravel pit in Sand Hutton, North Yorkshire.
Today she is still none the wiser about why they did it.
'They sent 70 officers to a small village and expected it not to create headlines' she says. 'Something significant clearly triggered it, but they wouldn't tell me what and I still don't know to this day. Much of the time the police just do not bother to keep me informed.'
Twice in recent years, Joan adds, locals have identified potential new persons of interest, only to be thwarted by police.
'One man went into a pub in Malton, and he knew things about Claudia that made the landlord suspicious,' she says. 'He tried to keep him talking while he called the police to get them to come along. But the local police said they couldn't send anyone, it had to come from York, and they didn't come. He couldn't keep him talking indefinitely and off he went. The same happened in a cafe near the station. I have been contacted several times by people with new information, but when I take it the police they don't listen.'
When the Mail contacted DS Fox, he said that while the inquiry has been in a 'reactive phase' since 2017, he wants to make clear 'the investigation is not closed'.
He added: 'Even after such a passage of time, our Cold Case Review Unit continue to receive information. Every new piece of information is carefully assessed against the significant volumes of material that have been gathered over the course of the investigation.
'If a specific line of enquiry is developed from receipt of new information, and grows in significance, we will take decisive action, as we did when extensively searching the gravel pits at Sand Hutton in August 2021.
'I hope the scale of activity which took place within that operation clearly demonstrates that, if information is capable of being effectively developed, North Yorkshire Police will work tirelessly in our continued search for the truth.'
In the meantime, theory after unlikely theory has bloomed in the vacuum that Claudia's absence has left behind - among them that Claudia was trafficked abroad or that she decided to start a new life in Cyprus, where she had previously holidayed and had friends.
O
NE theory Joan does not dismiss out of hand, however, is that her daughter may have fallen victim to double murderer Christopher Halliwell, a taxi driver serving a full-life term for the sexually motivated murders of Becky Godden-Edwards and Sian O'Callaghan in Wiltshire.
Halliwell has since been linked to many other violent offences against women involving assaults, rapes, disappearances and murders, with the date March 19 featuring in several of these cases.
I ask Joan what she thinks happened to her daughter, and it is now I see laid bare the grief that she has tried to manage throughout our interview. 'I honestly don't know. I just don't know,' she says, her face stricken.
It is a haunting question that has underpinned the past 15 years as she navigates milestone after heart-breaking milestone.
In the last year alone, there have been two particularly poignant ones: her own 80th birthday and last month, when Claudia would have turned 50.
Joan, tiredness sweeping over her features, says: 'I can't remember what I did on her birthday.'
She has watched Claudia's friends get married at the church where she was christened, knowing she would have been a bridesmaid, then godmother to the children that followed, while Ali's sons, now 19 and 15, have little to no memory of their aunt.
Joan knows that time is running out although she will never give up hope. 'Someone out there knows what happened,' she says. 'We just need to find them.'
And in the meantime, she will say her prayer, night and morning, hoping that one day it will be answered.

Graphic


Heartbroken: Joan Lawrence battles with Claudia's disappearance Picture: JOHN NGUYEN/JNVISUALSPicture: NORTH YORKSHIRE POLICE/PA

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Proud Bradford stagnating under a trigger-happy owner who is still giving fans false promises
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 806 words
Byline: Matt Bralow
Body


ANOTHER turbulent week in the life of Bradford City ended with the tonic of victory but it will take much more than that to restore self-esteem at Valley Parade.
It has become a miserable existence for their thousands of loyal and long-suffering fans, as the season nears its end with a humbling new local rivalry taking shape with Harrogate Town halfway down the fourth tier.
Old foes Leeds United, meanwhile, stretch further into the distance with sights on a return to the Premier League.
Bradford have spent five years languishing in League Two. There remains an outside chance of a late dash for the play-offs but it would involve a most radical reversal of form.
The 2-0 win on Good Friday over Tranmere Rovers ended a sequence of four defeats, three of which came at home before a 3-0 thumping down the road at Harrogate, which proved an embarrassment too far.
Fans activated plans for protests against owner Stefan
Rupp and the fanzine site Width of a Post issued an eloquent open letter, imploring him to intervene or sell.
It is a competitive field for terrible owners in the EFL and Rupp is firmly among them. He is largely absent from Bradford, spends most of his time in his native Germany and admits football isn't really his thing ? the businessman is more of a motorsport guy.
Rupp and Edin Rahic bought the club together in 2016. At first, Rupp left it all to Rahic, who quickly destroyed a well-run operation in the style of tin-pot dictator until forced out within two years. Rupp stepped in, promising supporters they deserved better, but in truth not a lot has changed.
Managers still come and go with remarkable regularity. There is a skeleton board and most of the control lies with Ryan Sparks, an inexperienced chief executive promoted from a role within the media department. The irony is communication reached an alltime low with Sparks in charge.
Hundreds of fans joined forces to tackle the culture of silence and wrote to Rupp. They bundled up the letters and shipped the package off to his business address in Bavaria, only to find it returned with a note to say not wanted by the recipient.
Season-ticket prices, competitively priced for many years, are set to increase and the lease on the stadium is up in 2028, reheating rumours that they may move in with rugby league neighbours Bradford Bulls at the Odsal Stadium.
The backdrop to all of this is that the football club with its proud history and the city with its population of more than half a million should be capable of so much more.
Little more than a decade ago, they were on a riotous run to the League Cup final as a fourth-tier club, before topping that achievement with promotion to League One. They were challenging for promotion to the Championship under Phil Parkinson when Rupp and Rahic appeared on the scene.
THEN came relegation and after five years in the EFL's basement, everyone is demoralised. Crowds appear to have held up at a glance, though official figures are bolstered by 15,000 season-ticket holders and do not chime with the swathes of empty seating in evidence at recent games.
Fearing the dangerous onset of apathy, sections of the disgruntled fanbase set about organising a protest, and Rupp tried to head
Glum: Defender Sam Stubbs hangs his head GETTY IMAGES it off with an open letter. 'Not good enough' and 'hugely disappointing,' he conceded.
He vowed to do better, to bring in more expertise and address ongoing problems. He also apologised for his personal absence and the remote nature of his ownership style.
It was the full bingo card of contrition. Rupp also reiterated he would consider offers from potential buyers, although he is thought to want back the £10million he paid, a price that seems unrealistic since the club has been so badly damaged. It was not particularly wellreceived by those who feel they have heard it all before.
'We are pleased Stefan Rupp has made the effort to communicate some of his intentions for the club,' said Steve Hamilton, chair of Bradford City Fans Independent Group.
'However, he has made previous statements with promises which were not actioned. The club was challenging for Championship football when he bought it and have regressed to a lower half of League Two. Our fans require regular communication and a short, medium and long-term plan that shows ambition and represents the sizable support given by Bradfordians over many years.
This club should be flourishing and it is not right now.'
Disillusion reigns with Bradford, who are in 14th place, bound for Grimsby Town today.
PS: It is not his most pressing concern, but Bradford City boss Graham Alexander has been dislodged from top spot in the ranks of Britain's high-scoring defenders. The title now belongs to James Tavernier, the Bradfordborn Rangers captain and right back, who scored his 131st goal on Saturday against Hibernian.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Rice and Rodri is a battle royal; Title tussle lit up by two midfield heavyweights at the top of their game
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 24,25
Length: 846 words
Byline: SAMI MOKBEL
Body


ECHOES of Patrick Vieira and Roy Keane. Shades of
Steven Gerrard and Frank Lampard.
Whether the latest chapter of enthralling Premier League midfield rivalries stands the test of time remains to be seen but Rodri versus Declan Rice is brewing up very nicely.
Rarely out of each other's eyeline, neither giving an inch. Bruising and balletic in equal measure. Painstaking graft complemented by a technical excellence and tactical acumen that illustrates the very best of what these two exceptional teams have to offer.
Rodri: Manchester City's puppet master. Rice: Arsenal's beating heart.
This was an occasion that did not require any hyping, although as we reflect on these 90 minutes many of us will feel unfulfilled.
And within this intriguing if placid clash between - arguably - England's best two sides, we witnessed a compelling battle of wits between two supreme footballers at the top of their game. Each going about their business in an irrepressible manner befitting the occasion. Dishing out punishment and suffering their own blows but still finding the fortitude to drive their team-mates forward.
Rodri nicked the ball off Rice's toes to initiate a City attack, only for the Arsenal midfielder to race back to atone for his error as if his life depended on it.
Later, Rice burst through City's lines with the energy and zest that has typified his season, only to be faced with Rodri's 6ft 3in frame stopping him in his tracks.
Neither player was accepting of defeat, personal or collective.
After the final whistle, with members of both teams on their haunches, the pair sought each other out and embraced. Game recognises game - and both were looking strikingly familiar to one another. The sort of respect boxers show each other after 12 rounds of brutality.
Eventually, the two protagonists separated from their clinch. They will rekindle their rivalry and we should all look forward to that.
Such is the nature of the modern world, there will be those who will want to compare and contrast Rodri and Rice's performances and proclaim one as the superior player. To that affect, the stats suggest Rodri had the greater impact on this encounter. The Spaniard took a staggering 144 touches with a pass accuracy of 91 per cent - significantly more than any other player. Ruben Dias was second with 98 touches and a completion rate of 92 per cent.
In comparison, Rice took just 42 touches yesterday - eight fewer than William Saliba, who had the most for Arsenal.
But Rice's contribution to Arsenal's valiant display here at the Etihad was made up of immeasurables. Guile and grit. Thrust and drive. Sometimes the numbers don't tell the full story.
'Playing against Rice is like playing against a wall,' said former
Arsenal midfielder Emmanuel Petit. 'Opponents can kick him, they can hurt him. But he will play on until the end and will stay strong mentally and physically.
'He can suffer a lot but he will follow you always and for me this is the big difference between Arsenal of last season and Arsenal this season.'
Petit knows a thing or two about what it takes to be successful in a Premier League-winning midfield. There's a resilience to Arsenal that was perhaps lacking last term and Rice is the fulcrum of that newly discovered durability.
On Sunday, Arsenal required every drop of that tenacity as Rodri ran the show.
There is little left to say about the Spaniard. You have to be some player to stand out in this
City team but somehow he sticks out like a sore thumb.
Pep Guardiola calls Rodri his 'lighthouse'. He is City's conductor, their string-puller-inchief. An unerring composure with his back to goal. A relentless urge to pass the ball forward, but all with ease and comfort.
The last time Rodri played and City lost was in February last year, more than 60 matches ago. The evidence is compelling. He is already in the Premier League's elite echelon of central midfielders. Ask Keane, Viera, Gerrard or Lampard - they would concur.
One day we may view Rodri as the very best to have graced English football. That isn't an exaggeration.
Yet, with all that said, the fact Arsenal were able to keep City at bay in spite of Rodri's influence represents their progress after a stalemate that ultimately failed to provide any clues as to where the title may end up.
This was a good point for both. A draw at the Etihad is never to be sniffed at, but at the same time City - whose defence was depleted by the absence of John Stones, Kyle Walker and goalkeeper Ederson from their starting XI, before Nathan Ake was substituted with a muscular injury - may feel this was a missed oppurtunity for Arsenal given their personnel problems.
The significance of it all will come out in the wash in May, but what isn't up for debate is the brilliance of Rice and Rodri.
To think, Guardiola had designs on pairing them together in City's midfield this season. Imagine a midfield triumvirate of Kevin De Bruyne, Rodri and Rice. It's almost unsporting.
But City's failed pursuit of Rice has become Arsenal's gain. Not that City fans, with Rodri in tow, will harbour too many feelings of regret.

Graphic


No way through: Rice goes into battle with Foden SHUTTERSTOCKMaestro: Rodri keeps his cool as Havertz closes in REUTERS

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



SF 'misinformation'; 'Go back and study Junior Cycle CSPE' says senator as SF calls for election of taoiseach
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 422 words
Byline: Aisling Moloney
Body


A PETITION by Sinn Féin to allow the people to elect the next taoiseach - instead of the Fine Gael party - has been branded 'straight-up misinformation' by Government politicians.
Sinn Féin promoted an online petition calling for a general election in the wake of Leo Varadkar's sudden resignation as leader of Fine Gael and Taoiseach.
He resigns on April 9, when leader-in-waiting Simon Harris - chosen by Fine Gael TDs - will be formally nominated as taoiseach in the Dáil. The online petition says: 'The people should choose the next taoiseach, not Fine Gael. It's time for an election. It's time for change.' Green party TD Marc Ó Cathasaigh called it 'straight-up misinformation'.
The Waterford TD said: 'They are creating an impression that in some way a taoiseach that is appointed in this way is illegitimate.' He said Sinn Féin was 'deliberately misrepresenting the constitutional position. We don't directly elect a taoiseach.
We don't live in America.' Article 13 of the Constitution states that the President appoints the taoiseach following their nomination by the Dáil.
'We have a huge issue with misinformation on social media and political parties should be leading the fight against it,' Mr Ó Cathasaigh said.
The Green TD said Sinn Féin rallies after the 2020 election had a 'narrative' that it had won the election, due to getting the most first-preference votes.
'It's legitimate to say at this point in the electoral cycle, "We should go back to the people," but that is not what they are saying,' he said.
'They're saying you, the people, should elect the taoiseach. Even at the next election, the people won't elect the taoiseach.'
Fine Gael senator John Cummins said Sinn Féin needed to go back to study 'Junior Cycle CSPE [Civic, Social and Political Education],' and questioned whether the party wanted to propose a referendum to change the Constitution, to give people a direct vote for the head of Government.
Those who sign Sinn Féin's petition are given the option of supplying an email address 'if you want to be part of Sinn Féin's campaign for change and if you want to hear more from us'.
Senator Cummins said he would like to know what the party 'intends to do with the email addresses they are collecting as part of their survey.'
A Sinn Féin spokesman said: 'Simon Harris is running scared because he knows his only hope of being elected taoiseach is by prolonging an arrangement with Fianna Fáil and the Greens. He should call a general election and let the people have their say.'
aisling.moloney@dailymail.ie

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Teen killed 1km away from scene of triple road tragedy
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 7
Length: 513 words
Byline: Garreth MacNamee
Body


A TEENAGE pedestrian has died in a road accident just a kilometre away from where a mother and her two young daughters were killed only days earlier.
The 17-year-old lost his life after he was knocked down by a car on the N17 just outside Claremorris, Co. Mayo.
His death occurred less than a kilometre away from where Úna Bowden, 47, and her daughters Ciara, 14, and Saoirse, 10, lost their lives in a car crash in the middle of last week.
The teenager was one of three people who were killed in separate incidents over the Easter Bank Holiday weekend.
A cyclist was knocked down and killed in Kildare yesterday morning. This followed the death of a pregnant mother of one in Tipperary on Friday.
The number of fatalities on the roads so far this year now stands at 58, compared to 42 at the same time last year.
In Mayo, locals in the Claremor- ris are were coming to the terms with the latest tragedy to hit their community.
It is understood the victim had been in a car with friends who had dropped him off on the N17. He was then walking on the road when he was hit by a passing car. The crash happened at around 9.20pm on Saturday night.
Local councillor Richard Finn told the Mail that this was another 'terrible incident'.
He said: 'All I know about this was that he was a young fella and he was walking up the road. It's a straight road now as well so we're not too sure what really happened to him. There are a lot of rumours and fake news out there about it as well so we have to wait and see. We believe the lad who passed away is a foreign national. They're needing to contact family abroad, that sort of thing, so that's why there has been a delay in his name getting out.
'All we can do is offer condolences to the family of the deceased and the young lad and his friends. Every accident is different. The cause is different in every one of them.'
In Co. Kildare, a man in his 60s was pronounced dead after he was knocked off his bike at Knocknagee yesterday. His body was removed to Naas General Hospital, where a postmortem is due to take place.
Claire Kavanagh, 30s, died after a two-car crash on Friday night. The pregnant mother of one was a passenger in the car with her husband when the crash happened.
Tipperary councillor Kieran Bourke said: 'She was a lovely kid. She used to come down to my house while growing up when she was a little kid. I was there at her Communion and Confirmation because she made it with my daughter. She comes from a fantastic family and was a fantastic mother to her little boy. It's just a huge loss not only to her family and husband but a huge loss to the town as well.'
Meanwhile, it has been confirmed Ms Bowden and her daughters are to be buried in Donegal. The family lived in Moycullen, Co. Galway, but Ms Bowden was originally from Donegal.
Her husband David Bowden had been working with the United Nations in Ethiopia when the tragedy happened.
Úna and her two girls will be laid to rest next to Una's late mother in a graveyard in the village of Convoy on Wednesday.
garreth.macnamee@dailymail.ie
'All we can do is offer condolences'

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TELEVISION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 42,43
Length: 246 words
Body


QUIZ GRAND FINAL Mastermind, 7pm, BBC2 WHILE MasterChef blows up the balloons for it's 20th-anniversary series, this TV quiz clocks in as the grandaddy of them all - it's been on air for 52 years, since 1972. Clive Myrie (pictured) asks the questions as six contenders get comfortable in the famous black chair, hoping to be crowned 2024 champion. Specialist subjects include artist Francis Bacon, composer Clara Schumann and Wimbledon singles championships.
HOSPITALITY SECRETS Grand Indian Hotel, 8pm, Ch4 EVER wondered how luxury resorts keep their inner workings - rubbish, laundry, catering - hidden from the guests? Tonight's second of three fascinating episodes takes us inside the incredible 1,200 metres of underground tunnels that connect these departments to guest accommodation at the Oberoi Group's flagship lakeside hotel in Udaipur.
FILM CHOICES Ferdinand, 12.05pm, Ch4 HORNED and heavy, Ferdinand looks fearsome, but he's a pussycat. In this charming animation, the soft-hearted bull flees his fate in the ring, making plenty of friends along the way. The voice cast includes John Cena as Ferdinand (pictured), Kate McKinnon as his goat mentor, and David Tennant as Angus the Scottish bull.
The Hitman's Wife's Bodyguard, 9.30pm, RTÉ One RYAN REYNOLDS and Samuel L. Jackson return for the crime comedy sequel as bodyguard Michael Bryce and hitman Darius Kincaid. Bryce is on holiday when Kincaid's con artist wife Sonia (Salma Hayek) has a rescue mission for him.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TELEVISION
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 46,47
Length: 249 words
Body


QUIZ GRAND FINAL Mastermind, 7pm, BBC2 WHILE MasterChef blows up the balloons for it's 20th-anniversary series, this TV quiz clocks in as the grandaddy of them all - it's been on air for 52 years, since 1972. Clive Myrie (pictured) asks the questions as six contenders get comfortable in the famous black chair, hoping to be crowned 2024 champion. Specialist subjects include artist Francis Bacon, composer Clara Schumann and Wimbledon singles championships.
HOSPITALITY SECRETS Grand Indian Hotel, 8pm, Ch4 EVER wondered how luxury resorts keep their inner workings - rubbish, laundry, catering - hidden from the guests? Tonight's second of three fascinating episodes takes us inside the incredible 1,200 metres of underground tunnels that connect these departments to guest accommodation at the Oberoi Group's lakeside flagship hotel in Udaipur.
FILM CHOICES Ferdinand, 12.05pm, Ch4 HORNED and heavy, Ferdinand looks fearsome, but he's a pussycat. In this charming animation, the soft-hearted bull flees his fate in the ring, making plenty of friends along the way. The voice cast includes John Cena as Ferdinand, Kate McKinnon as his goat mentor, and David Tennant as Angus, the Scottish bull.
Woman In Gold, 10.30pm, BBC2 HELEN MIRREN leads the cast of this absorbing drama, based on the real-life story of Maria Altmann, a Jewish refugee from wartime Vienna. Decades after the war, she sought to retrieve valuable paintings by Gustav Klimt that her family had owned before the Nazis stole them.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Ten Hag in peril after his United side down tools
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 32,33
Length: 779 words
Byline: CHRIS WHEELER
Body


BRENTFORD 1 MAN UTD 1
WHEN Manchester United had their pants pulled down at Brentford last season, Erik ten Hag sent his stars on a punishment run the next day to make up for their lack of effort. If only it was that easy this time.
Ten Hag was new then. It was his second game in charge and a 4-0 defeat felt like nothing worse than a nasty wake-up call.
The Dutchman was the progressive manager hired to sort out a shambolic dressing room. It was all part of the process and Ten Hag even joined his players on the run that Sunday in August 2022 to emphasise the sense of shared responsibility.
United recovered from their embarrassment at the Gtech Community Stadium to finish third in the League, win the Carabao Cup and reach the FA Cup final. So how has it come to this? Why, 19 months longer in the job, were United outplayed and outfought by a team who had lost 15 of their last 20 games?
Because make no mistake, this crazy 1-1 draw was every bit as one-sided as Ten Hag's last visit to Brentford and posed even more serious questions given the ramifications it could have for United's hopes of Champions League qualification and Ten Hag's chances of keeping his job beyond the summer.
'That's the sort of performance that gets the manager the sack because there was a lack of effort,' said Sky Sports pundit Jamie Redknapp.
After nearly two full seasons in charge and £400million spent on signings, Ten Hag still can't get the basics out of his players. He was good enough to admit that Brentford showed more 'passion and desire', even if his claim that this point might prove to be crucial smacked of desperation.
United look like a team lacking identity or a plan; one who are happy to let opponents pepper their goal (Brentford had a staggering 31 attempts here) and strike on the break, like a boxer playing rope-a-dope. A team who fly by the seat of their pants, relying on individual brilliance and last-gasp heroics rather than a discernible style of play.
When United beat Brentford 2-1 at Old Trafford in October, they needed two stoppage-time goals from Scott McTominay. When they knocked Liverpool out of the FA Cup, it was Amad Diallo scoring in added time of extra time.
On a strange night in west London on Saturday, Mason Mount almost did it again when his first goal for United in the 96th minute threatened to inflict a cruel defeat on Thomas Frank's side who had bossed the game, hit the woodwork three times and had a goal by Ivan Toney ruled out for a marginal offside.
Frank said he was just about to turn his back on the football gods when Toney set up a 99th-minute equaliser for Kristoffer Ajer.
Once again the Bees had swarmed all over United and once again Ten Hag had no answer. After all the talk of beating Liverpool being an opportunity to finish the season in style, this was another step back. It's been the story of Ten Hag's second season.
United are now 11 points behind Aston Villa and eight behind Tottenham in the race for Champions League places. The next two are away to Chelsea on Thursday and at home to Liverpool on Sunday. With respect, Brentford was meant to be the easy one.
Champions League qualification may prove the yardstick by which Jim Ratcliffe and Ineos judge the manager in the summer. Beyond that, they may look at the trajectory of this team and where they seem to be heading. None of which is good news for Ten Hag. BRENTFORD (3-5-2): Flekken 6.5; Jorgensen 6, Ajer 7, Collins 6.5; Roerslev 7.5 (Maupay 86min), Yarmoliuk 6.5 (Damsgaard 71, 6), Jensen 7, Janelt 7, Lewis-Potter 6 (Ghoddos 87); TONEY 8, Wissa 7 (Mbeumo 71, 6). Scorer: Ajer 90+9. Booked: Wissa, Jorgensen, Maupay. Manager: Thomas Frank 7.
MANCHESTER UNITED (4-2-3-1): Onana 6.5; Dalot 5.5, Lindelof 6 (Martinez 69, 6), Varane 5 (Maguire 46, 6), Wan-Bissaka 5; Mainoo 5.5 (Casemiro 80), McTominay 6.5; Garnacho 4 (Antony 59, 6), Fernandes 6, Rashford 4 (Mount 80), Hojlund 5.
Scorer: Mount 90+6. Booked: Wan-Bissaka, McTominay. Manager: Erik ten Hag 5.
Referee: Simon Hooper 7. Attendance: 17,138.
ERIK'S MEN SWARMED BY BEES
THE numbers show just how
BRENTFORD MAN UTD 31 .................. Shots ..................... 11 34 ............... Crosses .................... 9 14 ................Corners .................... 4 85 .....Touches in opp box ......... 16 85
BRENTFORD became just the second side since 2008-09 to have 80+ touches in the opposition box in a single Premier League game, after Man City.
dominant Brentford were: 31
BRENTFORD hit the woodwork four times. Their tally of 31 shots was their best in a Premier League game. United have now faced 20+ shots in 11 different top-flight matches this term, with only Sheffield United (12) doing so more often.

Graphic


Nowhere to hide: Fernandes goes to the fans at the end REX

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TERIYAKI TOFU RICE BOWL
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 40
Length: 202 words
Body


396g firm tofu 50g panko breadcrumbs 40g flour 2 eggs, beaten Spray vegetable oil 60g teriyaki sauce 250g brown rice 50g tenderstem broccoli To serve: Sesame seeds 1 Drain the tofu and pat with kitchen paper to remove excess moisture. Wrap in a clean tea towel, put a heavy pan on top and leave to dry out until needed.
2 Preheat the oven to 220°C/200°C fan/gas mark 7. Line a baking tray with nonstick parchment paper.
3 Cut the tofu into 16 even pieces. 4 In three separate bowls, add the breadcrumbs to one, flour to another and the egg in the third.
5 Season the flour. Dip the tofu in the flour and shake off any excess.
6 Dip in the egg and then coat in the breadcrumb. 7 Transfer to the lined tray, spray with oil and bake for 20 minutes.
8 Cook the rice according to the package instructions. 9 In a saucepan, boil the tenderstem broccoli for 3-5 minutes.
10 Warm the teriyaki sauce.
Spoon the rice into bowls, top with the tofu and the tenderstem broccoli. Drizzle over the warmed sauce and sprinkle with toasted sesame seeds.
Per serving 437kcals, 9.5g fat (2.1g saturated), 69.3g carbs, 3.4g sugars, 19.6g protein, 4.2g fibre, 0.64g sodium EASYFOOD SPRING ON SALE NOW!
In association with find us at www.easyfood.ie

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



The Government's all-or-nothing approach to sustainable energy will cost the taxpayer dearly
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 14
Length: 743 words
Byline: Kevin McPartlan
Body


AHIKE in excise duty today will be the first of four separate duty, tax and levy increases in the next 12 months. The hikes will negatively affect people's ability to fill up their car and heat their home, cumulatively adding 15 cents per litre (CPL) to petrol and 12CPL to diesel. This is a major blow to consumers and yet another factor adding to cost-of-living concerns.
At a time when calls for environmental sustainability grow louder by the day, Ireland - much like the rest of the world - finds itself at a critical juncture with a myriad difficult choices.
The Government's ambitious push to sustainable and renewable energy sources is both vital and urgently required.
However, the path chosen to do this by the Government is littered with challenges, not least the significant financial burden being placed on the shoulders of Irish businesses and consumers.
To date, the Government has failed to fully engage with the fuels industry. Its approach to fiscal policy regarding our energy supply for transport and heating is out of touch with the energy dependencies of Irish businesses and households.
Ireland's strategy ignores the potential of low-carbon and renewable liquid fuels as transitional alternatives. By focusing on an idealised future of electric vehicles and renewable energy, without due consideration for intermediate solutions, the Government risks alienating a populace not yet fully equipped for such a leap. In reality, our infrastructure, economy, and society are not yet ready for an abrupt all-or-nothing switch, yet we are careering towards that cliff edge.
Today's excise-duty rise will not only increase fuel prices for Irish households, but it will result in a gulf between costs at stations in Ireland and the UK, putting border-county outlets at a disadvantage.
Border This approach seems less about facilitating a smooth transition to renewable energy and more about ideological purity - and short-term fiscal gains, which will create a two-tier fuel economy in our border counties.
While the underlying intention - to pivot consumers towards more sustainable transport and heating - is commendable, the execution of this strategy is fundamentally flawed and could usher in a period of undue hardship for many.
The rationale offered by successive governments for these escalating costs is anchored in the desire to promote a transition to Electric Vehicles (EVs).
While we are in full agreement on the need to introduce more sustainable transport methods, this has proven to be a fallacious argument.
Putting petrol in the average citizen's car is not discretionary, it is an absolute need, as was demonstrated when - at a time of record fuel prices in the immediate aftermath of the invasion of Ukraine - sales volumes for fuel did not significantly fall.
These increases will only add to the already (EURO)6billion a year paid to the State in taxation - about 6% of total revenue received by the Exchequer. And about half the money paid at the pump goes to the Government through taxes and levies.
We urgently need a comprehensive review of fiscal policy in relation to the energy we use for transport and heating if we are going to manage the energy transition in a way that does not punish fuel consumers and make the cost of everyday life unsustainable.
Key to this will be closer collaboration between industry and the Government, and a broader input of views when it comes to making important fiscal decisions relating to energy.
Policy Fuels for Ireland believes that three key factors must be considered when it comes to shaping fiscal policy on energy.
These factors are: supporting the increased and rapid transition to sustainable energy; protecting the revenue generated from the fuels industry for the State; and ensuring that nobody is put in a position where they are priced out of putting fuel in their car or heating their home.
Our organisation wholeheartedly supports the transition to net-zero and recognises the need to build an environmentally sustainable future, and we have continually worked with stakeholders to play our part in achieving this.
Unfortunately, higher and higher taxation on fuel, resulting in increased costs for consumers, is not a magic bullet for achieving this, and will only unnecessarily punish ordinary citizens.
Greater collaboration and a broader array of views providing input into this issue is the best way to achieve a positive outcome for Irish consumers and our society as a whole.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Thousands of Israelis say Netanyahu must go
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 10
Length: 431 words
Byline: Vanessa Allen
Body


TENS of thousands of Israelis took to the streets at the weekend to demand the release of hostages from Gaza and the ousting of Benjamin Netanyahu.
Protests were held in cities including Tel Aviv, Jerusalem and Haifa, calling for the release of the estimated 130 people still held captive since October 7.
Families of the hostages were among the crowds calling for the controversial prime minister to leave power, branding him an 'obstacle to the deal'.
A statement from his office said the 74-year-old was undergoing surgery last night for a hernia and deputy prime minister and justice minister Yariv Levin would stand in while he was sedated.
Mr Netanyahu has come under growing pressure from the families of the captives to strike a deal with Hamas to free them.
He has insisted Israel will fight until it has destroyed the terrorist group's military capabilities.
Egyptian broadcaster Al-Qahera reported that negotiations for a truce between Israel and Hamas 'were due to resume in Cairo yest.' terday. Protesters in Tel Avivchanted: 'Enough killing, enough despair.' Shira Albag, whose daughter Liri, 19, was among the youngest to be taken hostage, said: 'The people of Israel won't forget or forgive anyone who prevents a deal that would bring them [the hostages] back to us.
'After 176 days, 4,244 hours, the excuses have run out.'
Relatives said it was time to step up the protests and to call for Mr Netanyahu to leave office.
Einav Zangauker, whose son Matan was taken by Hamas, said the prime minister's handling of the negotiations was 'criminal'.
Addressing crowds in Jerusalem, she said: 'You [Netanyahu] are the obstacle... You are the one who stands between us and the return home of our loved ones.
From now we will work to immediately replace you... We will publicly hound you.'
Protest leaders called on supporters to gather outside the Knesset in Jerusalem for a four-day demonstration, and to erect a tent city.
In Tel Aviv, organisers said Saturday's demonstration was the biggest seen since the October 7 attacks. Demonstrations blocked major roads and 16 people were arrested. Clashes with police were also recorded in Jerusalem, where hundreds of protesters broke through barriers to demonstrate near Mr Netanyahu's home.
In a televised press conference last night before his scheduled surgery, Mr Netanyahu said he was 'working night and day, burning the midnight oil' to make sure the hostages were brought home.
He also warned that those calling for him to resign would 'paralyse' the country's efforts to bring the war to an end.
news@dailymail.ie
'Burning the midnight oil'

Graphic


Rally: Protesters in Tel Aviv call for the hostages' release

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Toon know they dodged a bullet with Phillips
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 33
Length: 402 words
Byline: CRAIG HOPE
Body


NEWCASTLE 4 WEST HAM 3
NEWCASTLE'S decision to sign Sandro Tonali has badly damaged their season. Their decision not to sign another midfielder, Kalvin Phillips, may have saved it.
Both players continue to make headlines. One for gambling on football, the other for gambling on a career resurrection at West Ham. Neither are on to a good thing. Where they differ is that the more Tonali is absent, the better a player he apparently becomes. For Phillips, the more he plays, the worse it gets.
When Newcastle lost their £52million marquee summer signing to a 10-month betting ban in October, they looked to the Manchester City outcast to fill the hole come January.
Eddie Howe had too many doubts and, despite the clubs discussing a loan fee, they did not pursue the deal. Phillips, you suspect, would not so much have filled the hole as fallen into it, so disastrous has his subsequent move to West Ham been.
Saturday was the latest sorry episode. When he came on with 21 minutes to play, West Ham were leading 3-1. David Moyes wanted to add an experienced head and fresh legs to his team's resistance. Except Phillips is not as experienced as you'd think for a 28-yearold England international.
Before joining West Ham, he had made less than 50 Premier League starts. As for fresh legs, there was a fear at Newcastle they had gone stale at City. Indeed, what has emerged is a shadow of the player who starred for his country at Euro 2020.
Never was that more evident than here. In the 77th minute he conceded a penalty from which Alexander Isak made it 3-2. In the 83rd minute he was missing in midfield when Isak sent Harvey Barnes clear for 3-3. And in the 90th minute, Phillips failed to tackle Barnes on the edge of the area and the Toon man slammed into the bottom corner to complete a stunning comeback win.
As he boarded the team bus, Phillips was called 'useless' by a fan and he ? understandably ? responded by flipping the bird. He is, though, starting to feel like an albatross for West Ham. As one fan posted on X in the 69th minute: 'Oh no, Phillips is coming on. 4-3 Newcastle incoming'.
Moyes should have continued to embrace the chaos of the contest and pushed for a fourth goal. In trying to control the game, he lost control. He handed the initiative to Newcastle and their home crowd and, in attempting to shut up shop, the West Ham boss invited Newcastle's late raid.
LEAGUE OF IRELAND PREVIEWS: PAGE 10

Graphic


Grim cameo: Kalvin Phillips

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Vecchini's brace of tries seal it for Italy
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 54
Length: 338 words
Byline: AOIFE ENGLISH
Body


IRELAND ITALY 21 27
HOOKER Vittoria Vecchini scored a brace of tries as Italy beat Ireland 27-21 in the Guinness Women's Six Nations in Dublin.
Vecchini barged over the line from close range in the 25th minute and repeated the trick in the second half following a superb break from winger Alyssa D'Inca at the RDS Arena.
Ireland had taken an early lead when Vittoria Ostuni Minuzzi was adjudged to have committed a deliberate knock-on and sent to the sin bin, referee Hollie Davidson awarding the home side a penalty try.
However, Vecchini's two tries and further scores from Valeria Fedrighi and winger Aura Muzzo turned the game in the visitors' favour, Muzzo diving over in the corner just minutes after having a try ruled out by the TMO for a forward pass.
Ireland refused to throw in the towel and Katie Corrigan intercepted a loose pass to sprint in under the posts, leaving Dannah O'Brien a simple conversion with a minute remaining.
Roared on by a record crowd of 6,605, the home side piled on the pressure and worked their way to within two metres of the Italian line, only to lose the ball in the tackle as Italy clung on for the win.
Full-back Lauren Delaney was carried off on a stretcher with a neck injury shortly before half-time but was later seen sitting amongst the Ireland substitutes. IRELAND: L Delany (N Fowley 37); K Corrigan,
E Higgins, E Breen (A Dalton 59), B Parsons; D O'Brien, A Reilly (M Scuffil-McCabe 59); L Djougang (N O'Dowd 77), N Jones, C Haney (S McGrath 63), D Wall (E Corri 67), S Monaghan (capt); G Moore (F Tuite 55), A Wafer, B Hogan. Scorers - Tries: Penalty Try, Jones, Corrigan. Cons: O'Brien (2).
ITALY: V Minuzzi; A Muzzo, B Rigoni, E Stevanin; A D'Inca; V Madia, S Stefan (capt); S Turani (G Maris 15), V Vecchini (L Gurioli 80), S Seye (L Gai 75); V Fedrighi, G Duca; S Tounesi (I Locatelli 70), F Sgorbini (B Veronese 12), I Arrighetti (A Frangipaini 77).
Scorers - Tries: Vecchini (2), Fedrighi, Muzzo. Cons: Rigoni (2) Pens: Rigoni.
Yellow card: V Minuzzi 7. Referee: H Davidson (Scotland).

Graphic


Try time: Katie Corrigan scorches over

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



We cannot keep ignoring cruelty of factory farms; letters
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; LETTERS; Pg. 41
Length: 309 words
Body


VERY few people enjoy being a witness to cruelty of any kind. When confronted with a situation in which an animal is being abused and is clearly in pain, our instinctive response is one of shock and disgust. Many of us will intervene to try to stop the abuse, and those of us who cannot, for whatever reason, will be deeply affected.
When we see a dog being beaten and kicked, we are horrified. Likewise, if we saw a pig being beaten and kicked (unlikely, as 99% of pigs are imprisoned in windowless sheds), we would be horrified. In both scenarios, we might call the guards, or the SPCA, or we might report the incident to the Department of Agriculture, Food and Marine.
Every day, on factory farms across the globe, pigs and chickens suffer at the hands of those whose job it is to care for them. They are routinely shouted at, kicked, beaten, even thrown. There is a vast amount of undercover footage available online from pig and chicken farms across the EU and the rest of the world, all containing disturbing visual evidence of extreme cruelty. A recent investigation into the lives of pigs on Irish pig farms by the National Animal Rights Association (NARA) and Animal Rebellion Ireland (ARI) produced visual evidence of truly shocking conditions on two pig farms.
Factory farming is a hidden industry. We may have an inkling that all is not right down on the farm, but because the animals are never seen, we can, and do, turn away. Life is less complicated if we do not know; easier by far to look the other way.
All farmed animals are sentient; they experience emotions and can feel pain, just like us. Surely we have a moral duty to insist that they live a life free from unnecessary suffering. They are, after all, giving up their precious lives to become rashers and sausages, chicken wings and chicken nuggets.
GERRY BOLAND, Keadue, Co. Roscommon.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



we will not be a cashless society; Government moves to shore up rural support - and votes - by subsidising private providers of ATMs and cash-in-transit vans exclusive Banks face fines if there are not enough ATMs in a given area
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1,2
Length: 877 words
Byline: Brian Mahon; Craig Hughes
Body


THE Government is moving to shore up support among rural voters by committing to safeguard against a cashless society.
The Irish Daily Mail can reveal that the Coalition is planning to subsidise private providers of ATMs and cash-in-transit vans to ensure they provide access to cash for people in rural Ireland.
There has been backlash against a move towards a cashless society after the GAA, the National Ploughing Championships, Irish Rail and some public bodies - such as the NCT - began declining cash payments. However, Minister for Finance Michael McGrath has insisted that 'cash is here to stay'.
A private Department of Finance note, obtained by the Mail, shows that the Government is also considering banning access fees for the use of ATMs. Earlier Turn to Page Two
Continued from Page One this year, the Government formally published a new Access to Cash Bill, which proposed that banks be subjected to fines if they do not comply with a Central Bank direction to ensure that there is an appropriate number of ATMs in a given area.
Internal Department of Finance records obtained by the Irish Daily Mail now show that the State will have to pay to ensure that there will be a sufficient number of ATMs around the country.
The briefing note for the Minister for Finance outlines the need for a subvention for private operators to ensure access to cash for the public.
'The final outstanding matter relates to the funding of this legislation. The current proposal is for this to be covered by general levies. While industry will pay as needed, we need to be aware of the impact on cash in transit firms and independent ATM deployers who are also key players in the cash system,' officials wrote.
'Therefore, there may be a need for subvention to provide the option for the State to cover part of the regulation of the sector if justified.'
The Department does not yet have any costings for the measure, which could be approved later this year.
The note states that 'there is a precedent' for such a subvention, pointing to a similar mechanism for the credit union sector. 'The cost of regulating the credit union sector is funded 50:50 by industry and via the State through the use of a subvention,' they explained.
The officials recommended that the legislation allow for a subsidy to be provided for, if necessary.
They said: 'We recommend including such a provision in the Heads of Bill as the concentrated number of players in the Irish market involved in our cash cycle such as cash-in-transit vans and independent ATM deployers may require future support.'
A spokesman for Mr McGrath said that the minister of the day 'will have the competence to decide annually' in consultation with the
Central Bank the level of subvention. 'Whether each regulated category will be required to fully cover the costs of supervision or whether, as is currently the case with credit unions, part of the costs will be met by the State through taking a reduced surplus payment from the Central Bank,' he said.
The spokesman added that no subvention will be provided to banks.
'The cost of regulation for retail banks has been fully recovered by the Central Bank levy scheme since 2017, and no subvention will be applied to this sector as a result of the Access to Cash Bill. Should the cost of regulation increase, the coverage rate for retail banks' cost of regulation (100%), will remain unchanged.'
'Cash-in-transit companies and independent ATM deployers will be a newly regulated category, subject to new registration requirements following enactment of the Bill.
'Subvention in relation to that sector only and the costs of its regulation as a result of the Access to Cash Bill are what is being considered.'
It was also the belief among officials that the Government should introduce legislation to prohibit what is known as 'access fees' from being introduced, which are common in other countries, where people have to pay to use ATMs, usually between (EURO)2-(EURO)3 every time.'
The briefing note said: 'Access fees for Irish bank accounts have not yet appeared in Ireland but EU visitors are charged an access fee, usually (EURO)2 or (EURO)3. Such fees are also a feature in other countries. Residents in Ireland with Irish bank accounts are not generally charged access fees due to the rules laid down by card operators (Visa and Mastercard). However, it is at the discretion of Visa and Mastercard to amend their rules.'
The officials warned that if this did happen and ATM operators introduced access fees, this 'may hinder reasonable access to cash into the future'. 'It would certainly increase financial exclusion as cohorts with lower income taking out smaller amounts, (EURO)20 or (EURO)50, would be paying a disproportionate fee. Accordingly, department officials believe that legislation to prohibit access fees for Irish accounts should be introduced and we have engaged with the EU Commission for advice in relation to the treatment of access fees under EU legislation.'
They noted that the Commission 'did not identify any legal reasons' that would prevent the adoption by Ireland of national legal provisions prohibiting ATM operators from charging customers an access fee to withdraw or lodge cash from an ATM.
brian.mahon@dailymail.ie
'Access fees have not appeared'

Graphic


Plan: Michael McGrath

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Welcome to the Easter feast of bread and butter with a drizzle of common sense and plain speaking
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 15
Length: 1094 words
Byline: John Drennan
Body


SUDDENLY, in the wake of all that referendum 'bother' the phrase 'bread and butter' has become quite popular across the ranks of the Coalition - with the exception of the Greens, of course, who probably prefer couscous.
The preternaturally wary Fianna Fáil leader Micheál Martin - after a prolonged period of ducking that referendum - was the first, on his return to public life, to raise the need for politics to return to 'bread-and-butter' issues. The electorate would of course like some jam too, but we are probably fortunate to have gotten the health-conscious Micheál as far as an endorsement of the vice that is butter.
Incoming taoiseach Simon Harris swiftly entered the breadand-butter market, while numerous ministers are speaking of the joys of this back-to-basics approach with the sanctimonious relish of reformed sinners.
The embrace of 'bread and butter' is informed by the fervent hope that this is the antidote to the evils of 'Woke' politics.
This is especially true of a Fine Gael party that has embraced the Hate Speech Bill with varying degrees of internal enthusiasm for a decade.
As they clear the old leader out with scarcely a round of applause to accompany him, suddenly it is as though Fine Gael believe they were the unwitting victims of a terrible enchantment from which - like Rip Van Winkle - they have just woken up.
THE party's forgetfulness that the Woke agenda was something it freely acquiesced to is not unique in a political system where short memories are a virtue and, especially after elections, a necessity.
The reverse-ferret is to some extent understandable, for despite the successes of the marriage equality and eighth amendment campaigns, the political benefits of all those referendum victories have melted like candy in a hard rain.
In truth, when it comes to forging a durable relationship, the Irish are a peasant people.
The referendum result proved that once the possibility of throuples and polyamorous gatherings inheriting the land emerged, the jig was up on the new liberal Ireland we loved to display to the world.
The Bull McCabe's law of the land will always triumph over frolics of Wokedom.
Our new diet of 'bread and butter' mixed with the condiments of common sense and plain speaking might even work, if one senior Government adviser's recent experience of an accidental meeting with a focus group of well-lubricated pensioners in an early afternoon pub is anything to go by.
In the encounter, which also goes some way towards explaining the recent Sinn Féin slide and the modest Fine Gael recovery, the maestro of spin noted the OAPs were toasting Fine Gael and Heather Humphreys' latest double payment for pensioners.
When the overworked barman said they had told him previously they were voting for Sinn Féin, the sozzled pensioners declared as one that: 'So long as this lot keep the money coming in we'll be voting for them.'
Politics can sometimes be a simple game, although sadly rarely. The strategy of securing a Coalition return minus the Greens (sorry, Eamon) faces severe challenges from the current Independent figary and the wilting Sinn Féin rose. But like war, all political victories are secured by money and the amount you are offering.
Part of the reasoning guiding the wily declaration by Simon Harris that the election is postponed until next year is that the Coalition is rolling in cash.
Why would they cut and run while Heather is writing out a different cheque for what are a very diverse set of beneficiaries every week?
The bar stool bromance between the drunken pensioners and the Coalition is only one strand of a whole series of potential giveaways - not least of which is the same Heather's Rural and Community Affairs ministry, which appears to treat a thousand communities a year to substantial cheques. Of course, most of the credit for this is going to Heather which, in dangerous times, is a bit of a waste. But if a certain new taoiseach were to lighten the extra burdens placed on Heather by her new status as Fine Gael deputy leader by taking on the Rural and Community Affairs portfolio, Fine Gael's latest 'special one' could spend the next year on a 1997 Bertie-style nationwide campaign doling out grants to a thousand smiling towns.
The precedent has already been set by Charlie Haughey, who often took over little ministries like Arts and Culture on the entirely correct grounds that no one else was fit for the job.
And should Heather feel like getting the claws out to protect her position, there is always a presidential nomination coming down the tracks to soothe any down-sizing pains.
After losing power in 1995 to the Rainbow alternative of Fine Gael, Labour and Democratic Left, Bertie Ahern philosophically quoted Wordsworth's observation that 'the Rainbow comes and goes'.
The sudden reawakening of anti-Woke Fine Gael appears to have spelled the end for another school of Rainbow politics, for the very good reason that a return to unglamorous 'bread and butter' politics presents the party with great opportunities.
Far from being trapped in a corner, the Government - for as long as it has billions in taxpayers' cash - has options. And while current dissatisfaction had seen Independents buoyant in the polls, the wilting of the Sinn Féin rose illustrates that splashing the cash is still the route to power in Ireland.
HERMANN Göring famously dismissed the then-German equivalent of bread-and-butter politics with the observation that 'guns will make you powerful; butter will only make you fat'. When it comes to the Irish voter, however, our preference for the latter option was epitomised by the perception that Charlie Haughey was the political equivalent of the old Gaelic 'fat chieftain'.
Haughey was re-elected time and time again, despite a scabrous series of scandals, in the belief that if the chieftain was fat then the peasants would have a chance of getting the scraps.
Irish voters generally - and wisely - far prefer being fat to being shot at. The Irish voter has a reputation for being fickle but one iron law they always apply to elections is self-interest.
If Fine Gael (and Fianna Fáil too) can scratch that eternal Irish itch with bread and butter - and a few more houses - then the Coalition should do well at the next poll.
The homes part may be the more difficult one, but should they manage to add housing as the jam to their bread-and-butter offering, the Coalition will have a real chance to secure their re-election with the help of some like-minded Independents.
Hopefully they won't be too upset if they have to drop the Greens from the menu.

Graphic


Back to basics: Simon Harris and Regina Doherty

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



What are the odds? (EURO)40 bet nets (EURO)331,452 at Fairyhouse
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 284 words
Byline: Harry Bamforth
Body


ONE lucky punter had an Easter to remember after turning (EURO)40 into a staggering (EURO)331,452.80 at Fairyhouse in one of the 'biggest pay-outs' ever in Irish racing.
The remarkable jackpot was won by a Coral customer at the Fairyhouse Easter Festival in Co. Meath on Saturday, and came from just a small (EURO)20 eachway treble bet.
The winning moment was all thanks to 50-1 chancer Mousey Brown, ridden by jockey Conor Maxwell, who surprised many by coming through to claim victory on the final stretch of the listed 3m novice handicap hurdle.
Mousey Brown did end up at 33-1, but luckily for the punter, he added them to his treble at 50-1.
Coral's Head of PR, David Stevens, said: 'It's got to be right up there with the biggest payouts we've had, and in terms of Irish racing it definitely is.'
The treble also relied on both Don Chalant at 9-1 odds and Ardera Ru at 33-1 in the 2m4f maiden hurdle and listed handicap chase races, respectively.
Both raced triumphantly to victory, with Ardera Ru, ridden by Shane O'Callaghan, winning at an eventual price of 18-1.
Don Chalant kicked off the winning streak in expert fashion. The horse, ridden by jockey Michael O'Sullivan, never looked liked losing and won by seven lengths.
Then it was the turn of Ardera Ru, who also won comfortably to leave the punter just one race from dreamland.
Mr Stevens said: 'This customer will have an Easter to remember after he somehow picked these three big-priced winners at Fairyhouse, turning (EURO)40 into more than (EURO)330,000 as a result.
'Never mind chocolate eggs, this jackpot is more of a golden egg. We're all still looking at it here and wondering how he picked them. It was absolutely tremendous punting,' he added.

Graphic


Each-way treble bet: Winning trio of Mousey Brown ridden by Conor Maxwell; Don Chalant ridden by Michael O'Sullivan; Shane O'Callaghan on Ardera Ru

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



what to watch this week...
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 50
Length: 213 words
Body


TODAY League of Ireland: Galway United v Bohemians, Virgin Media Three, 7.30pm Should be an entertaining clash in Eamonn Deacy Park Championship: Leeds United v Hull City Sky Sports Main Event, 7.30pm Leeds look to be flying straight back to the Premier League under Daniel Farke.
WEDNESDAY Premier League: Arsenal v Luton, TNT Sports, 7.30pm Key game for the Gunners in their title charge THURSDAY Premier League: Liverpool v Sheffield United, TNT Sport, 7.30pm The Reds should have no trouble with the doomed Blades FRIDAY Euro 2025 qualifier: France v Ireland, RTÉ 2, 7.35pm Katie McCabe (below) and co begin their fiendishly difficult Euros qualifying campaign
SATURDAY Allianz Hurling league final: Clare v Kilkenny, TG4, 7.0pm Brian Lohan's Banner side could do with some silverware Champions Cup: Leinster v Leicester, RTÉ 2, 7.30pm Big night in the Aviva Stadium SUNDAY SPL: Rangers v Celtic, Sky Sports Main Event, 12pm Critical Old Firm derby as the season reaches closing stages Ulster SFC: Monaghan v Cavan, RTÉ 2, 3.15pm The old rivals meet in the preliminary round of Ulster Premier League: Manchester United v Liverpool, Sky Sports Main Event, 3.30pm Liverpool will be out to avenge their recent FA Cup defeat The Sunday Game, RTÉ 2, 9.30pm First episode of new season

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



1 THE number of clean sheets [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 31
Length: 31 words
Byline: NATHAN SALT
Body


1
THE number of clean sheets Liverpool have managed at Anfield in their last 12 games in all competitions.
They won here but continually conceding goals must surely irk Virgil van Dijk and Co.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



30-SECOND CHALLENGE Sudoku SVG generator
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 93 words
Body


START on left with number given and follow instructions as you go across. In 30 seconds, beginners have to complete their own challenge; intermediates have to complete their own challenge and the beginner's; advanced players have to complete their own challenge and the intermediate's.
YOUR ANSWERS
SOLUTION BELOW http://www.30secondchallenges.com
Beginner 7 ?3 +4
DOUBLE IT +1 ö3 +10 ö9 ?6
DOUBLE IT
Intermediate 7 ?12 ½% OF IT +3 5/8 OF IT ?10 -6 ¾ OF IT 1/12 OF IT
TIMES ITSELF 4/11 OF IT 125% OF IT 60% OF IT
Advanced 7
TIMES ITSELF +11 ?2 3/5 +20
LESS 12 ½% ?2 1/2

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Ali's shorts from 1975 fight set to sell for $6m
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 10
Length: 198 words
Body


THE boxing shorts worn by Muhammad Ali in his 'Thrilla in Manila' fight are set to sell for up to $6million.
The pair, which remain spotless despite the gruelling 14- round fight, are up for auction.
The silk Everlast shorts, pure white except for a black belt line and black racing stripes on each leg, are signed by Ali.
Sotheby's in New York expects the iconic garment to sell for up to $6million.
The fight, which took place in the Philippines in 1975, was the third time the legendary boxer faced 'Smokin' Joe Frazier.
The pair had previously met at The Fight of the Century in New York in 1971 and again at Madison Square Garden in 1974.
It's believed a billion people worldwide tuned in to watch the Thrilla in Manilla, still regarded as the greatest and most brutal boxing match of all time.
The pair fought for 42 minutes, despite temperatures hitting 49C. Of the fight, Ali said: 'It was like death. Closest thing to dying that I know of.
'We went to Manila as champions, Joe and me, and we came back as old men.'
Frazier, then 31, fought just twice more before retiring. Ali boxed for six more years.
He died at the age of 74, after a three-decades long battle against Parkinson's, in 2016.

Graphic


Vintage: Ali's winning pair

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



BRIDGE MASTERCLASS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 30
Length: 172 words
Byline: peter donovan
Body


Q J 10 7 ?8 ?AKJ62 ? K 10 4
YOU open 1? and LHO overcalls 1?. ?. What action do you take after the next two hands pass?
THIS week, I'm featuring a series of hands which have cropped up and have given rise to debate and some confusion in the analysis. On most, there is no 'correct' answer ? just common sense, logic and judgement.
Here, the first question really is: 'Should you bid again?' From the information available, the answer is 'yes'. A simple overcall followed by a pass from partner suggests that partner has a few values, but was unable to make a sensible bid; he may, of course, have long hearts, but not strong enough to make a penalty double.
If you decide to bid again, you should do so with a competitive double. It would be wrong to bid 1?, because partner would presumably have bid spades if he held four; nor should you rebid diamonds, because this suggests you're single-suited and prevents partner from showing clubs cheaply. Of course, you may have been fooled by underbidding opponents - but you can't cater for that.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



came from behind to win [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 25 words
Body


came from behind to win for the sixth time this season
Liverpool seize top spot as Gunners and City play out drab scoreless drawSEE:
THE VERDICT Centre pages

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



CESARE CASADEI turned his back [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 120 words
Byline: Matt Bralow
Body


CESARE CASADEI turned his back on Inter Milan in January last year to sign for Chelsea. He was promptly loaned out to Reading, one of the most extreme basket-case clubs of English football. Then to Leicester, where it was going nicely until his recall in January. Leicester have not been quite the same since and the 21-year-old midfielder has been restricted to 17 minutes in three appearances for Chelsea, all from the bench. Inter, meanwhile, are running away with Serie A. This was once the maddening existence of Ruben Loftus-Cheek, 28, who finally escaped Stamford Bridge last year and is into double figures for goals in his first season at AC Milan after scoring the opener in a 2-1 win at Fiorentina on Saturday.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



CHEPSTOW SSR
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 46 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 2.35 Idefix De Ciergues 3.10 Trapista 3.45 Ballee 4.18 Calico 4.55 One Eye On Vegas 5.30 Eceparti 6.00 Woodland Park 2.35 Idefix De Ciergues 3.10 Walkinthewoods 3.45 Phantomofthepoints 4.18 Prince Quali 4.55 Inoui Machin 5.30 Eceparti 6.00 Celtic Dino

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Clarifications & corrections
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 77 words
Body


¦If you feel any report in the Irish Daily Mail has been incomplete or inaccurate you can email Corrections and Clarifications at corrections@dailymail.ie ¦This publication supports the work of the Press Council of Ireland and the Office of the Press Ombudsman, and our staff operate within the Code of Practice. You can obtain a copy of the Code, or contact the Council, at www.presscouncil.ie, PH: (01) 6489130, Lo-call 1890 208 080 or email: info@presscouncil.ie

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



CORK
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 47
Length: 54 words
Body


EOGHAN O'BRIEN 1.48 Mickie Angel 2.23 Ricky Bobby 2.58 Donacheady Gale 3.33 Native Song 4.08 Ryehill 4.43 Boss Robin 5.18 Backmersackme 5.51 Air Of Entitlement
GLENN BOY 1.48 Lough Owel 2.23 The Banger Doyle 2.58 Donacheady Gale 3.33 Design Flaw 4.08 Ryehill 4.43 Break The Boundary 5.18 Backmersackme 5.51 Air Of Entitlement

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



EVERY league match is significant, [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 25
Length: 96 words
Byline: ISAAN KHAN
Body


EVERY league match is significant, though some have extra weight, that added importance. Arteta turns to Jorginho on such occasions. Yesterday was the Italian's ninth league start this season. His previous games include Manchester City and Chelsea in October, and Liverpool at the Emirates in February. He was not at his best this time, but nevertheless Thomas Partey, his replacement in the second half, got a 34-minute run-out. It was the midfielder's longest stint since his lengthy injury lay-off. Jorginho's cool head will certainly be required again in the coming weeks.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



exclusive dreams series You can train [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 17 words
Body


exclusive dreams series
You can train yourself to turn your nightmares into happy dreams STARTS PAGE 20

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



FAIRYHOUSE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 47
Length: 54 words
Body


EOGHAN O'BRIEN 2.05 Implicit 2.40 Bottler'secret 3.15 O'Moore Park 3.50 Zarak The Brave 4.20 Saint Sam 5.00 Any Second Now 5.40 Macdermott 6.10 Coco Masterpiece
GLENN BOY 2.05 Catena Zapata 2.40 Bottler'secret 3.15 O'Moore Park 3.50 Zarak The Brave 4.20 Saint Sam 5.00 Nick Rockett 5.40 Better Times Ahead 6.10 Coco Masterpiece

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



FAKENHAM RTV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 36 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 1.27 Camarrate 1.57 Glance At Me 2.32 Jerrash 3.07 Sambezi 3.42 Steal My Sunshine 4.16 Red Panda 1.27 Blue Universe 1.57 Omaha Wish 2.32 Jerrash 3.07 Up For Parol 3.42 Conceroe 4.16 Star Walking

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Falkirk up with games to spare
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 36
Length: 160 words
Byline: Matt Bralow
Body


LAST week's look into Farnham Town's unbeaten campaign in the Combined Counties South sparked correspondence about fond memories of similar achievements over time and I will try to return to as many as possible before the end of the season.
This week, however, the accolades are Falkirk's, who clinched the Scottish League One title with six games to spare after a 7-1 romp at Montrose, their biggest away win in 55 years to mark the end of five years in the third tier.
John McGlynn's team, which includes Aston Villa midfielder John McGinn's brother Stephen, have 25 wins and six draws and are now five games from an unbeaten league season.
Another promotion next time would have them back in the SPL in time for their 150th anniversary in 2026. Happy days once again for Falkirk, a club that set a world-record transfer fee 102 years ago when they paid West Ham £5,500 to sign England centre forward Syd Puddefoot from under the noses of Arsenal and Tottenham.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Hop on board! Nicola joins Posh's yacht party
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 7
Length: 106 words
Byline: Dominique Hines
Body


BUNNIES in sunnies appears to be the theme for the Beckhams' latest Easter yacht blowout.
It is a family tradition to party aboard a boat off the coast of Miami - and this year, Brooklyn's wife Nicola Peltz, 29, joined in.
She was pictured larking around with Victoria on a $20million yacht - an upgrade from the usual $6million affair - even lifting up the Spice Girl's black medical boot. Victoria broke her foot in a fall at a gym in February.
The pair also made a video of themselves dancing to the Spice Girls hit Say You'll Be There. Victoria, 49, who is rarely seen smiling with her teeth, appears to grin before covering up her mouth.

Graphic


Bonding: Nicola Peltz and VictoriaSoaking up the sun: Victoria and David

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



hotspots
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 48 words
Body


WORK WHISPER KANSAS DU BERLAIS (Huntingdon, 3.55) WEIGHTING GAME REBEL REDEMPTION (Wolverhampton, 4.38) Down 23lb from last winning mark. BURNT FINGERS SHOWBOATED (Redcar, 4.49)
CAPTAIN HEATH TRIO BROKEN SPEAR (nap) (Redcar, 4.14) TOOTHLESS (nb) (Plumpton, 5.20) SANS BRUIT (Chepstow, 4.18)

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



HUNTINGDON RTV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 56 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 12.35 Moon Eagle 1.05 Rock House 1.35 Shengai Enki 2.10 Copernic Du Mazet 2.45 Mixedwave 3.20 Blue Bikini 3.55 Wreckless Eric 4.30 The Hardest Geezer 12.35 River Tyne 1.05 Rock House 1.35 Optimistic Joe 2.10 Symbolic Spirit 2.45 Not At Present 3.20 Gazette Bourgeoise 3.55 Wreckless Eric 4.30 The Hardest Geezer

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Hurdle star Hill suffers colic scare
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 113 words
Byline: MARCUS TOWNEND
Body


CONSTITUTION HILL (left) is being cared for in a veterinary hospital after a suspected case of the potentially fatal colic. Trainer Nicky Henderson said the unbeaten 2023 Champion Hurdle winner was showing signs of improvement but that his team had endured 'a few traumatic days' after the diagnosis. He said: 'I am pleased they have managed to avoid surgery so far and he is being reintroduced to a normal diet.
'If this goes well he could come home in the next day or so.
'We are not completely out of the woods but very hopeful that he will soon be back which will be an enormous relief.' Constitution Hill missed this season's Champion Hurdle because of a respiratory illness.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Irish Mail Digital Edition
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 29
Length: 21 words
Body


Play lots more of your favourite puzzles with our amazing app for tablets and smartphones.
Just go to: www.mailsubscriptions.ie

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



KEMPTON RTV 2.55, itv 3.30, 4.05, 4.40
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 50 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 1.45 Kimmico 2.20 Musical Dancer 2.55 Forest Of Dean 3.30 Crescent Lake 4.05 Radio Goo Goo 4.40 VULTAR (nap) 5.15 Dream Pirate 1.45 Majestic Heights 2.20 Educate 2.55 LION'S PRIDE (nap) 3.30 Cello 4.05 Al Barez (nb) 4.40 Vultar 5.15 Intercessor
NORTHERNER - 1.45 Do It Now (nb)

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Laois really turn up heat after the break
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 51
Length: 190 words
Byline: PHILIP LANIGAN
Body


A POWERFUL second-half performance saw Laois cruise to a 2-22 to 1-12 victory against Carlow in the Allianz Hurling League Division 2A final.
Carlow had upset the odds somewhat in the group stage by taking the points, and yesterday's final was finely poised at half-time, Laois leading by just a single point, 0-9 to 0-8.
However, goals from Jer Quinlan and Mossy Keyes capped an emphatic secondhalf display. On this sort of form, they will make a right push for the Joe McDonagh.
This was just the latest in a series of big scores. Willie Maher's side clocked up 4-20 against Kerry and then hit another 1-24 in the semi-final against Down to win by 11. Aaron Dunphy was another to continue his hot streak yesterday on what was a good weekend all round for Laois GAA, with the footballers romping home on Saturday night at Croke Park in the Division 4 final.
In the Division 3A hurling final, Mayo and Sligo produced a high-scoring affair that produced six goals.
In the end, Mayo got the better of the Connacht derby, holding out to win by 3-19 to 3-16 at MacHale Park in Castlebar.
In the 3B final, Warwickshire saw off Fermanagh by 1-18 to 1-13.

Graphic


Winning form: Laois took their revenge on Carlow

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



MASTERQUIZ
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 28
Length: 79 words
Body


1. What is Paul McCartney's birth first name?
2. In Irish shipping, what do the initials LÉ mean?
3. Which Premier League team is nicknamed the Toffees? 4. On April Fool's Day 1982, the Daily Mail advised readers to wave what clothing items above TV sets to check for electrical interference? 5. Actor George Reeves portrayed which superhero on screen in the 1950s? 6. How many world championships did snooker's Alex Higgins win throughout his career?
SOLUTION: PULLOUT BACK PAGE

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Menopause drug a 'game-changer'
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 2
Length: 174 words
Byline: Cillian Sherlock
Body


A NEWLY approved drug will be a 'game-changer' for menopausal women experiencing hot flushes, an expert has said.
Veoza, which is set to be fully available in Ireland this month, is a non- hormonal medication designed to stop hot flushes and night sweats.
Campaigners say the daily tablet offers women an alternative to hormone replacement therapy (HRT).
Loretta Dignam, the founder of Menopause Hub clinics across Ireland, said its approval is a 'hugely positive development'. She said: 'A UK study concluded that women experience a weekly total of 17 hot flushes and 11 night sweats - and this symptom alone can impact severely on sleep, mood, concentration, work and personal lives. I personally endured up to 39 hot flushes a day... I know first-hand how debilitating they can be, so this will be a game-changer.'
Ms Dignam said up to 80% of some 652,000 Irish women suffer symptoms of menopause. The medication has been approved by the Health Products Regulatory Authority and will be available privately at a cost of up to (EURO)70 per month.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



MINDBENDER
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 28
Length: 95 words
Body


1. Totting up sales figures from last week, Sunil made a third plus a sixth of the sales achieved by Isaac, who made six more sales than Kay, whose sales totalled five times a third of Sunil's. If Jasper's sales brought the foursome's average to 27, what was the highest individual total of sales?
2. What connects bath, flask and joint?
3. Which James Bond actor can be seen ON ANY SCREEN? 4. Which is the odd one out: chaser, hitter, seeker, keeper? 5. Which three-letter word completes the following longer words: dorm---, l---nce, ju---, ind---s?
SOLUTION: PULLOUT BACK PAGE

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Monorail may be better; letters
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; LETTERS; Pg. 41
Length: 62 words
Body


ACCORDING to the latest information available, the Dublin Metrolink project will cost (EURO)9.5­billion. I fear a repeat of the scandalously increasing cost of the National Children's Hospital.
A monorail system could be built a lot faster and more cheaply than the Metrolink. It would also be less disruptive. After all, this is taxpayers' money JOHN FAIR, Castlebar, Co. Mayo.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



NIGHT VISION OF THE WEEKEND: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 47
Length: 40 words
Byline: CHRISTOPHER STEVENS
Body


NIGHT VISION OF THE WEEKEND: Heat-sensitive cameras captured amazing night-time images on David Attenborough's Mammals (BBC1), including a pack of hyenas bringing down a buffalo and a leopard hunting baboons through the treetops. Sensational.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



NO GO, ROBERTO?
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 31
Length: 104 words
Byline: NATHAN SALT
Body


ROY KEANE is not convinced Roberto De Zerbi is the right fit for Liverpool but there were plenty of lenses on the Brighton boss for what was seen as his 'Anfield audition'. Ruben Amorim looks to be the No1 target to replace Klopp, yet don't rule De Zerbi out. 'I've got question marks around whether De Zerbi is ready for that next step,' Keane said. 'His teams play a lovely brand of football but I have doubts about what's he won to take a big job.' Brighton played some good stuff but a lot of their best work was out of possession. While this audition won't have won any golden buzzers, a call-back was more than earned.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



ONE KISS AND 300 WINS FOR KLOPP
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 31
Length: 53 words
Byline: NATHAN SALT
Body


THIS victory over Brighton made it 300 wins and counting for Jurgen Klopp in all competitions. As Dua Lipa's One Kiss was belted out by the Kop at full-time, Klopp celebrated with the same passion and vigour as always.
He'll need a few more wins to get his side over the line in this epic three-way title fight, though.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



Photographer reveals more strangeness from the night of Andrew's car-crash BBC interview
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 13
Length: 154 words
Byline: Mary Carr
Body


MARK HARRISON, the photographer who took the shots of prince Andrew's carcrash interview with Emily Maitlis, reveals how, before Maitlis arrived on the scene , the British prince treated the Newsnight team to a guided tour of Buckingham Palace's marble hall, telling them all about how eye-wateringly expensive everything around them was. His behind-the-scenes account of the extraordinary interview also includes details of Andrew being wired up for sound, while telling everyone about the price of the antique chair on which he was perched. So much for the royal rules of etiquette and discretion.
Andrew sounds like a jumped-up Del
Boy Trotter trying to impress the gaffer about his new wheels. On second thoughts, perhaps he just sounds like a debt-ridden aristocrat leveraging dear old Mummy's priceless collection of art and antiques for a generous funding stream from a billionaire like his paedophile pal Jeffrey Epstein.

Graphic


Emily Maitlis, left, sat down with Prince Andrew for a disastrous 2019 Newsnight interview

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF TODAY'S RADIO
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 48,49
Length: 173 words
Body


HISTORY'S SECRET HEROES, 3.30PM, RADIO 4
HELENA Bonham Carter (pictured) returns with more tales of resistance, courage and deception from the Second World War. She starts with the prolific Mills & Boon writer Ida Cook, who risked her own life to help Jewish refugees escape Nazi persecution. Ida and her sister Louise used their passion for music as cover to visit opera houses in Germany, where they mixed with Nazi high society. They would then return to England laden with jewellery, as they smuggled out wealth that could then ease the passage of its Jewish owners out of Germany.
÷
RADIO 3'S 'refreshed' weekday schedule starts today, with extended editions of BREAKFAST (6.30AM, RADIO 3), hosted by Petroc Trelawny, and then Georgia Mann's ESSENTIAL CLASSICS (9.30AM), which now runs until lunchtime. Composer of the Week (which this week follows the young Mozart on tour) moves to 4pm. Then, night owl jazz fans will be pleased with a new nightly show, 'Round Midnight (11.30pm) hosted by Soweto Kinch, with a focus on British music.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PITCHERWITSTM
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 28
Length: 64 words
Body


1a. Aerial from a nonpolenta recipe (4,7)
12a. Pier got damaged when I went on one to feel good (3,4)
1d. A run of hoopla proposed for a victory circuit (3,2,6)
5d. Heavy fire at a balloon? (7)
5a. Rice cooked in a samba? It could be! (7)
13a. Sweet doughy one said to be liftin' the loaf? (6,5)
4d. Intricate lace created, but got faster (11)
6d. Collapsed state of raked up leaves? (2,1,4)

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Please save our at-risk birds
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; LETTERS; Pg. 41
Length: 126 words
Body


ONE of Ireland's most attractive birds, the golden plover, is celebrated on an An Post stamp now winging its way around the world. While many will see the stamp, few will have the pleasure of seeing the actual bird. This is because it is a red-list species whose numbers have fallen by more than 50% in three decades. Despite this, golden plovers may be mercilessly gunned down by hunters for 153 days of the year between September and January. Minister for nature Malcolm Noonan has removed some at-risk avians from the shooting list but others remain in the firing line. The minister must stamp out the persecution of golden plovers, and all endangered birds, before it's too late.
PHILIP KIERNAN, Irish Council Against Blood Sports, Mullingar, Co. Westmeath.

Graphic


Hunted: Golden plover numbers have fallen over 50%

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PLENTY of silverware has adorned [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 25
Length: 57 words
Byline: ISAAN KHAN
Body


PLENTY of silverware has adorned this part of Manchester of late. And plenty of medals were present in the stands, too. Cycling power couple Laura and Jason Kenny - with 12 Olympic gold medals between them - were in the plush seats. Two weeks ago, five-time Olympic champion Laura announced her retirement. What a way to start her next chapter.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



PLUMPTON SSR itv 2.25
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 39 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 2.25 Scarface 3.00 Game Socks 3.35 Proper Twelve 4.10 Saladins Son 4.45 Mi Sueno 5.20 Toothless 5.55 Ken Roy 2.25 Bourbali 3.00 Always Busy 3.35 Furkash 4.10 Kaituna River 4.45 Mi Sueno 5.20 Aggagio 5.55 Ken Roy

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Pope uses his Easter message to call for a ceasefire in Gaza
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 10
Length: 181 words
Byline: Mail Foreign Service
Body


THE Pope yesterday urged the world to resist 'the logic of weapons' as he called for a ceasefire in Gaza in his Easter message.
In his 'Urbi et Orbi' blessing (to the city and the world), Pope Francis, right, told 60,000 worshippers at Saint Peter's Square war was 'always an absurdity'.
From a balcony overlooking the square, the Pontiff, 87, also called for greater aid deliveries to Gaza as well as the release of hostages taken by Hamas on October 7.
He told the crowd: 'Let us not allow the strengthening winds of war to blow on Europe and the Mediterranean.
'Let us not yield to the logic of weapons and rearming.
'Let us not allow the current hostilities to continue to have grave repercussions on the civil population, by now at the limit of its endurance, and above all on the children.
'How much suffering we see in their eyes.
'With those eyes, they ask us:
Why? Why all this death? Why all this destruction?
'War is always an absurdity and a defeat.'
The Pope led the Easter Mass in good spirits, despite having to cancel a major Good Friday procession due to his recent health concerns.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



QUICK QUIZ
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 29
Length: 48 words
Body


1. What is the Norse god of thunder called? 2. What is the state capital of Utah? 3. Who received a Global Icon Award at the 2024 Brit Awards? 4. In which county is the headquarters of Irish language broadcaster TG4?
5. Graphite is a form of which chemical element? SOLUTION: PULLOUT BACK PAGE

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



REDCAR RTV
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 57 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 1.54 Rogue Encore 2.29 Likleman 3.04 Kynsa 3.39 Legal Reform 4.14 Glorious Angel 4.49 Blufferonthebus 5.24 Enderman 1.54 Stay In The Game 2.29 Happy Helen 3.04 Arkenstaar 3.39 Look Back Smiling 4.14 Twelfth Knight 4.49 Big Blue Boy 5.24 Captain Dandy
NEWMARKET - 3.04 Kynsa (nb) NORTHERNER - 1.54 STAY IN THE GAME (nap)

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



SSE AIRTRICITY LEAGUE PREMIER DIVISION PREVIEWS
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 35
Length: 189 words
Byline: Philip Quinn
Body


Dundalk v DROGHEDA UNITED Today, Oriel Park, 1.0 The Lilies won all four league games between the County Louth rivals last season and will be desperate to extend that sequence after a wretched start. PREDICTION: Draw
SHELBOURNE V DERRY CITY Today, Tolka Park, 5.0 The Candystripes have won three times and drawn once at Tolka since Damien Duff became manager but this will be their stiffest test to date, as the Reds are on a roll.
PREDICTION: Draw
ST PAT'S ATH V SLIGO ROVERS Today, Richmond Park, 5.0 The Cup holders are stuttering and Jon Daly needs a response, especially with the Hoops up on Friday. Simon Power is suspended for the Bit O'Red, who continue to surprise. PREDICTION: Draw.
WATERFORD V SHAMROCK ROVERS Today, RSC, 5.0 Stephen Bradley will be wary of the threat of Padraig Amond and pacey right winger Maleace Asamoah, whose duel with Josh Honohan could be pivotal. PREDICTION: Away win.
GALWAY UNITED V BOHEMIANS Tonight, Eamonn Deacy Park, 7.45 After a stubborn 45 minutes, Bohs collapsed like a cheap suit in Tallaght on Friday. Alan Reynolds knows he has a job on his hands to turn things around.
PREDICTION: Home win.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Straight to the POINT
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; LETTERS; Pg. 41
Length: 110 words
Body


÷
THE 'Assisted Dying' debate is everywhere. I'm trying to organise 'assisted living' for my 30-year-old daughter, who has Down Syndrome, and I'm dealing with so much red tape that I'm losing the will to live.
PHYL KENNEDY-BRUEN, Galway. ¦ EAMON Ryan wants less car use? Perhaps we will be living beside schools, in tents.
÷
AIDAN MCGRORY, by email.
÷
DARRAGH O'Brien says homelessness is the 'first thing' on his mind every morning. Typical Darragh, thinking of himself first.
÷
LIAM POWER, Dundalk, Co. Louth. ¦ CLEVER nations are the ones that keep changing their governments. Power must change hands or it will get spoiled and weary.
PAT O'CALLAGHAN, Mallow, Co. Cork.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Sudoku 1/8/24, 12:57 PM
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 27
Length: 30 words
Body


FILL in all the squares in the grid so that each row, column and each of the 3x3 squares contains all the digits from 1 to 9. Sudoku S SoVlGu gteionenrast oTOr MORROW 1/8/24, 12:57 PM

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



THE rancour of recent Manchester [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 25
Length: 77 words
Byline: ISAAN KHAN
Body


THE rancour of recent Manchester City season-ticket price hikes was made clear again. Fifteen minutes before kick-off, a banner from City's 1894 fan group read: 'Record profits but record prices. Stop exploiting our loyalty'. It was confiscated and three members were spoken to. 'We call on the club to come out and start talking to fans properly now about ticket pricing and policy instead of going all defensive,' an 1894 spokesman said. Some way to treat fans.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



The REAL winners on Super Sunday!; DIAZ, MO AND CO TAKE ADVANTAGE OF ETIHAD DRAW TO GO TOP OF TABLE
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 21
Length: 1 words

Graphic


Comeback kings: Luis Diaz equalised as Liverpool came from behind to win for the seventh time this season

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



THERE was plenty of good [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 31
Length: 92 words
Byline: NATHAN SALT
Body


THERE was plenty of good will for Adam Lallana on his return to Anfield. The Brighton man was warmly applauded when his name was read out over the PA system pre-match and he got a hug off Jurgen Klopp. 'Absolutely amazing coming home,' Lallana told Sky Sports. 'You know, I love coming back here. And I do call it home. Great, fond memories here.'
It would have been interesting to see the reaction had he slotted in an equaliser in the final stages after being thrown on from the bench. The home fans' applause probably wouldn't have been so forthcoming.

Load-Date: April 2, 2024


End of Document



THREE shots on target were [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 25
Length: 62 words
Byline: ISAAN KHAN
Body


THREE shots on target were achieved in total by both sides. The war of attrition was reflected in the Arsenal statistics. They had 28 per cent of possession, made 269 passes and committed 20 fouls. That was in contrast to City's 73 per cent possession, 690 passes and nine fouls. It's that willingness to adapt by Mikel Arteta which shows why they will be pleased with a point.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TRACK FACTS: JACKPOT & PRINCIPAL [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 88 words
Body


TRACK FACTS: JACKPOT & PRINCIPAL MEETING. R-H Polytrack course. GOING: Standard to slow. STALLS: Inside. DRAW ADVANTAGE: Low. Top jockey: Oisin Murphy. Top trainer: A Balding. Headgear first time: 2.20 Educate. Longest traveller: Approachability (3.30) 245 miles. Drop in Class: 2.20 Palace Green is down 2 grades on last run (Class 3 to Class 5); 2.55 Dubai Honour (3); Flying Honours (2); Sea Of Roses (3); 3.30 Crescent Lake (2); Approachability (2); 5.15 Dream Pirate (2); Charencey (2). First run since wind surgery: None today.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 48
Length: 17 words
Body


TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: Good-good to soft in places.Top jockey: Tom Cannon. Top trainer: C Gordon.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 57 words
Body


TRACK FACTS: L-H course. GOING: Good.Top jockey: Gavin Sheehan. Top trainer: G L Moore. Placed in the race last year: 1.57 Glance At Me (2nd). Headgear first time: 1.57 Rebel Angel, 3.07 Equus Millar, 3.42 Noah's Light. First run since wind surgery: 1.27 Star Player, Illucidate, 1.57 Bleue Verte, 3.07 Charlie's Glance, 3.42 Steal My Sunshine.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TRACK FACTS: L-H Tapeta course. [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 91 words
Body


TRACK FACTS: L-H Tapeta course. GOING: Standard. STALLS: 7f outside; remainder inside. DRAW ADVANTAGE: None. Top jockey: Luke Morris. Top trainer: A Carroll. Placed in the race last year: 1.40 Eagle Court (2nd). Headgear first time: 1.40 Daheer, 2.15 North Winterfell, 4.38 Gordonstoun. Longest travellers: Empress Of Bough (3.28), Big Dream (3.28), Lockdown (4.38), Haalim (5.13) Ireland; Henery Hawk (5.48) 275 miles. Drop in Class: 2.53 Bob The Bandit is down 2 grades on last run (Class 2 to Class 4). First run since wind surgery: None today.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



TRACK FACTS: R-H course. GOING: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 116 words
Body


TRACK FACTS: R-H course. GOING: Good-good to soft in places.Top jockey: Paddy Brennan. Top trainer: F O'Brien. Placed in the race last year: 2.45 Lord Sparky (2nd). Headgear first time: 12.35 Catlin, The Gambler, 1.05 Grain Trade, Gwash, Rock House, 1.35 Gustoso, Scout Master, 2.10 Ballynaheer, 2.45 Belargus, Concetto, Dalamoi, 3.55 Fandabidozi, Fourofakind, 4.30 Boots Bridge. Longest travellers: Optimistic Joe (1.35), Island Run (2.45), The Hardest Geezer (4.30) 209 miles. Drop in Class: 2.10 Charmian's Place is down 2 grades on last run (Class 3 to Class 5); Fantastic Artist (2); 4.30 Dino Magic (2). First run since wind surgery: 1.35 Joker Du Chenet, 3.20 Fair Frontieres, 4.30 Dino Magic.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



WOLVERHAMPTON SSR
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 49
Length: 54 words
Body


ROBIN GOODFELLOW GIMCRACK 1.40 Percy Willis (nb) 2.15 Pappano 2.53 Bob The Bandit 3.28 White Umbrella 4.03 Miguel 4.38 Swiss Rowe 5.13 Mudlahhim 5.48 Jojo Rabbit 1.40 Major Major 2.15 Pappano 2.53 Lady Dorchester 3.28 Coast 4.03 Rocking Tree 4.38 A Pint Of Bear 5.13 Theotherside 5.48 Crimson Angel
NEWMARKET - 2.15 PAPPANO (nap)

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



WORD WHEEL
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 27
Length: 73 words
Body


I
V S R
EE O RR
YOU have ten minutes to find as many words as possible using the letters in the wheel. Each word must use the hub letter and at least three others, and letters may be used only once. You can't use plurals, foreign words or proper nouns. Verbs ending in 's' permitted. Clue for today's nine-letter word: Fund Tarantino film without tracks. RATING: 8 words, average; 12, good; 16, very good; 18 or more, excellent. SOLUTION TOMORROW

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Young man left fighting for life after attack
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 10
Length: 131 words
Body


A YOUNG man has been left fighting for his life after he and a friend were attacked by a group of youths in an incident in the capital at the weekend.
The incident happened shortly after 10pm on Saturday in the Clondalkin area of west Dublin.
One of the victims was left in a criticial condition while the other suffered less serious injuries but is also being treated in hospital. Both are understood to be from Eastern Europe and aged in their early 20s.
Gardaí believe the pair got into a verbal altercation with a group of people outside a shop. The two then got on a bus and alighted at Grange View Way, where they were set upon by a group of men gardaí believe followed them in a car.
The victim was kicked multiple times in the head as he lay unconscious on the ground, gardaí believe.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



Youths suffer 'withdrawal' when phones taken away
Mail on Sunday (London)
April 1, 2024 Monday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 11
Length: 153 words
Byline: Inderdeep Bains
Body


YOUNG people are displaying physical withdrawal symptoms from social media addiction similar to those of drug abusers, experts have warned. One senior psychotherapist said sufferers will 'shake and sweat' when they have their devices removed.
Tony Marini, expert in behavioural addictions at the Castle Craig rehab clinic in Scotland, told the Mail he has seen a tenfold rise in social media addictions in the past decade.
'People will have physical withdrawal symptoms similar to drug addicts, like shaking and sweating, when they have their devices taken away,' he said. 'The "reward" from social media hits receptors in the brain in the same way cocaine would.'
Professor Phil Reed of Swansea University, who researches internet addiction, said children as young as 13 were now being affected. 'It used to be a problem for 18- to 25-year-olds but we are seeing it in people who are much younger and much older,' he said.

Load-Date: April 1, 2024


End of Document



'I think McGuinness will climb the mountain again'; Gaelic football is woven into the fabric of Paul McGinley's life and career, from his own time on the pitch to picking the brains of the 'the two Jims'
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 58,59
Length: 2029 words
Byline: Philip Lanigan
Body


HE many sides of Paul McGinley.
The only Irishman to captain a winning Ryder Cup team has an admission to make: he was a punk rocker in his youth. Still is, at heart. Stiff Little Fingers, The Clash, the lot.
It's an arresting image, a world removed from the golfing environs McGinley now inhabits. Like Augusta National, with its genteel green jacket and Butler Cabin traditions where he will be in commentator mode in less than a fortnight.
But on this Easter weekend, he's like a book of revelation, happy to talk music, golf, and Gaelic games on the weekend of the Allianz Football League finals.
How he spent four hours with Jim McGuinness over tea on the last visit up to Donegal with his father Mick, who represented the county himself.
Why he thinks McGuinness is going to lead Donegal back to an All-Ireland. What he learned from inviting him and Jim Gavin ? together ? to the Ryder Cup in 2014.
Why Kevin Moran remains his idol.
Watching him last Tuesday morning at Seapoint Golf Links as he navigated a press morning, with its Q&A session, photo opportunity and then a whole suite of interviews, in which he never answered any of the same questions in the same manner, it's easy to see how his 2014 Ryder Cup triumph has become a case study in leadership at the London Business School.
He is an easy ambassador for the Irish Legends tournament ? travelling over from his Sunningdale base to help announce OFX as title sponsor of June's tournament with a boosted prize fund of (EURO)400,000.
McGinley is such a natural front of house, such a natural communicator and storyteller. The strategist in him is asking why Mickey Harte gave Dublin the psychological advantage of beating Derry at Celtic Park when the home manager opted to play a weakened team in the group stage. Knowing the pair could very well meet in this afternoon's Division 1 final at Croke Park.
When the talk turns briefly to music and what he enjoys outside the world of golf, mention of Scottish noise-meisters and indie darlings The Jesus and Mary Chain playing the Olympia the night before sets him off on his own musical nostalgia trip.
'You know I was a punk when I was a boy. Stiff Little Fingers, The Undertones, The Clash, Sham 69 ? all of those. They were all my vintage back in the 80s. Stiff Little Fingers, I saw them last year in Reading. So I still go to the odd concert.
'All my playlists are still all that old music. If I happen to be in town when some of these are playing, even if it's a small venue, I'll go. I'm a huge U2 fan as well, was in Vegas watching them in the Sphere. It was groundbreaking what they did. Every tour they've ever done, I've always seen it. Got to know them over the years too.'
He's not name-dropping; this is just the world he inhabits. That 2014 triumph at Gleneagles in Scotland against the US team ? the meticulously planned nature of it, carried off with all the bravado and dash of a crown jewel heist ? opened doors in its own way for a player who had already sank the winning putt at The Belfry in 2002.
It's coming on 10 years since he invited Gavin and McGuinness over together. McGuinness, the family friend. The charismatic manager who took the traditional set-up of Gaelic football teams and shook it like a snow globe, inspiring Donegal to the summit in 2012. And Gavin, manager of the Dublin team Donegal shocked in the 2014 All-Ireland semi-final but who would create an imperious legacy in the game.
'I've always tried to be transparent with the two of them,' he explains. 'They were the top two teams in the country at the time ? I wanted to be transparent and fair to both of them. I was friends with both Jims ? I didn't want to be seen to be playing both sides.
'My dad played football with Donegal. Has been very involved with Donegal GAA over the years, with fundraising or whatever the case may be. He was a big fan of Jim McGuinness ? Jim is from down the road in Creeslough, the next village up. He'd known Jim for a number of years, Jim was friends with him. Then Jim became the manager and it escalated ? dad was heavily involved in the GAA at the time. So he got brought along on that journey.
'And I could see straight away that there was a changing? this guy had something about him. I was involved in Ryder Cup captaincy at the time so I'm all on the leadership pathway. I was intrigued at what he was doing. Had loads of conversations with him.
'And I'd obviously known Jim Gavin as well throughout the years. Watching how he went about his business in a quieter, more reserved, more private way. Got to know both of them.'
It's a bond that has lasted. 'The irony is, my mom passed away last July. It's funny, I still have the image in my head. As we're pulling out, everybody had moved towards the graveyard. We were pulling out of Rathfarnham church ? we're in the family limousine ? and as we pull out, there's two people left outside the church talking to each other in deep conversation and it was McGuinness and Gavin talking again.
'That was only last July and they would have loved that". She loved the GAA too. She was as much of a Dub as she was Donegal. Even though she was born and bred in Donegal, she also had a soft spot for the Dubs.
'It was a great tribute to her that both came to her funeral. And at the end, if you had a camera there to just take that picture last July...'
So what was the dynamic between them on that Ryder
McGinley's was Gaelic
Cup trip?
he only took up he knee 'They were soaking up the experience. I got them behind the scenes. When the players were out on the course playing, I got them in to have a look at the team rooms. What we did, the graphics, the images, all of the stuff that I did. How I turned the inside of our team rooms into our own domain, our own private place. With really strong graphic images with important messages on them. Meeting rooms, locker rooms, showed them all of that sort of thing.
'But a lot of the stuff that I used in 2014 ? even now Thomas [Bjorn] has used it, Luke [Donald] has used it ? a lot of the ideas that I used were GAA ideas. The county colours, the sense of representation. If you're from Spain, you're not just representing a blue flag, you're representing Spain. If you're from Germany, the same. So make people associate it with where they are from.
Because we're all very proud of where we're from. Whatever county that is in Ireland, we're proud of it.
19 passion football, properly golf when fractured his at 19 'When me and Pádraig [Harrington] used to play World Cups or Ryder Cups or together, we used to have this thing where we would count how many county jerseys we could see in the crowd.'
Like the ubiquitous Mayo or Kerry jersey?
'They were easy. If you'd see another one it would be ? "Oh I just saw a Cavan jersey" ? because you wouldn't see many of those. That real strong sense of representation is one of the themes that I brought in to the team. And that's still the case now where somebody like Jon Rahm was very much communicated to by Luke around the ideas of representing Spain last year. So that's really important.'
He gives a wonderful insight too into the McGuiness-Gavin dynamic and what he feels they bring to the role of manager. 'Two different things. McGuinness comes with an incredible intensity, an incredible sense of bonding and just 101 per cent commitment with just no time for anything else. A little bit like Mourinho does in soccer. And it's so intense, it's so strong, it's so bonded ? but it's got a limited shelf life.
'Whereas Gavin's is a little bit like Alex Ferguson ? it's a longer process. What he did was slowly regenerate the team, slowly moved guys out and guys in. He did it all seamlessly. It was very measured but it had long-term longevity what he was doing. So two very different dynamics. Very interesting.
'McGuinness is back in charge now and no doubt he's going to bring that same intensity. It will be interesting to see how long that flame will burn. At the moment the flame is just starting to light now ? I can see it, I can tell it. You look at the results already. The players are certainly dancing to his tune. That will get stronger.
'Because the intensity is so high level, it will be interesting to see how long that will last ? it's very, very hard to sustain. But it will reach a crescendo and that would probably? I would hedge a bet that it would be at least an All-Ireland final and maybe a win.'
Really? 'I do. I think McGuinness will climb the mountain again.'
Circumstances dictate that McGinley can't be at Croke Park this afternoon as Donegal take on Armagh in the Division 2 decider and Dublin face Derry in the Division 1.
'No. I'm going out to America tomorrow. We've a house there so we're going out there as a family for Easter, then I'm going from there on to Augusta so I'm going to miss it. But I will be watching it over there.
'I will be at the Derry-Donegal game, first round of championship. I have it in my diary.'
McGinley's 'big passion' was Gaelic football growing up, he only properly took up golf when he fractured his knee at 19. At that point, he was studying business and had designs on being a Dublin senior footballer, not a professional golfer.
And he clearly has such a passion still for Gaelic games.
'Dublin too. I was at the All-Ireland final last year. I'm a big fan of the Dubs as well. The joy from the players? you can always tell so much from the celebrations, what it means to the players.
'The joy that you had in the Dublin players beating Kerry last year, celebrating the win, showed you what it meant to them. Showed from how far back they were coming to beat Kerry and win that. I think that meant a lot more to them than many of the All-Irelands that they'd won before. The fact that they climbed the mountain again.'
ith all he has achieved in golf, McGinley is on record as saying he'd love to have played senior with Dublin. Is that still a lasting regret?
W 'My biggest hero in sport is Kevin Moran who was able to do two disciplines. If I had my life again? 'I got injured at 19 ? I really do feel in my heart, if I gave the same drive and intensity, and the same sense of ambition in golf, if I had channelled that into Gaelic football from the age of 19 to 23, I really feel confident that I would have been an inter-county player. I'm confident that I would have got myself to that level.
'But I got injured at 19 and that threw me into golf and I went in a different way. In an ideal world, I wish I had another three years playing football. And then I was able to pick up golf at 22, like Kevin Moran did. And then go off and have another discipline.
'Kevin is a good friend of mine and I keep telling him that, of all my sporting heroes that I've met, I really admire what he did.
'Kevin is a great guy. Not alone that but he has become a very successful businessman so he has had three phenomenal careers. That's why I say to him, "Kevin, you were a Gaelic footballer, played for Man United and now a successful businessman" ? he's ticked every box.'
As for McGuinness, he's very much in contact with him, though he says he won't be appearing in a Donegal dressing room any time soon in a motivational capacity.
'No, that's not a plan. My dad's not keeping well and any time we're up in Donegal, Jim comes and visits. And he'll come visit for a cup of tea ? but the cup of tea will last for hours. The last time we were up was January/February and Jim came over to the house. It was me, my brother and dad, and Jeez, he must have stayed four hours. He went through the whole plan, where he was at, what they were doing, and what the plan was. Going through the players and the young players coming through ? it was fascinating to hear his mind kicking into gear again.
'I love being around inspirational people and McGuinness is one of those guys you want to play for. You get energised talking to him. So I'm delighted that he's moved a little bit away from soccer to do this. I don't know how long it will last because I think he still has a bit of a grá with soccer, that he would like to go back and do something. But we'll see.'
had 19 McGinley's passion was Gaelic football, he only properly took up golf when he fractured his knee at 19

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



'We are here to do a job of work, to add value to what they are very good at'; Harte's impact on Derry is most obvious when you lou look at squad's increased depth
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 64,65
Length: 1057 words
Byline: Micheal Clifford
Body


E MAY be in his 70th year, but there is a lightness to Mickey Harte's
H step and mood which suggests he is forever young.
In a career bursting at the seams with all sorts of numbers, the fact that today is his 12th national final on the sidelines in Croke Park is not remarkable in itself. What is, though, is the sense that he is back to where he was when he first scratched the national consciousness in his initial season, when he led Tyrone to a successful defence of their National League title by beating Laois in 2003 and five months later crashed through the glass ceiling to deliver a first Sam Maguire.
Twenty-one years on, after burying the notion that he was easing into an impressive but gentle retirement from the very top level after three seasons with Louth, he is back in the high-stakes game, eyeing up the All-Ireland champions in this afternoon's Allianz League final.
But if there are those who see a correlation between Tyrone then and Derry now, he is not one.
'I had grown up with the Tyrone squad, most of them anyway, and there was something built there over time, now we have been jettisoned into a place where these players have worked themselves into a very good position with other management so it is not that easy to connect the two. There was a progression happening in the Tyrone scene that wasn't here. We are here to do a job of work, to add value to what they are very good at,' explains Harte.
It could be argued that to do just that is one of the biggest challenges Harte, along with his long-term coach, Gavin Devlin has faced.
His ownership of teams in the past has never been anything other than absolute. Tyrone's achievements under him were underpinned by the minor and under-21 success he had achieved with the county.
And when he took a rather painful leave of Tyrone, such was his status in the game - and such was theirs - that when he took on Louth, it was a blank canvas and he was allowed to put in the structure that allowed Louth go from a bottom-tier team to a Sam Maguire one inside two seasons.
He can never claim to be Derry's architect - history will inform that credit goes to Rory Gallagher - and that is what fascinated about what approach he would take to a group shaped in the likeness of another's coach's creation.
What exactly would be his stamp? It can be seen as a triumph of pragmatism over ego, but you have to squint hard to see it.
'We do want to put our personalities somewhat on the team but you don't throw out the baby with the bathwater.
'If something is working very well then you want people to continue to work that way.
'But you have to add value, there is no point coming in with more of the same. We have to bring our personalities, our ethos for the game, our tactical nous, we have got to bring it there too and say "right, you are doing things very right here, here is stuff we think would help to raise the bar for yourselves".'
They have managed to do that. Derry remain a group cemented in structure but Harte's most obvious impact is a sense that he has added considerable depth to a squad that even in winning back-to-back Ulster championships was too tight for its own good.
In the 11 games (including the pre-season McKenna Cup) he has been in charge of, 37 players have been exposed to game-time, with 27 featuring in the league.
Some of those decisions have been forced by circumstances - most notably Ryan Scullion's promotion to replace Odhran Lynch mid-league for a period -
but most have been by design to ensure that Derry now have genuine options for every line.
Diarmuid Baker has become a regular starter in the full-back line, Donncha Gilmore is tagged as a half-back but he is also a midfielder in the making, Cormac Murphy offers the off-the-cuff devilment that their attack has been missing, while last weekend Lachlan Murray looked like a strike forward less-than-content with a fringe role.
'Maybe what had happened over the three or four years, they had become a tight-knit group and because they were doing so well there was little chance for anybody else to do anything,' Harte explains. 'But we had an open book so to speak, we just wanted to see people break through with quality and there are players with quality there so why would we not want to integrate them into this team?'
Building is one thing but winning is another and he is adamant that Derry are primed to do both.
Clarity has always been Harte's strength, and having brought with him to Derry a long-held view that a game not worth winning is one not worth playing, there will be no holding back today.
Oddly, he has not won the top-tier Allianz League title since 2003 - he won the Division 2 title twice with Tyrone and a Division 3 with Louth - which will only whet an appetite that never needed much teasing.
'Any medal is a big medal to me,' he insists. 'People are always talking just about the All-Ireland. It's not just about the All-Ireland. It's about developing these players to start winning trophies. There's a trophy and medals up this weekend and I want to help them get as close to that as they can.
'Then the next thing is the Ulster Championship, and you have to go and try and chase that, and it's about chasing every opportunity that comes.
'We wouldn't want to get hooked on the be-all-and-end-all of winning an All-Ireland. If we do things well and the team develops as well as we can do, that is a possibility, but it's no more than that. Until it's a reality, it's only a possibility, so we will work with them to try and bring them closer to the reality than just a possibility.'
And as for his own motivation, it hardly needs asking.
'As long as God gives me the health to be at it, I'll probably be at it.
'I'm more than grateful for the things that came my way from being involved in football. It was a long time before I had much success, I played a lot of football and didn't win much, and then obviously I was involved with teams that started to win things at school level and county level, and I'm just so grateful for that.
'To think that you can be partly responsible for the feel-good factor for the people of a county as well as a club, it's just a great gift from God to be able to do that. It's made great friends for me and it has given me a great zest for life, you know?'
We certainly do.
Any medal is a big medal to me... it's not just about the All-Ireland

Graphic


COACHING TEAM: Gavin Devlin and Mickey HarteMAN WITH THE PLAN: Harte leaving the pitch at half-time of Derry v Tyrone in February

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



5 MOVIE highlights
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 29
Length: 209 words
Body


WILLY WONKA AND THE CHOCOLATE FACTORY FAMILY FAVOURITE Gene Wilder is on iconic form in this musical take on Roald Dahl's children's book. An eccentric confectioner opens up his magical factory for a tour by five 'lucky' children, including Charlie Bucket. Today, 12.25pm, UTV
THE HITMAN'S WIFE'S BODYGUARD COMEDY SEQUEL Ryan Reynolds in the crime comedy sequel as bodyguard Michael. He's on holiday when Sonia (Salma Hayek) asks him to rescue her husband (Samuel L Jackson). Easter Monday, 9.30pm, RTÉ one
I, TONYA OSCAR WINNING BIOPIC Margot Robbie takes the title role in this biopic of the US figure skater who became caught up in a career-ending scandal. Allison Janney won an Oscar for her performance as her domineering mother. Friday, 11.05pm, BBC2
APOCALYPSE NOW COPPOLA CLASSIC Francis Ford Coppola's acclaimed Vietnam War drama stars Martin Sheen as Capt Willard. He is sent on a mission to find and assassinate a rogue colonel (Marlon Brando) who is said to have gone insane.
Tonight, 10pm, BBC2
CREED SPORTS DRAMA Boxing drama, starring Michael B Jordan as the son of the late champion Apollo Creed. When he decides to carry on the family tradition, he seeks help from his dad's old rival, Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone). Tuesday, 9.30pm, RTÉ2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Across 1 A violin manufactured [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 39
Length: 548 words
Body


Across 1 A violin manufactured by a famous Italian family of stringed instrument makers (12) 8 Deputises for (4,2) 11 American animator and director who created Daffy Duck and Bugs Bunny (3,5) 12 --- Rose, name sometimes given to the fairy tale character Sleeping Beauty (5) 13 A principal water pipe, conduit or duct (4) 14 The back of a sheet of printed paper (5) 15 The 28th President of the United States, in office 1913-21 (7,6) 17 American puppeteer best remembered for creating The Muppets (3,6) 19 A small bird with a brown or grey plumage, feeding on seeds or insects (7) 23 Material made of a network of wire or thread (4) 24 Failure to meet a goal or a requirement (9) 25 Family ---, 1980s American sitcom starring Michael J. Fox (4) 26 The structural rules of a language (7) 28 --- --- day, a memorably important or happy occasion (3-6) 31 Muhammad Ali's opponent in 1974's Rumble in the Jungle (6,7)
34 The capital of Vietnam, on the Red River (5) 36 A room or hall in which martial arts are practised (4) 37 Traditional dresses worn by Indian and Pakistani women (5) 38 Inflammation of the mucous membrane that lines the nose (8) 39 George ---, 20th-Century novelist and essayist who wrote Animal Farm and 1984 (6) 40 A type of bird trained to return to a particular place (6,6) Down 2 and 16 1978 Booker Prize-winning novel by Iris Murdoch (3,3,3,3) 3 18th-Century Scottish philosopher and economist (4,5) 4 Genus of plants which includes the hollies (4) 5 British aviator; the first woman to fly solo from England to Australia (3,7) 6 The third-largest city of Jordan, south of the Syrian border (5) 7 Miss ---, stage musical first performed in 1989, based on Puccini's Madama Butterfly (6) 8 See25 9 A flat-bottomed drinking glass with no handle or stem (7)
10 British architect who brought Italianate Renaissance architecture to England (5,5) 16 See 2 18 See 25 20 Pontius ---, according to the New Testament, the official who was the judge at the trial of Jesus and ordered his crucifixion (6) 21 Butter heated until brown or black, often flavoured with vinegar or lemon juice (6,4) 22 Chief justice of the United States 1953-69, who led the commission that investigated the assassination of President John F. Kennedy (4,6) 25, 18 and 8 Comedy by William Shakespeare featuring the characters Petruchio, Bianca and Katherina (3,6,2,3,5) 27 Christopher ---, Elizabethan dramatist and poet whose plays include Tamburlaine and Edward II (7) 29 The --- estate, journalists or the press collectively (6) 30 Fats ---, American singer and pianist, a pioneer of rock 'n' roll music (6) 32 A frame used for supporting or displaying an artist's canvas (5) 33 Surrey racecourse where the Derby is run every June (5) 35 To speak or pronounce imperfectly or haltingly (4)
NOW THERE ARE THREE WAYS TO ENTER Complete the Prize Crossword and count how many times the letter 'i' appears in the finished grid. Post your completed grid AND iSpy answer to The Prize Crossword No 2158, The Mail on Sunday, PO Box 3451, Norwich NR7 7NR. Entries must arrive by Friday, April 5 (photocopies not accepted). The winner will be selected at random from correct iSpy answers. See today's solutions panel for terms and conditions.
Winner of Prize Crossword No 2155: Mr G Rice, of Barnsley, South Yorkshire.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



ADIOS STEVE! As Tracy leaves him for her lover in Spain; Jaci Stephen is away SOAP WATCH with STEVEN MURPHY
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 32,33
Length: 764 words
Byline: STEVEN MURPHY
Body


CORONATION STREET
Poor old Steve and Tracy, inextricably linked by a one-night stand some two decades ago which resulted in the arrival of little Amy and a lifetime of bickering thereafter. Back then, it was Tracy desperate to snare Steve, goading his fiancées and ruining his weddings until he eventually gave in.
So, it's ironic that the shoe is now on the other foot, with Steve desperate to hang on to Tracy.
Her affair with faded footie star turned painter and decorator Tommy Orpington felt like a breath of fresh air to the show, as Tommy went from hero to zero in Steve's eyes when the heartbroken hubby discovered his idol had been stripping morethan the Anaglypta at No 1.All in all, a welcome break from the arrests or kidnappings which now seem to be an almost daily occurrence in Weatherfield.
This week, we find Tracy realising she's scored an own goal now that Tommy's packed up and headed to a new life in Spain, and Steve is delighted when she suggests reuniting. There's only one small problem. Steve has in his possession a letter from Tommy asking Tracy to join him in his new life.
Will Steve come clean, making their new start a truly fresh one? Of course not. This is Steve, and his cowardice shines through as he sets fire to the letter. Sadly, the thing he really ends up burning is his bridges with Tracy after she discovers his deception. Tracy accepts Tommy's offer, and as she and her family raise a toast in the Rovers to her new life in the sun, poor Steve is more out in the cold than ever.
Elsewhere, the Lauren disappearance mystery rumbles on after Roy finds a contact for Lauren's mum. It's a strange tale this one ? while it's good to feel the show has a big story at its centre once again, it is a little distracting that it feels we only knew Lauren for five minutes.
But anything that gives David Neilson a chance to act his socks off as Roy is more than worth it in my book.
STEVE'S A BIG MAC
If it's over with Tracy, could this be a new start for Steve McDonald? 'Maybe we could see him lose weight,' says Simon Gregson (Steve). 'It'd be an excuse for me to make changes in real life too!'
FAIR CITY
Jess (left) tries to deal with her guilt over Steo as her family urge her to take it easy, but Babs's suspicions are raised by Jess's dour attitude. When Greg is called to work, she accepts Steo's offer to accompany her to an art gallery and is devastated when she realises that Greg has discovered there's something going on between her and Steo.
Victor lays down ground rules for Kira regarding their affair but she's annoyed when he ghosts her. She settles for a tame night with Mondo but feels increasingly guilty about her infidelity.
Carol warns Liam to take things slowly with Rafferty, advising that he gets concrete evidence before accusing him of corruption.
Liam confronts Brian Goode about taking backhanders from Rafferty, but he feigns ignorance. A cocky Rafferty brushes off James's concerns about Liam's snooping.
EASTENDERS
Sharon's back, having headed Down Under just after Keanu headed six feet under that cafe floor. She's got a lot to catch up on, and her return receives mixed reactions from 'The Six', Sharon (below) having just left them with a murder cover-up to get on with.
But there are soon far bigger worries as the news arrives that the cafe floor has collapsed. Why the gang are so surprised at this we have no idea, when they carried out the DIY work on the floor themselves. The ladies have many skill sets ? sandwich making, hairdressing, gay bar managing ? but we doubt any of that qualifies them in concrete mixing and laying. Of course, along with Keanu's rotting corpse, also buried is Denise's iconic 'D' necklace. The race is on for the conspirators to retrieve it before the body is discovered. But just as Denise and Stacey start work on exhumation under cover of darkness, in walks detective Jack to witness the macabre site.
Talking of things that make your flesh crawl, creepy Pastor Clayton's increasingly lingering hugs are causing concern for Yolande. And as the rumblings of a whispering campaign begin, the house of the Lord becomes a lot less heavenly for her.
Trouble's on the way for fragile Jay April's going to be a busy month for Jamie Borthwick, aka EastEnders' Jay. Not only is he running the London Marathon on 21 April alongside co-star Emma Barton (Honey), but during the race the pair will film scenes for that week's EastEnders episodes as Jay and Honey take on the challenge. Meanwhile, Jay's former lover Nadine's returning to the Square ? the sex worker is set to stir it up for her troubled ex.

Graphic


Steve stomps out as Amy, Tracy and Ken toast her new life

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Alarming rise in illegal taxi drivers since Covid; Black-market 'boom' sees convictions against unlicenced operators up 70%
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 34
Length: 907 words
Byline: Colm McGuirk
Body


CRIMINAL prosecutions against unlicensed taxi operators jumped by almost 70% to 135 last year.
However, representative bodies say these numbers are just the tip of the iceberg amid a post-Covid boom in the black-market economy, with illegal taxis now operating in 'most towns in the country'.
And registered drivers say unlicensed taxis are making a national taxi and hackney shortage even worse.
Taxi Alliance of Ireland chair Gerard Macken said licensed drivers 'just can't compete with' unlicensed ones anymore.
Aside from buying an expensive taxi licence and passing a test, taxi drivers pay a lot more for insurance - and pay tax on their earnings.
Illegal operators often have no overheads apart from the usual costs of running a car and - unless they wish to incriminate themselves - will not declare their earnings to the taxman.
Mr Macken, who is also a member of the National Transport Authority Taxi Advisory Committee, said illegal operators, who usually operate on a word-ofmouth basis, are often facilitated by publicans.
He said that, while Dublin has enough demand to cope with the situation, the ability to find a taxi in small towns and villages 'has just been ruined by illegal operators'.
Mr Macken told the Irish Mail on Sunday: 'If you have a lad at the end of the bar eating a packet of crisps and drinking lemonade who is there to bring people home illegally, then you're just feeding the system and you're never going to get a proper hackney, taxi, limousine or any sort of public [transport] service in the area.'
The experienced taxi driver said he knows of one small village that has one hackney driver, one taxi driver and eight illegal operators.
The National Transport Authority (NTA) and the gardaí can prosecute an illegal operator only after they have evidence the person has received payment for offering the lift.
This happens through roadside audits and reporting from the public.
But Mr Macken said publicans can call a licensed taxi instead of 'Jimmy down the road' if a stranger - who could be an enforcement officer or undercover garda - needs a taxi.
A taxi driver who operates in a medium-sized town said he has been reporting illegal operators for 'a couple of years', and said that the situation has now 'got out of hand'. The driver, who did not wish to be identified, said gardaí 'weren't taking me seriously', until eventually one did and initiated a sting on an illegal operator.
'His number was going through all the pubs and the regulator rang him,' the licensed driver said. 'He came and picked them up and accepted the money, and once you accept the money, you're caught.'
The licensed driver said he started his business a few years ago at 'tremendous expense' after some other local drivers retired.
'I only had this machine bought and Covid hit, so I had a bad two years. Then I got going and then the illegal guys came.'
Figures provided by the NTA show they 135 initiated criminal prosecutions last year relating to the operation of an unlicensed taxi service accounted for 61% of all prosecutions it launched.
In 2022, there was 80 prosecutions against unlicensed taxis - just over half (55%) of the total number of prosecutions taken by the NTA.
Vinny Kearns, who is CEO of
NXT Taxis and a founding member of The National Taxi Drivers Union, said 'most towns in the country have illegal operators'.
He said the value of this sector of the black-market economy would be 'colossal'.
Mr Kearns said he himself took a ride from an unlicensed driver on one occasion after requesting help finding a taxi in a pub.
'It wasn't licensed in any means or form and [the driver] went on to tell me that she was an unlicensed taxi, not knowing who I was. She drove me from A to B because I was in a hurry and I just gave her what she asked for which was probably similar to a taxi fare, but she had none of the overheads, she was technically not insured.
'So it's common enough and especially around pubs.'
Mr Kerans estimates it costs around '(EURO)18,000 to (EURO)20,000' per annum to run a taxi, counting fuel, insurance, car repayments, maintenance, tax and income tax.
Last year, the NTA received 78 complaints relating to unlicensed drivers.
The majority of these came from Leinster - excluding Dublin - and Munster, with 26 and 21 respectively. A further six came from Dublin, with 17 relating to Connacht and eight relating to Ulster.
A spokesman for the NTA told the MoS: 'With any allegation of an unlicensed SPSV [Small Public Service Vehicles] service, information is received, assessed in terms of evidence and acted upon wherever possible by NTA compliance officers and/or members of An Garda Síochána.
'For a successful prosecution, there must be evidence that the individual is operating for "hire or reward", therefore evidence of payment must be presented to the court.' Those convicted can be fined up to (EURO)5,000.
Revenue said it could not provide figures for the amount of tax receipts it has received for Small Public Service Vehicles (taxis, hackneys and limousines) over the last number of years.
In response to queries relating to unlicensed operators, a spokesman for the Vintners Federation of Ireland (VFI) representing rural publicans said: 'The VFI strongly supports the licensed, regulated taxi and SPSV sector, which provides an essential service in getting the Irish public home safely.'
colm.mcguirk@dmgmedia.ie
'Illegal operators have no overheads' 'It's common enough. Especially around pubs'

Graphic


TAXI BOSS: Vinny Kearns, CEO of NXT Taxis

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Amy deserves every chance to realise her Olympic dream; by mark gallagher #justsayin...
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 66
Length: 555 words
Byline: mark gallagher
Body


ON THURSDAY, a few hours before it emerged Amy Broadhurst had made the bombshell request to switch from Ireland to Team GB in an effort to realise her Olympic dream, Republic of Ireland women's manager Eileen Gleeson had to tackle the thorny issue of fluid nationality within international football.
Aston Villa's Anna Patten, a former England under-age captain, had been named in Gleeson's squad for the Euro 2025 qualifiers against France and England. Patten's inclusion adds some depth to Ireland's defensive resources but as was pointed out, it wasn't so long ago that she was on the pathway to the English senior team.
The Irish manager made the point that this was just a fact of life in international football and Patten, whose grandparents came from Donegal and Galway, has a deep connection to this country. That's the thing about nationality in an increasingly globalised world - it is possible to feel both Irish and English.
Look who was captaining England against Belgium last Tuesday.
The FA marked Declan Rice's 53rd senior international appearance by making the Arsenal star skipper. It was apt that this happened on the same night as Ireland's deep and troubling midfield issues were again laid bare against Switzerland and one couldn't but curse Martin
O'Neill for not taking Rice off the bench against Moldova seven years ago.
Which brings us back to Broadhurst. She should be commended for exploring all options to follow her Olympic dream. The talented Dundalk native is 27 years of age and boxing may not even be part of the Los Angeles Games in 2028 - at present, it is not on the programme. This might be the former world and European champion's last chance.
She grew up very aware of her English heritage through her dad, Tony, who is from Slough, outside London. Indeed she moved to the English capital at one point, winning an ABA elite title for the Islington boxing club. However, she came home after being given assurances that she would get the opportunity to represent Ireland at the 2024 Paris Olympics at her natural 60kg weight.
Kellie Harrington's decision to remain amateur status and seek to defend her Olympic title complicated matters. Broadhurst initially moved up to super-lightweight (63kg), where she won the world, European and Commonwealth titles, before having to jump again to welterweight (66kg) as that was an Olympic category.
The High Performance Unit felt that Gráinne Walsh deserved another chance at qualifying at 66kg after being robbed by a scandalous judging decision in the last Olympic qualifiers. And that left Broadhurst out in the cold, her Olympic dream in tatters.
So, why shouldn't she go down another avenue if it is open to her? There is no guarantee that she will be competing for Team GB in Paris - their current 60kg champion Shona Whitwell only lost to Harrington on a split decision at last year's Europeans.
A Dubliner has captained the England cricketers to great success. A former Ireland international captained Gareth
Southgate's team last week. In rugby, we cheer on Bundee Aki and Jamison Gibson-Park. Nationality is now fluid in international sport.
Broadhurst's decision to switch to Team GB simply illustrates the depth of talent in Irish boxing, which is something to be proud of. And just imagine if her path does cross with Harrington inside the ring in Paris.

Graphic


causing a splash: Amy Broadhurst wants Olympic shot

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



ANATOMY OF A SCANDAL; A new drama reveals the untold story behind UK's Prince Andrew's bombshell Newsnight interview...
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 6,7
Length: 690 words
Byline: Vicki Power
Body


When the UK's Prince Andrew sat down with Newsnight's Emily Maitlis in November 2019 to defend his relationship with the paedophile Jeffrey Epstein, he had no idea it would become one of TV's most astonishing car-crash interviews. It backfired so spectacularly that Andrew's royal career came to an abrupt end ? within days he announced he was stepping back from his duties.
Now new Netflix film Scoop tells the behind-the-scenes story of that notorious episode, and the women who were central to it ? Emily Maitlis (Gillian Anderson), BBC producer Sam McAlister (Billie Piper) and Prince Andrew's private secretary Amanda Thirsk (Keeley Hawes).
Gillian admits she was so frightened of playing fierce journalist Emily that she turned down the role at first. 'I said no because it was too daunting,' says the X-Files star. And even though she changed her mind, Gillian, 55, says, 'It was the first time I've played a real character who's still alive, and it's more daunting playing Emily Maitlis than Margaret Thatcher. People know her so well, they've watched her for years.'
While Emily's forensic questioning of Prince Andrew produced never-to-be-forgotten anecdotes about his inability to sweat and birthdays at Pizza Express, Scoop introduces us to the larger-than-life producer who made it all happen. We see Sam McAlister, a single mum worried about losing her job in a round of BBC cuts, set about schmoozing Amanda Thirsk, convincing her that an interview with Emily would help the prince boost the profile of his charity Pitch@Palace.
'Sam, who is incredibly tenacious, realises there's more to this story than just his personal charity, and she starts pursuing that,' explains Billie, 41, who was drawn to the role because she recognised herself in Sam's story. 'We don't have a dissimilar background. We come from the same sort of world and it's always good to have something you can relate to in the characters you play.'
The portrayal of Andrew is crucial to the story, yet Rufus Sewell looks little like the prince and was required to spend four hours in make-up. 'I had prosthetics around the eyes,' says Rufus, 56, star of The Diplomat. 'The upper teeth were an exact copy of Andrew's ? they looked so strange in my mouth! It was really useful to have the prosthetics put on me slowly and just watch him begin to emerge.
'The most I looked like him was when they put lids over my eyes. But I couldn't really express with my eyes ? I couldn't blink without them sticking, or open them wide. So we decided to make me a little less like him.' Rather than portraying Andrew as a pompous boor, Rufus controversially manages to make us feel sorry for him. 'It's a more powerful story that way,' explains director Philip Martin, who also directed episodes of The Crown. 'It'd be easy to portray Andrew in a certain way, but then the drama becomes rather onedimensional. What's interesting about Peter Moffat's script and Rufus's performance is it's a nuanced portrait of Andrew that lets you understand in some ways why he's in this situation.'
Andrew is even portrayed naked in one scene, emerging from his bath to read the bad reviews of the interview. 'At that point it felt interesting and important just to see
Andrew not through the lens of his status, but just as a person looking at his phone, confronting the reality of how the interview had played out,' says Philip.
Unable to film at Buckingham Palace or the BBC, the production team built a replica of the palace drawing room where the interview took place in a studio. They built the palace gates on a filming lot and used CGI to fill the background with the palace. West London office buildings doubled as the BBC's HQ.
Amazon are also producing a drama about the scandal focusing on Emily Maitlis's journey to that point, with Ruth Wilson playing her and Michael Sheen as Andrew. This film shows the importance of journalism getting to the truth, and that's what persuaded Gillian to play Emily in the end.
'It's important journalists have the opportunity to hold authority to account and speak truth to power. This film celebrates that.'
-Vicki Power ? Scoop, from Friday, Netflix.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Angelina and Brad's Heartburn over the kids
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; OPINION, COLUMN; Pg. 25
Length: 228 words
Byline: Eithne Tynan
Body


IT SEEMS Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's non-stop divorce battle may finally be winding down. After eight years of putting their children first by exposing them to exactly the kind of rancour that is known to mess kids up, the pair are set to stop fighting over custody.
The eldest three of their six children are now adults, and the youngest are 15 and 17, so maybe it just doesn't seem worthwhile any more. Brad is said to be dropping his pursuit of partial custody and will settle for visitation rights, but not without his people having a swipe at Angelina, right, for dragging it out this long on purpose.
Reading all this I couldn't help thinking of the scene in the 1986 film Heartburn scripted by the late Nora Ephron as a thinly veiled (and brilliantly funny) autobiographical account of her marriage to fellow journalist Carl Bernstein.
When Rachel (Nora) tells her father that her husband is having an affair, his reply reflects a time when attitudes to parenting and custody were quite different.
He says: 'Honey, when Joey Lazarus fell in love with Zizi Jevay, he went to his wife and said: "Natalie, we have six kids. I hope you don't give me any trouble about seeing them, because I can't beat this thing."
'And his wife said to him, "Joey, I'm happy for you. I won't give you any trouble about the kids. I've raised them for years. You and Zizi can have them."'

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Arsenal were easy prey for City. But Arteta fixed inferiority complex and built a winning machine
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 72,73
Length: 1184 words
Byline: Matt Barlow
Body


THIS very modern sporting rivalry remains best defined by English football's most notorious knee slide. It was performed by Emmanuel Adebayor after scoring Manchester City's third goal in a 4-2 win over Arsenal and saw him sprint the length of the Etihad Stadium to goad those in the away end.
They had been insulting him about his parentage and ancestry, Adebayor explained, and he has always insisted there are no regrets when the moment is revisited, which tends to be at least twice a season.
Here we go again, almost 15 years on, because Arsenal are back at the Etihad today having ended a run of 12 straight Premier League defeats to City with a 1-0 victory in October.
Mikel Arteta's team will go four points clear of the champions if they can win again and complete a first Premier League double over City since 2008-09.
That was the campaign when Adebayor was still a hero at the Emirates Stadium and scored both goals for Arsenal in a 2-0 win against City in April 2009.
Five months later, he was the arch-villain of a tempestuous contest in which he also stamped on Cesc Fabregas and raked his studs across Robin van Persie's face.
Van Persie called his action 'mindless and malicious' and the FA issued retrospective punishment, as they did more frequently in the days before VAR.
They hit Adebayor with a threematch ban for the Van Persie incident and fined him £25,000 for the provocative celebration.
'I was running on pure emotion,' the Togo international said later. 'I was abused all match and scored a goal that I knew would win the game for us.'
Adebayor's goal was a header in the 80th minute. It put the home side 3-1 up. Not only did it enrage Arsenal supporters, it signified lift-off for the new City, little more than a year after the Sheikh Mansour takeover.
Ahead of the game, Gunners manager Arsene Wenger had been fuming about 'financial doping', the term he coined in frustration as billionaire Roman Abramovich transformed the landscape of English football with his takeover at Chelsea in 2003.
Wenger tore up his Invincibles team of 2003-04 in a hasty attempt to create a new, younger team before Arsenal ? already hamstrung by loan repayments for their new stadium ? were left behind by the new reality.
In his autobiography, My Life in Red and White, published in 2020, Wenger wrote: 'With our colossal bank debts we were less able to buy players.
'This is why we turned to young ones while other clubs, which had artificial resources and existed on external sponsorship, clubs like Chelsea, Manchester United and
Manchester City, had huge financial clout and could buy whomever they wanted, often even our players.'
The summer of 2009 was City's first full summer window operating with oil money and was the height of their hubris. They burned through over £100million in the transfer market, a spree that included the 'Welcome to Manchester' swoop for Carlos Tevez from neighbours United.
Also incoming were Adebayor for £25m and Kolo Toure for £14m from Arsenal, who were unable to compete with the spending power of City's new owners.
This was also the summer marking the beginning of a nineyear period covered by the Premier League's 115 charges against City for allegedly breaking Financial Fair Play regulations.
'Quite surprised,' was Wenger's response last year when the charges came.
He is now FIFA's chief of football development. For him, the race is over. There might be a trace of satisfaction if City are found guilty, or even lose their titles as part of the punishment, but he cannot go back to change results.
City raided Arsenal for a second time, to lure away Samir Nasri for £25m and Gael Clichy for £11m in 2011. The loss of Nasri's creative flair was damaging in a window when Fabregas also forced a move from the Emirates to Barcelona. In between, in 2010, City signed Patrick Vieira, Arsenal legend and captain of the Invincibles team, five years after he had departed for Italy.
Wenger did not have the look of a man who considered imitation the sincerest form of flattery.
Wealthier rivals decimated his team. He was under attack and City were the main aggressors.
The rivalry simmered amid claim and counter claim. City boss Mark Hughes branded Wenger a 'bad loser' when he swerved a handshake after a League Cup tie, three months after the knee-slide.
There were six red cards in the next seven Premier League meetings. By the time of the hollow victories, when Van Persie and Alexis Sanchez both rejected moves to the Etihad for Old Trafford, City were champions for the first time since 1968 under Roberto Mancini.
They won it again under Manuel Pellegrini, whose team fired six past Arsenal in December 2013 on the way to another title, before returning at the end of the season to sign Bacary Sagna on a free.
City had clambered past on the ladder, sights firmly set on taking down bigger targets. Arsenal, meanwhile, were in the midst of an eight-year trophy drought and the Wenger Out brigade was gathering force.
Pep Guardiola arrived and reinforced the new order. In 15 Premier League games against Arsenal from May 2016 until October last year, City won 13 and drew twice, scoring 39 and taking 41 points from 45.
Arsenal's commitment to Wenger's open and attractive style of play made them easy prey for City, who were operating in a similar way but with better players and a ruthless edge.
Unai Emery replaced Wenger, but nothing changed. Freddie Ljungberg was in caretaker control when the Gunners were thumped 3-0 at home in December 2019, all the goals scored in the first 40 minutes as Kevin De Bruyne excelled.
Within a fortnight, Arsenal had prised their former captain Mikel Arteta away from Guardiola's coaching staff to become Emery's permanent successor. The
Spaniard spent five years in Wenger's dressing room. In April 2012, he scored the winner against City on a day when the volatile Mario Balotelli was sent off at the Emirates.
Back then, Mancini's title bid was threatening to implode. That defeat left his team eight points behind United at the top, but a run of six wins ? including in the Manchester derby ? were enough to win it on goal difference.
Nobody knew the internal workings of this rivalry better than Arteta, whose in-tray included finding a way to rid Arsenal of their inferiority complex and instil some of the ruthlessness he had witnessed inside Guardiola's winning machine.
It has taken time but progress is clear, summoning a title challenge last season after acquiring a little of City's winning mentality in the form of Gabriel Jesus and Oleksandr Zinchenko.
Significantly, Arsenal beat City in the scramble to sign Declan Rice last summer and, in October, beat them in a league game for the first time since 2015, with a late goal by Gabriel Martinelli.
To beat the champions in the title race, they had to start taking points from them to tilt the balance in their favour.
This they have done and the Gunners appear rejuvenated by a training trip to Dubai in January.
Arteta's team have won eight in a row since then, scoring 33 and conceding only four.
Just like Manchester City, they can thank the restorative powers of the Gulf.

Graphic


NOTORIOUS: Adebayor's controversial knee slide signalled the start of a huge City and Arsenal rivalry that comes to a head again today

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



As always, Harris will make zero difference
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 23
Length: 364 words
Byline: Ger Colleran
Body


IT SHOULD have been a great week for our presumptive taoiseach Simon Harris, enjoying his 'moment' as Fine Gael's new leader and excitedly anticipating his election to the highest office in the land on April 9.
Life is good for the 37-year-old Wicklow TD, left, who has been in government - as minister for Health, Justice and Higher Education - since 2016. Not bad for a man who dropped out of college to focus on serving the people. But things are never that simple, are they Simon?
This week has produced the most profoundly negative assessment of Mr Harris's time in government. And that's not just because of the general blame he shares on the basis of collective Cabinet responsibility - it's very particular to him, especially in respect of the health crisis. The story of how 65-year-old Martin Abbott from Shannon died after falling from a trolley in the busy emergency department at University Hospital Limerick in December 2019, when Harris was health minister, is as shocking as it is disgraceful. The trauma Mr Abbott's family have been forced to endure has been magnified by suggestions that the poor man may have lain unattended for perhaps an hour before he was discovered.
If anything illustrates the dreadful state of our health crisis, this is it. The health system is even worse now, which is a tragic calibration of the difference Mr Harris made in the Department of Health during his time there. Which was no difference at all.
It was the same in Justice when he stepped in for Helen McEntee. In May 2023, as minister, Mr Harris assured us that the Garda Commissioner had enough resources to deal with escalating anti-immigrant, far-right violence. What a cock-and-bull story that was in light of the Dublin riots last November, and arson attacks all over the country since.
And then there's the housing crisis with increasing numbers of people in emergency accommodation. Harris and others have been promising solutions for so long now to these wellidentified crises that their words have, to borrow from Bob Dylan, turned into a meaningless ring. Harris will put a new face on the office of Taoiseach. Unfortunately, experience tells us that nothing else will change.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



At best Israel's actions in Gaza are war crimes - at worst genocide; MARCH 31 ? 2024 The Irish Mail on Sunday COMMENT 23 Ger Colleran
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 23
Length: 814 words
Byline: Ger Colleran
Body


WE ALL know what Israel is doing in Gaza because we've seen the devil's work with our own eyes. At worst it's genocide, at best it's a war crime on a grand scale. Either way it's unconscionable. Two weeks after murderous Hamas militants entered Israel on October 7 in an outrage that resulted in the deaths of 1,200 people and the kidnapping of more than 200 others, I wrote that thousands more innocent people would die following the Israeli government's decision to destroy the terrorist organisation.
The bitter logic of that decision meant pulverising Gaza, destroying hospitals, houses, offices, schools and all and every kind of infrastructure to get at Hamas leaders and fighters. And to get at them Israel knew that they'd have to go through tens of thousands of innocent civilians. And that's precisely what they've done.
A fortnight into Gaza's torment, 4,000 Palestinians, mainly women and children, had been butchered. Today that appalling loss of life is well over 32,000, with another 75,000 injured on a spectrum of seriousness we are now, tragically, all too familiar with. he Gaza strip has
T been reduced to rubble, the entire area is under the most merciless siege from Israel and the population of just over two million people is starving as Israel refuses to allow in life-saving food, medicine and other supplies.
It's notable that since this catastrophe began, our outgoing Taoiseach Leo Varadkar and Foreign Affairs Minister Micheál Martin have distinguished themselves by calling out Israel's grossly disproportionate response to the Hamas murders. During the St Patrick's Day visit to the White House, the Taoiseach was as blunt as he was principled in his message to President Joe Biden, in which he called for an immediate humanitarian ceasefire. Given that it's mainly Uncle Sam who's providing all those weapons of carnage that Israel is using to destroy Palestinian lives, and that there's well over (EURO)500bn invested by American companies in Ireland, creating over 350,000 jobs directly and indirectly, Mr Varadkar's stand has been all the more impressive. The fact that only this week the US abstained to allow through a UN Security Council resolution calling for a ceasefire is due in part to unrelenting international pressure on Mr Biden, including from Mr Varadkar. After all we know about the genocidal madness of the Nazis in the 1930s and 1940s, particularly the wilful destruction of six million European Jews, it's hard to accept that we're witnessing another such act of utter brutality.
And finally this week Francesca Albanese, UN special rapporteur on human rights in the Palestinian territories, officially dropped the 'G' word. She said: 'There are reasonable grounds to believe that the threshold indicating the commission of the crime of genocide? has been met.'
Genocide has a legal definition of specific acts committed with the intent to destroy in whole or in part a national, ethnic, racial or religious group. Albanese accused Israel of committing three acts of genocide with intent: causing serious bodily or mental harm to members of the group; deliberately inflicting on the group conditions of life calculated to bring about its physical destruction in whole or in part; and imposing measures intended to prevent birth within the group. Israel is demonstrably guilty on all counts.
KILLING more than 32,000 Palestinians, most of them civilians; starving the entire group to the point of famine, and destroying hospitals and healthcare facilities to the extent that mothers and their newborn babies are dying by malnutrition or want of care, translates into deliberate acts of genocide.
The cynical, vicious deliberation with which these crimes are being carried out was made clear by an Israeli army officer insisting on television last week that Israel was not preventing trucks with food and medicine from entering Gaza and, incredibly, that there was no starvation in the beleaguered strip.
It's estimated that 300 trucks of food every day are needed to prevent total famine; for a week in March only 164 trucks a day were getting through. Joe Biden needs to 'do the math'.
The pressure continues to mount on Israel and, on Thursday, a group of
UN experts condemned what they regarded as 'collective punishment' against Palestinian civilians. They said: 'There is no justification for violence that indiscriminately targets innocent civilians, whether by Hamas or Israeli forces. This is absolutely prohibited under international law and amounts to a war crime.'
Micheál Martin has decided that Ireland should intervene in support of South Africa's claim before the International Court of Justice that Israel is committing genocide. He accuses Israel of 'a blatant violation of international humanitarian law on a mass scale'.
The Tánaiste said the international community is clear - 'that enough is enough'.
He's speaking for all of us.

Graphic


'G' word: United Nations's Francesca Albanese

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



BEES STING TING UNITED; Ajer's last-gasp leveller punishes Ten Hag's men
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 74,75
Length: 1045 words
Byline: Riath Al-Samarrai
Body


Brentford Ajer 90+9 11
Man United Mount 90+6
JUST as Manchester United set about celebrating a heist that would warrant a prison sentence in any other walk of life, they were quickly trapped by the realities of their own ineptitude. Even the gift of a 1-0 lead with two minutes to play is not safe in those slippery fingers.
But before we come to the most wild of finales, in which Mason Mount had United ahead on 96 minutes and Kristoffer Ajer brought Brentford level on 99, it is necessary to reflect on the greater levels of craziness preceding it.
That being the craziness of a goalless draw. The sheer insanity of United somehow being in this match when they had been pummelled and embarrassed in so many ways apart from any of those that actually matter.
To go by a metric as basic as shot count, Brentford won this match 30-10, not counting those on either side from Mount and Ajer. Let's contextualise those digits a little, because when Brentford crushed United 4-0 in this fixture last season, the numbers showed 15-13 in United's favour. This game was twice the battering of that one.
31
Had Brentford scored six here, it would not have been a false accounting. Ivan Toney hit a post and had a goal disallowed in a close-call offside, to go with two other good chances. Bryan Mbeumo hit the bar and side-netting. Yoane Wissa had multiple opportunities, so did Keane Lewis- Potter, and Andre Onana was a yellow blur of saves.
United faced against ? Sheff only other face 30+ games this
And yet somehow it almost ended in a Brentford defeat when Mount, so peripheral at United, was played clear by Casemiro and teed up the most unfathomable of victories. Thomas Frank looked almost traumatised; Erik Ten Hag somehow had found a lottery ticket.
But this is United. Of course it is.
31 shots Brentford are the team to in two season
And so with a win they did not remotely deserve in their grasp, they made a hash of defending a high ball, Ivan Toney played in Ajer, and the team with the worst form in the league could suddenly reflect on two points dropped rather than one. Madness.
Working from the basis that a good thing at United is pretty rare these days, Ten Hag didn't fiddle with the XI which beat Liverpool in the FA Cup quarter-finals.
Most notably that pointed to Kobbie Mainoo overcoming a bout of illness and there was also encouragement from Lisandro Martinez's place on the bench after two months of recovery from a knee injury. By contrast, Thomas Frank made two alterations to the team beaten at Burnley a fortnight ago, with Lewis-Potter and Yehor Yarmoliuk in for Frank Onyeka and the suspended Sergio Reguilon. For the benefit of happy memories, among other qualities, Brentford also had Toney, Mads Roerslev and Mathias Jensen from the side that trounced United 4-0 in this fixture last season.
That was a riot, a real storming of the weak with all four goals coming between the 10th and 35th minutes. This time round, the patterns of pressure were near identical, albeit with Brentford somehow failing to break though.
How? Goodness knows, but in that same period of time when they killed United once before, here Raphael Varane had to launch himself in front of a Lewis-Potter shot, Onana tipped away a drive from Jensen, Yoane Wissa and Zanka were each marginally offtarget with free-headers and Toney hit a post.
None of those went in; on another day three or four might have done. Having looked reasonably steady in the opening 10 minutes, United were a shambles.
The components of their problems? Diogo Dalot's marking was repeatedly exposed as a vulnerability, Toney was a mismatch for Varane at set-pieces and Roerslev spent the half getting into the space behind Aaron Wan-Bissaka.
Frank was well aware of how the latter dovetailed with the other two frailties and bled that route dry ? so many attacks from Roerslev's right flank caused United difficulties.
As such, they spent all bar a handful of minutes pinned back. Mainoo was a delight when he could get on the ball but too many of the attacking options, from Marcus Rashford to Bruno Fern- andes and especially Alejandro Garnacho, were passive onlookers to a kicking.
That they escaped the half on level terms was incredibly fortunate indeed. Ten Hag responded by hooking Varane for Harry Maguire at the break ? Varane had seemed to hurt himself earlier in blocking a Toney shot ? and the general energy of his side also lifted. They were able to pin Brentford back by pressing with fewer gaps and more urgency, particularly Rashford and Garnacho.
Out of those increased efforts, Dalot came close from distance and Rasmus Hojlund, chasing a goal in a seventh successive league fixture, saw his attempt tipped wide by Mark Flekken.
While that was briefly promising, it was quickly shut down, with one chance for Wissa and two quality Onana saves in keeping out Yarmoliuk and Lewis-Potter.
Garnacho was hauled off for Antony in an act of dice rolling and, more troubling for Ten Hag, he then had to replace a second centre-half after Victor Lindelof went down injured. That disappointment was possibly balanced by receiving the benefit of a marginal offside call against Toney when he seemingly volleyed Brentford ahead. Bryan Mbeumo followed it up by crashing against the bar after United switched off entirely at a set-piece.
Just when it seemed this match could not be harsher on Brentford, Mount, on as a substitute put them ahead six minutes into stoppage time. That was bonkers, with order only partially restored amid the insanity when Ajer levelled from close range a moment later.
BRENTFORD (3-5-2): Flekken 6.5; Jorgensen 6, Ajer 7, Collins 6.5; Roerslev 7.5, Yarmoliuk (Damsgaard 71min, 6), 6.5, Jensen 7, Janelt 7, Lewis-Potter 6 (Ghoddos 87); Toney 8, Wissa 7 (Mbeumo 71, 6).
Scorer: Ajer 90+9. Booked: Wissa, Maupay, Jorgensen. Manager: Thomas Frank 7.
MAN UNITED (4-2-3-1): Onana 6.5; Dalot 5.5, Lindelof 6 (Li Martinez 69, 6), Varane 5 (Maguire 45, 6), Wan-Bissaka 5; Mainoo 5.5 (Casemiro 80), McTominay 6.5; Garnacho 4 (Antony 59), Fernandes 6, Rashford 4 (Mount 80), Hojlund 5.
Scorer: Mount 90+6. Booked: Wan-Bissaka, McTominay. Referee: Simon Hooper 7.
disallowed 31
United faced 31 shots against Brentford ? Sheff Utd are the only other team to face 30+ shots in two games this season in

Graphic


DRAMA: Norwegian defender Ajer slots in late, late equaliser for Brentford, just minutes after Mount had looked to have sealed an undeserved victory for Ten Hag's United

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



big MISTAKE; How even the tiniest speck of pollen can be a killer's one... Forensic ecologist Patricia Wiltshire has tracked down hundreds of criminals, including Soham murderer Ian Huntley - who had cleaned every inch of his car, but forgot all about the mud underneath the bonnet CONSTANCE CRAIG SMITH TRUE CRIME The Natural History Of Crime Patricia Wiltshire John Blake (EURO)27.50
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 51
Length: 950 words
Body


As any fan of detective stories will know, one of the guiding principles of crime-scene investigation is that 'every contact leaves a trace', whether that trace is a fingerprint, DNA, a hair, fibres or blood. In the past few decades, a new tool has been added to the crime-fighting arsenal: the evidence provided by our contact with trees, plants and soil.
One of the leaders in this field is professor Patricia Wiltshire, a pioneering UK forensic ecologist who uses her expertise as a botanist to help the police solve crimes. Thirty years ago she was working on analysing pollen, spores and soil sediments for archaeological digs when to her surprise she was asked to help the police pinpoint where a suspected murderer's car had been.
She was able to prove that members of a Chinese Triad gang had trodden on the ground where they had dumped a body, taking pollen-laden soil from the site back to their car's footwell and pedals. Using her training in this way was 'a revelation', and since then she has worked with every police force in the UK and Ireland and investigated 300 other crimes.
What makes forensic ecology so effective is that the combination of plants growing in any one area is almost as unique as a human fingerprint. 'Look at the plants around you and you will see that the vegetation is never identical to anywhere else,' Wiltshire writes.
When a body is discovered outdoors, she is able to work out how long it has been there, as 'seepage from a corpse often kills underlying leaves and even stems - and at differing rates, depending on the species of plant'. Despite this, giving a precise time of death in these circumstances is almost impossible. 'The accurate estimations in films and TV series are quite laughable,' she writes, waspishly.
When Wiltshire gets to a crime scene, she spends time taking in what she sees. 'I sit with the corpse for a while, trying to picture the events that had resulted in the scenario in front of me.' This can irritate and puzzle police officers, who 'don't understand these few minutes of apparent inactivity'.
Her job also involves recovering botanical evidence from bodies in the morgue. A victim's hair is useful as it can hold pollen, spores and other particulates almost indefinitely. In one case, Wiltshire was able to lead the police to the location where a woman had been killed, several kilometres from where her body was found, due to the plant traces she found in the victim's hair.
One of the enduring cliches of crime fiction is the scene where the plucky heroine performs a gory autopsy while the watching police officers turn green and stagger out of the room. Wiltshire confirms that this does happen. When she and one of her female students struggled to get samples from the nasal passages of a very heavy corpse, using a ghastly sounding technique involving a crochet hook, the three policemen present 'literally cowered in the corner of the room'.
While the morgue holds no fears for her, and she thoroughly enjoyed a week she spent at a 'body farm' in the US, observing the decaying process of human bodies left out in the open, she loathes being crossexamined at a trial. This is 'about the worst part of anything I do? at least one knows what to expect from a cadaver, whereas just about anything can happen when you are giving evidence'. She has met plenty of excellent barristers but is scathing about 'lazy' barristers who don't bother to understand the evidence she presents. Wiltshire makes no attempt to sugarcoat her prickly nature and admits she has riled a lot of people in her career. Does she care? 'I have never worried about winning popularity contests.'
Her main fear when examining a body is that she will miss some crucial bit of evidence or make a mistake. Some cases have touched her profoundly, 'when I have felt so much for the victim that it has been like being kicked in the stomach? I will think about those victims forever'.
One of those cases was the 2002 murder in Soham in Cambridgeshire of two 10-year-olds, Holly Wells and Jessica Chapman. Wiltshire was called in to look at the bodies when they were first discovered and was deeply affected by the sight of the children's remains lying in a ditch.
When the police arrested school caretaker Ian Huntley, along with his girlfriend Maxine Carr, Wiltshire located botanical trace evidence from his shoes, his car and two plastic petrol cans. Although Huntley had cleaned the car inside and out, changed the tyres and washed away debris from underneath the engine, some of the mud had sprayed onto the inside of the bonnet. Wiltshire was able to take samples and confirm that he had been present at the site where the bodies were left.
At Huntley's trial, Wiltshire endured hours of 'mean and aggressive' cross-examination from his barrister, who did his best to trip her up and cast doubt on her evidence. She was followed into the witness box by a geologist, whose findings tallied with hers. After their evidence, Huntley changed his plea to guilty. Wiltshire felt proud that botany, often dismissed as an old-fashioned science, had been so pivotal in providing vital evidence.
She clearly loves her work, even if examining, identifying and cataloguing hundreds of samples can be boring. 'Mostly, the work is excruciatingly tedious because of the utter thoroughness and accuracy that is essential,' she writes. 'If only the throngs of young people who long to be a forensic scientist knew what it really involved, they might not be so keen.'
'I sit with the corpse for a while, trying to picture the events that had resulted in the scenario in front of me' 'Sometimes I have felt so much for the victim that it has been like being kicked in the stomach'

Graphic


TRAGIC: Holly Wells and Jessica Chapman, murdered by caretaker Ian Huntley in 2002

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Block fresh hikes with a few savvy switches!; Why prices are going up tomorrow (and how you can escape the pain)
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: BUSINESS; Pg. 54,55
Length: 980 words
Byline: BILL TYSON
Body


Tomorrow yet more price hikes will hit, driving up the cost of fuel, energy, TV and broadband.From midnight, we will have to pay an extra 4c a litre for petrol at the pumps and 3c more for diesel.
Also from tomorrow, Eir, Sky, Three and Vodafone will hike TV, broadband and phone bills by up to nearly (EURO)100 a year.
And piling on even more pain, our energy bills will spike after April with no more Government 'credits' to come from then onwards.
All this comes as household bills have spiralled to record levels.
Just paying two types of bill - energy plus TV/broadband - could cost us as much as (EURO)5,000 a year, and we'll pay more than (EURO)4,000 on average.
But the news isn't all bad - and there's plenty we can do to avoid the pain.
Fuel and energy supports are unwinding because energy prices and inflation generally are coming down.
To reverse a common adage, this is the 'storm before the calm' and prices should ease from here on in.
This week, Yuno dropped its electricity prices for the fourth time this year, likely fuelling yet another round of price cuts.
And there's plenty of value to be had in the TV and broadband market where some providers are more than 50% cheaper than their rivals.
Here, we examine the markets under price pressure right now - gas, electricity and TV/broadband/ phone. And we'll show how you could save close to (EURO)2,000 on those bills if you're already paying through the nose.
We also look at how to save at the pumps. But first, a quick search on comparison site www.Bonkers.ie identifies the dearest energy providers...
PRICE SHOCK PrepayPower takes this dubious honour for the gas market, charging (EURO)1,690 a year on one of its plans.
Another prepaid operator, Pinergy, charges an eye-watering (EURO)2,004 a year for electricity.
That means you'd be paying almost (EURO)4,000 for energy alone with these plans.
But how low could our bills go if we were to shop around?
ENERGY SAVINGS Let's look at energy first. The lowest variable rate gas price is available from Bord Gáis, while Electric
Ireland has the cheapest variable rate electricity.
Fixed prices are lower still but are not recommended right now (see below right).
Snapping up the lowest variable deals saves (EURO)799, according to www.Bonkers.ie, if you're on average rates.
Or you could earn yourself up to (EURO)1,874 extra a year if you're already paying top dollar in the market.
That should shield you from any more PRICE SHOCKs - or even pay for a nice sun holiday where you can forget all about those pesky energy bills .
DON'T FIX IT WHEN PRICES ARE FALLING Avoid fixed rates and pre-pay deals.
A glance at our table suggests pre-payment might not be the way to go.
I'm not a big fan of pre-paying anyway as you're effectively paying an additional monthly bill.
Alas, it's not quite that simple. Yuno (actually owned by PrepayPower) is also a pre-payment operator and it's leading the way with price cuts.
Yuno is certainly the cheapest electricity deal on the market right now, which might tempt you to snap it up, even if it is pre-paid.
However, Yuno's deal is fixed, as are most of the current cheapest deals, and when wholesale prices are falling, it's not a good idea to lock into a fixed rate.
Instead, we're recommending variable rates, which are likely to fall further in the next year.
BOX CLEVER WITH TV & BROADBAND From tomorrow Eir, Sky, Three and Vodafone bills will rise by between (EURO)24 and (EURO)96 a year, depending on your plan and provider.
These companies have brought in a more-than-annoying practice of mid-contract price hikes that apply on April 1.
Eir, Vodafone and Three will hit customers with a rise amounting to inflation +3% annually.
With inflation so high - at 4.6% - this means a painful 7.6% jump this year.
Regulator Comreg has expressed concern at this practice - though it has no control over Prices .
The issue has also been raised by the opposition in the Dáil, though again there's no sign that they can do anything about it.
You could always opt for Virgin, which is the only major player to spare its customers thus far.
But as it's also the dearest provider for long-term pricing, that's not much consolation.
There's no point fleeing Eir to go to Virgin to end up paying up to (EURO)107 a month to avoid a (EURO)3 increase in your (EURO)50 monthly Eir bill.
Eir offers by far the cheapest monthly deal of (EURO)44.98 - though this is set to jump. It also doubles after year one.
Vodafone has a much dearer (EURO)70 a month compared to the other initial offerings.
However, while the other three operators more than double their rates after a year, Vodafone's stay the same .
Despite their mid-contract shenanigans, Darragh Cassidy from www.Bonkers.ie still recommends Eir and Vodafone on price alone.
'It's a close call,' he says. 'But Eir just about edges it because of its tie-in with Apple TV (you get a free Apple 4k box) and its competitive pricing in the first year, perhaps.
However, if longer-term value is important, it's hard to look past Vodafone, especially given its new improved TV service.'
But brace yourself for prices going up from tomorrow - and every year thereafter.
PUMP IT UP? There's still time to ease the pain of rising fuel prices Tomorrow .
The obvious one is to top up your tank today. The average tank is about 55 litres, so you could save up to (EURO)2 - or even more if you have a petrol car that's nearing empty.
And if you pay attention to prices at the pumps, you could save even more now and on an ongoing basis.
There's an 11c+ price gap between the dearest and cheapest garages in Dublin alone, according to the voluntary price inspectors that update the website www.Pumps.ie That difference would save you nearly (EURO)6 per fill - or around (EURO)300 a year.
We recommend checking www.Pumps.ie for the latest updates but remember that prices are updated by volunteers and are not comprehensive or always up-to-date.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Bradley Walsh? 'So-so comedian' Sarah Millican? 'Vulgar' Frank Skinner? 'Too explicit' Rowan Atkinson? Michael McIntyre?'Funny as a kick in the balls'; An outspoken and irreverent Jimmy Tarbuck gives his uncensored views on today's telly comedy giants - and the last man standing from his generation doesn't pull his punches!
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 4,5
Length: 1706 words
Body


With comedians, the desire to seek out the funny is hardwired. Thank goodness for it, too. Otherwise, conversation with Jimmy Tarbuck could be unbearably maudlin. It's getting a bit grim when he runs through all the funerals he's been to in this chapter of his life, what with farewells to Parky and Brucie and Cilla and Desdemona.
Desdemona? 'Des O'Connor. I used to call him Desdemona. He would laugh and laugh.'
The way Jimmy tells it, all these showbiz icons -? or his bezzie mates, really ? are up on the great stage in the sky now, vying for position. Down here, it's feeling increasingly like it's just him lingering in the wings, waiting for that final curtain call.
'It can be lonely, thinking that you're the last man standing. You think, "Why me? Why am I still here?" and, "I'm 84 now. How long have I got?" I've been to quite a few funerals now. A parade of them. Last one, I caught the wreath.'
He grabs my arm and cackles.
Heads turn in this restaurant in London, and everyone laughs, even those who can't possibly have heard the punchline. Maybe he just has that sort of face. Whatever, Jimmy Tarbuck, legendary funnyman, is happy because he's looking out into the dazzle of other people's teeth.
'It's like a drug,' he says, beaming to himself. 'People always ask me ? you will probably ask me today ? "Did you ever do drugs, Jimmy?" And I tell them, "Yes. I got addicted to the biggest drug of all: laughter."'
Would to die on No, I'd die in my quietly. better, Sophia
To be fair, he did once do actual drugs too, with his own showbiz (and school) pal John Lennon. That they were in the same class at school is one of those quirks of entertainment history. Whisper it, but Lennon might have been funnier than Tarby back then. 'Once the teacher said, "Lennon, if I had three crowns in one pocket and four in the other, what would I have?" John said, "You'd have Tarbuck's trousers on, sir." The laughs! The place was in uproar, but the teacher said, "Funny boy, eh?" and gave him three belts of the leather strap for his cheek.'
It was in a nightclub in London at the height of the Swinging Sixties when he reckons he got high at Lennon's expense. 'Speed,' he confirms. 'I think so. He was forever putting stuff in people's drinks. He thought it was hilarious.' He does an impression of the young Tarby 'off his head'. 'Talk about a trip. We started in the West End of London. Before I knew it we were in Carlisle.'
I like stage?
'  You feel a little off your head yourself in conversation with James Tarbuck. Over the space of one lunchtime he lurches through the years, 60 of them in showbiz now, and the stars. One minute you're starstruck with him in Elvis's company, the next you're in a Pringle sweater playingto bed, Or, even with Loren golf with Bing Crosby ('a lovely man. You'd have liked him. And the crowds who queued to see him. He was mobbed getting off the course').
He and Tom Jones are good friends ('Oh yes, big mates. I bought a Rolls-Royce off him once') and now have a bet about which one will outlive the other. 'I've told him he has to go first because I want to sing at his funeral.' He bursts into song. Let's just say it might be kinder to all if Tom is the one who's left to provide the chorus.
How would Jimmy like to go?
This is a man living with prostate cancer ('the doctors said it won't kill me, but I will die with it'). After only a few hours in his company, I'd imagine he'd want to die on stage. 'No. I'd like to die in my bed, quietly,' he says. 'Or, even better, while giving Sophia Loren one.' He explodes laughing again. Has he met her ? since he seems to have met everyone? 'No,' he says. 'But there's still time.'
Until then, there are other conquests to be made. In a few weeks, Jimmy is embarking on a standup tour. He reckons he will be able to manage two hours every night. 'I hope so anyway. We will see. I don't feel 84. I feel 40. Good age, 40. In my head, Sophia Loren is 40 too.'
Jimmy hasn't toured since pre-Covid times. He says his wife Pauline, whom he met in the Cavern Club in Liverpool when they were 17, has fully supported his return to the stage. I suspect she's tired of him sitting at home, dreaming of Sophia and yelling at the new generation of comics who have taken over TV.
'Haven't they just,' he says. 'Do you know Bradley Walsh? On everything, him. He ought to be careful. You can be on too much. He asked me to come on The Chase, the celebrity version. I said, "How much are you paying?" He said "£4k." I said, "Are you serious? I wouldn't have a p*** for £4k. I want what you're getting." He said, "But I'm the host."' He seems genuinely baffled. 'I'm 60 years doing this. Do they pay to come and see him? I mean he seems a nice lad, but is he a good comic? So-so. He's not dynamite. It's not "Bfff, Bfff, Bfff"
like it was with Dave Allen.'
It's an entertainment in itself hearing Tarby's views on the 'youngsters', aka the reigning kings and queens of the comedy circuit. He adores Peter Kay ('Proper funny. He did it the proper way. He was Parky's warm-up man for years.'). He has a soft spot for Dawn French, but hates Sarah Millican (too vulgar) and cannot abide 'those comics who have to show off how clever they are, such as Rowan Atkinson'.
I've my life a nappy like to my c**p I've looked my family
Some hugely famous comedians he can't quite place. 'Michael McIntyre? Is he the fat fella who bounces round the stage? He wants to be careful, him. He'll fall into the orchestra pit.' Is he funny, though? 'No. He's as funny as a kick in the b******s.'
His ire is at its highest, though, when it comes to comedians who sell out Wembley 'but get up there and just eff and blind'. There is no need for it. Nor is there any need for explicit routines. 'Frank Skinner did one about anal sex. How would you take your mother along to watch that?' Jimmy's mother is at this table with us too. She died of cancer when his career was at its zenith, and it was the only time he recalls cancelling a show.
'I called the theatre and said I had to get back to Liverpool and the manager said, "You haven't given us much notice." I said, "God didn't give me much f***ing notice either."' Born in working-class Liverpool in 1940, his was a wartime childhood. He had an adored older sister Norma ('who looked after me, always') and a brother whom he only met when he was six. 'He'd been fighting on the front, and turned up in our living room with his rifle over his shoulder. I didn't like him, then. Didn't know him. I came to be very close to him.
never in changed but I think, in way, after 'He became a lorry driver. I'll never forget when he turned up at my house once with his truck and said, "I'll park around the corner. I don't want to embarrass you." I said, "You will not. You will put it in my drive."' He shakes his head. 'They thought I'd gone posh once I made a bob or two, but I was never flashy.' It sounds like an unusual trajectory, from Liverpool to superstardom, but this was an extraordinary age, and never forget he watched the Beatles do it. He not only went to school with Lennon, but was a Redcoat at Butlins with Ringo Starr.
He tells me one of his most vivid memories was of standing in the wings of a London venue at the height of Beatlemania. 'Honest to God, the screaming. It was like nothing I'd ever heard. Lennon was miming. He said, "They can't f***ing hear us anyway. What's the point?" Glorious.'
Was he mates with Paul McCartney too? 'Not really. Bit showbizzy. Lennon was my cup of tea. I thought he was the Beatles' true genius.'
He always wanted the roar of the crowd, though. He came through the ranks in working men's clubs and Blackpool. People like Bruce
Forsyth and Bob Monkhouse ('best in the business') were kind on the ascent. All were associated with the venue he'd like to play one last time: The London Palladium. 'Best place in the world. When that laughter gathers it roars down those seats and up to the stage. You cannot beat it.'
He's lost count of the number of Royal Variety Performances he did. 'Met the Queen many times. And the King. I wrote to him when he was ill. Had a nice reply.'
Comedy took him all over the world while Pauline held the fort at home. They had three children, including broadcaster Liza Tarbuck 'who, people tell me, is good on the wireless'. There are grandchildren. 'Six. Or five. Let me count.' He gets his fingers out. 'Five.'
How does a man not know how many grandchildren he has? Is it fair to say you were not a man to change a nappy, Jimmy? 'Never in my life! But I like to think that, in my c**p way, I've looked after my family.'
Mostly, he reckons, showbiz has been kind to him, but there have been blips. Like Cliff Richard he was wrongly arrested once, as part of Operation Yewtree. He has always reckoned an enemy tried to cause trouble for him there. Why? "Envy. There are some p****s in this business. I steer clear of them.'
There was a more recent public shaming. Last May he crashed his car into parked vehicles and, although no one was injured, he fled the scene. He was fined (EURO)900 and given five points on his licence. It's a stain on his character. 'What can I say? I'd been at my sister's funeral. I don't know where my head was. I came out of a supermarket, turned right, this fella was coming towards me and I swerved. I should've stopped. I don't know why I didn't. I got home and Pauline said, "You didn't what?"' The show goes on. He says when he steps on that stage again, he will carry the ghosts of his friends with him. He gets a little weepy remembering some, including Michael Parkinson ('A friend. A loyal friend. I cannot believe I will never see him again') and 'little Ronnie Corbett, who was one of the biggest stars of all'. He points out that Corbett never got a knighthood, which is shameful. 'He should have had a proper gong.' Jimmy has an OBE but hasn't had a 'proper gong' either.
He might've put paid to getting one with his traffic misdemeanour, but would he like one? 'I would, yes,' he says, the ambition still very much in evidence.
?Jenny Johnston
I've never in my life changed a nappy but I like to think, in my c**p way, I've looked after my family Would I like to die on stage? No, I'd like to die in my bed, quietly. Or, even better, with Sophia Loren

Graphic


Above: Jimmy playing golf with showbusiness pals Bruce Forsyth and Ronnie Corbett in 1996Jimmy with his wife Pauline (inset right) and (below) with actress Amanda Barrie in the 60s

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Buy less, buy better, by Helen; Helen McAlinden's minimalistic style has entranced women for two decades and now she has a new Dublin shop to visit
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 12,13
Length: 581 words
Byline: Rose Mary Roche
Body


Helen McAlinden has led her titular brand for more than two decades and during that time has weathered the financial crash, the pandemic and the rise of online retail.
It has been a career defined by change and the ability to pivot when needs dictate. Recently she marked another change with the launch of her new retail and design HQ at 19 Drury Street in Dublin.
The designer says: 'It was hard saying goodbye to our South William Street boutique last month, but I'm loving our new Drury Street home. It feels like an exciting new chapter, a bit more edgy and creative, like Drury Street itself. The building seems petite, but we have three floors for a more personalised shopping experience. Plus, we've relocated our design studio to the top floor, a throwback to the old couturier model, when fashion designers used to sketch, fit, cut and make all their designs in the same building they retailed in.'
Originally from Northern Ireland, McAlinden studied English in Belfast but her attraction to design subsequently led to a post grad in textiles in Manchester. She subsequently gained experience with Marks & Spencer and Courtaulds, followed by three years at the forerunner to Enterprise Ireland in Dublin. She then took over Irish brand Ramsay before launching her own label in 2001. She has collaborated with Foxford since the early Noughties on their home textiles, and this year celebrates 23 years as both a fashion and interior designer.
As someone with a 'minimalist aesthetic' who values beautiful fabrics, classic design and a flattering cut, McAlinden has consistently refined her signature look and stayed true to her core values. Her clothes are quietly confident and focus on elegance, simplicity and sustainability. She is not a designer who adds details but rather one who pares things back. Her philosophy is to buy less and buy better, a sentiment increasingly appreciated by consumers.
Her Spring Summer 2024 collection is full of easy stylish clothes in flattering shades. There are fit and flare dresses like the Laoise in zingy lime ((EURO)355), the Avril in dusty blue ((EURO)325), and the Vera in soft pink ((EURO)375). Sleek tailored dresses include the Jane in ivory ((EURO)365), the Layla in a beautiful begonia ((EURO)345) and the Ophelia in optic white ((EURO)345). Waist emphasis is a recurring feature with tie belts and cummerbunds. There are pretty prints too: including an attractive blue and white Toile de Jouy in the v-neck Bonnie dress ((EURO)345) and a zingy leaf print in the halter neck Bronagh ((EURO)325), both perfect for summer socialising. The Aurora mini dress in begonia ((EURO)365) with gathered sleeves makes an impact.
There are also classic tailored styles like the Cassie ((EURO)310), Darcie ((EURO)325) and Jade ((EURO)310) blazers with slim and wide trousers in shades of blue, bone and soft pink. The Cassie Glen check jacket ((EURO)395) and Lyra wide leg trousers ((EURO)275) nod to masculine tailoring, recalling Annie Hall. The Lydiah lightweight trench in navy or bone ((EURO)420) is a smart buy for the erratic Irish summer.
McAlinden's shop will stock all these, alongside her range of jeans, cashmere knits and t-shirts. A selection of Irish-designed accessories will be available too including the range of My Name is Ted bags, millinery by Anna Victoria Mulcahy and gloves by George Horne made in The Liberties. Stockists include Arnotts, Harvey Nichols Dundrum and Curated at Kildare Village or at www.helenmcalinden.com.

Graphic


Cassie dark navy blazer, (EURO)325Ophelia white dress, (EURO)345Bronagh leafy print dress, (EURO)325Aurora begonia dress, (EURO)365

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Cava fizz… and a whizz round historic Cadiz
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 52
Length: 575 words
Byline: Fran Goodman
Body


On a cruise around the coast of Spain I was expecting historic cathedrals, tiny chapels, even the occasional remains of a Roman temple. What I wasn't expecting was the chance to worship at a cathedral of wine.
As we pulled up at Adernats winery in the village of Nulles, a 15-minute drive from Tarragona, I was looking forward to a vineyard stroll, a lesson in viticulture and a few glasses of vino.
What I received was a lesson in Spanish resilience and determination. Nulles's livelihood was destroyed by the 1880s phylloxera pest infestation - so they built back better.
Needing an architect, they reached out to Barcelona's Cesar Martinell, a contemporary of the great Antoni Gaudi, and by 1920 he had built a modernist building with soaring arches and decorative brick work - more beautiful than many churches. A century later and it still delivers excellent wine.
The tasting began with the aptly named seduccio (seduction). Next up was xarello vermell, a fruity white. And finally the creamy cava with small, gentle bubbles.
I exited through the gift shop, well refreshed, with my backpack now heavier. The Tarragona trip was halfway through my 15-night cruise on Fred Olsen's flagship Bolette, sailing from Southampton, southern England.
With a maximum of 1,338 passengers, Bolette is big enough to offer a good choice of restaurants and entertainment, but small enough to give friendly, personal service. All-inclusive fares include a fine dining restaurant, buffet and poolside cafe, but it was worth paying an extra (EURO)18 to try either of the two Asian restaurants: the Goan-inspired Vasco, or fusion food at Colours and Tastes.
There were films and cookery demonstrations in the auditorium, a spa, gym, quizzes, guest speakers and lessons in bridge to playing the ukulele. Every night saw a new show, with musical theatre-style performances, comedians and magicians.
But the real stars were undoubtedly the ports of call. If there's a prettier sight from a cruise ship balcony than Cadiz, I've yet to see it. This vibrant city made its name thousands of years ago by putting a huge hit of Andalusian flavour into Roman food, with garum, the local fermented fish sauce. Today you can enjoy all the flavour the city has to offer for a few euro. My walking tour covered Cadiz's two cathedrals, ancient city walls and Roman theatre before becoming a bar crawl with epic snacks.
We started in the Central Market's Rincon Gastronomico, packed with tapas stalls, then moved on to Las Banderas, a buzzing bar, to eat sliced pork belly with hunks of bread.
Other stops included the 1st Century Tower of Hercules as well as Valencia, with its thrilling space-age City of Arts and Sciences. Next was Cartagena's Roman forum and 7,000-seat Roman theatre, followed by Malaga from where I visited the spellbinding Nerja Caves.
The cruise grand finale was in Funchal, Madeira's capital, for a 'meet the fleet' party with all three of Fred Olsen's ocean-going ships - Bolette, Borealis and Balmoral.
The Madeiran capital loves a party, and we certainly gave them one with music and fireworks. I could still feel the glow when I got back home - before grabbing that backpack full of cava and silently giving thanks to the cathedral of wine.
?Fred Olsen offers a 14-night all-inclusive cruise around Spain and Portugal, sailing from Southampton on Sep 29, with fares from (EURO)2,105 (www.fredolsencruises.com). Aer Lingus return flights to Southampton from (EURO)69.

Graphic


OLE! Dancers dazzle crowds once Bolette has docked. Far left: The centre of Cadiz

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Code Cracker N0.909[...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 39
Length: 222 words
Body


Code Cracker N0.909 Prove your Code Cracker prowess and you could win a (EURO)15 book token! Each letter of the alphabet is represented by a different number from 1 to 26. From the information given you should be able to fill out the grid with words - names, phrases and hyphenated words are allowed - and complete the rest of the panel at the right, to find which number represents which letter.
Answers next week.  1 14 2 15 3 16 4 17 5 18 6 19 7 20 8 21 9 22  3 26 11 14 17 24 9 7 3 14 13 26 5 12 26 6 2 8 13 13 13 26 3 26 15 16 21 3 13 26 22 3 13 3 14 14 6 26 22 15 3 14 18 9 23 8 16 9 10 26 14 13 3 4 12 1 12 4 3 9 26 25 19 7 6 6 13 3 4 20 9 7 26 12 15 16 16 4 5 12 16 11 2 7 6 14 5 16 26 11 26 7 11 3 15 14 26 8 13 26 20 3 13 18 15 3 18 3 3 22  A  10 23 11 C  24 12 X  25 13 26  Send your solution to: Code Cracker No.909, The Irish Mail on Sunday, PO Box 5332, CardiffLane, Dublin 2. Entries must arrive by Friday (no photocopies). The winner of Code Cracker No. 908 is Sarah Jane Dunne, Santry, Dublin 9.  name.........................................................................................................  address.................................................................................................  ................................................... telephone..........................................

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Corruption, bribery... and Michael Lynn's Faustian pact with a Chechen gangster; Book reveals disgraced solicitor's dishonest Balkan deals By Michael O'Farrell investigations editor
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 27
Length: 1106 words
Byline: Michael O'Farrell
Body


CONVICTED thief Michael Lynn partnered with notorious mafia crooks in Bulgaria and paid bribes to secure planning permission, a new book reveals.
Fugitive: The Michael Lynn Story - which is out now - also includes Lynn's own assessment of his corrupt dealings with Balkan underworld figures.
'I cannot say I was raped as an innocent,' is the self-incriminating way Lynn described his corrupt engagement with Bulgarian criminals.
As a result of a deal Lynn struck with feared Black Sea criminals, the former solicitor was able to secure valuable beach-front land from local farmers for a fraction of its true value - all in the name of making millions for himself.
'These farmers were under pressure to sell for (EURO)5 per square metre for something that costs (EURO)55 per square metre,' Lynn previously told the author.
'Okay - basically that's terrible. I don't want you quoting me, but in the Celtic
Tiger it was what can I get? What can I sell it for? How's she cutting?'
Delivered in his Mayo accent with a 'who cares' shrug, Lynn's callous words lay bare his contempt for the law if he saw an opportunity to make money.
During Lynn's recent trial and retrial, he sensationally claimed to have paid bribes and kickbacks to various bankers - without producing any evidence. These claims were then denied by each banker and Lynn was convicted of stealing nearly (EURO)18m from various banks.
But there is evidence of Lynn's corruption and bribery in Bulgaria as he pursued an opportunity to make tens of millions - at the same time as he was duping Irish banks.
One opportunity arose in February 2006 when Lynn met a Chechen living in Ireland at a property exhibition in the RDS. The Chechen - a go-between to violent mafia figures in Bulgaria - pitched a (EURO)1.6m development opportunity to Lynn involving a Black Sea site at Shkorpilovtsi.
A detailed brochure for the deal promised the project could yield profits in excess of (EURO)37m, and Lynn would go on to secure planning for 1,000 apartments there. But there was a catch. The deal was corrupt from the start and involved bribing a local authority official in Bulgaria with a (EURO)30,000 'gift' - something that did not faze Lynn.
This bribe was even written into the proposal presented to Lynn in Dublin. It was also listed on the finder's fee invoice the Chechen finder sent Lynn - which he paid via an Irish bank transfer.
Aside from bribery, the deal brought Lynn into contact with some of Bulgaria's most notorious crooks. These criminals included figures such as Yahiya Megomedovich Hashiev, a notorious Chechen gangster and mafia lord who has been imprisoned in Bulgaria for VAT fraud.
Hashiev, who was based in the Black Sea port of Varna, is also linked to a vicious gang involved in raising funds for terrorism, extortion and human trafficking.
"
Lynn said of his first meeting with Hashiev: 'I went over to Bulgaria, and I was greeted in Varna by him and his people - all of them carrying pieces. All with bulletproof vests. I thought: sell "Mother of God; what am I involved in here?"' What he was involved in was corruption and bribery at a considerable cost to others. After strong-arming dozens of locals to sell their coastal land for a pittance,
Hashiev and his associates packaged the deal and sold it to Lynn via their Irish-based go-between.
Property records in Bulgaria confirm that half the land was sold to Lynn's firm through a company associated with Hashiev's wife.
The remainder was sold to Lynn by a Varna politician, Cristo Danov, who has been linked to gun- running, prostitution, money laundering and human trafficking.
Once the land was secured by Lynn, his criminal associates set about ensuring planning permission would go smoothly.
In his contract with Lynn's property development firm Kendar, Hashiev promised - for a price of (EURO)138k - to ensure the land, which was protected as a nature reserve, would be rezoned to allow building. This was achieved via the chief architect of the local council, Simeon Saraliev, who was a crucial contact if planning for hundreds of apartments in an ecologically sensitive area was to be achieved.
The (EURO)30,000 'gift' listed in the original deal sold to Lynn in Dublin went to Saraliev. The invoice sent to Lynn by the Chechen gobetween in Dublin itemised the 'gift', describing its purpose as: 'Assistance to get the contract for the project preparation with architect Saraliev.'
In return the city architect - a public servant responsible for planning in his district - contrived to have Kendar's design work completed by a company owned by his own daughter, Liana, who is also an architect.
Liana's company, DZZD Ecoconsult, signed a design contract with Kendar for (EURO)1.2m and issued a receipt for an initial payment of (EURO)40,000 which Kendar paid immediately by bank transfer. Based on a price of (EURO)16 per square metre the design project price was far in excess of the (EURO)4.50 that such work would normally command.
Saraliev died in 2008 and his daughter did not respond to a request for comment from the MoS this week. But this newspaper has obtained the contract her firm signed and the receipt it issued for the initial payment.
With both Hashiev and the town architect on Kendar's payroll, Lynn could be assured that all permissions would be granted. But there were other problems with Hashiev and frequent disputes about delays and payment. This resulted in Hashiev issuing mafialike threats to Lynn and his staff.
By early February 2007, correspondence reveals Hashiev threatening Lynn's manager, Turkish citizen Haldun Senyuva. At one point he demanded (EURO)50,000 because 'I feel humiliated'... 'Kendar is showing disrespect. I don't allow this to anyone,' wrote Hashiev, who once survived an assassination attempt. 'When two camels have sex and there is a fly between them - it dies... you are no longer of interest to me. I don't believe the Bulgarian State will mind if I f*** one Turkish a***.' Lynn, who was stealing millions from Irish banks at the time, responded directly and defended his manager. 'Yahia [sic], please refrain from any further threats to Haldun. Please understand that if you threaten Haldun you also threaten me.'
The tension led to a split and Lynn severed all contracts with Hashiev and his associates. But by then Lynn was on the run, having absconded from Ireland after his banking deceptions were rumbled.
A lawyer representing Lynn told the MoS on Thursday they would be unable to reach him for comment before publication. ? Fugitive: The Michael Lynn Story, by Michael O'Farrell, is in shops now priced at (EURO)19.99.
'Mother of God, what am I involved in here?'

Graphic


CONVICTED: Former solicitor Michael Lynn paid bribes to secure planning permission for a Bulgarian resort

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Cost of each child in care is (EURO)330k a year or nearly (EURO)7k a week; Foster care bill rises to (EURO)350m as Tusla warns costs are set to increase
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 26
Length: 733 words
Byline: John Drennan
Body


THE State is paying more than (EURO)330,000 per year for every child in care, the Irish Mail on Sunday has learned.
And the total bill to provide foster care has risen to (EURO)350m a year, according to figures provided by Children's Minister Roderic O'Gorman in response to parliamentary queries from Independent TD Carol Nolan.
Tusla, the State child and family agency, confirmed the cost per child of residential care is now an average of (EURO)6,388 per week.
The agency also admitted places can cost between (EURO)4,730 and (EURO)6,737 per week, depending on whether the place is provided by the voluntary or private sector, the latter being more expensive. And it warned costs are set to increase even further.
In response to Ms Nolan's queries Tusla said: 'These residential care figures refer to a point in time in 2023 pre price increase and will be recalculated once 2023 financial data is finalised.
'Voluntary sector costs will increase owing to additional funding allocated in 2023-2024.'
'Tusla also confirmed there were 5,613 children in care last year, although this does not include minors receiving care under the
Service for Separated Children Seeking International Protection.'
Of the children in the care of the State, Tusla said 5,034 (90%) are in foster homes. Of these, 3,560 children are in general foster care, with a further 1,474 in the foster care of a relative.
Some 408 (7%) children are in residential care, 397 of whom are in general residential care, with 11 in special care. A further 171 children (3%) are listed as being in 'other' care placements.
Tusla said in its statement: 'The Child and Family Agency is committed to ensuring children and young people are supported to live at home with their families.
'Every effort is made to place children and young people within their extended family (relative foster care) or in a foster care placement. Where this is not possible, the child or young person may be placed in a children's residential centre which are comprised of statutory, private, voluntary and special care placements.'
Responding, Ms Nolan said: 'I am deeply alarmed the number of children requiring State care and the intervention of social services remains, not just stubbornly high, but is virtually the same from where we were in 2019, when we had 5,951 children in State care.'
'Five years later, the number of such children stands at 5,613, but we know this does not include children receiving care under the Service for Separated Children Seeking International Protection. The number in real terms may actually be higher than 2019.
'There appears to be no real shifting of the dial in terms of the level of neglect and familial dysfunction that children are facing year after year.'
Ms Nolan called on
Fine Gael leader Simon Harris to 'prioritise' the treatment of vulnerable children in State care.
She told the MoS: 'The relative costs of all of this cannot be measured in purely financial terms, as significant as they are. But the costs per week are eye-opening, as is the number of children involved.' The latest figures will increase unease over the 'runaway cost' of spending on troubled children.
In response to queries, a spokesman for Tusla said: 'Yes, the average cost per year for a child or young person in a residential placement is over (EURO)300,000.'
In relation to fostering placements, the spokesman added: 'At the end of January 2024 there were 15 young people in out-of-State placements, 14 of these were in foster care placements.'
Concern has been expressed over the expenditure by the State of more than (EURO)70m to place vulnerable children in 'unregulated' emergency accommodation over just 18 months.
Department of Children figures highlighted Tusla's increasing reliance on emergency arrangements, where children are housed in B&Bs, rental properties or in holiday lets.
The use of Special Emergency Arrangements (SEA) has been criticised by children's rights groups, politicians, and judges, who say they are unsuitable for vulnerable young people in care.
In May 2022, then Tusla chief Bernad Gloster - now HSE chief - admitted that the dependency on private providers was a cause for concern as he outlined a plan to increase 'public provision'.
But that year the State's spending on SEA jumped to (EURO)38.4m, from (EURO)1.4m in 2014.
news@mailonsunday.ie
'The number in real terms may be higher' 'The costs per week are eye-opening'

Graphic


ALARMED: Carol Nolan TD

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



crowley stars; Munster on the up but Ulster just edged out
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 67
Length: 834 words
Byline: James Murray
Body


JACK CROWLEY scored a second-half try and kicked the clinching 74th-minute penalty to give Munster a 20-15 URC win over Cardiff at Thomond Park last night.
Ben Thomas and replacement Thomas Young both crossed to give Cardiff a 12-10 lead on the hour mark but they could not avoid a fifth straight league loss.
A lone Crowley penalty had Munster leading 3-0 at half-time, with the hosts frustrated by nine handling errors across the opening 35 minutes.
Munster captain Tadhg Beirne and Thomas swapped tries, with the latter running in a fine intercept effort, before Young profited from John Ryan's sin-binning to score from a maul.
Player-of-the-match Crowley scrambled over and finished with 15 points, albeit replacement Jacob Beetham's late penalty gave Cardiff a deserved bonus point.
The result moved Graham Rowntree's men back above the Stormers into fourth place but Beetham's long-range kick made sure 12thplaced Cardiff pocketed a point on the road.
Meanwhile, Ulster were unable to hold out in a desperate rearguard action as Stormers came from behind to triumph 13-7 in Cape Town.
A Nick Timoney try meant the visitors led from the seventh until the 74th minute, at which point No8 Evan Roos rewarded his side's complete dominance in the second half by rounding off a maul.
What the score lacked in artistry it made up for in importance as for all their control after their interval, the 2022 champions wasted chance after chance through self-inflicted errors.
The Stormers' defence looked heavy legged when it was exposed in the seventh minute by a simple attack that saw Nathan Doak slip Timoney between two tacklers for an easy run in.
Manie Libbok missed successive penalties and to mirror his difficulties, scrum-half John Cooney followed suit for Ulster despite both his attempts being in very kickable positions.
The visitors had dominated every aspect of the first half but only had a 7-0 lead at the break and when play restarted they came under significant pressure, their work at the breakdown helping to keep the Stormers at bay.
Roos almost finished a sweeping move but he knocked on inches short due to the attention of Ulster's effective scramble defence.
The Stormers won a scrum penalty and Libbok was finally off the mark but then a maul that was creeping over the whitewash ended because of a knock-on in the dewy conditions.
As the match entered the final quarter, Ulster were creaking amid relentless pressure with David McCann's departure to the sin-bin adding to their problems.
The Stormers launched their backline at speed only for yet another handling error to intervene and they were unable to score a point when McCann was off the pitch.
But the decisive score finally came in the 75th minute when Roos crashed over the line from a line-out maul with Libbok nailing a tricky conversion and then adding an overtime penalty.
Earlier, Connacht dropped out of the play-off places when flanker Alessandro Izekor powered over with just seconds remaining to snatch Benetton a vital 18-14 victory at Stadio Monigo.
Ignacio Mendy also crossed for
Benetton, with Jacob Umaga adding a conversion and two penalties.
Niall Murray and Cian Prendergast scored Connacht's tries, with Jack Carty converting both.
Scotland wing Kyle Rowe scored a hat-trick of tries as Glasgow climbed into second place in the URC table by blowing away the ill-disciplined Scarlets 45-3 in Llanelli.
The win moved the Warriors above the Bulls and to within five points of leaders Leinster, with five rounds of the regular season to go.
last night'S RESULTS BENETTON . . . . . . .18. CONNACHT . . . . . . .14 T: Mendy, Izekor T: Murray, Prendergast C: Umaga; P: Umaga 2 C: Carty 2 SHARKS.. . . . . . . . . 23.. EDINBURGH. . . . . . .13 OSPREYS. . . . . . . . 36. LIONS. . . . . . . . . . . . .21 STORMERS . . . . . . . 13. ULSTER. . . . . . . . . . . .7. T: Roos T: Timoney C: Libbok; P: Libbok 2 C: Cooney SCARLETS. . . . . . . . .3. GLASGOW. . . . . . . . 45 MUNSTER . . . . . . . 20. CARDIFF. . . . . . . . . .15 T: Beirne, Crowley T: Thomas, Young C: Crowley 2; P: Crowley 2 C: De Beer; P: Beetham  HOW THEY STAND PW D L F A BPTS Leinster.................. 13. 11. 0. 2. 421. 227. 10. 54 Glasgow................. 13. 10. 0. 3. 365. 224. 9. 49 Bulls....................... . 13. 9. 0. 4. 403. 289. 9. 45 Munster................. 13. 8. 1. 4. 318. 221. 9. 43 Stormers............... 13. 8. 0. 5. 316. 252. 7. 39 Benetton................ 13. 8. 1. 4. 250. 257. 3. 37 Ospreys.................. 13. 7. 0. 6. 290. 264. 7. 35 Ulster..................... . 13. 7. 0. 6. 302. 288. 7. 35 Edinburgh.............. 13. 8. 0. 5. 277. 298. 2. 34 Connacht............... 13. 7. 0. 6. 285. 293. 6. 34 Lions....................... 13. 6. 0. 7. 367. 290. 10. 34 Cardiff.................... 13. 3. 1. 9. 287. 290. 10. 24 Sharks.................... 13. 3. 0. 10. 249. 296. 6. 18 Scarlets................. 13. 3. 0. 10. 184. 436. 4. 16 Dragons................. 13. 3. 0. 10. 195. 408. 3. 15 Zebre.Parma........ . 13. 1. 1. 11. 255. 408. 9. 15

Graphic


crucial score: Munster's Craig Casey congratulates Jack Crowley after his try against Cardiff last night

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



De Zerbi's Brighton future is uncertain
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 73
Length: 286 words
Byline: Stephen Davies
Body


ROBERTO DE ZERBI has refused to commit to Brighton next season amid increased speculation linking him with looming vacancies at Liverpool and Bayern Munich.
Brighton are at Anfield today in what has been billed as De Zerbi's audition to succeed outgoing Reds manager Jurgen Klopp.
The Italian is a hot property after taking Brighton into Europe for the first time in their history in his first season.
Asked yesterday if he could reassure Brighton fans that he will still be at the Amex next season, De Zerbi said: 'I have not decided my future.' De Zerbi, who has also been linked with Manchester United, has said he will not make any decision until he has spoken to Brighton owner Tony Bloom.
De Zerbi, 44, hailed as 'one of the most influential managers in the last 20 years' by Pep Guardiola, has a deal which runs to 2026.
De Zerbi said: 'I want to speak with my club, I have a contract but the problem is not the contract - the problem is to find the same plan, the same target, the same vision for the future.
'I want to speak with Tony to understand his plan and then we will take a decision together without problems.
'I want to know what is the project because if I don't feel comfortable, I can't stay.'
De Zerbi guided Brighton to sixth in the Premier League last season and they are on course for another top-10 finish this term, despite one of the lowest wage bills in the
Liverpool v Brighton 2pm, Live on Sky Sports top flight.
Speculation about Liverpool and Bayern Munich has grown after Bayer Leverkusen head coach and Anfield target Xabi Alonso committed his future to the Bundesliga leaders.
Bayern Munich, meanwhile, are also on the hunt for a new manager after deciding Thomas Tuchel can leave in the summer.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Derry boy's girls; Jonathan Anderson's top designs have crowned him the e king of the red carpet .. and here are six of JW's finest creations worn by the stars, as picked out by our top stylist LAURA JORDON - EXPERT VIEW
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 16,17
Length: 691 words
Byline: Colm McGuirk
Body


TOP Derry designer Jonathan Anderson further bolstered his portfolio when Zendaya wore one of his gowns to the premiere of tennis romance Challengers this week.
It wasn't the first time the actress has worn the Derry man's designs, but it further bolstered Vogue magazine's description of him as 'one of the greatest fashion designers of our times'.
The 39-year-old son of former Ireland rugby captain Willie Anderson, now counts some of showbiz's biggest stars among his clients, through Spanish luxury house LOEWE, of which he is creative director, and his own JW Anderson brand.
Pop superstars Beyoncé and Rihanna both wore his designs during performances in 2023 - a year when he won
Designer of the Year at the Fashion Awards in London in December - while Jennifer Lawrence, Cate Blanchett and Jamie Dornan are also fans.
And he could be about to take the world of film by storm too. He created the costumes for Challengers and worked with its director Luca Guadagnino again for his upcoming film Queer, based on the William S Burroughs novel and starring Daniel Craig.
The Magherafelt designer, right, recently acknowledged that Zendaya had 'been very kind to me'.
'She's worn a lot of [my] things,' he said. 'She has the ability to engage with people in a way that is very [different] compared to other celebrities. She becomes part of something larger. She uses clothing as a kind of instrument.'
Luxury conglomerate LVMH identified
Anderson to run LOEWE ten years ago, and the designer has overseen the brand's rise from luxury also-rans to what fashion marketplace Lyst called the 'hottest brand in the world' last year. He gained his first taste of the business at Brown Thomas in Dublin, before moving to London to study fashion.
He then did a stint with Prada before setting up JW Anderson and launching his first menswear collection in 2008. Universal acclaim saw him commissioned to design lines for Topshop, Versace and Uniqlo over the next decade, between creating ranges for LOEWE and his own brand.
A slew of Fashion Awards followed, including being crowned both menswear and womenswear designer of the year in 2015 - the only time the same person has won both. And last year, he was named International Designer of the Year by the prestigious Council of Fashion Designers of America.
Anderson's father Willie played for Ireland 27 times between 1984 and 1990, most famously leading a defiant staredown of the New Zealand Haka against the All Blacks in 1989.
Laura on...
CATE CanneagainaIndie Sin colm.mcguirk@dmgmedia.ie
Laura on... JENNIFER LAWRENCE Madrid premiere of No Hard Feelings, 2023 Structural and demure, the architecture of this piece is incredible and it highlights Anderson's skill in form and fit.
Laura on...
RIHANNA Super Bowl halftime show 2023 as announcement a pregnancy well as a show look, all eyes were on the outfit and how it showcased
RIHANNA's baby bump. Designed to show of f her shape and yet stay style, another loyal to her signature strong result from Anderson.
Laura on...
BEYONCÉ Renaissance World Tour 2023 When it comes to showstopping stage outfits, this has the wow factor in spades. And as a sparkling seal of approval from one of the most powerful women on the planet, it also confirms Anderson is at the top of his game.
Laura on...
JAMIE DORNAN Fall-Winter 2023 campaign for Loewe choice as brand
A very interesting outside the typical
In simple shapes ambassador realm of candidates.
done well with luxury fabrics, this nature of Loewe shows the everyday as a high-end brand - and indeed, own style and influence.
Anderson's
Laura on...
CATE BLANCHETT Cannes 2018 and againat the 2023 Indie Spirit Awards More in keeping with the signature style that Anderson is known for, this is a perfect fit for Cate in terms of her contemporary look and effortless-yet-considered red carpet presence.
Laura on...
ZENDAYA This week, Challengers film premiere Zendaya is known for themed red carpet looks, and this does not disappoint; the tennis motif gives a sense of movement with the image of a tennis player mid-strike. Her stylist Law Roach's attention to detail is clear with the green stilettos as the ideal complement.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Derry Girl's new show is a bit of a misfire? so far; 53 more Section Philip Nolan He's watching what you're watching!
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 53
Length: 819 words
Byline: Philip Nolan
Body


Big Mood Channel 4, Thursday/All4 steaming
The Great House Revival RTÉ One, Sunday
Rising Tides: Ireland's Future In A Warmer World RTÉ One, Wednesday
Raised By The Village RTÉ One, Sunday
Is mental health ever acceptable as a device in comedy? Well, yes, anything is, and I'd be pretty certain - if friends who sometimes struggle with depression are anything to go by - that people would be more offended by seeing their lives excluded. Whatever your view, one thing is certain. Big Mood, which started on Channel 4 this week, indeed does deal with mental health, but it could never be accused of being a comedy.
It's the story of Maggie Donovan (Nicola Coughlan), a bit rudderless in life as she approaches 30, while still trying to find her niche after her debut play was savaged by critics. She volunteers to return to her old school to give a career guidance talk on theatre, but in truth wants to meet up again with the history teacher she fancied while a pupil. She drags along her best friend Eddie (Lydia West from It's A Sin) for support, but it all soon goes wrong.
Instead of the primary children she expects to meet, Maggie finds herself in front of 100 uninterested and borderline hostile teenagers, though the gambit does pay off when the teacher reveals, rather inappropriately, that he has been thinking about her for years. They have rushed sex on his desk, but are interrupted by his wife, a former classmate of Maggie, and their children.
The scene is set. Maggie has bipolar disorder, and alternates between manic episodes and being so depressed she can't get off the couch. It doesn't help that she refuses to take her lithium, because she fears it will muzzle her creative voice, and her strained relationship with her mother (Niamh Cusack) over this only adds to her woes.
Written by Coughlan's long-term friend Camilla Whitehill, Big Mood is a hard one to categorise. There are a few giggles, not least from a scene in the second episode when a birthday party ends in a mass pub evacuation, but they come nowhere near giving any reason to keep your attention. If anything, the show most clearly illuminates the life of a best friend helping someone navigate the ups and downs of living with bipolar disorder, while chronicling just how exhausting that can be.
A Grim
Coughlan, as always, is great, though in scenes where she has to show hysteria, there are clear echoes of her character in Derry Girls. Overall, for a show that promised a lot, Big Mood is something of a misfire at this stage.
On RTÉ One, Hugh Wallace returned in The Great House Revival, following young couple Mary-Claire and Sully as they set about the restoration of a 200-yearold parson's house in north Cork.
The place was falling to bits, but they slowly got it shipshape, not least because carpenter Sully and his friends did so much of the work, and it actually came in (EURO)40,000 under budget. On a couch in north Dublin, Dermot Bannon must have needed a defibrillator to cope with the shock.
As always, these shows are really about the people who have the vision to breathe new life into properties that were all but written off. Given how many vacant homes we have in the middle of a housing crisis, the Government could do worse than enlist the advice of this young pair on what can be done with a little imagination and determination. Wallace, as always, is there to drop the occasional nugget of sagacity. One flaw he identified chimed with my own thoughts. I never can understand how people put televisions over the fireplace, meaning they have to strain their necks looking upwards. Eye level from the couch really is the only place for a telly.
The view from there was pretty scary on Wednesday night during Rising Tides on RTÉ One, when Philip Boucher-Hayes travelled to Greenland and to Malawi to predict, based on local experience, what the future might hold for Ireland if climate change continues unmitigated. Rising sea levels would wipe out many of our coastal communities, but the fact this is a crisis developing over years leaves many of us lackadaisical over its impact. That wasn't possible when he spoke to a mother in
Malawi after her son was killed as a result of one of the ever more frequent cyclones hitting the inland African country. Her simple statement was heartbreaking: 'He was in fourth class. I hoped he would go into fifth.'
Finally, Raised By The Village also returned to RTÉ One, as two more children from disadvantaged backgrounds were despatched to rural Ireland to see how different lives are lived. I have a huge ethical problem with it, because the children cannot reasonably consent to having their experience presented as primetime entertainment.
Usually, there would a photo from each programme on this page, and while the children appeared to have a good time, that's not the point. They deserve to return to the anonymity from which they really should not have been plucked at all.

Graphic


The Great House Revival These shows are really about the people more than the houses

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Djokovic undecided about coach
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 57
Length: 248 words
Body


NOVAK DJOKOVIC has turned to fellow-Serb Nenad Zimonjic after severing his partnership with Goran Ivanisevic, but insists he has not made a decision on who his new full-time coach will be.
Djokovic announced last week that he had split with former Wimbledon champion Ivanisevic after two years.
Now Amelie Mauresmo, Andy Murray's former coach, and Conchita Martinez, a former WTA coach of the year, are being touted as possible replacements. The 24- time Grand Slam winner has been prearing for next week's Monte Carlo Masters alongside Zimonjic in Belgrade.
Djokovic and Zimonjic are former Davis Cup team-mates but the world No1 would not comment on it being permanent.
'I still don't have a clear idea who a new coach would be, or whether there will be one at all,' the 36-yearold said. 'I've had coaches since I was a kid, now I am trying to feel by myself what I need, what I feel most comfortable with. You will be informed in case someone joins the team.'
Djokovic won four of the Grand Slams he entered with Ivanisevic as coach. But his start to 2024 has been frustrating with a semi-final loss against Jannik Sinner at the Australian Open, a third-round loss to the world No123 Luka Nardi at Indian Wells before he withdrew from the Miami Open.
Sinner will be hoping to make it third time lucky when he takes on Grigor Dimitrov in the Miami final tonight. The Italian, beaten in the 2021 and 2023 finals, will rise to No.2 in the world if he wins, and said: 'I'm a different player now.'

Graphic


no coach: Djokovic

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Early election likely despite Harris's plan to see out full term as new taoiseach; Cabinet colleagues doubt Dáil discipline can be kept up, saying 'natural causes' will finish off Government
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 8,9
Length: 1041 words
Byline: John Lee ; John Drennan
Body


THERE is a growing acceptance among Coalition leaders that an early general election will take place in the autumn, senior Government sources told the Irish Mail on Sunday.
Taoiseach-in-waiting Simon Harris has said he wants to see out the full term in government - legally up to March 22 next year.
But there is a belief among some of his Cabinet colleagues that 'natural causes' will call time on the Coalition before then.
With at least one more Fine Gael TD expected to announce they will not be standing in the next general election, party chiefs admit it will be difficult to maintain Dáil discipline when the Oireachtas returns after the summer recess.
Several influential Independent TDs have said they want a general election to happen in the autumn.
And, significantly, Fianna Fáil ministers told the MoS that they see it as 'next to impossible to hold Dáil discipline' from September on.
One Fianna Fáil minister said: 'It will even be a challenge to get a budget through in September or October. It's just human nature. When so many people are retiring you have very little to threaten them with. There is little personal interest for retiring Fine Gael TDs to hold it together. Let's face it, some of their senior figures have hardly displayed loyalty to the party or the Government in recent times.'
The Cabinet source pointed out that the Coalition is 'already reliant on Independents to either go missing for contentious votes or vote with us, yet we are aware that many of those Independents want to see this done and dusted by Christmas.'
They added: 'Besides anything else, polls are showing increasing support for Independents so they want to capitalise on that.'
However, sources close to Mr Harris said they are confident the Government will see out its term, countering many claims from those who say that it will be difficult to continue through the autumn.
Indeed, sources inside Simon Harris's close circle said they are confident he will meet the next US president - whether it be Joe Biden or Donald Trump - at the Oval Office and still run a March election campaign. Traditionally the Oval Office meeting is close to St Patrick's Day.
One source told the MoS: 'There is nothing to stop the general election being held on the last possible date - March 22, 2025 - and Simon shooting over to Washington for a truncated visit during the last days of the campaign.
'Indeed, what better message to the electorate of stability and continuity than seeing the Taoiseach with the most powerful man in the world while letting them think of the appalling vista of a Sinn Féin leader there?'
Mr Harris's supporters also believe there will be minimal disruption from by-elections, as only one Government TD - Barry Cowen - is standing for election to the European Parliament.
'Simon is determined for it to go all the way to March. We need to send the public a message that there is stability and continuity. That means sustaining a Dáil to its full term,' a source said.
Sources close to the new Fine Gael leader said they expect to see the return of several familiar faces from the 'Enda Kenny years'.
One source said: 'You can expect backroom people and advisers who were around during Enda's years to return. Simon will be channelling his inner Enda Kenny.'
Meanwhile, Mr Harris's Cabinet colleagues say they expect few changes in the upcoming minireshuffle of Fine Gael TDs sparked by Taoiseach Leo Varadkar's decision to stand down.
Some sources said ministers Simon Coveney (Enterprise) and Helen McEntee (Justice) are the ones most under threat.
Uncertainty over Mr Coveney's future grew this week after his adviser, former Newstalk presenter Chris Donoghue, was poached by the incoming taoiseach.
There is internal unease about moving someone of Mr Coveney's seniority and standing within the party. But one source warned: 'There needs to be blood on his hands if he [Harris] is to take command of his party. Not buckets of it, but enough to need a mop.'
However, one senior minister predicted that both Mr Coveney and Ms McEntee could be safe as the new taoiseach will opt for minimal changes. They pointed out that, in the case of Ms McEntee, sacking or demoting her would be an admission that the Cabinet was wrong to back her in Sinn Féin's unsuccessful motion of no confidence in the Justice Minister last December.
Additionally, there are fears the young mother may decide to quit politics if she is demoted.
The minister told the MoS: 'The only objective of the new taoiseach is to hold seats so, yes, if he was confident that the Government will continue for a year, then he could ring the changes. But he's not confident of that, so he will have to keep the ship steady.
'If Coveney stays in Cabinet, he runs again, giving Fine Gael a seat. So again, there are more risks to dropping him than there are rewards,' they added.
As Mr Harris was not swept to leadership by a group who would now seek reward, but attained the leadership by default, there is no pressure on him now to create space at Cabinet.
The incoming taoiseach will have his own Cabinet position to fill, along with two minister of state jobs, assuming the promotion to senior minister comes from the junior ranks.
With Junior Minister for European Affairs Peter Burke expected to get the promotion to Cabinet, his most sought-after of junior ministerial roles will become vacant.
There is also a junior education ministry to fill following outgoing Fine Gael TD Josepha Madigan's announcement that she intends to step aside.
The need for a potentially larger reshuffle was eased by the decision of Kerry TD Brendan Griffin not to return to the party fold.
The highly regarded TD's decision was conveyed to Mr Harris at a meeting on Wednesday, and came as a blow to the incoming taoiseach as he faces a battle to cling on to as many seats as possible.
One senior party figure said: 'It has made the reshuffle simpler. Griffin was only going to accept a full ministry to return. Simon would have loved an eye-catching U-turn by Griffin to reverse the perception of decline, but at least he has an extra space.'
john.lee@mailonsunday.ie
'We need to send a message of stability' 'There needs to be blood on his hands' NEW BROOM: Simon Harris with Heather Humphreys in Athlone last week

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Easter is a time to think about the challenges of migration
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 22
Length: 778 words
Byline: gary carville
Body


EASTER is a time of hope, of new life and of new beginnings. For Christians, it gives us an opportunity each year to renew the commitment to our faith and to our spiritual journey with Jesus Christ, our Risen Saviour. The fact that this season occurs in spring reinforces the emphasis on 'beginning again'
or of taking a renewed approach to life and to the issues that confront us personally and in our community and wider society. There are many such issues today. Easter is a time for us as a community to look anew at key questions such as migration in Ireland - both inward and outward, as well as our ability to provide a sustainable future for people living in Ireland and to welcome those in particular need and to integrate them in a meaningful way.
In his message for St Patrick's Day, Archbishop Eamon Martin, Archbishop of Armagh and Primate of All Ireland, highlighted the fact that in the year to April 2023, some 64,000 people left Ireland, half of them being Irish citizens. While some of these did return home during that period, bringing with them valuable new life skills, the fact remains that for many young people across the island of Ireland today, the prospect of a better-quality of life outside of Ireland is seen as a better option than remaining here.
A
T THE same time, millions of people worldwide are forced to migrate, having been displaced by war, oppression or economic hardship. Many too are deceived, captured or exploited by human traffickers. Archbishop Martin calls for 'an honest and open conversation about migration, both outward and inward'. He asks 'how can we truly become an island of belonging and hope where our young people, health workers and teachers want to stay, and where others uge here important Church challenges increase among us nation and arrival want to come and live among us?'
This is an important conversation for us to have and it must move away from extremes and focus on the lived realities of everyday life for people and communities, especially in the areas of housing and community services.
The issue of people seeking ref- uge here in Ireland has become an important topic in public and Church discourse in Ireland. The challenges posed by the recent increase in those seeking refuge among us are well highlighted. As a nation and as people of faith, the arrival of immigrants raises challenges for each of us - above all the challenge to do the right thing.
As a people of faith - there is a distinctive attitude and purpose of intent we can bring to the conversation. For our faith impels us to strive to see the face of Jesus in those who seek shelter in our midst - the
Gospel of Matthew 25:35 speaks clearly of making the stranger welcome. To reach out and welcome is indeed our first reaction.
Catholics, at an individual and collective level the length and breadth of the country, are involved in various initiatives and practical responses to the emerging issues of immigration. Hundreds of thousands of Catholic parishioners contribute financially to assisting immigrants and refugees along with those parish communities, religious orders, groups and individuals who are doing so much to highlight this area and to practically intervene to assist our immigrants. The divisive narrative and destructive actions of some in this regard are far from a Christian response.
O
F COURSE, we must acknowledge that the movement of peoples brings both exciting opportunities and real challenges for the society that welcomes them. A coherent just approach is needed by our civil authorities. Full consultation with local communities, addressing their concerns, and careful long-term planning along with the provision of adequate resources are essential to preserve social cohesion.
Our real strength as a Christian community is to build a culture of encounter where we can meet those who seek refuge among us as people - fathers, mothers, brothers, sisters, sons and daughters - people with their own particular stories. Families, just like ours with their hopes and dreams that tomorrow might be somewhat better than today.
Our hope is that as new political leadership takes office, we can ask ourselves as a society how we can promote a culture of encounter and dialogue in our communities, including faith communities, many of which are enriched by the presence of immigrants from many parts of the world among their congregations. How can we, as Pope Francis exhorts us to, responsibly 'welcome, protect, promote and integrate' (cf Pope Francis, Fratelli Tutti, 129).
? Dr Gary Carville is executive secretary of the Commission for Social Issues & International Affairs of the Irish Catholic Bishops' Conference

Graphic


HAPPY EASTER: A drawing submitted by one of our young readers, Eliza Long, aged 12.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



EGG-CELLENT EASTER TABLE; Set the stage for a special dinner with gorgeous pastels and lots of cheerfulaccessories, with flowers, candles, eggs and bunnies to embrace the fun
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 14,15,16
Length: 307 words
Byline: Emily Westbrooks
Body


What's not to love about an Easter or springtime table s e t t i n g? The colours are cheerful, the accessories are adorable, it's a win-win situation. If you don't actively celebrate Easter, that bank holiday Monday is still the per fect time to invite some friends over for a bit of brunch ? and these table setting tips
will set you up right.
I love an excuse to break out the tablecloths and napkins, but you'll want to make sure you choose an option that's going to complement your dinnerware and overall decor. A white or pastel-colored tablecloth creates
a classic and elegant look, allowing the other elements of your tablescape to shine. Pair the tablecloth with cloth napkins in a contrasting or coordinating colour.
The centrepiece should be the focal point of your dinner table. Opt for a low-profile centerpiece,
such as a shallow bowl filled with fresh flowers, candles or Easter eggs, so guests can see e a c h o t h e r a c r o s s the table Pastels are the colour scheme du jour for Easter, so focus on pale pink, blue, green
and yellow, which you can incorporate into y o u r t a b l e s c a p e through your tablecloth, napkins, decorations,
and flowers.
You can also add pops of brighter colo u r s , s u c h a s o r a n g e o r purple, to create a vibrant and fest ive look.
Get the look Easter table decorations should involve as many bunnies as possible, in my opinion. You can also include faux and real Easter eggs of various sizes for maximum impact.
HOP to the bunnies
Egg wreath, (EURO)40 from Next
Meadow rabbits, (EURO)22 from Next
Spring wooden rabbits, (EURO)15 from Very Ireland
Easter bunny room ornament, (EURO)16 from Very Ireland
Flower mat, (EURO)12 from Penneys
Set of four pastel mugs, (EURO)20 from Next
Stock up on bunnies, eggs, tulips and pastels for a spring brunch (B&M)
Rattan Easter rabbit, (EURO)16 from Very Ireland

Graphic


Bunny in a raincoat, ?26.9very.ieChoosepastel placesettings(Next

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



EMILY AND HER NEWSHOUND!; New film reveals Maitlis took her whippet to work
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 28
Length: 383 words
Byline: Katie Hind
Body


EMILY MAITLIS was one of the most highly paid and powerful stars at the BBC - and with that power came the privilege to take her beloved whippet into the broadcaster's London headquarters.
In the new Netflix movie, Scoop, which tells how Newsnight producer Sam McAlister landed Ms Maitlis's infamous 2019 interview with Prince Andrew, the presenter is regularly seen taking her dog, Moody, into Broadcasting House.
And The Mail on Sunday can reveal that such scenes are true to life. Ms Maitlis, 53, who left the BBC in 2022, would often take Moody to work, while colleagues who were further down the pay scale would have to do without their faithful friends.
One BBC insider said: 'Emily loves that dog so much, and he would often be at her side when she came to work. It was just one of those things that happened. You'd turn up to work and Emily would have her dog with her. But she was the only one.
'Some laughed. Others thought it was pretty entitled. Maybe it was a presenter thing, but those earning far less than Emily had to shell out for dog walkers and the like.'
During the film, which will be avail- able on Netflix from Friday, Gillian Anderson as Ms Maitlis is seen with the dog on a lead as she goes up in a lift. She even takes Moody on to the set shortly before Newsnight goes live while having a discussion about the forthcoming interview with Ms McAlister - played by Billie Piper - and the then Newsnight editor Esme Wren (Romola Garai).
While Ms Maitlis appears to adore her pet, Ms Anderson, 56, revealed at the Scoop premiere on Wednesday that the animal playing him wasn't quite so lovable: 'There are a few scenes where I have a lead in my hand that is slack, but they did it in a way that you can't see there's no dog. It just would not stay by me and whined all the time. The dog didn't really want to be there.'
In June 2019, Ms Maitlis was lambasted by fellow passengers for letting Moody lie on a seat on a train from Penzance to London.
She hit back at her critics, claiming to be a victim of 'pet-shaming' and explained that the whippet - who was recovering from an injured leg - leapt on to the seat after three hours on the carriage floor when a passenger got off at Reading. She also pointed out that a passenger wearing trainers was 'stretched out on the row behind us'.

Graphic


PAMPERED POOCH: Gillian Anderson and 'whiny' actor whippet portraying Maitlis and her beloved Moody in a scene from ScoopSTAR: Anderson takes a break from playing Maitlis on set of Scoop

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



FIVE TRULY SCANDALOUS SHOWS
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 7
Length: 263 words
Body


A VERY BRITISH SCANDAL Claire Foy (below) is masterful as Margaret Campbell, aka the 'Dirty Duchess', whose toxic 1963 divorce from the vile Duke of Argyll (Paul Bettany), caused a scandal thanks to the 88 men she was accused of having affairs with and some salacious Polaroids. Foy's Margaret (right) is no angel, but this three-part series interrogates the gender hypocrisy surrounding sex at the time.
A VERY ENGLISH SCANDAL In 1979, disgraced British Liberal leader Jeremy Thorpe stood trial for conspiracy to murder his ex-lover, Norman Scott (Ben Whishaw). Hugh Grant (left) is superb at pulling off Thorpe's upper-class reserve in this series from Russell T Davies.
IMPEACHMENT: AMERICAN CRIME STORY (Disney+) This addictive ten-parter focuses on Bill Clinton's affair with White House intern Monica Lewinsky (Beanie Feldstein), which led to the impeachment of the President (Clive Owen, inset above) in 1998. Sarah Paulson steals the show as Monica's confidante Linda Tripp.
STONEHOUSE (ITVX) Based on the stranger-than-fiction true story of the British politician who, in 1974, hatched an outlandish plan to disappear, this polished drama stars Matthew Macfadyen as John Stonehouse, who tried to fake his own death. The casting of Macfadyen's real-life partner, Keeley Hawes (above, left, with Macfadyen and Emer Heatley), as Stonehouse's longsuffering wife, Barbara, is a masterstroke.
WHITE HOUSE PLUMBERS (Sky/Now) Justin Theroux and Woody Harrelson (right) are hilarious as the 'plumbers' who were hired to plug national security leaks but caused the Watergate scandal.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



For peat's sake; Farmers braced for British boycott of Irish mushrooms ASNATIONALTRUSTTAKESTHEM off menus over climate fears
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 32
Length: 485 words
Byline: COLM MCGUIRK ; COLIN FERNANDEZ
Body


A?MOVE?to?ban?mushrooms?from? cafes? operated? by? the? British? National? Trust? is? 'likely? to? adversely?affect?the?financial?viability? of? producers'? here,? according? to? the? State? agriculture? and? food?agency?Teagasc.
The? National? Trust? announced? earlier?this?month?it?would?remove? mushrooms? from? the? menu? at? its? almost?300?cafes?around?the?UK.
?  It?came?after?calls?in?Britain?for a? national? boycott? of? mushrooms? grown?in?peat,?to?protect?bogs?dug? up?to?provide?the?organic?matter.
Bogs? lock? in? carbon,? helping? to? fight?global?warming.?The?Wildlife? Trust? says? that? peat? extraction? from? bogs? for? horticulture? has? caused? 31?million? tons? of? carbon? dioxide? to? be? released? since? 1990? and? tells? consumers? to? 'avoid? mushrooms?grown?in?peat'.
But? with? exports? to? the? UK? accounting? for? around? 80%? of? ? produced? in? Ireland,? the?ban?has?caused?concern?among? some?growers?here.
Donal? Gernon,? who? is? a? mushroom?advisor?with?the?agriculture? and? food? development? authority? Teagasc,?said?banning?mushrooms? 'is? likely? to? adversely?affect?the?financial?viability? of? producers'? and? that? 'once? a? grower? has? gone? out? of? production?they?are?unlikely? to? re-enter? production? due? to? the? high? start-up?costs.'
The? mushroom? sector? uses? what? Teagasc? calls? 'a? relatively? small? amount?of?peat'.
Mushroom? compost? itself? does? not? contain? peat? -?it?is?a?mixture?of?straw,?manure,? gypsum? and? mushroom? spawn? -? but?a?5cm?deep?layer?of?peat?mixed? with? sugar? beet? lime? is? placed? on? top?to?trigger?the?growth.
Mr?Gernon?told?the?Irish?Mail?on? Sunday? that? a? 'considerable? amount?of?research'?is?ongoing?in? Ireland? and? internationally? to? find? viable? substitutes? to? peat,? using? 'a? wide? range? of? organic? and? non-organic? materials'.mushrooms FOR
Mushroom? growers? say? they? have? no? choice? but? to? continue? using? peat? until? a? viable? alternative?is?available.
Padraic?O'Leary,?chief?executive? of? Walsh? Mushrooms? Group? in? Gorey,? Co.? Wexford,? the? second? largest? supplier? of? mushrooms? to? the?UK,?said:?'There?is?no?alternative?to?peat,?which?is?a?critical?part? of?the?growing?process.'
Ecologist?and?environmental?scientist?Padraic?Fogarty?said?he?did? not? 'know? why? you'd? pick? out? mushrooms? [to? ban]? over? meat? and? dairy? and? all? these? other? things.?Everything?comes?with?an? impact.'
FREE FUSS
Mr? Fogarty? added:? 'The? State? needs? to? start? taking? responsibility? for? this? and? to? regulate? [peat? harvesting]?properly.?Ultimately,? the? peat? has? to? stay? in? the? ground,? but? at? the?moment?it's? not? even? regulated.?It's?wild? west?stuff.
EVERY ?  'So? I? think? that's? where? I'd? be? putting? the? emphasis,? rather? than? on? telling? people? not? to? eat? musrooms.' colm.mcguirk@dmgmedia.ie
'It's not even regulated, it's wild west stuff'

Graphic


CONCERN: Donal Gernon said the ban will impact growers

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Get your green this Easter; Get your five-a-day with the help of these nutritious and easy recipes for all the family
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 24,25,26
Length: 1541 words
Body


CHICKEN SKEWERS WITH SPRING ONION SALAD SERVES 4 FOR THE CHICKEN 700g (1lb 8oz) boneless, skinless chicken thighs, cut into bite-sized pieces 2tbsp olive oil 1tsp each ground cumin and cinnamon ½tsp ground turmeric 1tsp sweet smoked paprika 2 garlic cloves, crushed Juice of 1 lemon Salt and freshly ground black pepper FOR THE SALAD 12 spring onions, thinly sliced diagonally 1 cucumber, halved lengthways and sliced at an angle 10 radishes, thinly sliced 50g (1¾oz) wild rocket leaves 200g (7oz) mixed red and yellow cherry tomatoes, halved A small bunch each of fresh coriander and mint, finely chopped FOR THE DRESSING Juice of 1 lemon 4tbsp olive oil 2tsp runny honey 2 garlic cloves, crushed
2tsp sumac
Place the chicken in a nonreactive bowl (ceramic, stainless steel or glass). Combine the oil, spices, garlic and lemon juice, season and pour over the meat. Toss to coat, cover and leave in the fridge for 1-2 hours. When ready to serve, preheat the grill, then thread the chicken onto 8 metal skewers. Grill for 10-12 minutes, turning once, until golden and cooked. Meanwhile place all the salad ingredients into a large bowl.
Mix the dressing ingredients and pour over the salad, making sure it is well coated.
Serve with the chicken skewers.
THAI GREEN SPINACH CURRY WITH BABY COURGETTES
SERVES 4 1tbsp vegetable oil 1 onion, halved and thinly sliced 4tbsp Thai green curry paste 400g tin of coconut milk 1tbsp fish sauce 1tbsp finely chopped lemongrass 3-4 kaffir lime leaves (from supermarkets) Finely grated zest and juice of 1 lime 1tbsp green peppercorns in brine, rinsed and drained
(optional) 200g (7oz) baby courgettes, sliced lengthways 200g (7oz) baby carrots, very thinly sliced lengthways 50g (1¾oz) baby spinach leaves To serve A small handful of Thai basil leaves (from supermarkets, optional) 1 red chilli, finely chopped Jasmine rice, cooked
Heat the oil in a nonstick pan, add the onion and stir-fry over a medium heat for 2 minutes. Add the curry paste and stirfry for 1-2 minutes. Pour in the coconut milk, fish sauce, lemongrass, kaffir lime leaves, lime zest and juice, and the peppercorns, if using. Bring to a simmer, then add the courgettes and carrots. Cook over a medium heat for 8 minutes, until the vegetables are just tender. Stir in the spinach and cook for 3-4 minutes, until just wilted.
Just before serving, add the basil leaves, if using, and chopped chilli. Serve with cooked rice.
SMOKED HADDOCK FISHCAKES WITH WATERCRESS SALSA SERVES 4 FOR THE FISHCAKES 250g (9oz) smoked haddock fillet, skinned, bones removed 300g (10½oz) cooked mashed potato ½tsp Dijon mustard 3 spring onions, finely chopped 2tbsp finely chopped chives Finely grated zest and juice of 1 lemon Salt and freshly ground black pepper 4tbsp plain flour 1 egg, beaten 120g (4¼oz) panko breadcrumbs (from supermarkets) Vegetable oil, for frying FOR THE WATERCRESS SALSA
85g (3oz) watercress, roughly chopped, plus extra sprigs to serve 2 oranges, peeled, segmented and roughly chopped 1 red chilli, deseeded and finely chopped 1 red pepper, deseeded and finely chopped ½ a red onion, finely diced 2tbsp extra-virgin olive oil Juice of 1 lime
Preheat the oven to 190?C/fan 170?/gas 5. Place the haddock in an ovenproof dish with 6- 7tbsp water, cover with foil and bake for 15 minutes. Allow to cool, then flake into large pieces.
Place the potato, mustard, spring onions, chives, and lemon zest and juice into a large bowl. Add the haddock and mix well.
Season, then divide into 8 equal portions and shape each portion into a patty. Place the flour, egg and breadcrumbs into 3 separate bowls. Roll each fishcake in the flour, then dip into the egg, then coat with breadcrumbs. Shallow-fry the fishcakes in a little vegetable oil for 5-7 minutes, turning once, or until crisp and golden. Drain on kitchen paper and keep warm.
To make the watercress salsa, combine all the ingredients in a bowl, season and serve with the fishcakes, garnished with watercress.
MISO-GINGER CHICKEN & CHOPPED GREENS
The dressing is the star, so make double and keep it in the fridge for up to a week.
SERVES 2 30g pumpkin seeds 150g tenderstem broccoli, trimmed 1 romaine lettuce, shredded 1 avocado, diced 150g cucumber, diced 4 salad onions, finely sliced About 300g cooked chicken, sliced or shredded MISO-GINGER DRESSING 2 tbsp white miso paste 2 tbsp sunflower oil 1 tbsp rice vinegar 1 tbsp maple syrup 1 tsp grated fresh root ginger
1 tsp toasted sesame oil Preheat the oven to 180C/160C fan/gas 4. Place the pumpkin seeds on a roasting tray to roast for 10 minutes until golden and just starting to burst, then set aside to cool.
Meanwhile, bring a large pan of water to the boil and add the broccoli. Simmer for 3 minutes then
drain and refresh in cold water. Pat dry and set aside.
For the dressing, whisk all the ingredients together.
Arrange the lettuce on a large platter or in individual bowls. Roughly chop the broccoli then scatter over the top along with the avocado, cucumber, salad onions and chicken. Spoon over the dressing and sprinkle with the pumpkin seeds.
ASPARAGU S, LE MON AND RICOTT A QUICHE
Serves 4-6 350g (12oz) shortcrust pastry Flour, for dusting 200g (7oz) asparagus spears 200g (7oz) ricotta cheese 2tbsp finely chopped dill Finely grated zest of 1 lemon 100g (3½oz) mild Cheddar cheese, grated 2 large eggs 150ml (5fl oz) single cream Salt and freshly ground black pepper 1tsp nigella seeds (from supermarkets) On a lightly floured surface, roll out the pastry and use to line a 22cm loose-bottomed quiche tin (about 4cm deep) and set on a baking sheet. Chill for 20- 30 minutes, then preheat the oven to 200?C/ fan 180?C/gas 6. Line the pastry with parchment and fill with baking
beans or uncooked rice, then bake for 10 minutes. Remove the paper and baking beans or rice and return to the oven for a further 5 minutes. Remove the tin from the oven and set aside. Turn the oven down to 180?C/fan 160?C/gas 4.
Meanwhile, blanch the asparagus in a large saucepan of lightly salted water for 2 minutes, until just tender, then drain and set aside. Dot half the ricotta cheese over the bottom of the pastry case. Sprinkle with the dill, lemon zest and Cheddar cheese. Trim the ends of the asparagus spears to fit the tin and lay on top.
Add the eggs and cream together with a little salt and freshly ground black pepper. Pour the mixture evenly over the asparagus. Dot the remaining ricotta around the quiche and sprinkle the nigella seeds over evenly. Bake for 40 minutes, until golden and set.
LEEK & TARR AGON RI SOTTO WITH CRI SPY PANCETT A
Serves 4 12 baby leeks 2tbsp olive oil 1.5ltr (2¾pt) chicken stock 1 tbsp butter 4 slices pancetta, chopped 3 garlic cloves, chopped 300g (10½oz) risotto rice 125ml (4fl oz) dry white wine Salt and freshly ground black pepper The leaves of a small bunch of tarragon, roughly chopped
100g (3½oz) Parmesan cheese, grated Preheat the grill or a griddle pan. Halve 4 of the leeks lengthways, brush with 1tbsp olive oil and cook for 2-3 minutes on each side, or until tender and lightly charred in places. Set aside and keep warm. Roughly slice the remaining leeks. Warm the stock in a saucepan set over a low heat.
Heat the butter and remaining 1tbsp oil in a separate large saucepan
and fry the pancetta until crisp. Remove with a slotted spoon and drain on kitchen paper.
Put the sliced leeks and garlic in the pan you used for the pancetta. Stir-fry for 5-7 minutes, until softened. Stir in the rice and cook for 1 minute. Pour in the wine and cook, stirring, until absorbed.
Add the stock a ladleful at a time, stirring and waiting for the rice to absorb the liquid before adding more. Continue for 20 minutes, or until the rice is just cooked and the risotto is creamy. Season, then stir in the pancetta, tarragon and Parmesan. Serve garnished with the reserved griddled leeks
Spring greens, chicken & lentil soup Serves 2 Ingredients 2 teaspoons rapeseed oil ½ red onion, finely chopped 3 carrots, finely chopped 2 celery sticks, finely chopped 1 organic or free-range chicken breast (about 180g/6oz), thinly sliced 500ml (18fl oz) chicken or vegetable stock (fresh, bouillon or cubes are fine)
? 100g (3½oz) precooked Puy lentils 130g (4½oz) spring greens, cut into thin ribbons Juice of 1 lime A small handful parsley (about 15g/½oz), chopped Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper Method Spring greens are high in vitamin C, which supports immunity, and vitamin K, which builds bone strength. This recipe uses precooked lentils because they're so much easier and quicker. In combination with the chicken, lentils are a great source of protein, as well as fibre, which will help you to feel fuller for longer. You could swap out the spring
greens for any kind of green vegetable ? try cabbage, kale or cavolo nero.
Heat the oil in a saucepan over a medium heat and gently fry the onions for about 3 minutes. Add the carrots and celery and cook for a further 6 minutes until they have all softened.
Next, add the chicken and fry for a couple of minutes until it has a little colour and then pour in the stock.
Then add the lentils and gently simmer for 5 minutes, then add the spring greens for a further 5 minutes.
Remove the pan from the heat, add the lime juice and season to taste. Stir in the parsley and serve.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Glimmers of hope as O'Shea steadies Ireland ship but some familiar issues remain
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 70
Length: 754 words
Byline: Philip Quinn
Body


W
HEN the next FIFA world rankings are published on Thursday, the Republic of Ireland will have moved up two places to 60th, a small but significant step in the right direction.
The team will also be 28th in Europe, up one position.
With the World Cup qualifying draw to come in December, the higher in Europe the better for Ireland.
The minimum target is 25th, as that would ensure a second seeding in the draw which involves no less than 12 groups - Russia remain above Ireland but are currently ineligible for international competition.
The quirky FIFA mathematics show Ireland finished in credit, just, after drawing with Belgium and losing to Switzerland in the recent window under interim manager John O'Shea.
That they didn't score a goal and didn't win either game rankled with O'Shea, but the opposition was a lot stronger than the last friendly double-header, in November 2022, when Ireland lost to Norway 2-1 at home, before edging Malta 1-0 away.
On balance, O'Shea can reflect on steadying the ship as Ireland combined grit and guile against Belgium, and looked compact and structured for three-quarters of the two games - the first 45 minutes against Switzerland was a grim watch. Some well-worn problems persist. The team continues to cry out for a playmaker, such as a Wes Hoolohan, who hasn't been replaced since his final appearance at the end of 2017.
Of the current squad, Will Smallbone and the recalled Robbie Brady offer the most creativity in general play.
Perhaps Andy Moran, the Under- 21 midfielder on loan at Blackburn will be the answer in time. Until Ireland bring more invention to the stage, they will struggle to break down the better teams.
It's a worry that goals remain in short supply. Excluding Gibraltar, Ireland's two goals in their six 2024 Euro qualifiers came from a corner (Nathan Collins) and the penalty spot (Adam Idah).
They fired two blanks in this window, although Belgium, with so many B-listers on the park, were there for the taking.
Against the Swiss, Ireland managed one shot on target in the game - nowhere near good enough.
While Ireland were lacking firsthalf zip on Tuesday, they still gifted the Swiss their goal as Gavin Bazunu and his defenders should have dealt better with Xherdan Shaqiri's free kick.
For O'Shea, there was a pep in his step as be exited his final press briefing late on Tuesday night.
He'd been careful not to give too much away about his status with the FAI, and whether he might be in the running for the job on a more permanent basis.
He confirmed that his remit was 'to manage for the two games' and that he'd had 'no discussions' with the FAI about staying on.
'Ultimately, the big thing for me is that I will help the Republic of Ireland any way I can, always.
That focus will remain there and that will be a key part of my life always.
'Whenever you get a chance to manage your country is a good time.'
O'Shea, 42, has played for Ireland at under-age level, from the U16s to the U21s, and then on to the seniors, where he won 118 caps, and captained the side.
Since getting into coaching, he has been a No 2 to Jim Crawford with the U21s, a No 3 under Stephen Kenny, and is now a No 1. It's an astonishing Irish CV and you strongly suspect he's not finished yet.
He treated the games as qualifiers, not as experimental friendlies to have a look at everyone.
'You are talking about combinations of players that potentially could play with each other six months down the line, that type of thing, where you can work on a few ideas,' he said.
'I spoke about winning games to the players. Ultimately, it's the here and now.'
O'Shea is adamant there are good times around the corner for Ireland.
'I know how they are going to develop, I know the quality that they have. But it is just a frustrating one for them, because if they had got the win against Belgium, it would have given everyone a lift. As soon as the win comes it is going to be such a big boost to the group.
'The key thing now for the players is getting back to your club, playing for your club and showing that quality, consistently.
'We need more players in the Premier League because at this level it's about decision-making, it's the speed, it's the physicality. We need to keep matching that.'
Every long journey begins with a single step and Ireland inched forward this week.
But bigger strides are needed under the new manager, who will only have two games in June to assess the hand he has been dealt before facing England in the Nations League.
'as soon as that win comes it will be such a big boost'

Graphic


made his point: But John O'Shea was hoping to bag at least one win

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



HAIRDRESSER CALLS FOR BACKSTREET BEAUTICIANS CRACKDOWN
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 34
Length: 317 words
Body


THE hair and beauty black market has 'blown up' since the pandemic, according to representative bodies who are lobbying Revenue to chase tax dodgers.
One of those bodies, the Hair and Beauty Industry Confederation (HABIC) estimates its sector is losing (EURO)500m a year to the shadow economy, costing the State (EURO)55m in lost tax receipts.
Lisa Finnan, who is on HABIC's executive council, said one of their 'main objectives right now is to put an end to this'.
She said the hair and beauty sector is currently receiving special attention within Revenue.
'They are actively looking to come down on it,' she told the Irish Mail on Sunday.
Ms Finnan, who owns the Beautique Skin And Beauty Clinic in Mullingar, Co.
Westmeath, said that in 14 years of business she has 'never struggled as much to get staff' because it is 'much more profitable for people to be set up at home'.
'It is as simple as that. A lot of them are claiming social welfare, they're getting all these things that they're claiming from the Government and they're also earning a load of cash on the side.'
Lisa Eccles, who is president of the Irish Hairdressers
Federation (IHF), said belowboard hairdressers are 'going from house to house relatively unwatched and able to work for cash. And for all we know they're also claiming social welfare or whatever else.'
Ms Eccles, who owns Zinc Hair and Beauty in Kilmainham, Dublin, said there had been 'a huge drop off' in available salon staff since the pandemic.
'Obviously one element is people deciding to change career path, but I think an awful lot of people were definitely lured to the whole idea of doing hair at home for cash and then just not declaring it,' she said.
The IHF president said insurance, VAT and stock costs have all risen considerably over the last number of years, as well as the cost of hiring people due to higher wages and increased sick leave entitlements since January.

Graphic


CONCERNS: Lisa Eccles, president of the Irish Hairdressers Federation

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



HORROR WOOD; Up-and-coming Dubliner filmmaker Lee Cronin reveals plans to shoot future thrillers here and turn Ireland into...
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 5
Length: 741 words
Byline: Colm McGuirk
Body


AN IRISH filmmaker taking Hollywood by storm has revealed 'at least' half of his upcoming slate of horror stories for film and TV will have 'Irish origins'.
Lee Cronin's previous film, Evil Dead Rise - which took $"m ((EURO)135m) at the box office, making it the highest-grossing film ever written and directed by an Irish-born person - was made in New Zealand and set in the US.
But its precursor, The Hole In The Ground, was made and set in rural Ireland, and its writer and director plans to repeat the trick going forward.
Cronin, who is from Skerries in north Co. Dublin, told the Irish Mail on Sunday: 'I would say at the moment at least 50% of the projects I have [in development] in movies and TV have clear Irish roots and origins, and that's really exciting to me.'
One of these projects is a supernatural movie he is about to start writing, based on real events that took place in Ireland in the late 1980s.
'It's something I'm really drawn to because every Irish family has their ghost story, or their neighbour or someone does,' Cronin said.
'Certainly within my own family there's a few of those tall tales. I just found this really interesting one that drew me in and we're just starting that development process.'
Cronin signed his new production company Doppelgangers up to an exclusive 'first refusal' deal with giants New Line Cinema two weeks ago, furthering his reputation as one of the most exciting names in Hollywood horror.
Doppelgangers, which started with standing partners John Keville and Macdara Kelleher of Wild Atlantic Pictures, will be Irish-based, which Cronin said is 'important to me from an identity point of view'. The new film will also require 'lots of brilliant Irish talent both in front and behind the camera', and the filmmaker said helping to promote the industry 'here is 'a big part of what we do'.
Evil Dead Rise, which starred
Alyssa Sutherland and Lily Sullivan in an acclaimed continuation of the Sam Raimi-created franchise, was co-produced by Wild Atlantic Pictures.
'That was something that was important to me,' the 42-year-old writer-director said. 'Not that I had to fight for it, but it was something that I wanted to bring to the table. And by doing that I was able to do all the postlong- production on that movie over here and bring in so many people in sound, music composition, visual effects, etc.
'So even when a movie might call for some international reach, I'm always looking for avenues of how I can engage with homegrown talent as well.'
Both his feature films and his award-winning short Ghost Train are carried by strong performances from child actors - with young James Quinn Markey putting in a particularly chilling turn in
The Hole In The Ground.
'The key thing for me is actually that you communicate to any performer of any age with respect and with clarity, because that's your job as a director - to be very clear about what you want.
'And the great thing about young performers is that they're great at listening, they're great at absorbing ideas. They're like sponges.'
Cronin also made sure to involve 11-year-old Nell Fisher, who plays Kassie in Evil Dead
Rise, in as much of the preparation process as possible.
'I'd bring her over to see special effects and tests and let her stick her hands in the slime and play around with the fake blood,' he said.
'You're trying to make it feel like a really long, fun Halloween night for those young performers. But when it comes to show time and you roll the camera, you need them to be scared or terrified.'
Cronin wrote the screenplay for Evil Dead Rise - the 63rd highest-grossing horror film of all time - 'sitting on my bed in my little apartment' in Dublin during the pandemic.
'The roots of it all came from me being in lockdown, stuck in my apartment like so many people were. I poured a bunch of those thoughts into it, because the movie's kind of about people being trapped by something outside the door - you don't quite know what it is but it's really dangerous.'
Despite his chosen genre, Cronin calls himself 'a scaredy cat'.
'I remember years ago we went on a family holiday to this little house down in Kerry near Dingle. Pretty much all my family had a weird experience there except me. So I'm always like, "Oh, I don't believe in any of that." But I don't know if that's just because I'm a bit of a scaredy cat deep down.'
colm.mcguirk@dmgmedia.ie
'I'm a bit of a scaredy cat deep down' 'Every Irish family has their ghost story'

Graphic


TALENT: Lee Cronin says half of his projects will have Irish originsHORROR: Alyssa Sutherland and Lily Sullivan, above, star in Evil Dead Rise. Emily, left, and Alyssa in the movie

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



HOT LIST; CLAIRE HYLAND ON WHAT'S TRENDING IN GREAT NEW READS
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 597 words
Body


IN HER PLACE EDEL COFFEY An absorbing read that will draw you in and have you blurring your moral stance on 'the other woman' is Edel Coffey's In Her Place.
Career woman Ann finally find happiness when she meets Justin, whose world has revolved around caring for his wife Deborah, who is in a coma. Their relationship blossoms but then Deborah wakes up ? and all bets are off.
In Her Place (Sphere) is out now, priced from (EURO)16.99.
THE HONEYMOON AFFAIR SHEILA O'FLANAGAN What are beach days without a compulsive read from the master of the page turner? Sheila O'Flanagan is set to drop her 30th novel in the coming weeks.
The Honeymoon Affair (Hachette) sees Izzy fall for a handsome writer on holidays. There's just one problem ? his ex-wife is determined to get him back. It's expected at the end of April, priced from (EURO)14.99.
I'M F*UCKING AMAZING ANOUSHKA WARDEN Anoushka Warden's debut I'm F*cking Amazing is getting rave reviews.
Now in her thirties and committed to a serious boyfriend, the author's girl has one problem ? she just can't bear sex with 'the best guy ever' and even worse, it hurts.
I'm F*ucking Amazing follows her journey from doctors to natural remedies as she begins to suspect that you can't have it all, after all. I'm F*cking Amazing (Orion) is out in April, priced from (EURO)24.99.
THE HUNTER TANA FRENCH Having already claimed the second spot on the New York Times bestseller list, Tana French's The Hunter makes for a riveting read.
It follows Cal Hooper, a Chicago detective who escapes to the west of Ireland and finds peace in the family that embraces him there. But when a moneymaking scheme threatens the family, he is on red alert. The Hunter (Penguin Viking) is out now, (EURO)15.99.
MY FAVOURITE MISTAKE MARIAN KEYES My Favourite Mistake introduces us to Anna, who lives the life those moving to the Big Apple can only dream of? except she's done with it all.
As she moves home to Ireland and grapples with her latest evolution as a PR for a coastal resort universally despised by locals, she quickly learns that running away doesn't mean leaving your problems behind.
My Favourite Mistake (Penguin) is out on April 11, but it's available to pre-order now at (EURO)16.99. Take a peek at some of the other suitcase reads you'll want to pack in the coming months.
EMMA, DISAPPEARED ANDREW HUGHES Crime Lit fans on the trail of a holiday read should look no further than Andrew Hughes's Emma, Disappeared.
The disappearance of a bright university grad sparks a nationwide debate about women's safety in Ireland.
As the case rumbles on, archivist James gets sucked into the case and a student gang searches for Emma. Then her body is discovered near James's flat. Emma, Disappeared (Hachette) is expected on April 4 from (EURO)14.99.
A STRANGER IN THE FAMILY JANE CASEY DS Maeve Kerrigan is on the case again. When a nine-year-old girl disappeared from her bed, her family was ripped apart. Sixteen years later her mother dies with her father by her side but what looks an open and shut case unravels into a web of lies and secrets ? and someone is prepared to kill to keep those secrets buried. A Stranger In The Family (Hemlock Press) is out now, (EURO)11.99.
ANNA'S GAME PLAN ANNA GEARY Onwards and upwards is the motto we all need this year and perhaps no one understands that better than Anna Geary. The TV host has just released her debut book, Anna's Game Plan, which is packed with the motivational tools she has picked up over the years, along with learnings from behavioural science. Anna's Game Plan (Sandycove) is out now, priced from (EURO)17.99.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



How to avoid being taken n in by fake illegal cosmetics
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 10,11
Length: 418 words
Body


Do you know the difference between beauty dupes and fake beauty? There is an increase in the latter - counterfeit beauty - in the UK right now and it's surely impacting Irish shoppers too.
The difference between dupes and illegal fakes is this - a beauty dupe may 'look' like a pricier buy, or it might perform similarly if its makeup, but counterfeit beauty is unregulated, spurious, and could cause you harm. For the most part, beauty dupes are made following the same safety protocols as a luxury brand, and if the product is being sold in a store or pharmacy it needs to pass the same laws on ingredients.
Fake beauty is just that - fake - and follows no safety guidelines, and who knows what they are made from. But how do you spot counterfeit beauty?
I spoke with Tracy Moores, founder of Glorious Brands, a fragrance and beauty website to find out. Tracy told me why there is an increase in fake beauty at the minute.
'With the increase in online shopping this is becoming much harder, as online brings far more risks to buying in-store and in person,' she says. 'When online it's much more difficult to establish if we are purchasing a counterfeit product.'
Red flags to look out for are subtle differences in packaging. 'Logo, ingredients and registered [legal] address are all quick and easy checks,' she says. 'The best way to be sure is to buy only from reputable retailers with an online platform or well-established e-tailers. Companies selling counterfeit product.' s don't offer samples, which is an easy check.
'Also, if a price seems too good to be true - it normally is!'
On the subject of beauty fakes like perfume that aren't trying to look exactly like the more expensive item but perform or smell somewhat the same, Tracy says maybe you should save your money.
'The saying 'you get what you pay for' applies here. To sell a product cheaply, it has to be manufactured using cheap ingredients, most likely from suppliers using cheap synthetic imitations, using unsustainable methods and without integrity - all of which can cause skin irritation or worse,' she says.
'Fragrance also evaporates, so you may be able to smell a fragrance as soon as you spray it, but when using cheap imitations, the fragrance may be fleeting,' she says.
'Compare the logo alongside the logo of the dotcom site, the amends will be slight but obvious. Any difference at all is a red flag.'
Tracy adds: 'Remember this motto - if in doubt, check it out - before making any purchase you think might - counterfeit beauty - .'

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



How to keep grey at bay - without hitting the hair dye; Many of us are happy to grey gracefully. But if you want to hang on to your natural colour as long as possible, a top expert tells you how (it's bad news for vegans!)
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 18,19
Length: 1893 words
Byline: Eva Proudman
Body


LEADING HAIR CONSULTANT
FINDING that first grey hair is never a cause for celebration. For the vast majority of us, it's just another reminder that old age is advancing a little faster than we would like.
But while the rate at which our hair colour changes is largely dictated by our genes there is some good news.
I've worked in this field for more than two decades, and in recent years there has been a growing body of research showing that, for some of us at least, there are ways to slow the rate at which our hair transitions to this state.
These include tackling stress at work or home ? it can damage the delicate cells in the scalp that control hair colour ? covering the head in the sun to protect against UV rays and even getting medical checks to ensure turning grey isn't due to a hidden ailment.
And perhaps most surprisingly, research suggests that eating red meat, such as liver, could help preserve hair colour.
This is bad news for vegans, because as healthy as it is, a vegan diet lacks vital nutrients that protect hair against the ageing process.
In fact, I estimate that being vegan speeds up the greying process by about five years.
Of course, grey hair is nothing to be ashamed of, and it's great to see high-profile celebs, such as Hollywood stars Salma Hayek and George Clooney ? as well as stage and screen legend Helen Mirren ? embracing their natural colour changes.
The greying process is often misunderstood. With age, our melanocytes (tiny cells in the skin that produce melanin, the pigment that gives our skin and hair colour) start to fail.
The result is that hair doesn't actually go grey ? it becomes translucent, only appearing grey because it reflects the light from surrounding darker hairs.
But the fact is that millions of us go to extraordinary lengths to hide it with hair colourants and regular salon visits.
While the 'silver fox' look may be in vogue for some older men, surveys show turning grey ages most males by at least three years.
For women, it's even worse ? they are judged to have aged by an average of six years and, research shows, are seen as less competent by others who have yet to lose their natural colour.
Unfortunately, if you have a strong family history of relatives going completely grey in their 20s or 30s, your fate is probably sealed.
And there is no obvious cure for grey hair on the horizon.
But for everyone else, there may be a chance they can postpone the inevitable for several years, by following these simple www.steps.NO SMOKING OR VAPING - THEY KILL CELLS THAT GIVE HAIR ITS COLOUR IT's been known for years that smoking tobacco can speed up the rate at which you go grey.
This is because toxins in cigarettes trigger oxidative stress, a biological process where unstable molecules in the body called free radicals ? which are produced by smoking ? attack and destroy healthy cells in the scalp that produce melanin, the pigment that gives your hair colour.
It's likely that using an e-cigarette -? also known as vaping ? isn't any safer.
A study at the Medical University of Silesia, in Poland, published in the journal Molecular and Cellular Biochemistry in 2014, found regular exposure to nicotine ? either through tobacco, e-cigarettes or even nicotine gum and patches ? reduced melanin production in the scalp by about 16 per cent.
KEEP OUT OF THE SUN TO AVOID UV DAMAGE TOO much sun exposure isn't just bad for your skin, as it also drains the colour out of your hair.
That's because excess UV light triggers the same oxidative stress that smoking does, damaging melanin-producing cells in the scalp and speeding up the greying process. And it's not just hair colour that suffers ? studies show UV rays also disrupt levels of keratin, a protein in hair that strengthens and protects it.
Anyone who spends a lot of time outdoors ? such as builders or farm workers ? should make sure they wear a hat.
But I would also recommend everyone uses specialist antioxidant conditioners. Products such as this coat hairs in a substance to protect them against sun-related damage.
Antioxidants work by neutralising the harmful free radical molecules (which trigger oxidative stress, damaging the delicate melanin-releasing cells) before they penetrate the hair and scalp.
THE ESSENTIAL VITAMIN THAT VEGAN DIETS LACK
VEGAN diets are notoriously lacking in vitamin B12, which is found in abundance in meat, eggs and dairy products but in much lower concentrations in plant-based foods. It's not found naturally in fruits, vegetables or grains.
Vitamin B12 is absolutely crucial for cell regeneration, including that of melanocytes, and without enough of it in your diet it can bring on the greying of your hair.
For this reason, vegans are massively more at risk of going grey prematurely.
For people looking to maximise their B12 intake, the best food sources are liver and red meat.
However, if you find these choices unpalatable you should try a daily supplement ? your body needs around 1.5mg a day to stay healthy.
For those who are meat-free, a daily iron supplement can help.
This is because iron deficiency is known to cause hair to grey by also depleting melanin levels.
STRESS IS DESTROYING YOUR NATURAL COLOUR HAVING a bad day at work isn't going to affect your chances of going grey prematurely.
But if you are experiencing chronic, long-term stress ? whether it's from a job you hate, financial worries or a troubled home life ? it's a different story.
Our bodies are programmed to release certain hormones ? such as cortisol and norepinephrine ? when we find ourselves under threat or feeling pressure.
It's part of the natural fight-orflight response crucial to our predecessors' survival in the wild.
But if that natural response doesn't then switch off, and instead persists for days, weeks or even months, the excess cortisol can take a deadly toll on our bodies, including our hair.
In addition, when in survival mode the brain prioritises the supply of blood and nutrients to cells and tissues (such as muscles) that are vital for escaping the crisis.
Non-essential cells, such as melanocytes that dictate hair colour, are a low priority.
This isn't a problem in a brief crisis, but if it carries on longterm then melanocytes begin to malfunction and hair colour fades.
Learn to de-stress through exercise and relaxation.
But you don't have to run marathons or spend hours doing yoga. The key is to simply find a distracting activity that relaxes you and takes your mind off your daily worries, whether it's jogging, gardening, baking or reading a book.
If you're not thinking about the stressful factors in your life for at least an hour or two a day, your stress hormone levels will decline and the impact of stress on your hair will be reduced.
GET THE BLOOD FLOWING WITH A HEAD MASSAGE MANY people swear by simple head rubs as the secret to their youthful-looking locks. And while there's little hard evidence to say it works, there is some rationale behind it.
Gently massaging the scalp stimulates blood flow to both hair follicles and melanin-producing cells, helping hair to grow and potentially retain its colour.
A plentiful supply of nutrientrich blood is essential for both.
I often recommend my patients try the Manta Pulse ((EURO)70 on Amazon), a gently vibrating soft brush that massages the scalp.
It was developed by a hairdresser whose wife was undergoing chemotherapy for cancer and was worried about losing her hair.
SUDDENLY GREYING? GET YOUR THYROID CHECKED FOR most of us, turning grey is a slow process. But if you are worried that it's happening faster than you expected, you might need to see a GP, as one common cause of rapid hair whitening is an underactive thyroid.
The thyroid is a butterflyshaped gland in the neck that releases the hormone thyroxine.
This regulates the body's metabolism, and studies show when thyroxine levels are low, because the gland is not working properly, we suffer fatigue, weight gain, depression and joint pain.
It also reduces melanin production by the cells in the scalp that give hair colour.
The good news is that there are several accounts in the scientific literature of patients regaining their hair colour once the underactive thyroid is treated with a synthetic form of thyroxine called levothyroxine.
Coeliac disease can also make hair turn grey. However, it is unclear why it triggers a loss of hair colour.
COUNTRY LIVING MAY SLOW THE PROCESS AIR pollution damages hair colour in much the same way as cigarette smoke does.
Toxins such as diesel fumes that are inhaled and absorbed into the bloodstream can trigger oxidative stress ? damaging healthy cells in the scalp, reducing their ability to produce the melanin needed to retain colour.
City dwellers are more at risk. A recent report found that the population of London, for example, is exposed to levels of toxins, such as nitrogen dioxide gas, above World Health Organisation guidelines.
If you live in a built-up area, it is important to wash your hair regularly ? at least every other day ? to get rid of polluted particles that could penetrate the hair and damage melanocyte cells in the scalp.
Contrary to popular belief, it is healthy for your scalp and hair to be washed regularly.
Consider using an antioxidantrich conditioner that can help protect against toxic deposits that might speed up the greying process.
? Eva Proudman is founder of UK Hair Consultants and is the star of TV's The Hair Loss Clinic on Discovery +.
MY HAIR FELL OUT SO I KNOW HOW MUCH IT MEANS
GROW old gracefully. That's the rather dismissive mantra spouted by those who think hair is purely a cosmetic issue and nothing to do with our health or wellbeing.
But for many people, hair is closely related to their overall self-esteem and psychological welfare. And I should know ? a few years ago I developed a condition called telogen effluvium that is often triggered by stress.
With healthy hair, not all of it is growing. At any one time about 85 per cent is growing and the other 15 per cent is resting or shedding ? and this is dictated by your DNA. With telogen effluvium, hair that should be growing instead switches to resting or shedding, and even when it starts to regrow it sheds again very quickly, causing thinning and sparse patches.
In my case it was a result of the hugely restricted diet I was on after weightloss surgery. I'm a hair expert so I knew what was going on, but even so it was profoundly traumatic. It fell out in clumps and washing it was terrifying ? great fistfuls clogged the shower. I knew this was a temporary condition and my hair would eventually stabilise, but it wrecked my confidence. It felt like I had lost my identity.
What did it teach me? That hair isn't just part of our identity, it's also inextricably linked to our psychological health.
Wanting to stop the grey ? or have a thick mane through a hair transplant ? is not about vanity, it's about taking care of your overall wellbeing. And the better that is, the healthier you're likely to be.
TURN DOWN THE SETTINGS AND KEEP YOUR DISTANCE MOST household hairdryers heat to between 20C and 60C. At the top end of that range it is enough to 'bake' not only the hair but the delicate melanin-releasing cells in the skin and hair follicles, turning off the supply of pigment to each strand of hair. It's best to opt for a moderate setting and keep the drier a reasonable distance ? about 8in ? from your hair, while moving it around.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



I admire Mikel for having the courage of his convictions
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 73
Length: 684 words
Byline: Danny Murphy
Body


MIKEL ARTETA would have learned plenty from Pep Guardiola at Manchester City but nothing more important than having the courage of your convictions.I was shocked when he signed David Raya last summer because I'd been impressed by Aaron Ramsdale who clearly has many attributes for a goalkeeper, including organisation and leadership.
Arteta backed himself to make the tough decision as Guardiola had once done by ditching England No1 Joe Hart at City.
I admire it in many ways because if you're a manager and believe there's a player who can improve your team, it's a big thing to trust your judgement when it won't sit well with everybody.
There was a backlash and even now there will still be some Arsenal supporters who may prefer Ramsdale. But Arteta was strong enough to make his choice and Raya's penalty shootout heroics against Porto were probably the final vindication, with the Gunners also having the best defensive record in the Premier League.
I've seen it suggested Arteta went for Raya because he's superior to Ramsdale with his feet but I think there was broader reasoning than that. For one thing, Ramsdale is technically good himself despite the recent error against Brentford.
I speak to goalkeepers who think Raya is probably a slightly more physical and dominant presence in commanding his penalty area. He's brave and also clearly good with his feet. But the main difference is Raya has a calming influence on the team.
The only problem Arteta gave himself was earlier in the season when he claimed they were both No1s. The majority of people in the game suspected that wasn't the case. Raya has been one of the reasons Arsenal go into this pivotal top of the table clash. Alas for Arteta, his old boss Pep is standing in the way to the title.
Most players would have loved to work under Guardiola. I certainly would. Even as a young player, I enjoyed the tactical side of the game and regularly had questions for my coaches, such as Steve
Holland, to learn more.
I also responded to managers who would give me a kick up the backside and Pep seems to be that type rather than a pat-on-the-back kind of guy. He demands the best and the consistency he gets from his players over months and years is an unbelievable skill.
His City team are always evolving to find different ways to dominate the ball and find a weakness in the opposition.
I liked his recent passionate conversation with Kevin de Bruyne after he took the player off against Liverpool. He might not have spoken like that with a new signing but he and Kevin know each other so well. Their exchange was real. It didn't cross the line of discipline and actually nipped the situation in the bud.
Guardiola has to be in the conversation with Alex Ferguson as the greatest ever. His biggest legacy is the influence he's had on the English game from top to bottom. In the lower leagues, more clubs are giving younger coaches a chance to develop players and fans want to be entertained. That's been triggered by Guardiola.
It's no surprise many coaches who have worked in the City group are doing well as managers including Enzo Maresca at Leicester and Liam Manning with Bristol City.
Nobody has taken it on board more than Arteta and he's now a serious rival to his mentor.
Today's game is big for Arsenal. With fixtures away to Brighton, Tottenham and Manchester United to come, they'll be the clear outsiders should they leave the Etihad empty-handed. Get a result however and they will truly believe.
Most teams would fret over injury doubts to players with the quality of Kyle Walker and John Stones. It just doesn't seem to bother Guardiola's team though. They are going for a fourth league title in a row despite having Erling Haaland and De Bruyne out for long periods.
Even if they miss their two England international defenders, you wouldn't consider the likes of Nathan Ake, Ruben Dias and Josko Gvardiol as sub-standard. All are gifted players with plenty of bigmatch experience. If Walker doesn't make it, Manuel Akanji or Rico Lewis could come in at right back without letting anyone down.
Man City v Arsenal Today, 4.30pm, Sky Sports

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



I arrived at the five-star hotel in old undies thanks to Victoria's hidden secret
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 3
Length: 698 words
Byline: Fiona Looney
Body


have often wondered why clothes manufacturers don't carry on labelling their garments with the age they're suitable for all the way from childhood to bewilderment. You know where you are with children's
I clothes: even given the vagaries of growth spurts, nobody has ever mulled over buying a dress aged two to three for a 12-year-old.
But once you get into adult clothes, it all becomes very confusing. There is no label to tell you that the tiny mini dress you're taking into the changing room is for age 18 to 24. Likewise, all those outfits that you find on the middle floors of department stores should be marked age 55-70, in order to prevent some unfortunate lamb dressing as mutton. If we just labelled all clothes with the appropriate age, a world of wardrobe malfunctions could be avoided and I certainly wouldn't be right this minute huddled over in Victoria's Secret using the torch on my phone to try to read what it says on the endless black drawers.
In my defence, we are spending the weekend in a five - five! - star hotel and all the intel I've acquired down the years about these situations (women's magazines and the internet) suggests that new underwear is compulsory. So here I am crossing the door of the Grafton Street store of the world's most successful lingerie retailer for the very first time, in high spirits - five! - and little knowing that the next hour will be one of the most stressful of my life.
I start with some basic reconnaissance of the ground floor in order to ascertain how shops work these days. Like those other American apparel stores, Abercrombie & Fitch and Hollister, it is quite dark. I realise now this should have been as clear an indicator of age appropriateness as any clothes label, but for some reason - five! - I soldier on regardless. There are about three of every bra hanging on small bra hangers, which initially puzzles me, since there are about 500 different bra sizes in the world, but that's when I spot the lines of drawers underneath, each of which is marked (in tiny writing) with a number and a letter. So say your bra size is 34C, then not only are you very lucky, but your new bra is awaiting you in that drawer.
I think I have shone my torch on every drawer on the ground floor - and there are hundreds - before I start to wonder if, of the aforementioned 500 bra sizes, Victoria's Secret only carries 499 and that the missing one is mine. But along with that dawning suspicion comes another revelation: there are three more floors of bras and drawers in the shop. Up I go, then up I go again, spending at least 20 minutes in a neon pink room which, the internet will inform me several days later, is the shop's teenage section. But again, my bra drawer is the lingerie equivalent of the lost city of El Dorado.
Through all of this, I have a vague sense that I appear to be the only customer in the shop who isn't wearing a school uniform, but again - five! - I put that down to there being something wrong with all of them and not me. Then I run out of drawers and only then do I seek help. I am too embarrassed to reveal my bra size here but let's just say that the part that should be hilariously big is hilariously small and vice versa. When I ask the extremely helpful assistant if they stock my size, I see her stifle a snigger and then, without even pretending to look something up, she tells me that they don't. I try to palm it off as a joke and choose two bras I don't like in sizes adjacent to my elusive one. In the changing room, the only thing I can clearly see is my cellulite. One of the bras does actually kind of fit though, if I push the fat bits of my sides down under the straps. But they never mentioned this in the women's magazines or on the internet so I abandon the bra campaign completely and pick up a silky cream-coloured nightie instead. Then I leave the shop in a sweat and have a lengthy word with myself.
As to the five-star hotel, it's just perfect. And the cream nightie turns out to be pink in natural daylight.
All of which could have been avoided if they just turned the lights on and put ages on their bras instead of letters and numbers to which deluded women like me can only aspire.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



I can't be a teenage protest singer for ever; Declan McKenna started out as the voice of a generation but now he's doing his own thing
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 48
Length: 757 words
Byline: Declan McKenna
Body


DANNY MCELHINNEY INTERVIEW
Declan McKenna
Declan McKenna has made the journey from a teenage protest singer to a mature artist of invention and importance in his mid-twenties with such apparent ease that is both heartening and even startling. To recap, Declan, who was born and raised in London and whose grandparents hailed from Cavan and Cork, at age 16 won a competition to play the 2015 Glastonbury Festival and later that same year played the Electric Picnic for the first time. His earliest singles Brazil, Paracetamol and Isombard were socially aware, politically savvy songs that delivered their messages with no shortage of hooks.
His 2017 debut album What Do You Think About The Car? laid down further markers as to his talent. Zeros released just over three years later was even better. It revealed an artist who had learned well from his heroes David Bowie, The Waterboys and Ray Davies of The Kinks.
For his third album, Declan left his Brighton home (which he shares with his friend former Strypes guitarist Josh McClorey) for Los Angeles and returned with What Happened To The Beach? an album that reflected that city's sunnier climes and also a diverse-sounding collection of songs that embraced experimentation but on which he rarely puts a foot wrong.
'LA is a more relaxing environment to work in and that kind of energy did feed into the album,' he says.
'The songs that I had written this time were a little more abstract. The producer that I workedwith,GianlucaBuccellati [Lana Del Rey, Arlo Parks], seemed to go for those kinds of songs. It is a completely different experience to working out of London or Brighton but it wasn't a complete U-turn. It's kind of a new approach mixed with going back to my roots a little bit.'
He will play a mix of both when he takes to stages in both Belfast and Dublin this week. One of the new songs in the live set is an album stand-out, Nothing Works. On it he sings, 'I don't relate to the kids no more. I feel like I'm letting them down', and also, 'so what if I sing 'I love war'.' It seems to contradict another of his early songs British Bombs which criticised his country's policy of armament sales.
'It's not that I will not write anything about social injustice or whatever issue it is again, it's just that I don't want to repeat myself,' he says.
'Nothing Works is kind of justifying what I was doing with this record. It would feel wrong to me to allow my writing to always veer in that direction when I have already done it quite a lot. It is a bit tonguein-cheek obviously when I sing "so what if I sing 'I love war'". Really, I don't want to come off as some perfect influence - it is just not possible.
My label did suggest that I go back and work in the same way that I had before but I said I can't really do that. I can only really do what I'm inspired to do now. It's the only way that it's going to be any good.'
Declan is another artist who has dialled down his presence on social media. 'I don't see a functioning revolution coming out of these apps,' he says. His change in attitude partially inspired I Write The News another excellent song from the album, which followed its predecessors into the Irish and UK top 10s.
'You see things on the internet where two sides of a debate can have two completely different sets of what they think the truth is; there is nothing unifying or productive about getting involved with that,' he says.
'Social media sites probably aren't owned by people who care as much as a lot of their users do about these issues. The fact that many people are logging in is probably the most important thing for them. That's why I feel a bit weird about using social media at all.'
Declan now releases his music on his own imprint, Tomplicated Records, but still through Columbia, which won the bidding war to sign him nine years ago.
'I probably have a bit more control because I'm a bit more demanding than I was when I was a teenager,' he laughs.
'You know the way the industry is. Conversations get had and you get swayed into doing things the label's way. It is a constant push and pull. But I have fought for this album to be the way it is. There is a level of experimentation but we've kept the balance of something organic and the digital process that we've used. A lot of laptops but a lot of heart as well!' ? Declan McKenna plays the 3Olympia Theatre on Tuesday and Wednesday. His new album, What Happened To The Beach? is out now.
album review on next page
'Really, I don't want to come off as some perfect influence - it is just not possible'

Graphic


MOVING ON: Singer Declan McKenna, who plays Dublin and Belfast this week

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



I'm a poor tennis player, but I couldn't miss the chance to play (and be beaten) at Wimbledon; Ryan Tubridy ryan@mailonsunday.ie london diary
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; OPINION, COLUMN; Pg. 19
Length: 764 words
Byline: Ryan Tubridy
Body


O
N MY first Virgin Radio/Q102 show I was joined by the great Russell Crowe who was quick to mock my white legs which he bore witness to when we played tennis during the summer of 2022.
After the show, an accomplished Irish tennis player called James Cluskey got in touch to say he had heard the chat and wanted to invite me to his tennis club to play a game or two.
When he added that the club in question was Wimbledon, I nearly fell off my seat.
I'm a poor player who is stuck in a time with Wimbledon references really only stretching from Boris Becker to Stefan Edberg, but I do enjoy the sounds and occasional afternoon of Wimbledon watching, so I jumped at the opportunity.
Last week after the show, I hopped on a Tube to the famous grounds where I got a guided tour through the courts and dressing rooms usually only ever seen on television during lazy summer afternoons.
The grass courts were being maintained so our hour of power took place on a beautiful indoor tennis court.
I think I won two points in five games (it felt like correctly answering a question on University Challenge) and James informed me that I had earned myself a bagel.
This is not a lunch reference but rather the shape of the number of games I had won… We wandered past the beautiful trophies that the champions win on the day (which they raise above their heads and promptly return before being handed a mini replica for the mantelpiece!) and had a good look around the royal box, that area populated by the great and the good (and well-connected) during the championship.
I was struck by how close these particular spectators are to the action, but also by the pristine courts and overall sense of tradition. Between the House of Parliament last week and Wimbledon soon thereafter, I'm getting a great old peek behind the curtain of some quintessentially British institutions, but I'd still take home any day!
When I used to visit schools, I always asked the children if they liked history as a subject. If a smattering of hands went up I'd explain to them that, in fact, they all loved history but just hadn't met the right teacher yet.
I'm a long-standing fan and admirer of teachers BUT, like in any business, a bad leader can kill morale, curiosity and hope. I've seen this up close in my professional life but in the teaching world this can kill a young person's nascent interest in the past or in poetry or indeed the sciences. Conversely, a great teacher (the majority) can bring a subject to life, making it vibrant, accessible and fascinating. The same rules apply in many ways to museums the world over.
For whatever reason, I found myself visiting three different museums in London this week. As some of my close pals were visiting, they wanted a bit of culture to complement the few pints, so we took ourselves off to the Imperial War Museum which is within walking distance of Elephant and Castle Tube station. It's free in and offers an incredible and evenhanded approach to history in an interesting and accessible way.
The First World War section takes you through the timeline which is accompanied by interactive graphics, beautiful and grotesque visuals, and even a trench to walk through to give you a sense of the dimensions and degradation. It takes a while to get through but it's well worth the effort.
The next floor up is the Second World War, which is apparent from the swastikas on the wall and the audio of jackboots on the march interspersed with the guttural rantings of Hitler. Again, the displays are compelling and well-written, never boring or overbearing.
The next floor up is dedicated to the horrors of the Holocaust and is populated by all generations of visitor slowly shaking their heads in disbelief at the relentless stories of the death and destruction perpetrated by the Nazis during their reign of terror.
You could spend many hours at the IWM so if you're planning to visit, be sure to carve out a full afternoon. And it's not suitable for under-12s.
The British Museum has been receiving rave reviews for its Legion exhibition on life as an ordinary Roman soldier in the time of empire, so I was excited to buy a ticket (£22/(EURO)25.50) and head in.
Unfortunately, I found it very underwhelming and definitely a case of poor teaching. In my disappointment, I headed upstairs to the permanent (and free) exhibition where a lovely older volunteer gave a (free) tour of several points of interest in the Roman section. In 40 minutes there I learned more than in the two hours I spent, pretty bored, at the big-ticket event. Upstairs, I had found a better class of teacher!

Graphic


POOR: I was bored by the British Museum's Roman exhibitionHAWK EYE: But there wasn't much to see as James Cluskey beat me at Wimbledon

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Improved set-piece can boost Irish hopes
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 69
Length: 608 words
Byline: Rory Keane
Body


PARIS 2024 will be a seismic moment for Sevens in this country.
David Nucifora's pet project has been polarising but the fact that both the men's and women's teams will represent Ireland at the Olympic Games for the first time deserves credit.
And the women's team in particular will be quietly fancying their chances of serving up a medal later this year. The likes of Lucy Mulhall, Amee-Leigh Murphy Crowe, Beibhinn Parsons and Eve Higgins have been achieving great things at this level in recent times, winning silver on the Seville leg of the Sevens circuit in 2022 and following that up with a first-ever tournament victory, beating a brilliant Australia team in their home turf in Perth in January.
And if Mulhall and Co do something special at Stade de France in August, they will be lauded for their efforts. But will it have captured the public consciousness?
Because this afternoon's Six Nations clash at the RDS feels like the kind of event which will capture a lot more imaginations. This championship fixture ? the first in Dublin since 2022 ? is headed for a record attendance, surpassing the 6,000-odd spectators who descended on the same venue for a Six Nations game against Wales two years ago.
Thousands of young girls, parents, budding coaches and volunteers who could be inspired to take the game forward. Crucially, this is all on free-to-air on a Sunday afternoon. There are going to be a lot of eyeballs on Ireland's fortunes today.
That brings its own pressure, of course. At times last year, if felt like the glare of the media spotlight was blinding for an Ireland squad stumbling around in the dark. The memory of former captain Nichola Fryday breaking down in the front of the cameras after a harrowing experience against a French team operating on a different plane remains vivid. This squad simply weren't ready for the scrutiny and exposure.
It's early days in the Scott Bemand project, but there are tentative signs that the class of 2024 can cope with the hype, expectation and pressure.
The way they fronted up against France in Le Mans will have heartened this playing group. One early defensive blip aside, the hosts got nothing easy against an Irish team which looked far more organised and determined. If they can sharpen up the set-piece ? the return of Sam Monaghan will be a major boost on that front ? and get a bit more front-foot ball, they can make life difficult for the Italians.
Bemand sprang some big surprises when his team selection was announced earlier this week. Deeming co-captain Edel McMahon and Hannah O'Connor surplus to requirements in his matchday squad says a lot about the Ireland head coach's approach. He wants to build depth and competition.
It will be fascinating to see how this group fare in front of a sizeable crowd. In Neve Jones, Monaghan and Brittany Hogan, they have a trio of forwards who fall into the 'follow me' category. If we start seeing Parsons, Higgins and Katie Corrigan getting on the ball in a bit of space, then this could be a big day.
How they line up
IRELAND: L Delany;
K Corrigan, E Higgins, E Breen, B Parsons; D O'Brien, A Reilly; L Djougang, N Jones, C Haney, D Wall, S Monaghan (capt); G Moore, A Wafer, B Hogan. Reps: S Delaney, N O'Dowd, S McGrath, F Tuite, E Corri, M Scuffil-McCabe, N Fowley, A Dalton.
ITALY: V Minuzzi; A Muzzo, B Rigoni, E Stevanin; A D'Incà V Madia, S Stefan (capt); S Turani, V Vecchini, S Seye; V Fedrighi, G Duca; S Tounesi, F Sgorbini, I Arrighetti. Reps: L Gurioli, G Maris, L Gai, I Locatelli, B Veronese, A Frangipaini, F Granzotto, B Capomaggi.
Referee: H Davidson (Scotland). TV: Kick-off at 3pm, RDS Arena. LIVE on RTÉ 2 from 2.30pm.

Graphic


MAJOR BOOST: Sam Monaghan

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Independents follow 'Verona template' to win over disgruntled Coalition supporters
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 8,9
Length: 679 words
Byline: John Drennan
Body


THE fledgling Independent Ireland party has said it is fielding 100 candidates in the upcoming council elections.
The party, formed last November, includes Independent TDs Michael Fitzmaurice, Michael Collins and Richard O'Donoghue and is looking to harness an expected surge of elected Independents in the wake of the crushing defeats in the referendums on family and care - supported by all the main political parties.
It also wants to flex its muscles after fellow Independent TD, Verona Murphy announced at a recent event attended by hundreds of people including Senator Michael McDowell that she will be fielding ten candidates in the Wexford local elections.
The Irish Mail on Sunday recently revealed conservative leaning Independent TDs were mobilising around the former tánaiste with a view to forming a new Dáil alliance.
Michael Fitzmaurice was among the TDs - including Deputy Murphy - who were initially linked to the new grouping.
But speaking to the MoS this weekend, the rural campaigner indicated he is firmly focused on growing the Independent Ireland party into a political force.
The Roscommon-Galway TD said: 'The party are planning to run up to a hundred council candidates across the country.'
Currently, only 20 people (18 men and two women) have declared their candidacy on the party's official account.
But Mr Fitzmaurice stressed: 'There is a lot more coming.' Providing a regional breakdown of its candidates, Mr Fitzmaurice said there 'will be 12 on Galway city and county, and three in Roscommon'.
Up to 14 will run in the Cork city and county political heartland of party leader Michael Collins.
Mr Fitzmaurice added: 'We are talking to a lot of people. There will be candidates in Westmeath, in Sligo and in Longford.'
He also said the party will stage a series of 'regional rallies' to boost its profile in the countdown to the June local and European elections.
Other high profile Independent TDs want to capitalise on the growing sense of voter detachment from the main political parties. Influential Tipperary TD Michael Lowry - on whose support the Coalition often relied - is fielding five candidates in the five electoral areas in the north of his home county.
Commenting on the relatively small number of Lowry-backed candidates, a local source said: 'There are five candidates because we are seeking a 100% success rate.'
Sources said Lowry's team is also considering moves to expand into the south of the country, which has been split into two separate constituencies by last year's boundary review.
'A number of requests from
TA UP DAIL Former justice EXCLUSIVE candidates in South Tipperary is under consideration,' one source said. A potential Lowry move into South Tipperary is causing worry within Fine Gael, whose local candidate, Senator Garret Ahern, is a top target for the party.
INDEPEND By John Drennan
Turn
One Fine Gael source told the MoS: 'The last thing we need is a Lowry fox in South Tipperary. Both us and [Independent TD} Mattie McGrath will not be sleeping easily.'
In Galway West, Independent TD Noel Grealish - another rumoured target of the McDowell alliance - will have five candidates running under his city' cleared - for half a day used in vile euthanasia ad in France 10 18
FULL STORY See Pages 6 & 7 banner. However, a lot of focus will be on the long-term plans of rebel former Fianna Fáil councillors Noel Thomas and Séamus Walsh, who left the party after internal criticism by the leadership of statements they had made about asylum seeker accommodation at the Ross Lake House Hotel, which was set ablaze last December.
Cllr Thomas accused Fianna Fáil of being detached, and said he had been left with no option but to sever his links with the party.
Cllr Walsh announced he will contest the local elections under the Independent Ireland banner.
Commenting on the Independent manoeuvres, one non-party TD said: 'The big parties are terrified. The Lowry and the Verona template is catching like wildfire.
'They're facing real competition, and unlike Sinn Féin we will have more than enough candidates if there is a vote there.'

Graphic


GATHERING STORM: Our report on how the new party started to form under the former t?naiste last weekTARGET: Galway West TD Noel Grealish

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



It's a MAN's world in the Constitution; Study finds that men are mentioned 109 times while women are referred to just seven times and 'she' not at all
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 15
Length: 601 words
Byline: John Drennan
Body


THE Irish Constitution is sexist and not fit for purpose, according to new research led by University College Dublin academics.
It found the State's founding document mentions women just seven times, while men are mentioned 109 times. Incredibly, the word 'she' does not appear in the Constitution at all.
The research carried out by UCD - assisted by CeADAR, Ireland's centre for artificial intelligence (AI) - led the team to conclude the blueprint laid down by Eamon De Valera is ripe for revision.
They found Bunreacht na hÉireann is in need of 'a sustained make-over' in more areas than the contentious references to women in the home if it is to meet the test of gender inclusivity.
However, the main political parties will be reluctant to engage in any more constitutional engineering following the recent referendum rout.
Nonetheless, the researchers are calling for more inclusive language to be included in the written document after they used AI and machine-learning tools to reveal the extent to which gender bias is endemic in the text.
The research - carried out by Paula Carroll, an associate professor in UCD's School of Business, CeADAR researcher Bhawna Singh, and Professor Eleni Mangina of UCD's School of Computer Science - also found 'key authoritative words' were much more closely associated with men and familyorientated words were more associated with women.
Announcing the results, the researchers said they conducted 'a simple frequency count of gendered terms in the Constitution' and found that the words he, him, his, man and father appear collectively 109 times. The research found the word 'his' alone appeared 63 times.
In contrast, the research found the word 'her' appears only twice, the word 'woman' three times, and 'mother' twice. The word 'she' does not appear in the text at all.
In a separate test, the group then counted the document's 1,283 'unique words' and organised those most often repeated into two separate lists.
They note 'the authoritative list' contained words such as successor, genius, chief, command, head, authority and ownership.
A 'family' list contained words such as birth, diversity, guardianship, parent, child, and spouse.
Using machine-learning and Natural Language Processing tools, the project leaders ran a
Word Embedded Association Test against the target list of gendered terms. The AI tools then quantified the high level of male gender bias in the document.
CeADAR's Bhawna Singh said: 'The fact that the words in the authoritative list were much more closely associated with the male gender just highlights how much of the language in the Irish Constitution is outdated and the need for language in future policy documents to be inclusive.
'When we have the opportunity to choose words, we should choose the gender-neutral option when we can,' Mr Singh added.
UCD's Paula Carroll added: 'The close association between certain words and gender is important to highlight because ultimately that is how humans learn.
'If the word "president" appears alongside the word "he", an association is automatically formed.
'We might hear in the discourse that the Constitution is sexist and biased, but this research quantifies it for the first time,' she said.
The study also revealed that gender bias is not just to be found in the Constitution.
An earlier study by the authors revealed via machine learning and Natural Language Processing that there was a high level of 'implicit gender bias in the national energy and climate plans of EU member states'.
news@mailonsunday.ie
'De Valera's blueprint is ripe for revision' 'We should choose the gender-neutral option'

Graphic


REVISION: The gender imbalance in the Constitution

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Joan's pain at learning of mother's death by post while in US
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 26
Length: 352 words
Byline: Colm McGuirk
Body


FORMER Tánaiste Joan Burton has revealed she only learned of her 'totally fantastic' adoptive mother's death by letter after her funeral had taken place while she was in the US.
The former Labour leader was on a J1 visa one summer break while she was studying commerce in UCD, when she received the devastating news.
Speaking on tonight's episode of Keys to my Life on RTÉ One, Ms Burton said her adoptive mother Bridie King Burton had been 'determined' that young Joan should grasp the opportunity of a lifetime to spend a summer in the US.
She said Bridie had been 'sick on and off for about three years and gradually it just got worse'.
'I ended up going [to the US] and I had a ball,' Ms Burton tells presenter Brendan Courtney.
'But in July when I was there, I got a letter from my dad to say that she died.
'She'd already been buried. That was devastating for me,' Ms Burton said.
The former Dublin West TD further explained that her family did not have a phone in their house at the time of Bridie's heartbreaking death.
'It was just an incredibly difficult time, as it is in anybody's life.
'By the time I came home then, which was the end of the summer, my dad had met somebody else... he just was one of those people who couldn't really live on his own.
'And they got married then quite quickly. My dad and her just went off and created another life.'
Ms Burton had spent her infanthood in the Sisters of Charity baby home at Temple Hill in Blackrock, Co Dublin, before joining her new family at the age of two.
But she wasn't formally adopted by her new parents until a couple of years later.
Revisiting her first family home in Rialto on Dubin city's south side, she tells Brendan Courtney that being teased as a toddler by her mother's friends led to her having a lifelong fear of social workers.
She said: 'I can remember standing on the table and my mother Bridie and maybe three of our neighbours - women - all saying to me: "You have to eat, if you don't eat you'll be taken away." So in fact, all my life, even when I've been a politician - I'll let you in on a secret - I've been terrified of social workers.'

Graphic


MEMORIES: Brendan Courtney and Joan BurtonHEARTACHE: The former Sisters of Charity baby home at Temple Hill

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Konsa's on a roll as nervy Villa claim vital l win in battle for top four
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 74,75
Length: 625 words
Byline: Joe Bernstein
Body


Aston Villa Diaby 36, Konsa 65 20
Wolves
EVERYTHING is going right for Ezri Konsa at the moment.
Already buzzing from winning his first England caps last week, he followed up by scoring his first goal since 2021 with a mishit cross that totally flummoxed Wolves goalkeeper Jose Sa. Villa were relieved Konsa's fortuitous strike was added to Moussa Diaby's power-packed opener so the game could be put bed and allowed them to reclaim fourth place from Spurs.
Wolves have never been the kindest opponents. The last time
Villa beat their neighbours in the Premier League at home was in 2003 when a young Gareth Barry was among the scorers.
There were nerves around Villa Park at kick-off, compounded by news from north London that Tottenham's late win against Luton had temporarily knocked Unai Emery's side out of an automatic Champions League spots. Now they are back in the top four despite a shaky start at Molineux.
Wolves carried a threat until they were in front of Emi Martinez and clearly missed their injured forwards Hwang Heechan, Pedro Neto and Matheus Cunha, with 18-year-old Leon
Chiwome asked to lead the line on his Premier debut.
'The only disappointment was the result. Performance-wise, it was an unbelievable effort,' said Wolves boss Gary O'Neil.
'We gave Villa loads of problems. If we'd had certain players, our expected goals would have been goals.'
In contrast, Villa were ruthless even though top scorer Ollie Watkins didn't reappear after half-time on doctors' orders after feeling discomfort in his hamstring. 'It was an important win. We've lost three times recently at Villa Park but though we were soft in the first 20 minutes, we recovered and played with discipline,' said Emery.
'We are fourth but we can't be comfortable with that with eight games to go. Tottenham is behind us. Manchester United have the potential to make up points. We have to stay focused.'
Wolves should have taken an early lead when Santiago Bueno's cross reached Rayan Ait-Nouri at the far post before the defender's shot was blocked by Martinez's left leg. 'Ninety-nine times out of a hundred that is a goal in the Premier League. He had a lot of the net to aim for,' said O'Neil who also saw Pablo Sarabia denied from edge of the box.
At the other end Watkins shot into the sidenetting when put through by Youri Tielemans before Diaby broke the deadlock.
Douglas Luiz clipped a free-kick into Leon Bailey's path and when the resulting cross was halfcleared to Diaby on the edge of the box, Villa's £52million record signing fired unerringly past Sa.
Jhon Duran replaced Watkins at the interval and Wolves again threatened through Mario Lemina and Chiwome.
Emery sent on Lucas Digne and Nicolo Zaniolo midway through the second half to try and regain control and it worked immediately. Zaniolo found Diaby who moved the ball on to Konsa. The overlapping rightback tried to dink a cross to Duran at the far post but caught it with the wrong part of his foot and it lofted at an angle over Sa's head. He claimed afterwards it had been part of a cunning plan.
'Yeah, definitely,' he said when asked if he'd meant it. The next sentence was more revealing. 'Whether it was a cross, it went in in the end so it's my goal.'
ASTON VILLA (4-4-1-1): Martinez 7; Konsa 6.5, Carlos 6, Torres 7, Moreno 5.5 (Digne 63min, 6); Bailey 7 (Kesler-Hayden 90), Tielemans 7, Luiz 7.5, Rogers 7 (Zaniolo 63, 6.5); Diaby 8 (Iroegbunam 88); Watkins 5.5 (Duran 45, 5.5).
Scorers: Diaby 36, Konsa 65. Booked: Tielemans, Duran. WOLVES (3-1-4-2): Sa 6: Kilman 6, S Bueno 7, Toti 6; Doyle 6 (Chirewa 71 6); Semedo 6 (Doherty 84), Gomes 6 (Traore 84), M Lemina 6.5, Ait-Nouri 6 (H Bueno 64 6); Sarabia 6.5, Chiwome 6 (Fraser 84).
Booked: Sarabia, H Bueno, Kilman, Chirewa. Referee: Paul Tierney 7.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Lamptastic; Aladdin may be a 'panto with pretensions' but its spellbinding Genie is utterly?
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 47
Length: 538 words
Byline: MICHAEL MOFFATT
Body


MICHAEL MOFFATT SHOW OF THE WEEK Aladdin Bord Gáis Theatre Until April
My only memory of the 1992 Disney animated movie that inspired this musical is the over- whelming Robin Williams' voiceover performance as the genie, that practically obliterated everything else on screen.
This production, without the advantage of animation, has all that liveliness, a magnificent live genie and exhausting performances from the highly talented (and overworked) dancers.
The Arabian Nights story of Aladdin is simple. Street-wise hard-up thief Aladdin is tricked by a wicked vizier into getting the magic lamp from a cave. He releases the genie from the lamp, outwits the villain and gets to marry the sultan's daughter.
Despite the simple story, non-stop activity sometimes takes over the show, beginning with the opening Arabian Nights routine - it's invigorating, sets a sparkling mood but just takes too long to get things moving. Dance routines are regularly elongated to stretch the material, but the Alan Menken score keeps things boisterously animated.
It's a visually impressive show, especially the cave scene, a spectacular piece of designer freewheeling where the magic lamp is found in the midst of glitter, gold and a spooky atmosphere.
Lamptastic
And there's no doubt about the performance of Yeukayi Ushe as Genie - locked up for 10,000 years in a lamp and determined to make up for lost time now he's on the loose. It's a devilishly demanding, exhilarating performance that almost leaves the other characters surplus to requirements. He jokes, dances, does some cartwheeling, makes it all look ridiculously easy, and delivers a smashing treatment of Friend Like Me with the ensemble.
The Aladdin/Princess Jasmine love affair is threatened by royal protocol but when there's a genie around there's never a major problem. When Aladdin ends up in prison you know he won't be there for long. Jasmine (Desmonda
Cathabel) looks great, is a fine singer and is given a robust feminist role: she refuses to be sold off as wife to the lascivious vizier, played by a nicely villainous Adam Strong, a melodramatic schemer, accompanied by his grovelling comic sidekick Iago, who has to work hard to rustle up laughs.
It's hard for Gavin Adams to make much of Aladdin, whose character doesn't quite fit his status as a Diamond In The Rough, the song that celebrates his prowess. The most satisfying and concise scene has Aladdin and Jasmine singing A Whole New World as they whirl in space on the magic carpet that seems to defy gravity with no obvious strings attached, serving up an atmosphere of real magic.
The show ticks all the boxes you'd expect in modern productions: expansive choreography and scenery, a long list of designers, arrangers and various lyricists, including the late Howard Ashman contributing to the Alan Menken score, all dishing up a superior job of presentation, especially Jim Steinmeyer's magic carpet wizardry. Aladdin's three imported buddies keep up the chirpiness with Genie and Aladdin, including the raucous Somebody's Got Your Back.
As a show, it's not in the same league as the great musicals: it's pantomime with pretensions but nevertheless, it's delivered with a punchy pizzazz that makes up for its shortcomings.

Graphic


magical: above, left, and Princess main, in Aladdin

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Laurel River eases to Dubai World Cup win
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 56
Length: 327 words
Byline: Eoghan O'Brien
Body


LAUREL RIVER turned the Dubai World Cup into a procession when running out a wide-margin winner for local trainer Bhupat Seemar and jockey Tadhg O'Shea.
Formerly trained by Bob Baffert, the Juddmonte-owned six-year-old was trying the 10- furlong trip for the first time but with two furlongs to run had the race won.
The likes of Derma Sotogake, Ushba Tesoro, Newgate and Kabirkhan had garnered most of the pre-race talk, with Laurel River almost sneaking in under the radar.
It looked a brave decision to step him up in trip, despite winning a Group Three by almost seven lengths over a mile last time out. O'Shea was allowed to dictate the race from a long way out and under no pressure, he went further and further clear.
Entering the final furlong, he was still 10 lengths ahead and while Laurel River understandably got tired late on, he crossed the line well ahead of Ushba Tesoro and Senor Buscador.
The winning trainer said: 'I would like to thank Juddmonte and His Royal Highness for sending me the horse. I was worried that they might be going too fast but Tadhg got the right fractions and also a breather into him.
'It's the greatest feeling to have won this race, but what he was doing in the mornings made me think, "What has this horse got"?
'There is so much stamina in his pedigree but his training was out of this world.'
O'Shea added: 'I tell you one thing, I have never ridden one as good as him. I never dreamed I would win the Dubai World Cup, it really is the stuff of dreams.
'He behaved like a pony; he hit the gates and did everything from the front, it was unbelievable.'
Connections of the placed horses were quick to pay tribute to the runaway winner.
Jockey Yuga Kawada, who was eight and a half lengths back in second on Ushba Tesoro, said: 'The winner was too fast and stayed really well in front.'
Senor Buscador was a neck further back in third and his trainer Todd Fincher commented: 'Hats off to Laurel River, he freaked on everybody there.'

Graphic


JOY: Laurel River's trainer Bhupat Seemar and jockey Tadhg O'Shea

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Leaders pledge stability after Donaldson's sex charges
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 577 words
Byline: David Young ; John Drennan
Body


STORMONT'S DUP deputy First Minister said victims must always be given the best chance to get justice, following the shock resignation of DUP party leader Jeffrey Donaldson after being charged with historical sex offences.
Emma Little-Pengelly's statement followed interim leader Gavin Robinson's reassurances over the DUP's future direction, saying the party was 'not about any one individual'.
Jeffrey Donaldson quit as DUP leader on Friday and was also suspended by the party. It is understood the Lagan Valley MP is charged with one count of rape, one count of gross indecency, and several counts of indecent assault.
And it is further understood that in a letter to party officers informing them of the allegations, he made clear he would be 'strenuously contesting' all charges against him.
The 61-year-old politician, who was arrested and charged on Thursday, will appear in court in Newry, Co. Down, on April 24 in relation to the nonrecent sexual allegations.
He travelled to London early on Friday following his release from Antrim police station. A 57-year-old woman has been charged with aiding and abetting offences in relation to the same police investigation.
The Stormont powersharing executive was re-established in February after a two-year impasse, with Ms Little- Pengelly chosen by Mr Donaldson as the DUP nominee for deputy First Minister.
In a message on social media, she said: 'I know many, many people are deeply shocked and devastated by this news, as I am. Victims must always have the best opportunity for justice. This must be fully respected and supported.
'My thoughts are with those suffering who have put their faith in the criminal justice system. Protecting the integrity of that process necessitates significant restrictions on what can be said. I have faith in our justice system.
'I want to assure you that I am determined to do all I can to provide stability. I will be working closely with our new interim party leader Gavin Robinson and my colleagues to continue the work of tackling the big issues faced by Northern Ireland. There is much to do. We are determined to deliver for all of the people of Northern Ireland.'
Sinn Féin First Minister Michelle O'Neill has stated there is no threat to powersharing. The SF vice president had reached out to the leaders of the other three Executive parties to ensure 'cohesion' going forward. 'The public here rightly deserve our newly formed Executive to continue to deliver for them,' she told Sky News.
In Dublin, Leo Varadkar, one of whose last official acts as
Taoiseach will be to attend the North South Ministerial Council on April 8, told the MoS: 'The Government looks forward to working with Gavin Robinson MP as the DUP interim leader.'
A spokesman for Tánaiste Micheál Martin added: 'We note the appointment of an interim leader... We will continue to work with all parties to ensure full and effective functioning of GFA institutions.'
Mr Robinson, who was DUP deputy leader, was unanimously voted interim leader in an emergency meeting of party hierarchy on Friday.
In an Easter message seen by the PA news agency, the East Belfast MP wrote: 'Our thoughts are with those suffering who have put their faith in our criminal justice system.
DID YOU REMEMBER?
'The police service and courts must be allowed to complete their processes without interference. Nothing that any of us say or do must in any way compromise that.'
news@mailonsunday.ie
'There is much to do for Northern Ireland'

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



League final is a huge game - and I think Clare will edge it; Michael Duignan THE VOICE OF HURLING
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; OPINION, COLUMNS; Pg. 61
Length: 962 words
Byline: Michael Duignan
Body


DON'T be shocked but I actually think the Allianz Hurling League final between Clare and Kilkenny next Saturday evening in Thurles is a huge match.
Clare have only won the title once since the 1977-78 competition, and that was back in 2016. Kilkenny haven't won the league outright since 2018 - the Covidaffected title of 2021 was shared with Galway - and haven't won the All-Ireland since 2015.
So this has to matter. Add in the fact that Brian Lohan is five years with Clare and hasn't won any silverware, for all the sense of progress being made and some of the big performances they have put together. They also have to be hurting from the consecutive all-Ireland semi-final defeats handed to them by the same opposition.
There was a time when Kilkenny were sweeping all before them - winning league titles, Leinster titles and All-Irelands, and maybe that league medal lost a little bit of value. But I can tell you from my own playing career how much it is valued. Offaly are very proud to have won four All-Irelands ever - in my time as a senior player, I was lucky enough to win five Leinsters, two All-Irelands and the county's sole National League in 1991. And I'm very proud of that league medal.
Only a handful of the Clare players have one.
For me, that's the starting point for this game. It's time to take it on its merits, even if Championship is 15 days away for both teams.
So yes, I believe this is huge.
Kilkenny have an easier route in Leinster with a first game in the round-robin at home to an Antrim side who have been struggling. It's certainly easier compared to Munster, which is so cut-throat. Clare host All-Ireland champions Limerick knowing that you're in trouble straight away if you lose the opening game.
But imagine the bounce in confidence and momentum and belief a win for Clare would give them going into that game. The same goes for Kilkenny after they have already knocked out Limerick in the semi-final. This is very much Derek Lyng's team. It has changed quite significantly in the two seasons he has been in charge since taking over from Brian Cody. There has been a lot of change to starting line-ups, particularly with the O'Loughlin Gaels players coming back in after club duty. This should give a fair indication of the starting Kilkenny team come championship. Both managers would like to think they'll have 12 or 13 positions nailed down after this.
Clare have key men still to come back in Tony Kelly, Shane O'Donnell and David McInerney. So I really do think this is massive.
For Kilkenny, the win over Limerick the last day was about laying down a marker, gaining that psychological boost.
With Limerick, there was a bit of fake news about the late substitutions. With Gearòid Hegarty, Cian lynch and Aaron Gillane all taken off late, it was as if they didn't really care. Which was pushing it a bit.
Now I don't think they particularly wanted to be in a league final. They looked like a team that had trained really, really hard during the week, were very leggy. One player I look for direction on that is Diarmaid Byrnes. He was unbelievable against Galway when he came on, looked so sharp. Last Sunday, he was hardly able to waddle about the place. Cian Lynch also went on a few solo runs and was turned over. That's not like www.him.No surprise then that I heard afterwards they had a few really, really tough training sessions in the build-up.
I still really enjoyed Kilkenny's performance, their honesty of effort. I loved the goal they got when Paddy Deegan launched the ball in. He has spent all winter scoring four and five points a game from centre-back with O'Loughlin Gaels. This time though, rather than shooting, when he gets the ball he looks up and sees the mismatch inside, between TJ Reid and Aaron Costello. Once the ball was in the air, all you could think was goal.
TJ is 37 in November but he continues to amaze. I met him at the Kilkenny-Offaly league match. He wasn't playing, said he had a bit of a hamstring twinge - but then added that he'd be back for the last two rounds, and the semi-final and final. I love that mindset! He's modest, down to earth, but that's the mindset of an elite player - think in terms of making the final.
Whatever about what went wrong with Limerick, I'm not sure why Tipperary were so off it in their semi-final against Clare. They missed a load of frees. Jason Forde is one of the best in the business but they ended up with four different takers. Clare looked way ahead of them athletically.
Clare have been impressive during the league and I do think they can win this one. David Fitzgerald has been such a big player for them. His movement, his power, his scoring ability - he has really taken his game to another level.
And while other forwards like David Reidy or Ian Galvin aren't big, they have a great first touch, can do damage. Athletically, they might have the edge right now.
They are playing a nice brand of hurling, are able to mix a short and long game. Like TJ, John Conlon is still going strong, goes for every ball like it means the world.
I'd never write off Kilkenny but I said from the start that this would be a big league for Brian Lohan and Clare. Darragh Lohan has been a real find in the middle of the field and I'm expecting a Clare win.
I just hope there are no soft yellow cards handed out like we saw last weekend. Eoin Cody's second yellow was a free, nothing more.
The Jake Morris second yellow card too was so soft. A Clare man went up to catch a ball and he didn't cover his hand. Morris went to flick on the ball. You can't be training five days a week for this sort of craic - if the ball is there you're entitled to go for it.
So I hope the league final is refereed accordingly and there's a bit of blood and thunder to set the tone for championship.

Graphic


mindset: TJ Reidtowering: Clare's David Fitzgerald in action against Tipperary

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Light at the end of the tunnel?; Paula Fitzpatrick was part of Ireland's golden generation who blazed a trail for the women's game. Now, after years of decline, she believes the national team could be turning a corner
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 68,69
Length: 1435 words
Byline: Rory Keane
Body


THE good days feel like along time ago now.Rewind a decade and the Ireland women's team were doing great things. In the space of three seasons, a brace of Six Nations titles were secured, including a Grand Slam in 2013. Sandwiched between those two championship triumphs was a charge to the semi-final stages of the 2014 World Cup. New Zealand were topped en route in a stunning pool win.
Paula Fitzpatrick was part of a golden generation, along with the likes of Niamh Briggs, Lynne Cantwell, Nora Stapleton, Fiona Coghlan, Sophie Spence, Claire Molloy and Joy Neville.
The former Ireland flanker and the rest of her comrades have had to watch as the fortunes of this Irish team have nosedived.
There have been many low points along the way - the disastrous home World Cup in 2017, failure to even quality for the global showpiece four years later, Anthony Eddy's departure, the players' letter to the Government and the subsequent fall-out with the IRFU. There was the changing facilities fiasco at Energia Park in the midst of all of it. Last season, Ireland finished with the Six Nations wooden spoon for the first time since 2004.
Poor performances and negative headlines have been a depressingly regular reality for some time now.
But last weekend's stirring display on French soil suggested that this long-suffering Irish team - after almost 10 years in the doldrums - might finally be turning the corner.
Yes, it was yet another defeat but the fitness, determination, defensive grit and cohesion of Scott Bemand's new-look side suggested something positive is brewing.
Fitzpatrick was certainly heartened by what she saw last weekend.
'I thought it was very encouraging,' said the Tallaght native, who retired from the international game in 2018 after winning 26 caps for her country.
'If the players were given that scoreline before the game, they would have definitely taken it.
'France were not at their best but I think there was a huge difference between that game and last season's game.
'The tenacity and organisation in their defence was a huge improvement. Declan Danaher (Ireland defence coach) has made a huge difference, clearly. His enthusiasm for defence really comes across and it has instilled an enthusiasm, a want and a real desire in the players to defend, which is really good because last year we would have seen soft tackles or maybe poor positioning in defence.
'That was a huge positive in the French game and a huge thing to bring forward because France are one of the better teams.
'Those defensive tackles, the effort that was being put in... there were often two-player tackles. Aoife Wafer was making big hits.
Edel McMahon, too. And that was all done without Sam Monaghan, another big hitter.
'So, it looks really promising.' This afternoon's clash with Italy will be instructive. If Ireland can build on what they delivered in Le Mans last weekend then people can begin to get excited again. We've witnessed a few false dawns through the years when it comes to this team.
'It's one game and I don't think France played their best game either,' Fitzpatrick warned.
However, Ireland were playing against a world-class side with world-class players. Even with that, Ireland were dominant in defence.
'They looked organised, which was a big thing. They weren't looking around to see who was going to make a decision. They were really clear on their roles in defence.
'The only thing was the French try around the pillar (of the ruck). That was the only time we saw a real weakness and that was just an individual who was too eager. An individual error as opposed to a system error so I thought that was quite promising.
'It's probably too early to be talking about whether this team has turned the corner but I'm very excited to see them play this weekend because against Italy they'll have much more opportunities to attack as well.
TALKING GOOD GAME: Paula Fitzpatrick on pundit duty 'Because of the strategy against France, they ended up kicking quite a lot. There were some issues with execution there but I think it was the right decision a lot of the time in order to gain territory, but it meant that a lot of their possession was in their own half.
'I'd love to see them get some sustained possession in the Italian half, to really see them on the offensive because I think they did some really good stuff from broken play, like Brittany Hogan making breaks up the pitch. There was some really good individual efforts.
'I'd love to see what their attack is like when they really get a chance to be a cohesive unit and pairing that with the really strong defensive effort.
'I think we could be looking at a really decent performance.'
If the home side manage to get
Beibhinn Parsons and Eve Higgins into the game a bit more this afternoon then Ireland will be in business.
'When we saw Beibhinn or Eve get the ball last weekend, they weren't in space. They were doing what they could in limited space.
'We never really got the chance to see them attacking out wide and taking players on in a foot race.
'Hopefully we'll see that this time. Italy are a great team and they have some excellent backs that will really put Ireland under pressure as well, but I do think they should have a bit more time and space this weekend.'
There has been plenty of recent talk about progress, positivity and rebuilding for the future. But this is a results business and a first Six Nations win since 2022, breaking a six-game losing streak in the process, would do wonders for a squad which has experienced many low ebbs.
'It would be huge,' Fitzpatrick agreed.
'As we all know, competitions like the Six Nations are all about momentum. So having that good performance against France, they would have been quite encouraged by that performance.
'Italy are becoming a really strong force within the Six Nations now. They've taken some big scalps over the years and they've really tested England and France at times as well.
'To get a win against them would be massive and would really set them up for Wales and Scotland as well. They've targeted their three homes games as ones they could potentially win. It would definitely set them up for the rest of the tournament.'
After years of neglect and lip service, there is a sense that the penny has finally dropped with the IRFU. This Irish team are finally being resourced properly. Bemand is leading a top-class coaching team. Proper supports in areas of nutrition, logistics and strength and conditioning are in place. The training facilities in Abbotstown are world-class.
The current contract model - a mixture of full-time, hybrid and Sevens - is not ideal. But it's been a positive development nonetheless.
'I think so much progress has been made,' said Fitzpatrick.
'The contracts were huge and I know that there are some players who still have dual careers.
'There's three different set-ups.
There's players who are full-time outside and then coming in, there's people working part-time and coming in and there's players who are fully centralised.
'Then you have the group over in England and there's the Sevens group as well.
'It sounds from the outside that they're more understanding of all the different situations.
'The contracts have been huge. To be able to play professional rugby is huge so I think they are getting a lot of things right.'
The big challenge in the coming years is creating a pathway which provides proper preparation at club level. The current mixture of the Women's AIL, interpro series and a fairly benign Celtic Challenge Cup is not really fit for purpose.
'I think there are huge issues in the AIL with the standard,' Fitzpatrick added.
'It was the same in the Celtic Challenge Cup. They were playing against Scottish and Welsh development teams whereas we were playing our full international teams against those players so, from the outside, it might have looked encouraging that we were beating these teams from
Scotland and Wales but when you look at the level of player that we were playing against, we're not playing at a high enough standard. We need to bridge that gap between club rugby and international rugby.
'There really needs to be stronger tests at club rugby.
'We'd love all our players to be playing in Ireland and really strengthening the AIL but at the moment the standard is higher in the English Premiership. So, it makes sense for a lot of players to travel and play over there.'
Plenty to ponder, indeed. For now, a win against Italy would be most welcome. Is there finally some light at the end of the tunnel? This afternoon's clash in the capital will reveal a lot.
I'd love to see what their attack is like when they get a chance

Graphic


TALKING A GOOD GAME: Paula Fitzpatrick on pundit dutyLEAP OF FAITH: Mana? Feleu of France wins a line-out against Ireland last week; Paula Fitzpatrick takes on Italy in the 2018 Six Nations, below

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Lipstick lift: make-up really does boost mental wellness
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 28
Length: 381 words
Byline: Roger Dobson
Body


COCO Chanel may have been right when she said: 'If you're sad, add more lipstick.'
A study has found that wearing make-up can have a marked effect on improving women's mood and even helps with maintaining good mental health.
Researchers recruited 240 volunteers who did not normally wear make-up, asking half to slap it on three or more times a week while the rest went without.
They found those wearing make-up saw symptoms of depression drop significantly, stress levels halve and self-esteem soar.
One theory they put forward is the 'camouflage effect' of make-up helps the wearer with self-image worries by changing their appearance while stimulating feelings of attractiveness which elevates their mood.
'Our results show that the frequent use of make-up can contribute to effective and sustainable improvement in wellbeing and mental health,' the research team reported in the scientific journal Dermatology And Therapy. 'Make-up has the potential to contribute to the improvement of depressive symptoms, mood swings and low self-esteem.'
Half of the women in the study were given a make-up kit with 16 items, including lipstick, eye shadow, blusher and foundation, and given expert advice on its application.
measures 20 different feelings and emotions - before and after the experiment.
All the recruits completed a psychological test for depression - the Zung scale, which in feelings make-Wearing 55% drop cortisol marker
The women who wore make-up recorded an average 8.3% drop in scores for symptoms of depression. There was also a 25% increase in feelings of self-regard among make-up users.
Wearing make-up also led to a 55% drop in levels of the hormone cortisol in saliva. Cortisol is a marker of stress levels and a trigger for episodes of depression. 'Regular use of make-up was associated with lower incidence of mild depression and lower intensity of depressive symptoms,' said the research team from Sao Paulo in Brazil and Queensland and Curtin Universities in Australia.
Professor Carmine Pariante, Professor of Biological Psychiatry at the Institute of Psychiatry and King's College London, said: 'Make-up is a type of self-care and, as shown in this study, helps with depression. The benefit is clinically significant, as shown by using the Zung scale.'
news@mailonsunday.ie

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Lynam impresses in Westmeath triumph
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 62
Length: 1025 words
Byline: Mark Gallagher
Body


0-13 2-10
Down Westmeath
IN THE most consequential match that will be played at Croke Park this weekend, Westmeath pulled off a bit of a surprise by proving themselves to be more gritty ? and being more adept at managing a game ? than their Mourne opponents and being crowned Division three champions.
Of course, this may all be irrelevant come the summer. This game might mean something in the championship or it might not. But last night, Sam McCartan's impressive performance from wing back and Jonathan Lynam's brace of goals were enough for Dessie Dolan's team last night.
As GAA president Jarlath Burns said in his speech, this Westmeath team know how to win at Croke Park, and that is what they showed last night. Jonathan Lynam found the net twice, the two decisive scores in the end. His first goal came from an old-fashioned high ball into the square, which brought the team right into a game that Down had been controlling.
Lynam's second goal, coming when the game was delicately poised with 10 minutes to go, settled a game that had looked like it was edging to extra-time. This was a competitive game, played out to a sparse enough crowd, but it is supposed to mean something. The top team in Division three should be guaranteeing their place in the race for Sam Maguire, although both of these teams still might be eyeing a place in the provincial final.
Down started the brighter and were a couple of points ahead early on but Luke Loughlin's high ball was punched into the net by Lynam and so began an entertaining arm-wrestle of a match that saw Down a point ahead at halftime, 0-8 to 1-4. Pat Havern and Liam Kerr kicking a couple of corkers for Down.
McCartan was the outstanding player, scoring four points from wing-back although Havern did kick seven free frees while Kerr also kicked three from play. And Westmeath came with a game-plan to restrict Down's goal chances, The second half went to and fro until Lynam fired to the net. In many ways, the Ulster team were disappointing, especially for a side playing for their Sam Maguire lives, although they will be someone that nobody wants to meet in the Tailteann Cup.
As for Dessie Dolan and Westmeath, without John Heslin and Kierna Martin, they looked a side that nobody will want to meet in the championship. Some rare silverware in Croker is a boost for this team and they will be eyeing a Leinster final place.
Earlier, Laois made it a good day for the midlanders as they claimed the Division 4 title with a comprehensive win over Leitrim.
Ben Dempsey's first-half goal gave the Leinster side the upper hand, though Leitrim rallied bravely and reduced the gap to two points in the third quarter before goals from Eoin Lowry and Paul Kingston wrapped it up for Laois.
Laois reeled off an unanswered 2-6 in total from the 48th minute as Leitrim failed to score again after that mini-revival.
It means that Leitrim will head into next weekend's Connacht SFC quarter-final clash with Sligo following a chastening 14-point defeat. But Laois have capped promotion to Division 3 with the title outright and will approach their Leinster SFC quarter-final against Offaly on 13 April in confident mood.
Derry finally found a way to shake off Tyrone's feisty challenge and claim the Allianz League Division 2B title at Owenbeg.
Going into the final ten minutes, the sides were level, but the Oak Leafers pulled away, and a 1-04 salvo saw off their Ulster neighbours. WESTMEATH: J Daly; D Scahill, C Drumm, J Gonoud; J Dolan, D Lynch, S McCartan; R Connellan, A McCormack; J Lynam, R O'Toole, C Dillon(M Whittaker 54); L Loughlin(L Dolan 51), S Smith(S Baker 50), R Forde.
SCORERS: Jonathan Lynam 2-0, Sam McCartan 0-4 (0-2 45), Robbie Forde 0-3 (0-2f), Luke Loughlin 0-1 (0-1f), David Lynch 0-1, Conor Dillon 0-1.
DOWN: J O'Hare; P Fegan, R McEvoy, C Doherty; F McElroy, P Laverty, D Guinness; J Flynn, O Murdock; M Rooney, L Kerr, R Johnston; D Magill, P Havern, J Guinness(S Annett 50).
SCORERS: Pat Havern 0-7 (0-7f), Liam Kerr 0-3, Odhran Murdock 0-1, Miceal Rooney 0-1, Oisin Savage 0-1.
REFEREE: B Tiernan (Dublin).
GAA scoreboard ALLIANZ NFL Division 3 final Down . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0-13. Westmeath. . . . . . . . . . . . . 2-10 Division 4 final Laois. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3-14. Leitrim . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 0-9 ALLIANZ NHL Division 2B final Derry. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1-14. Tyrone. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1-8 VERY CAMOGIE LEAGUES Division 1A Waterford. . . . . . . . . . . . 0-13. Kilkenny. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2-10 Galway. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .0-14. Cork. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .0-9 Clare. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .0-7. Tipperary. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .4-19 P W D L Dif Pts Tipperary. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 4. 0. 1. 36. 12 Galway. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 4. 0. 1. 18. 12 Cork. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 3. 0. 2. 5. 9 Waterford. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .5. 2. 0. 3. 10. 6 Kilkenny. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .5. 2. 0. 3. -3. 6 Clare. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 0. 0. 5. -66. 0 Division 1B Limerick. . . . . . . . . . . . . 3-11. Wexford. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .1-15 Dublin. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .0-16. Antrim. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .0-9 Kerry. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .2-8. Down. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .0-14 P W D L Dif Pts Wexford. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 4. 0. 1. 90. 12 Dublin. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 4. 0. 1. 44. 12 Limerick . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .5. 3. 0. 2. 36. 9 Antrim. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 3. 0. 2. -40. 9 Down. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 0. 1. 4. -59. 1 Kerry. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5. 0. 1. 4. -71. 1 Division 2A Meath. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .2-13. Offaly. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .0-5 Westmeath. . . . . . . . . . .5-9. Derry. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1-9 Carlow. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4-11. Cavan. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2-10

Graphic


VICTORY: Kevin Maguire lifts the cupBATTLE: Ronan O'Toole of Westmeath against John McGovern of Down

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Marathon man Son the saviour for Spurs again
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 75
Length: 695 words
Byline: Matt Barlow
Body


Tottenham Kabore 51 og, Son 86 21 Luton Chong 3AFTER covering more than 14,000 air miles and scoring goals in Bangkok and Seoul, you could have forgiven Son Heung-min if weariness was creeping into his muscles as the clock ticked into the 86th minute.
Even so, he summoned the energy for one more run. Tottenham had been hammering away at Luton's depleted team for much of the second half, having gone behind early in the game and then equalising soon after half-time.
But the visitors had been on the attack, searching for a winner when Son collected the ball, drove forward, released Timo Werner and kept on running. Werner found a change of pace and delivered a low cross from the left. Brennan Johnson nudged it back towards his captain and Son found the net with the help of a deflection.
It was his 160th Spurs goal, lifting him clear of Cliff Jones into fifth in the club's all-time list. Relief washed around the stadium. Victory felt crucial in the race for the Champions League after a heavy defeat at Fulham last time out.
Ange Postecoglou applauded his players for their patience and refusal to give up. 'Outstanding,' said the Spurs boss. 'He [Son] has been a brilliant footballer for this club for a long time and hopefully for many years to come.
'He was really unlucky with a couple of chances and some good saves, but when we needed him he was there. I'm sure he feels tired. They are long trips and there's a time difference, but he never looks for those clutches. He gets on with it. We try to look after him and the proof is there in what he produces.'
Luton went ahead inside three minutes with a goal on the break created by former Spurs winger Andros Townsend, who won possession deep in his own half.
Townsend eased past Yves Bissouma and found Ross Barkley, who displayed the composure to resist the urge to go for goal and instead slid a pass to his left where Tahith Chong applied the finish.
Luton boss Rob Edwards punched the air. His team have scored in 18 successive league games and there were signs his game plan, tracking Tottenham's blur of movement with man-to-man marking, was working.
Still, there is great attacking quality in Postecoglou's team. Werner wriggled clear but pulled the first wide of the far post. The German was dangerous yet erratic as ever in front of goal.
Then Son skipped past keeper Thomas Kaminski only to see his shot strike the inside of one post, fizz square across the line, hit the other and bounce out. Werner lashed the rebound at goal but Issa Kabore made a block. Then Pape Matar Sarr took aim, beat Kaminski and found Teden Mengi on the line to clear. Luton protected their lead until half-time.
Spurs trailed at the break, which is something of a bad habit. In seven home games since the turn of the year, they have not led at the interval. Some home fans booed.
Johnson came on and made an impact, just as against Crystal Palace in the previous home game, forcing the equaliser after a crisp one-two with Pedro Porro and low cross which was turned into his own net by Kabore.
Kaminski made important saves, including one from Johnson, who thought he had scored as the ball spun along the line. Alfie Doughty hooked it clear and the goalline graphics showed one more revolution would have taken it in.
Jordan Clark forced a fine save from Guglielmo Vicario, but it was Son who settled the game. 'Massive for us,' said Tottenham's captain. 'I was really frustrated but I wanted to stay calm and not show too much emotion.'
Heartbreak for Luton, who slip into the drop zone on goal difference. TOTTENHAM (4-3-3): Vicario 6.5; Porro 7.5, Romero 6.5, Dragusin 6, Udogie 6; Sarr 7 (Lo Celso 68min, 6), Bissouma 6.5 (Richarlison 85), Maddison 6 (Bentancur 68, 6); Kulusevski 6 (Johnson 46, 7.5), Son 8 (Hojbjerg 88), Werner 7.
Scorers: Kabore 51 (og), Son 86. Booked: Hojbjerg, Lo Celso.
Manager: Ange Postecoglou 7. LUTON (4-2-3-1): Kaminski 7.5; Kabore 6.5, Burke 7 (Hashioka 46, 6), Mengi 7.5, Doughty 6.5 (Woodrow 83); Barkley 6, Mpanzu 6; Townsend 6, Berry 6.5 (Clark 64, 6), Chong 7 (Onyedinma 74); Morris 5.5.
Scorer: Chong 3. Booked: Barkley, Burke, Mpanzu, Mengi. Manager: Rob Edwards 6.5.
Referee: Jarred Gillett 6.

Graphic


CAPTAIN FANTASTIC: Son scored the winning goal as Spurs fought back

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Mayhem and mistakes as Toon win thriller; Barnes the hero, Phillips the villain in tale of two subs
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 76,77
Length: 1019 words
Byline: Craig Hope
Body


Newcastle Isak 6 (pen), 77 (pen), Barnes 83, 90 43
West Ham Antonio 21, Kudus 45+10, Bowen 48
HERE was an outrageous game of many things, but the story of two impact subs perhaps best cuts through the mayhem. Harvey Barnes and Kalvin Phillips. When they arrived within two minutes of each other midway through the second half, West Ham were leading 3-1 and looked comfortable.
What followed was uncomfortable in the extreme for Phillips and, more so, the manager who brought him on, David Moyes. The England midfielder ? soon to be former international, on this evidence ? certainly made an impact. He gave away a penalty for 2-3, was not close enough to creator Alexander Isak for 3-3 and was turned far too easily by scorer Barnes for 4-3 in the 90th minute. The roof would have caved in on
Phillips had it not been sent into orbit by the home supporters.
Match-winner Barnes also netted the equaliser and, like Moyes, Eddie Howe's substitution had changed the game, even if it was enforced when Miguel Almiron was injured 10 minutes after coming on. But credit is due for his earlier changes, Elliot Anderson and Lewis Hall entering at 1-3 and immediately injecting energy and forward purpose. By attacking, it meant Newcastle did not have to defend, and that is a smart tactic for them right now.
Moyes responded. On 69 minutes, he introduced Phillips at the expense of forward Michail
Antonio, who had been excellent, a nuisance throughout. He scored West Ham's equaliser in the 21st minute ? they trailed to Isak's early penalty ? when he finished with force from Lucas Paqueta's delicate ball over the top.
Newcastle's defenders, then, were relieved to see the back of Antonio. By contrast, their forward players were thrilled to see Phillips. Newcastle's recruitment this season has not been great, but the decision to abandon their interest in the Manchester City outcast in January was a shrewd one. At least he contributed to a Newcastle victory here.
Moyes did not refer to Phillips by name afterwards, instead talking repeatedly about 'the change'. The change, just as much as those of Newcastle, changed the game. It could also change the respective seasons of two rival clubs competing for European places beyond the Champions League.
It could yet change the future of the managers, too. This was significant for Howe, who was booked for the first time in his managerial career when sprinting down the touchline following the goal that would prove the winner.
This has been a bruising season for Newcastle and their boss, and a few more blows would no doubt have landed had they lost for a 13th time, especially given the calamity of their defending in falling behind.
He was, then, happy to accept a yellow card. Moments later and his winger Anthony Gordon was receiving a red, picking up a second booking for time-wasting. He will miss Tuesday's visit of former club Everton, but that disappointment was lost amid the euphoria of the finish.
Gordon was up against England team-mate Jarrod Bowen, and both enhanced their Euros credentials. The former won two penalties from which Isak converted and, at the death, it was his muscle to get the better of Kurt Zouma and neat lay-off to Barnes that presented the chance for the winning goal.
There was still work to be done, but Barnes made light work of Phillips, stepping away from his opponent before lashing beyond the reach of Lukasz Fabianski from 20 yards. Seven minutes earlier he had finished through the legs of the keeper having been sprung clear by Isak.
The goal that signalled the start of the comeback came in the 77th minute, when Gordon nicked ahead of Phillips and the sub's clumsy leg felled the Newcastle man in the area.
From that point on there was an inevitability to the scoreline being reversed, such was the home momentum and noise inside St James' Park. If Moyes was screaming in despair on the touchline, you would not have heard it.
His team looked set for victory when, in first-half injury time, the outstanding Mohammed Kudus lashed in from Bowen's pull-back.
Then, two minutes into the second half, Kudus skipped down the left and freed Bowen, all alone in the centre of the pitch. His finish was never in doubt ? his 19th goal of the season ? and the forward did not deserve to end up on the losing side.
He did so because of a massive miscalculation by his management team, and it was telling when he refused to slap hands with Hammers coach Kevin Nolan after full-time. The change had changed everything.
NEWCASTLE (4-3-3): Dubravka 4; Livramento 5.5 (Almiron 57min, 5; Barnes 67, 8.5), Lascelles 6 (Krafth 17, 4; Hall 57, 7), Schar 5, Burn 5.5; Longstaff 5.5, Guimaraes 7, Willock 5 (Anderson 57, 7.5); Murphy 6.5, Isak 8, Gordon 7.5. Scorers: Isak 6 (pen), 77 (pen), Barnes 83, 90. Booked: Isak, Howe. Sent off: Gordon.
Manager: Eddie Howe 7.5 WEST HAM (4-2-3-1): Areola 6 (Fabianski 45, 6); Coufal 5.5 (Ings 90+3), Zouma 5, Mavropanos 6.5, Emerson 5.5; Soucek 6, Ward-Prowse 6 (Johnson 83); Bowen 7.5, Paqueta 7, Kudus 8; Antonio 7.5 (Phillips 69, 6). Scorers: Antonio 21, Kudus 45+10, Bowen 48. Booked: Soucek.
Manager: David Moyes 4. Referee: R Jones (Merseyside) 6.
CALAMITY KALVIN
KALVIN PHILLIPS' nightmare start to life at West Ham continued after he gave away the penalty that sparked Newcastle's dramatic comeback. Here's how his seven games have gone so far. Game 1 v Bournemouth: Three minutes into his debut, he's sold short with a pass and gives the ball away, gifting Dominic Solanke a goal.
Subbed after 68 minutes.
Game 2 v Man Utd: Comes off the bench with 18 minutes left of a 3-0 defeat.
Game 3 v Arsenal: Comes on for the second half with Hammers already 4-0 down. They lose 6-0.
Game 4 v Nottm Forest: Sent off for two yellow cards in three minutes as West Ham fall to a 2-0 defeat at strugglers. Game 5 v Everton: Comes on as a 66th-minute substitute in a 3-1 win at Goodison Park.
Game 6 v Burnley: Subbed at half-time with West Ham 2-0 down. Without him, they come back to draw 2-2.
Game 7 v Newcastle: After being dropped by England last week, he's brought on with West Ham 3-1 up. Gives away a penalty and they lose 4-3.

Graphic


GOALS GALORE: Isak put the home side ahead with an early penalty, but Antonio levels and Kudus fires West Ham in front before the breakACTION PACKED: Bowen (above) puts West Ham 3-1 up, but after sub Phillips fouls Gordon, Isak's penalty (above) sets up a sensational finishELATION: A jubilant Barnes runs off to celebrate his late winner amid delirious scenes at St James' Park

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



McEntee'hiding a ng asylum reality'; Minister accused of releasing obscure and incomprehensible figures for deportation of bogus applicants
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 30,31
Length: 962 words
Byline: John Drennan
Body


JUSTICE Minister Helen McEntee came under renewed pressure this weekend when she was accused of releasing 'obscure' and 'incomprehensible' figures relating to the deportation of bogus asylum seekers.
According to the figures released to Independent TD Michael McNamara, Ms McEntee, pictured right, said that 857 'deportation orders were signed in 2023'. She also confirmed that 317 people, 'were removed from the State under various processes in 2023', but some of this number relates to deportation orders from previous years. Of the 857 orders signed last year - in the breakdown of figures provided by the minister - she acknowledged that only 52 of these were 'enforced' by the Garda National Immigration Bureau.
A further 21 deportations were listed under the heading 'EU removal', which generally refers to people who have committed a crime or are seen as a threat to public safety.
The majority of the deportations (213) were described as 'voluntary returns', which refers to people who have left the jurisdiction before a deportation order has been issued.
Mr McNamara - a barrister with experience of immigration law - said he could not understand 'how this is included in the figures on deportation orders, given that the whole point of a voluntary return is to avoid a deportation order'.
The Clare TD was also bewildered by the classification of a further 28 deportations - described as 'selfdeportation' - which refers to asylum applicants that the department says have voluntarily left the jurisdiction, after exhausting all legal processes and being served with an order to leave the State.
Mr McNamara told the Irish Mail on Sunday: 'It is not clear, for example what proofs are required for self-deportation or how that operates.'
According to the figures supplied by Ms McEntee, a further three deportation orders were the result of a 'D III transfer'.
This refers to the Dublin III Regulation 2013 that covers asylum applicants who have entered Ireland from another European country. Under the regulation they can be returned to that country, but only if the process is carried out within six months of their arrival here.
Mr McNamara said the only clear data provided by the minister, 'are the Garda National Immigration Bureau and the EU Removal figures'.
The Independent TD said of the responses provided by Ms McEntee: 'Nothing in these figures would build any confidence that the current deportation system is in any way robust. It is not even comprehensible, let alone robust.
'They simply do not add up. There is an utter absence of clarity in the figures, which raises real questions as to why the figures are so obscure.
'Even a barrister with experience in immigration law could not make head or tail of that response,' he added.
The war of words over the deportation figures comes amid speculation that Ms McEntee - who was once regarded as a potential successor to the outgoing Taoiseach Leo Varadkar - could be demoted from Justice to less highprofile Cabinet position, or even a junior ministry.
Ms McEntee's difficulty also comes as new figures confirm a significant rise in the number of asylum seekers arriving in the country in recent weeks.
Speaking at the launch of the Government's new immigration plan this week, Integration Minister Roderic O'Gorman promised that a new 'comprehensive accommodation strategy' will see 'a move away from full reliance on private providers and towards a core of State-owned accommodation, delivering 14,000 State-owned beds by 2028'.
But, again, serious questions are being raised about the proposed strategy's capacity to meet the continuing increase of asylum seekers arriving here. While there has been a significant fall in the number of Ukrainian refugees arriving in Ireland in recent weeks, there has been a steep rise in the numbers of asylum applicants who are seeking international protection.
Since the Russian invasion of their country in February 2022, more than 104,400 Ukrainians have arrived in Ireland.
According to latest data from the Department of Justice, the average daily arrivals from Ukraine dropped from 74 in November to 47 in January, falling to 25 a day last month.
But this fall in war refugees from the eastern European country is being offset by a corresponding rise in the number of asylum seekers arriving here. New International Protection Accommodation Services (IPAS) figures confirm that 479 asylum seekers landed in the country between March 11 and March 17, an average of 68 a day. If this trend continues, more than 24,000 asylum seekers will arrive here this year. This is a significant increase on previous years. The number of asylum seekers coming here rose by almost 8,000 between 2022 and 2023, from 18,534 in 2022 to 26,371 last year. One senior Government source said of the Coalition's response to the escalating immigration crisis: 'Under Roderic, we are running to a standstill. The increased 14,000 places will only serve to maintain the current crisis.'
Aontú leader Peadar Tñibin also criticised the State's response: 'This is another example of Government complicity with chaos from monitoring deportations to the appalling spectacle where tents on the side of the road are now a permanent feature of refugee provision. Minister O'Gorman's new plan represents nothing more than a continuation of unmanaged chaos.'
Responding to Mr McNamara's criticism, a Department of Justice spokesman said: 'In responding to the Deputy's question the Minister was endeavouring to give as comprehensive a reply as possible and the Department will clarify any aspect of the information provided as required.
'The number of removals in any given year can include removals on foot of deportation orders made in previous years.'
news@mailonsunday.ie
'These figures simply do not add up'

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



My jumbo love for elephants; The late Paul O'Grady's final TV series sees him helping to save these gentle 'soulful' animals
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 27
Length: 396 words
Byline: Vicki Power
Body


year ago, the sudden death of Paul O'Grady at the age of just 67 left us mourning the loss of one of the most
A beloved TV personalities and activists. The passion Paul (above) had for animals was evident in his series For The Love Of Dogs, and the fact that he left (EURO)900,000 to animal charities in his will.
So it seems a fitting legacy that his last TV series is also animal themed. Paul O'Grady's Great Elephant Adventure is a moving tribute to him, and seeing Paul interact with vulnerable elephants will remind us of his unique affinity with our four-legged friends.
Filmed in December 2022, just three months before he died, the series sees Paul travel to Thailand and Laos to visit sanctuaries rehabilitating elephants that have been ill-treated in the cruel tourist and logging industries. Asian elephants are an endangered species: Thailand's population has fallen by 75 per cent in the past 35 years with only 7,000 remaining, while Laos's is estimated at between 500-1,000, just one third of the numbers two decades ago.
'Whisper it quietly, folks,' he says conspiratorially in the documentary, 'but my love of elephants runs dogs a close second. They're so soulful; there's wisdom in their eyes.'
His passion is evident in the bond he forms with Lotus, a rescued elephant at Boon Lott's Elephant Sanctuary in Sukhothai in Thailand. It's run by Katherine Connor, an English woman who quit her London life 20 years ago to set it up.
'When Paul arrived, Lotus made a beeline for him,' she recalls, saying it's unusual for elephants to have such an instant connection with humans. 'It happens once in a blue moon. And Paul adopted Lotus. He would send me money for her every month before he died. He just had the biggest heart.'
Paul also visits Thailand's largest elephant rescue centre, the Elephant Nature Park, which houses 120 of the majestic beasts, many with injuries from a life of maltreatment. There, he nearly came a cropper while playing with oneyear-olds Chobah and Pyimee.
'They were running around like lunatics but don't know their own strength and nearly knocked Paul over,' says the show's producer
Rory Dalziel. 'Luckily, we managed to pull Paul out of the way.' Rory says they were planning more documentaries before Paul's death, which makes this final outing all the more poignant.
?Vicki Power ? Paul O'Grady's Great Elephant Adventure, today, 8pm, UTV.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



New anti-ageing solutions to add moisture to dry and thirsty skin
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 10,11
Length: 866 words
Byline: Laura Bermingham
Body


ANTI-AGEING SKINCARE The Ordinary Retinal 0.2% Emulsion (EURO)17.90, www.theordinary.com/en-ie The Ordinary's five retinol options start with the mild Retinol 0.2% in Squalane and the Granactive Retinoid 2% Emulsion to the Retinol 0.5% in Squalane, Retinol 1% in Squalane and Granactive 5% in Squalane which offer quicker and better results. This new Retinal 0.2% Emulsion is now The Ordinary's most advanced option and costs (EURO)17.90. It's a good idea to work your way up from the lowest concentration of retinol so your skin becomes accustomed to it.
ANTI-AGEING SKINCARE Farmacy Beauty Honey Halo Cream (EURO)50.60, Space NK and Cult Beauty Designed for dry to very dry skin, Farmacy Beauty's Honey Halo is a rich and nourishing cream that offers maximum hydration and comfort to skin that feels taut. In a base of shea butter and vitamin E, the day and night cream has a potent blend of ceramides to reinforce weakened skin, plus a buckwheat honey blend with propolis and royal jelly to attract moisture into the skin and hold it there. Fig extract makes the skin feel smooth and supple.
ANTI-AGEING SKINCARE Skin Proud Daily Barrier Support Cream (EURO)14.95, Dunnes Stores and online This Daily Support Cream is one of Skin Proud's squalane offerings, all under (EURO)16. Deeply hydrating and comforting, squalane is often paired with anti-ageing retinol (see The Ordinary top left) because it helps boost and retain moisture in the skin. This cream is blended with niacinamide, ceramides, vitamin E, hyaluronic acid, squalane and avocado oil. Despite sounding like a heavier cream, it is lightweight and perfect for hot skin or weather or as part of an antiageing regime that includes retinol.
NEW MAKEUP
Dior Forever Glow Maximiser, (EURO)41/six shades, www.dior.com/en-ie and Brown Thomas Willow Smith has just been signed up as a face of Dior and this Glow Maximiser multi-use highlighter is where she will appear first in the brand's campaigns. The liquid highlighter can be used on the face, body and eyelids for a touch of luminosity wherever you fancy it. There are six shades (one of them clear) and the colours range from Pink to Rosy, Gold and Bronze. A wanded highlighter makes it easier to control the liquid.
NEW MAKEUP Westman Atelier Lip Suede Matte Lipstick (EURO)55, Brown Thomas exclusively Makeup artist Gucci Westman is much-loved by her celebrity clients including Jennifer Aniston, Gwyneth Paltrow and Anne Hathaway. The veteran MUA created Westman Atelier a few years ago, and it's possibly the most high-end brand that is clean and natural. This new launch is a 10-piece lipstick line that offers saturated matte colour and comfort with the addition of vitamins C and E, kaolin clay and hyaluronic acid to smooth out lines and keep the lips hydrated all day long.
NEW MAKEUP MAC M?A?Cximal Silky Matte Lipstick in Velvet Teddy (EURO)30/40 shades, MAC counters MAC has reformulated its classic Matte Lipstick line so it is more hydrating, comfortable and durable for 12 hours. All the favourites are there ? Ruby Woo, Whirl, Mehr and Velvet Teddy, and the new formula, so adored for its matte finish, should delight MAC fans. The brand has added a creamy blend of coconut oil, organic shea butter and organic cocoa butter that conditions and nourishes lips.
Between the great nudes, browns and reds there is a Silky Matte Lipstick for everyone's skin tone and taste.
REPAIRING HAIR SOLUTIONS L'Oréal Professionnel Metal Detox Pre-Shampoo Treatment (EURO)35, salons nationwide Metal Detox as an in-salon treatment and at-home shampoo and conditioner has been a monster success for L'Oréal's salon-exclusive range. Designed to remove damaging metals from the hair from hard water in our showers and taps, Metal Detox refreshes hair colour and prevents fade. This new Pre-Shampoo Treatment is used on wet hair before shampoo and it goes a step further, repairing one million micro-breaks on the surface of the hair shaft and inside it for healthier and smoother hair.
REPAIRING HAIR SOLUTIONS Joico Defy Damage KBOND20 Protective Masque (EURO)35.90, salons and online beauty retailers Joico's new power masque for the hair has been created to help fight against daily aggressors like environmental pollution, heat styling and UV light. The masque helps hair health by repairing broken bonds inside the hair shaft and reducing breakage and frizz. Rich but lightweight, the masque can be used once or twice weekly for two to five minutes to restore damaged lengths and boost shine and softness. An intense masque is necessary to protect the hair for anyone using heated styling tools.
REPAIRING HAIR SOLUTIONS Act + Acre Microbiome Cooling Scalp Serum (EURO)70, stockists nationwide and www.zolobeauty.com Irish brand Act + Acre has been blazing a trail through beauty and it's now stocked in prestigious stores like Sephora. This new Scalp Serum is for anyone with dandruff, psoriasis, eczema and dermatitis on the scalp. Instantly cooling, it contains peppermint oil and fireweed extract to help clear flakes and excess sebum, plus an amino M3 complex to soothe reactive skin. Just two to three pipettes are needed daily to relieve symptoms. Apply to a clean damp or dry scalp.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



New building for refugees may be halted by legal battle
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 31
Length: 491 words
Byline: Valerie Hanley
Body


A NEW State-run accommodation centre for asylum seekers may be blocked by a pending legal battle, the Irish Mail on Sunday can reveal.
The 40-acre plot of land at Crooksling, Co. Wicklow, is a key part of the plan unveiled by Integration Minister Roderic O'Gorman this week, to provide accommodation for 35,000 asylum seekers over the next four years.
But the contract signed by the minister to lease the land from the HSE may not be valid due to a pending legal case.
According to Independent Wicklow councillor Gerry O'Neill, legal documents say that the land was donated to the State, provided it was only used for the sick and the elderly.
Mr O'Neill and some of his colleagues now want a meeting with Mr O'Gorman and Health Minister Stephen Donnelly, in relation to the plans for the centre on the former St Brigid's nursing-home complex, that closed four years ago.
Cllr O'Neill told the MoS: 'We are meeting with our legal advisors next week and what we are basing our arguments on is a Deed of Trust which states that the land was gifted and can only be used for the sick and the elderly.
'We have been having this row for years with the HSE. What we are dealing with here is land grabbing and bully-boy tactics by the HSE. The site has been lying idle for four years and the HSE has spent a fortune on security. The HSE is not entitled to lease the land and they are not entitled to use it for refugees. How can they give a lease for land they don't own?'
Mr O'Neill said a legal document signed on May 5, 1856, by the Governors of St Patrick's Hospital and a John James Verschoyle specified how the land could be used. According to another document dated September 29, 1909, the site 'has the benefit of an indemnity against payment of the rent and other sums' as agreed between a Sarah W Campbell and others and The Joint Dublin Hospital Board.
The former nursing home building was set ablaze by suspected anti-migrant activists two months ago, due to claims that asylum seekers could be housed there.
It was also at the centre of a controversial plan over St Patrick's weekend, to move several asylum seekers - who had been camped in tents outside the International Protection Office on Dublin's Mount Street - to the site. Department of Integration officials this weekend insisted that they were not aware of any legal issues over the Department lease agreement with the HSE.
A spokesman said: 'The Department has signed a lease for the use of the Crooksling site. The Department is not aware of any impediment concerning the current use of the centre.'
A Department of Health spokeswoman said: 'The Department of Health has engaged with the Department of Children, Equality, Disability, Integration and Youth (DCEDIY) and with the Department of Housing over the course of 2022, 2023 and into 2024 in relation to the sourcing of properties which may be suitable for use in both the provision of housing and in providing accommodation for refugees.'

Graphic


ANGER: Our report on refugees being moved to the Crooksling site

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



New Dublin are just the same in all the ways that matter
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; OPINION, COLUMNS; Pg. 63
Length: 867 words
Byline: Marc? Sé
Body


AS WE stand on the brink of the championship, the chill that is sending a shiver down the spine of Gaelic football's chasing pack has nothing to do with the grim Irish spring climate.
There is a pervasive sense that Dublin have moved so far ahead of the rest that they have already thieved the season of its intrigue, killing all hope for others.
If you are hoping I have 10 reasons up my sleeve as to why that is not the case, then sorry to disappoint you but I have seen nothing out there to make me think any different.
My biggest fear is that by this evening, Dublin may have already extinguished the diminishing hope that this thing is not done before it has even started.
This is not just a league final today, this is a showdown between the best team in the land and the closest team to them.
Outside of Dublin, Derry are the only other team which can be said, definitively, to be a better version of themselves than they were 12 months ago.
They have gone from having an 18-man panel to a genuine 26-man one.
They have developed options in every line, from the likes of Diarmuid Baker and Donncha Gilmore in defence, the return of Emmett Bradley as a midfield reserve, and the addition of Cormac Murphy to attack.
Last weekend, Lachlan Murray, who has been deep in the fringes for the past few seasons, revealed his talent with a couple of booming points and a jaw-dropping goal, which saw him drop the ball from his right hand to his left foot to defy an acute angle.
You don't get scores like that without being gifted.
The view, and this was their greatest weakness up to this season, that they are a one-man band in attack has been dispelled, with Shane McGuigan now having a genuine supporting cast around him to lift that load.
Not only are Derry better this year, they have so much more to play for than Dublin this afternoon. A win today would not only validate the progress that has been made in Mickey Harte and Gavin Devlin's first season, it would give the team the belief they desperately need.
For all that they achieved under Rory Gallagher, the one thing missing was taking down a big scalp in a sudden-death Croke Park game.
Who have they beaten in that time? Offaly in a Division 3 final, Clare and Cork in All-Ireland quarter-finals? Not only would they not be able to dine out on those results, they would hardly be served by the local chippy van.
And look who they have lost to - Galway and Kerry in All-Ireland semi-finals and, lest we forget, last year's four-goal mauling by Dublin in the Division 2 final.
If Derry come up shy in another heavyweight contest in Croke Park, then it will be even more difficult to avoid coming to the conclusion that this is a very good team but one that ultimately is just not good enough.
So here is the thing - we know the team that has won back-toback Ulster championships are even better now, we know that their need is greater and, yet, we also know that they are not going to win today.
Worse than that, I fear that they may struggle to keep the ball kicked out to Dublin today and I would not be surprised if the All-Ireland champions don't win this by a double-digit margin.
Why am I so sure? Especially since Harte picked a Derry-lite team in the regular-round match which he knew they could afford to lose to Dublin?
The advantage gained by having Conor Glass available - and it will be a mouth-watering prospect to see him going head-to-head with Brian Fenton - is almost totally erased by the fact that Croke Park is Dublin's killing field.
And if they did feel a little vulnerable there for a couple of seasons, that was only because in 2021 and 2022 they were going through a transition process under Dessie Farrell that was misinterpreted as the beginning of the end.
The truth is that they are right at the start again. The line kept being peddled was that last year was all about getting the old band back together. But this feels more like it is a brand new band, capable of making the same sweet music.
Only rare talents, the likes of the David Cliffords and Peter Canavans, can go from zero to hero in inter-county football, the rest of us get to serve our apprenticeships.
Which means that this latest iteration of Dublin was hiding in plain sight, the introduction of the likes of Eoin Murchan, Lee Gannon, Seán Bugler and Colm Basquel over the past few years has revealed them to be blue-chip players. And the same thing is happening now with the likes of Theo Clancy, Cian Murphy, Ross McGarry, Killian McGinnis and Lorcan O'Dell.
And that is before you even name-check their generational talents like Fenton, Ciarán Kilkenny and Con O'Callaghan or consider that Stephen Cluxton, James Mc- Carthy, Michael Fitzsimons, Jack McCaffrey and Paul Mannion will come back into the frame.
More than anything, as personnel changes, the selfless mind-set remains the same, underlined by the way Basquel and O'Callaghan spurned clear chances to take their own goal last weekend to set up O'Dell and Niall Scully respectively because they had even a better one.
They are different, but they are the exact same.
The prize they will chase today is not the league title, but in reminding the team that is closest to them that they are as far away as ever.

Graphic


new generation: Dessie Farrellduel: Donncha Gilmore of Derry with Dublin's Lorcan O'Dell

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



No need to be coy, Roy offers something few can match
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 70
Length: 313 words
Byline: Philip Quinn
Body


IF THE FAI were looking for a box office manager like no other for the Republic of Ireland, all they had to do was say yes to Roy Keane.
Instead, the association's headhunters allowed the biggest personality in Irish sport, and one of Ireland's greatest ever footballers, to walk away.
At least they did before Gus Poyet hoppped on the bus yesterday. Maybe now there is no need to be coy about Roy.
That no permanent manager is in place when the FAI were preparing for life after Stephen Kenny as far back as last September, after Euro 2024 losses to
France and Holland, beggars belief.
That the FAI met Keane three times indicates two things.
Firstly, that Keane was a person of immense interest for the FAI and secondly, how much passion Keane had for the job.
The Keano of previous years wouldn't have displayed such patience. He'd have told the FAI to take a hike.
It's understood a difference of opinion about funding contributed to the impasse, which makes no sense because appointing Keane would have generated millions for the FAI, in sponsors and ticket sales.
By going cool on Keane, the opportunity for Irish football to regain ground in the battle for public acclaim has been lost by the FAI. Instead, the Rugby XV will continue to hold the high ground.
Keane might not have managed as a No 1 for 13 years but he was No 2 with Ireland from 2013 to 2018, the last successful period of the team. He is a football fanatic who attends far more games than the ones he sees from the Sky Sports couch.
His sheer presence, winning mentality, and a refusal to accept anything but the best would have shaken up the Irish dressing room - and given every opposing manager something to be wary about.
Asking Keane to lead Irish football out of the dark and into the sunlight would be a gamble yes, but a glorious one.
It's something for the FAI hierarchy to think about on this weekend of renewal.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Old hand Brady hasn't hit the wall yet
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 60
Length: 1211 words
Byline: Mark Gallagher
Body


THIS was never part of a grand plan for Paul Brady. He didn't expect to come back and reach another
All-Ireland final at the age of 44. It just sort of happened.
Ireland's greatest handballer had gone back on to the court before Christmas, in an effort to shed a few pounds. A friend somehow roped him into playing a doubles competition and between the jigs and the reels, he decided in February to put his name down for the All-Ireland singles championship.
Once in the championship, Brady did what he does best and started winning. And so next Saturday at the National Handball Centre in Croke Park, the Cavan man will look to claim his 11th All-Ireland, a full 11 years after winning his record 10th title. Adding a bit of spice is that standing in his way is Robbie McCarthy, the talented Westmeath native who took up the sport's mantle after Brady.
'This showdown should be a final for the ages,' is Paul Fitzpatrick's estimation, the sports journalist who doubles up as PRO for handball in Ireland.
'This wasn't planned or expected, it wasn't part of the agenda,' Brady insisted on Wednesday afternoon. 'I just had a bit of weight on and went back to the game to get fit. One thing just led to another.'
Brady won't be the only one with a chance to burnish their legendary status at Croke Park. Catriona Casey, widely regarded as the greatest female player, is looking to regain the All-Ireland title she last won in 2022 against Fiona Tully, the former Roscommon footballer.
Casey was on her way to Mexico on Wednesday, where she is playing a WPH (the pro handball tour) event in Juarez. All going well, she will be playing in the final this afternoon and flying home tomorrow to start preparing for next weekend.
'It's Dublin to Dallas and then fly to El Paso. And it's the same back. It is a lot of travelling, but I am used to flying over and back to the States by this stage,' Casey said from Dublin Airport on Wednesday morning.
She's not kidding. There have been 30 events since the WPH started holding women's tournaments in 2013 and the Cork woman has competed in 29, winning 27 of them. Like Brady, she is a master of her craft and early in her dominant career, she was even entered into a men's event in Arizona.
'That was interesting alright, I played the women's event the same weekend so it was difficult to do both but it was good to do. Maybe it is something I will try again before I retire,' she says with a chuckle.
The Ballydesmond native is a primary school teacher, like Brady. And she is excited by the opportunity to showcase the sport in the National Handball Centre next week in the first singles finals to be staged there (the All-Ireland doubles finals have been played there previously).
The state-of-the-art centre behind the Cusack Stand has been beset by numerous problems over the past 15 years, as well as the pandemic also stalling the grand opening, but it now stands as the gleaming home for the sport, promising a bright future.
Handball went through a difficult time during Covid-19. As an indoor - and minority - sport, it saw playing numbers nose-dive, and some clubs fell by the wayside.
'We probably lost half a generation of juvenile players because of the pandemic,' Brady surmises. But in the past couple of years, the sport has turned a corner. Opening the new centre has been key. The sport has somewhere to call home - and it just happens to be at Croker.
'For years, colleagues and friends would ask where I was playing at the weekend and if I told them, they'd just nod. But when you say Croke Park, everyone sits up and take notice. It is something special,' says Carey.
Since 2022, handball has also come under the GAA's coaching and development department after years of operating more as an independent state within Gaelic Games. Waterford native David Britton, who had previously worked with the Irish Athletic Boxing Association, was made chief executive of handball in 2022 and over the past 18 months, has helped clean up the governance issues which held the sport back.
Before Britton's arrival, the governance had been so poor that the Department of Sport had written to the GAA president outlining their concerns about handball while Sport Ireland had frozen funding in 2022 over noncompliance. Since coming in, Britton has worked very closely with Sport Ireland to iron out these issues. 'They have been very good in assisting us and providing us with experts in this field. The GAA have also assisted us to become compliant and because of that, Sport Ireland have released the funding they were withholding. That was a big step forward for the organisation, good governance is non-negotiable, it is a requirement for all sports,' Britton said.
Britton has also worked hard to ensure that handball reaches the 40% gender quota on the board required by the Department of Sport. And over the past year, handball is evidence that when things are done properly at the top, it flows down through the sport.
There has been a surge in participation numbers, with many more primary schools taking up the game. As Brady, also a primary school teacher, points out, the game is so accessible for kids because all that is needed is a ball and a wall. It is particularly accessible for the new Irish, as shown in a recent RTÉ news feature on two Afghan-born brothers playing handball in St Felim's National School in Cavan town, where Brady plays.
'Any school I have worked in, I've coached kids. Handball is an easy one, especially one-wall, because all you need is a wall and ball. And it especially works for kids who have only recently arrived in Ireland. There are 28 different nationalities in our school, and kids who haven't grown up immersed in GAA or soccer, might be more inclined to try handball,' Brady says.
If numbers declined immediately after Covid, there was surge last year. 'This year, there was a 35% increase in entries in the junior nationals, which is a huge jump,' Britton says. 'Anecdotally on the ground, we are hearing good things from our members, that they are being inundated with enquiries from people who want to take up the game or get back into the sport.'
Wallball, which uses one wall, is going through a surge of popularity across the world and this August, Ireland will host the World Wallball Championships at UL followed by the World 4-Wall Championships in Kilkenny, Carlow, Laois and Dublin in October.
They will mark the centenary year of the handball organisation. TG4 will broadcast both championships while next week's All-Ireland finals will be shown live on TG4's YouTube channel - the Irish broadcaster is also developing a documentary about the sport.
And to top it all, the game's most legendary figure has made it back to the most eagerlyanticipated All-Ireland final in some time.
But just as Paul Brady insists that it wasn't part of the plan, he also quietly points out that he never actually left. 'I never officially retired, I just sort of quietly wandered off into the sunset,' he says.
The game pulled him back in. And next Saturday in Croker, Brady will be centrestage, hoping to be king of the court one last time.
I never officially retired, I just sort of quietly wandered off 11 Brady is seeking his 11th All-Ireland win next weekend, 11 years after he last took the title

Graphic


back at the top: Cavan's Paul Brady

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Parental alienation expert found unfit to practise in UK now advising family courts; She lacked 'the moral qualities of sincerity, integrity, competence and wisdom to which ALL practitioners are strongly urged to aspire,' yet...
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 33
Length: 990 words
Byline: Debbie McCann
Body


AN EXPERT who worked in a recent family law case in the High Court was sanctioned in the UK after the British Association of Counselling and Psychotherapy (BACP) found the service she provided 'fell below the standard that would reasonably be expected of a practitioner exercising reasonable care and skill'.
Karen Woodall, a self-proclaimed 'parental alienation' expert, was sanctioned in 2015. She posted on her blog in 2016 that the complaint 'was made by a client in an out-ofcourt case' and was 'only partly upheld'.
Proponents believe that parental alienation - a highly contested concept - is where a child becomes estranged from one parent as a result of manipulation by the other parent.
The Irish Mail on Sunday has spoken with several parents who say that they have wrongly lost custody or have been forced to share custody with an abusive parent because the concept of parental alienation has been used in their family law court cases.
Ms Woodall confirmed to the MoS this week that she has since worked in the Irish courts, including the High Court.
In July 2015, a BACP panel was unanimous in its decision that its findings in an inquiry amounted to 'professional malpractice on the grounds of recklessness and the provision of inadequate professional services in that the service for which Ms Woodall provided fell below the standard that would reasonably be expected of a practitioner exercising reasonable care and skill'.
The panel also found that 'Ms Woodall lacked the personal moral qualities of sincerity, integrity, competence and wisdom to which all practitioners are strongly urged to aspire'.
Parts of the partially upheld complaint related to Ms Woodall's provision of a written assessment of a family, including the opinion that the child 'is suffering from…' and 'I make this diagnosis…' when she had not in fact met the child at that time.
Other findings relate to a lack of clarity in respect of fees and the nature of services offered.
When it was put to her that the UK's largest professional body - representing 40,000 counsellors and therapists - had previously sanctioned her, she replied: 'Yes, the sanction wasn't fitness to practise. I'm a psychotherapist; psychotherapy is not a regulated profession'.
'The [Irish] High Court judge in the case that I worked in is well aware of all these issues which were raised by every disgruntled [inaudible] I have worked with.'
Asked if the judge had any issue with her having been sanctioned ,she said, 'Absolutely not and neither do the High Court judges here [UK]'.
'BACP is one of 74 regulating bodies for counselling and psychotherapy. My work is regulated by the High Court and the judge in each case has oversight of the work that is done.'
Asked about her work on parental alienation and if she had any reply to the UN, which criticised it as an 'unfounded and unscientific concept' last year, Ms Woodall said she had 'nothing to say'. She added: 'I've got nothing to say to you or any other journalist.'
In a blog post on her website in 2015, Ms Woodall said the publication of the complaint against her by the BACP 'has been seized upon, not by the opponents of work with parental alienation, but by people in the UK who purport to work for families'.
She told how she was 'found to have contravened the voluntary code of ethics laid down by BACP and thus lacked personal moral values of sincerity and honesty' and she added that this news was 'tweeted with what appeared to me to be salacious-like glee'.
'I was sanctioned on the basis that my contract with the complainant was implicit and that I carried out an assessment of a family dynamic without seeing the child,' she wrote.
'In my court work with families, I carry out such assessments regularly, the issue of implacable hostility residing in the dynamics around the child and not in the child per se is accepted by the family court.
'It is not accepted by the BACP. Thus the dissonance between the work that I do in the court process and the view of that by BACP, renders any therapist undergoing the same work vulnerable.'
In another blog post in May 2016, Ms Woodall wrote how she received news that the BACP sanction had been 'lifted and the case closed'. 'This comes after I complied with the requirements of BACP although I chose not to rejoin the voluntary governing body after the length of time taken to hear the complaint against me (31 months),' she wrote.
She added that although she is no longer a member of the BACP she had 'learned' from her experience. 'Some of it positive, such as the training day I attended in contracting with difficult people, and some of it negative such as the actions of those clearly determined to use the sanction to ill-effect.'
On her website, Ms Woodall says she is 'known around the world' for her work with children who 'suffer' from parental alienation. She adds: 'Causing a child to suffer alienation is a serious form of child abuse…' However in June 2023, a UN human rights expert criticised what she described as the 'unfounded and unscientific concept of parental alienation', which she said is 'highly gendered'.
Reem Alsalem, UN special rapporteur on violence against women, said family court systems worldwide are being affected by 'deeply embedded gender bias' which is leaving women and children vulnerable to violence and 'immense suffering'.
She wrote in a report to the Human Rights Council in Geneva: 'The tendency of family courts to dismiss the history of domestic violence and abuse in custody cases, especially where mothers and/or children have brought forward credible allegations of domestic abuse, including coercive control, physical or sexual abuse, is unacceptable.'
Ms Alsalem's report criticised the 'unfounded and unscientific concept of parental alienation', stating, 'While it is invoked against fathers and mothers, it is predominantly used against mothers'. debbie.mccann@mailonsunday.ie
'High Court judge is well aware of all these issues'

Graphic


SANCTIONED: Karen Woodall, left, and, above, the UN's expert on violence against women Reem Alsalem with human rights officer Orlagh McCann

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Pick of the Day
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 34,35
Length: 223 words
Body


This Town 9Pm, BBc1... Peaky Blinders creator Steven Knight is returning to the English Midlands for his new drama, but this time the action takes place in the 1980s, against the backdrop of the region's ska scene. The series opens in 1981, as Birmingham is gripped by social and political unrest. Dante (Levi Brown, pictured) wanders into a riot and finds himself caught up in a new world that is dangerous but also full of opportunities. The second episode airs tomorrow, and sees the Irish and Jamaican sides of Dante's family being brought together by a funeral. (See page 6.)
Paul O'Grady's Great Elephant Adventure 8Pm, UTv.. Paul travels through Thailand and Laos to celebrate the work done by conservation centres to rescue, rehabilitate and protect elephants. He begins by travelling to the jungle surrounding Chiang Mai.
Attenborough And The Jurassic Sea Monster 8.30PM, RTÉ2 ???.. The naturalist investigates the discovery of a lifetime - the skull of a pliosaur, one of the most ferocious Jurassic predators ever known. This prehistoric marine reptile ruled the seas 150 million years ago.
An Bothy Band 9.30Pm, TG4.. This feature documentary looks into the band's legacy as surviving members Matt Molloy, Dónal Lunny, Tríona Ní Dhomhnaill, Kevin Burke, Paddy Glackin and Paddy Keenan reunite for a very special live performance.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Pick of the Day
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 38,39
Length: 220 words
Body


MasterChef 6.30PM, BBC1 ????... John Torode and Gregg Wallace (both pictured) return for their 20th series, but they have made a few tweaks to the recipe this time around, including adding a new challenge called Basic to Brilliant. It will see the amateur chefs being given an everyday ingredient and asked to turn it into something spectacular, while ensuring it's still the star of the show. There's also the Invention Test, which focuses on one of Gregg's favourite foods, potato gnocchi, and the hopefuls must also prepare a two-course menu for 2023 champion Chariya Khattiyot. Bradley Walsh: The Laugh's On Me 10PM, VIRGIN ONE ???.. The TV star gives a personal and honest account of his own life, joined by his nearest and dearest celebrity friends to tell the incredible story of his career, including Rod Stewart and Jimmy Tarbuck.
Kayak ? Thuaidh 10Pm, BBc2.. Tessa Fleming and Irial ? Ceallaigh embark on the final leg of their journey. around the northern coast of Ireland, surfing at Downhill Beach before setting of f along the Derry coast and into Co Antrim's coastal waters.
BBC 1Xtra Comedy Gala With Eddie Kadi And Friends 11.30PM, BBC1 ???.. Comedy showcase recorded live at the Hackney Empire, featuring Babátúndé Aléshé, Gbemi Oladipo, Kane Brown, Kyrah Gray, Michael Odewale, Ola Labib and Thanyia Moore.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



PICK OF THE DAY
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 42,43
Length: 212 words
Body


Cúramóirí 7.30Pm, TG4... There have been plenty of documentaries about the work of the medics and police who deal with emergencies, but the people who provide longterm care can sometimes be overlooked. This series sets out to put that right, as it explores the crucial role played by family members, professional carers and dedicated organisations who help those who need it most. In the opening episode, viewers are introduces to Dublin's Diarmuid Mac Dubhglais, who provides food for the hungry, and Úna O'Kane (right), a palliative care nurse at The Galway Hospice. The End Of The World With Beanz 7PM, RTé ONE ????... Martin journeys across land and sea to reach the remote Scottish island of Gometra to meet with Roc Sandford and his family. He is joined by Roz Purcell to learn what it takes to live an off-grid life.
Aldi's Next Big Thing 8PM, CHANNEL 4 ???.. Cameras look on as small-scale food and drink producers get the rare opportunity to pitch their products to Aldi executives. The first batch of six suppliers pitch their products in the dinner time category.
The Rise And Fall Of Pablo Escobar 11.50PM, CHANNEL 4... The search for Pablo Escobar as told by US Drug Enforcement Administration agents, with never-beforeseen footage of Escobar's life and capture.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Pick of the Day
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 46,47
Length: 217 words
Body


Grey's Anatomy 9.35PM, RTé2 ????... The title of this episode of the medical drama may be We've Only Just Begun, but it's also the first instalment in the 20th series, meaning any newcomers have a lot of catching up to do. For longstanding fans though, it may seem like business as usual as Meredith (Ellen Pompeo, right, who is scaling back her role) is forced to rethink her plans, and the interns discover they are on thin ice following a patient's death. Meanwhile, Simone and Lucas are put to the test by an emergency, Richard confides in Bailey, and we discover Teddy's fate. Professor T 9Pm, UTv.. A bride is found dead, floating in the hotel swimming pool on her wedding night. Though the photos portray the perfect picture of happiness, the police suspect foul play and ask the professor to help with the investigation.
Rising Tides: Ireland's Future In A Warmer World 9.35PM, RTé ONE ???.. Philip Boucher-Hayes investigates what kinds of adaptations the human race need to survive and thrive into the future, such as a retreat to another hospitable planet.
Mandy 10Pm, BBc2.. Double bill of the comedy, starring Diane Morgan. Mandy dabbles in things she does not understand. Which is almost everything if you're Mandy. Next, Mandy is going up in the world for once. Guest starring Michaela Strachan.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Pick of the Day
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 50,51
Length: 213 words
Body


Taskmaster 9Pm, ch4... The previous series of Taskmaster was arguably the least competitive in the show's history - the contestants even sacrificed themselves to help each other. But does anyone in the class of 2024 have their eyes firmly on the prize (which is a golden bust of Greg Davies' head)? We may find out in this second episode, as Nick Mohammed covers a water bottle with a sock, Joanne McNally (right) ties a noose for a soft toy, and Steve Pemberton has an urge for pancakes. Meanwhile, Sophie Willan attempts to take flight, and John Robins relies on honey. The Complaints Bureau 7pm, RTÉ ONE... Amy Molloy uncovers the story of the unfinished log cabin, the contractor who decided to leave Ireland and the settlement agreement that was never settled. Conor Pope tries to recover money from a Covid-cancelled trip.
Robin Williams: A Life in Ten Pictures 9Pm, BBc2... A handful of images of actor and comedian Robin Williams, from iconic shots to private snaps, are used to reveal a new story of his life, as told by those who knew him best.
Rain Dogs 9Pm, RTÉ2.. Costello and Iris have found a safe place to land but the hustle to keep afloat continues. As he pines for a phone call from Costello, Selby acclimatises to his new reality and reluctantly makes a new friend.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Pick of the Day
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 54,55
Length: 223 words
Body


The Assembly 10.40PM, BBC1 ????... It's Autism Acceptance Week, and to mark it, BBC1 is bringing us this special talk show, which is adapted from a hit French format. It finds a cast of thirtyfive interviewers who are autistic, neurodivergent or learning disabled, questioning actor Michael Sheen. So, instead of being prompted to share some pre-rehearsed anecdotes, he will instead find that no subject is off limits, as he's grilled on everything from his favourite motorway to his ex-girlfriends. The results will give us a new insight into Sheen, but will other celebs sign up for future shows?
Tracks And Trails 7.30PM, RTÉ ONE ????... Journalist and podcaster Nicola Tallant hikes the challenging Boolas Loop in the Comeragh Mountains in Co Waterford. For her second walk, Nicola follows a top trail starting out from the seaside village of Dunmore East.
Beechgrove Garden 7.30PM, BBC2 ????... The team returns with more gardening advice, with Carole Baxter and George Anderson beginning by assessing how the wild, wet winter has affected the Beechgrove garden, located just outside Aberdeen.
Avoidance 9.30PM, BBC1 ????... Jonathan's attempt to win back Claire backfires. when he discovers her big secret. Dan and Courtney get a surprise at their baby scan - it's a boy. Comedy, with Romesh Ranganathan, Jessica Knappett and Aisling Bea.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Pick of the Day
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 58,59
Length: 221 words
Body


More Abba At The BBC 8.35PM, BBC2 ????... On this day 50 years ago, pop history was made when Abba (pictured) won the Eurovision Song Contest, setting them on the road for world domination. To mark the anniversary, BBC2 is turning over an evening to one of Sweden's biggest exports. It begins with this new compilation of clips, including a 1974 performance of the song So Long, which was previously believed lost. It's then followed by the documentary When Abba Came To Britain, which explores their popularity in the UK and why they chose London as the venue for their virtual comeback.
Our Dream Farm With Matt Baker 8Pm, ch4... Matt Baker helps the National Trust find a new tenant for the vacant Wallington Estate farm in Northumberland and its 340 acres of grassland. In this first episode, Matt arrives at the estate to meet the applicants.
The Jonathan Ross Show 9.35Pm, UTv... Jonathan is joined by Monty Python and travelogue legend Michael Palin, heavyweight boxing star Anthony Joshua and singing veteran Lulu, ahead of her final tour after 60 years in the business.
The Tommy Tiernan Show 9.50PM, RTÉ ONE ????... Improvised chat show in which neither the presenter nor the viewers are told the identity of the guests in advance. With the comedian in the dark about who he will be interviewing him, anything can happen.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Poch's frustration as Chelsea held to draw
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 77
Length: 270 words
Byline: David Kent
Body


CHELSEA'S capacity for chaos knows no bounds, this time losing two leads against a Burnley team consisting of 10 men and no manager on the sidelines of Stamford Bridge as Mauricio Pochettino was left perplexed at the 2-2 draw.
Pochettino is never one for burying his players in public. More than most Premier League managers, he will defend them.
So when Chelsea's manager calmly pointed to his heart and then his head in his post-match press conference - to suggest what was missing - it was cutting by his genteel standards.
Chelsea's fans booed at full-time, knowing this was an opportunity missed to move into the top half of the Premier League table.
Cole Palmer twice left them in a position from which they should have won yet Burnley - even after losing Lorenz Assignon and manager Vincent Kompany to red cards in the 40th minute - went on to equalise through Ireland duo Josh Cullen and then Dara O'Shea.
There was a complete reversal of fortune for another Irishman as Seamus Coleman's 91st minute own goal condemned Everton to a 2-1 defeat away to Bournemouth.
The visitors had looked set for a valuable point when Beto's 87thminute goal cancelled out Dominic Solanke's opener but in the dying moments Adam Smith's deep cross bounced up and hit Coleman on the chest before dropping into the net.
Elsewhere, Chris Wood scored his seventh goal in eight league games as Nottingham Forest moved back out of the relegation zone with a 1-1 draw against Crystal Palace, while Rodrigo Muniz's superb stoppagetime equaliser denied Sheffield United a rare Premier League win in a six-goal thriller against Fulham at Bramall Lane.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



POYET PASSES; Yet another blow for FAI as manager hunt drags on
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 78
Length: 300 words
Byline: Philip Quinn
Body


THE Republic of Ireland managerial soap opera has taken another twist after Gus Poyet reportedly rejected an offer from the FAI to take charge until Euro 2028.
The rebuff is set to delay the appointment further and could open the door for a U-turn by the FAI on Roy Keane, who covets the job. John O'Shea, interim boss for the recent friendlies, could also come into the equation.
Media outlets in Greece claimed Poyet was given 48 hours by the FAI to accept the post following the Greeks' Euro 2024 play-off loss to Georgia last Tuesday. But Poyet, out of contract today, is understood to have turned down the FAI.
Exactly why is uncertain but a senior FAI source said the association would not have imposed any conditions on Poyet's backroom team.
The Uruguayan, who masterminded wins over Ireland home and away in the Euro qualifiers, is the latest to snub the FAI in their marathon search for Stephen Kenny's successor.
Lee Carsley, the FAI's top choice, opted to stay with England U21s, while Anthony Barry continued with Bayern Munich and Portugal.
An FAI spokesperson said they were 'not commenting on any individuals at the moment and will be announcing (a new manager) in April'.
On March 4, director of football Marc Canham said the delay was due to 'existing contractual obligations'.
That could have referred to managers involved in the Euro play-off such as Poyet and Georgia's Willy Sagnol.
'Once we've announced, you'll see where we've landed,' said Canham on February 20. It remains to be seen where the FAI will land now that Poyet has taken flight.
Meanwhile, Hannah Dingley, who last year became the first women to take charge of an English league club when she was caretaker boss of Forest Green Rovers, has emerged as the front runner to be the FAI's new head of women's and girls' football.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Public good is not served by Army's silence on court-martialled Ranger
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 22
Length: 390 words
Body


This week, we reveal details of Sergeant Damien Mc Donough, who was previously the subject of a court martial after committing an assault on two women in 2007, during which he exposed himself to them. We understand he is in the process of leaving the Defence Forces, but at this moment is still a member of the elite Army Ranger wing.
The subsequent court martial in 2009 heard how Sergeant Mc Donough grabbed the women by the head and called one of them 'a dog's b****x'. He also became involved in an affray with another soldier, and was inebriated after drinking from two o'clock on the day in question, to the point where he could not recall when the function ended. This newspaper asked the Defence Forces for a statement on the fact that Sergeant Mc Donough is representing himself on various security industry bodies as an expert in this area, without any reference to his previous court martial. But they refused to discuss it.
Citing security reasons, they told us that it was Defence Forces policy to advise we not only refrain from displaying a photograph of Army Rangers, but also not to name them. In the past, this newspaper has followed this guidance on the basis that we are not in a position to know, at any given moment, the extent of the grave security threats to which the brave men and women who fulfil a vital role in our nation's security may be subjected.
However, that ethical choice cannot be used to prevent appropriate oversight or interrogation of an issue of public interest, such as how the Defence Forces deal with sexual assaults in their ranks.
In the years since Sergeant Mc Donough's demotion from corporal to private following the court martial, further details of assaults by serving Defence Forces personnel have come to light thanks to the brave actions of the Women of Honour. One of those women, Karina Molloy, says that the refusal to engage with our questions on the basis of Sergeant Mc Donough's current position within the forces is a case of the Army closing ranks to protect one of its own.
We will leave it up to our readers to decide whom they support in this dispute, but this newspaper takes ethical concerns seriously. We believe the public interest, the right of people to know about the court martial, outweighs any guidance or request from the Defence Forces not to name Sergeant Mc Donough.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Quotes OF THE WEEK
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 24
Length: 217 words
Body


'When it comes to Sinn Féin, never has a party, in my recollection, displayed so much cowardice on so many issues so quickly.'
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar attacks Sinn Féin for its U-turn on the Hate Speech Bill. 'I am confident they will face justice.'
CHESTER
MICHAEL
Picture:
Justice Minister Helen McEntee tells the Association of Garda Sergeants and Inspectors' conference that Kinahan mob bosses in Dubai will be sent back to Ireland. 'It's taken me to reach 74 to be regarded in the same sort of breath as Elvis Presley, Tom Jones, Rod Stewart. You know, wearing trousers that are considered by those of us of a sensitive disposition to be rather too tight.'
Alan Titchmarsh, whose jeans were blurred out by state TV in North Korea, where jeans are considered a symbol of the West.
'Husband, father, adulterer. Yes, Roger, I knew.'
Bench plaque in Bristol, England, that's now the talk of the city. 'Everything has gone up but nobody seems to know the price of anything besides a pint. A pound of butter is nearly (EURO)5 but you would never hear anyone talk about it.'
Offaly publican Gerard Hough after Diageo this week increased the price of a pint again.
'I should probably be in an ankle-length kaftan with snood now.' Liz Hurley, left, who says she wears bikinis at 58 to promote her own brand of beachwear.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Radio Week; The picks of the best of this week's radio
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 32
Length: 522 words
Body


ENTERTAINMENT An Cúinne Dána SUNDAY, 6.30PM, RTE RNAG ????... The book of the month is Athmháthair, an Irish-language translation of Michela Murgia's award winning book Accabadora. The book focuses on a dark aspect of Sardinian folklore associated with euthanasia, and here it's discussed with leading writers and folklorists.
This Cultural Life THURSDAY, 11AM, BBC RADIO 4 ?????.... Michael Palin, actor, comedian and globetrotting TV documentary presenter, talks about the creative influences that formed him. He starts with his indulgent mother to whom he would read out Shakespeare, playing all the parts, and the joys of listening to radio comedy at home including his favourite The Goon Show. He also recalls a demanding performance in Alan Bleasdale's drama GBH and what could be fractious writing sessions on Monty Python. And his favourite sketch? The Fish Slapping Dance, which he says works all around the world and even raised a laugh when he showed it to his guide in North Korea.
FACTUAL History's Secret Heroes MONDAY, 3.30PM, BBC RADIO FOUR.... Helena Bonham Carter has tales of resistance, courage and deception from the
Michael Palin talks about his influences Second World War. She starts with the Mills and Boon writer Ida Cook who, together with her sister Louise, risked her own life to help Jewish refugees escape Nazi persecution. The sisters used their genuine passion for music as cover to visit opera houses in Germany where they mixed with Nazi high society. They would then return to England laden with jewellery, as they smuggled out wealth that could then help ease the passage of its Jewish owners out of Nazi Germany to safety.
The Life Scientific TUESDAY, 9AM, BBC RADIO 4 ????... Dinosaurs continue to fascinate us and today's guest, the fossil hunter Dr Nick Longrich, has discovered morethan a dozen new species from Mexico to Morocco to the Isle of Wight. He talks about his work in the field, and also the less glamorous task of sifting through long-forgotten bones in museum cabinets and drawers that have set him off on searches. He grew up in Alaska the son of a crab fisherman, where he spent much of his childhood out in nature ? 'it was a lot like Lord of the Flies ? good times.'
Helen Lewis Has Left The Chat WEDNESDAY, 9.30AM, BBC RADIO 4 ????... Helen Lewis explores the extraordinary rise in instant messaging ? there are now an estimated 2.7 billion users on WhatsApp alone. Instant messaging at work and within families and relationships has obvious attractions, but its speed and the casual nature of the communication nature can lead to indiscretions, so there are definite dangers.
DRAMA Howl's Moving Castle
EASTER SUNDAY, 3PM, BBC RADIO 4 ????... Robert Bathurst narrates and Julia McKenzie stars in this adaptation of the fantasy novel by Diana Wynne-Jones featuring wizardry and spells, a floating castle and the Wicked Witch of the Waste. Studio Ghibli transformed the story into an Oscarnominated animation in 2004.
MUSIC The Full Score TUESDAY, 1PM, LYRIC FM ????... Pianist Yulianna Avdeeva joins the WDR Symphony Orchestra in Cologne for Beethoven's Piano Concerto No. 4 in G.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Scam celebrity crypto ads aim to steal your cash… so don't take the bait; A QUESTION OF MONEY
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: BUSINESS; Pg. 55
Length: 481 words
Body


Fraud attempts have doubled in just a year - especially scams involving ads on social media and Google. You know the ones where well-known people reveal they have 'made a fortune' in cryptocurrency and invite you to do the same. Only they haven't - and would never advise anything of the kind. Social media giants are only held responsible for (eventually) taking down these ads not for putting them up in the first place - which enables them to make billions. Now, an increasing number of banks are warning customers to be on the alert for such scams. The latest is Bank of Ireland where NIcOla SadlIer is head of fraud. She tells us how to beat the scammers.
What is the latest trend in fraud?
Bank of Ireland is warning about an increasing number of false articles appearing online designed to defraud consumers through fake financial products, investments or cryptocurrency schemes. I've seen other banks now also warning about this. Is it hitting customers?
Fraud attempts have almost doubled year on year and our advice is to be constantly vigilant. Bank of Ireland will continue to make customers aware of how they may be targeted, and to Stop, Think and Check. We can see that the various campaigns are making an impact, as our research is showing that awareness of fraud is extremely high.
What kind of false articles? The articles appear like news articles from genuine media outlets, but they are false advertisements that fraudsters are actually paying for online. The advertisements feature fabricated news stories with claims about specific cryptocurrency trading platforms or designed to entice readers to websites where some share personal details [mobile number] and they can then be contacted and defrauded. The false articles/ advertisements generally feature a well-known personality or celebrity, combined with a controversial headline. It's unacceptable to see fraudsters operating so openly on social www.media.No company should be generating advertising revenue from criminals - social platforms need to step up and crack down. What's your advice?
Don't click on these adverts, ignore them completely, and if an investment sounds too good to be true, it's probably fraud.
What about your own experiences? My dad was caught out recently. He had Google-searched a top Irish brand, clicked on the sponsored ad and then the link to the website and he proceeded to buy a pair of shorts. He then received a call from the bank to tell him that he had unknowingly shared his card details on a fake website. This was close to home (despite all my advice). All of us are receiving calls, texts and emails - and more and more people are getting caught.
BUSINESSPLUS MAGAZINE SPECIAL SUBSCRIPTION OFFER Never miss an issue: SUBSCRIBE NOW n10 issues (Ireland only) (EURO)40 n10 issues (Digital edition) (EURO)29
To order visit: www.businessplus.ie, scan the QR code or call (01) 256 0800

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



skylights
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 32
Length: 279 words
Body


FBI: Most Wanted sky witness, friday, 9pm As the new season begins, a mysterious deal goes south and leaves behind multiple dead bodies. The Fugitive Task Force head to Virginia to put the pieces together, while Remy (Dylan McDermott, above) continues to grapple with the aftermath of connecting with his long-lost nephew.
Royal Autopsy Season 2 sky history, tuesday, 9pm Professor Alice Roberts is back to lift the veil on more monarchs in the morgue with a second series of Royal Autopsy. Using a blend of historical and medical expertise and contemporaneous accounts and documents, she and Home Office pathologist Dr Brett Lockyer will be examining the deaths of 'The Party King' George IV, 'Bloody Mary' Mary I, 'The Usurper' Henry IV and 'The Forgotten Queen' Anne to reveal how each of these monarchs truly perished.
10 Lives sky cinema, premieres friday Beckett is a pampered and selfish cat who takes for granted the lucky hand he has been dealt. All that is about to change, however, when he carelessly loses his ninth life. With no lives left and faced with the inevitable,
Beckett pleads for things to go back to how they were.
One Day As A Lion sky cinema, available now Starring Scott Caan and JK Simmons, One Day As A Lion sees Jackie Powers, a nice guy but a lousy hitman, be sent to take out a crafty debtor. Fleeing the scene, Jackie takes bored waitress Lola as a hostage.
My Favourite Things: The Rogers and Hammerstein 80th Anniversary Concert sky arts, sunday, 8pm Celebrate 80 years of Rodgers and Hammerstein with this anniversary concert, starring Joanna Ampil, Michael Ball, Maria Friedman, Daniel Dae Kim, Audra McDonald, Julian Ovenden and Lucy St Louis.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Soldier who abused two women now top advisor to global security firms; Women of Honour blast Defence Forces for 'circling wagons' around elite Ranger after Army fails to respond to MOS questions
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 14
Length: 1026 words
Byline: Debbie McCann
Body


A FORMER soldier and whistleblower has accused the Defence Forces of 'circling the wagons' to protect a member of the Army Ranger wing who rose through the ranks despite pleading guilty to assaulting two women.
Damien Mc Donough was demoted from corporal to private after he grabbed two women, one a civilian, by the head, exposed himself to them and then called one of them the 'dog's b****x'.
However, the Irish Mail on Sunday can reveal Mr Mc Donough was later promoted and now sits on the board of several national and international security bodies.
Mr Mc Donough, who was wrongly called 'McDonagh' in the 2009 court martial ruling, is currently serving as a sergeant in the special forces Army Ranger unit.
He is also listed on the board of directors at the Security Institute of Ireland and is the Regional Director of the International Foundation for Protection Officers.
Contacted by the MoS, Mr Mc Donough said the incident 'was one of the worst times of my life'. Since his demotion, the senior soldier said he has gone on to 'completely and absolutely personally develop' himself and is 'extremely remorseful'.
However, security sources have questioned how someone with his record has been allowed to get the rank back and to lobby on behalf of security organisations for better community standards.
And former soldier and author Karina Molloy, who served for three decades in the Defence Forces, accused the Army of closto ing ranks to protect one of their own. She told the MoS: 'The wagons have been circled there? it's an old boys' network working there to protect him.
'He's very lucky that it happened in the time line that it did, because as you know from the IRG [Independent Review Group] Report [published last March 2023 in response to allegations of discrimination, bullying, and sexual harassment in the Defence Forces] recommendation that the [Defence] Minister [Micheál Martin] agreed that all sexual assaults now go through the guards.
'Because, having read what he did, it is classified as a criminal offence and he should have been discharged.
'I am wondering why the civilian didn't pursue it. I can understand the poor victim because she was just starting her career? what mental suffering has she had to deal with throughout her career knowing that he is still serving and got promoted?'
Ms Molloy, who suffered alleged sexual abuse throughout her career and detailed that in her book A Woman in Defence, now campaigns about military sexual trauma, which she said the Defence Forces still has not 'approved or acknowledged'.
She added: 'It's a trauma that people suffer for a life term. The British, Canadian, America and Australian armies have all acknowledged it now, and that it what I am aiming to get done.'
In June 2009, Mr Mc Donough pleaded guilty to assaulting a civilian woman by putting his hands around her head and pulling it towards him.
The court martial heard he also admitted charges of conduct prejudicial to good order and discipline contrary to the
Defence Act. These included grabbing a female private by her head and exposing himself in front of the women.
He admitted he used inappropriate language towards the civilian woman - calling her a 'dog's b****x' - and, at the same venue, becoming involved in an affray with another soldier. He was later fined (EURO)500 and demoted.
In 2011, he lost a challenge to his demotion to the rank of private. A three-judge Court-Martial Appeal Court rejected his arguments that the demotion was disproportionate as it would lead to a (EURO)6,500 loss in salary a year.
The appeal court also noted Mr Mc Donough told the military judge he had consumed great quantities of alcohol from 2pm on the day of the incident - which occurred at a military function at a hotel in Drogheda, Co Louth, on St Patrick's Day in 2007.
He unreservedly apologised for the conduct he freely acknowledged was unacceptable.
The court acknowledged the strong supporting evidence of good character and also recognised his actions may have been once-off offending behaviour fuelled by excessive alcohol.
However, the court said it could see no other choice but to uphold the demotion.
Mr Mc Donough, now aged 40, was a decorated Army Ranger who served in Liberia and Kosovo.
Asked this week how his Army rank was reinstated and how he is able sit on a number of boards despite the court martial ruling, Mr Mc Donough told the MoS: 'I don't know how to answer that really to be honest with you. I don't see what the relevance is.
'That was one of the worst times of my life. I [have since] completely, absolutely, personally developed myself, [am] extremely remorseful of what happened and [have] rebranded myself and worked on myself professionally and personally. It's a part of my life I wish never happened for all parties involved.'
Asked why his name is spelt differently on the court martial ruling, he replied: 'The administration errors are out of my control. This [court martial] was well documented at the time, and I have been completely transparent.'
Mr Mc Donough said he now believes 'drunken behaviour is just not acceptable anywhere, and I use that as a learning experience'. He added: 'That's what it is. I don't think I've got anything else to say. It's a time from my life I've moved on from.'
In response to queries from the MoS, Defence Forces Press Officer Commandant Conor Hurley said it 'cannot confirm the identity of any individual who might be serving with the Army Ranger Wing (ARW) as the identities of members are SECRET'.
When it was pointed out Mr Mc Donough was previously identified in the court martial ruling which was widely reported in the media at the time, Cmdt Hurley said they had 'nothing further to add'.
The Defence Forces would not say if it gave Mr Mc Donough approval to sit on the boards of security organisations.
It also did not respond to a query asking how Mr Mc Donough's name was spelt incorrectly in the court martial ruling.
The Security Institute of Ireland and the International Foundation for Protection Officers did not respond to queries.
debbie.mccann@mailonsunday.ie
'It's an old boys' network working to protect him' 'It's a time of my life I've moved on from'

Graphic


COMMENTS: Press Officer Cmdt Hurley, left, and Karina Molloy, right

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



State's agencies's homeless and refugees compete for housing
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 30,31
Length: 637 words
Byline: Valerie Hanley
Body


THE Dáil spending watchdog will investigate how State agencies are 'gazumping' each other in a competition to secure scarce accommodation for asylum seekers and the homeless, the Irish Mail on Sunday has learned.
Public Accounts Committee (PAC) vicechair Catherine Murphy spoke out after it had emerged that the operators of a Kildare hotel - paid a massive (EURO)10.8m in one year alone to house asylum seekers - have signed a new contract with a homeless agency.
Celbridge Manor Hotel did not renew its contract with the Department of Integration, opting for a new deal with the Dublin Regional Homeless Executive instead. As a result, international protection applicants staying at the ivy-clad Georgian hotel are being moved on to make room for homeless families who are waiting on Dublin City Council's housing list.
Deputy Murphy said the PAC will question officials from Integration Minister Roderic O'Gorman's department about how State agencies have been 'gazumping' each other for scarce accommodation at a hearing scheduled for April 18.
The Social Democrats TD told the Irish Mail on Sunday: 'It [State agencies competing against each other] will be one of the issues that will be on my list to ask.'
Referring to the case of Celbridge Manor Hotel - which had previously been a popular wedding venue in her Kildare North constituency - Ms Murphy said: 'The really shameful thing here is that a very large hotel like this is required for homeless accommodation.
'It's not the shortage of money? it's really unsatisfactory particularly from the point of view of children. There will be substantial damage done to children who have experienced homelessness.'
And she added: 'The amount of money to keep people out of homelessness certainly could be spent on more permanent solutions and that's what we need to work towards so that we start seeing those figures coming down.'
Figures released this week confirmed a record 13,841 people are now living in hostels and other temporary accommodation, 4,127 of whom are children.
In response to queries from the MoS, the Department of Children confirmed it could no longer use Celbridge Manor to house refugees because the hotel decided not to renew a contract worth almost (EURO)11m. The Department acknowledged that it will be difficult to find alternative accommodation.
The Department publishes all payments over (EURO)20,000 for providing Ukrainians and asylum seekers with accommodation.
But a spokesman said this weekend: 'The Department of Children, Equality, Disability,
Integration and Youth does not comment on individual contracts, which are deemed commercially sensitive.
'The contract for Celbridge Manor will come to an end in the coming weeks as the provider has decided not to renew their contract with the Department of Children, Equality, Disability, Integration and Youth.
'At this time, it is not possible to confirm where the residents will be dispersed to due to the ongoing shortage of accommodation in the IPAS [International Protection Accommodation Services] accommodation portfolio due to the unprecedented numbers arriving seeking accommodation whilst their applications for international protection are processed,' the spokesman added.
Dublin Homeless Regional Executive is part of Dublin City
Council, which confirmed its agency signed a contract with the Celbridge Manor Hotel last April.
It said the contract was awarded after a tendering process, but declined to say how much it will cost to relocate homeless families to the 66-bedroom hotel in the Co. Kildare commuter town.
According to documents lodged with the national property registration office, the hotel is owned by Country Manor Hotels Limited. Its directors are Wexford-based accountant Daire Turner and Co. Louth businessman Ronan Mallon.
The company did not respond to queries this weekend.

Graphic


HIGH COST: We exposed the scale of payments for housing refugees

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



TDs are quitting because they're not appreciated; PICTURE OF THE WEEK
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 24
Length: 597 words
Body


ONE thing that has not been mentioned about Taoiseach Leo Varadkar's resignation, and the disillusionment of many other Fine Gael TDs that is causing them to leave politics, is that Fine Gael supporters cannot understand why the party is not topping the polls.
They feel they have done everything right for the country rather than the party.
From almost bankruptcy in 2011, Fine Gael made Ireland one of the wealthiest and most successful countries in Europe.
Mr Varadkar succeeded in getting the best possible Brexit deal for Ireland and they had giveaway budgets but they still go down in the polls.
In my view, a big reason for TDs wanting to quit politics is that, no matter how good a job they do, people will not reward them in the polls.
Even with their major failure on housing, it is surprising that they did not get more thanks from the electorate. And Fine Gael politicians genuinely feel unappreciated.
John F Hyland, Killiney, Co. Dublin. SF hypocrisy on leadership I FOUND it rather risible to hear Sinn Féin politicians recently criticising Fine Gael over the fact that there wasn't a leadership contest.
My understanding is that the president of Sinn Féin, Mary Lou McDonald, and the first minister for the North, Michelle O'Neill, both became leaders of their party in their respective countries without an election.
I believe that there has never been an election for a leader of Sinn Féin at any point in history.
I am reminded of the words uttered by the late American comedian and social critic George Carlin: 'Let's not have a double standard. One standard will do just fine.'
John O'Brien,
Clonmel, Co. Tipperary. Cancer inequality A LEADING cancer specialist has warned that Ireland has a two-tier cancer care system, with poorer outcomes for patients in the west and northwest of the country.
Consultant surgeon Professor Michael Kerin, director of the Cancer Managed Clinical Academic Network at the Saolta University Healthcare Group, told a cancer conference that Galway University Hospital is outdated and has inadequate facilities for cancer patients.
Professor Kerin further stated that the west and northwest region is the most rural area of the country, and suffers from economic deprivation and a poorer outcome for cancer patients.
The EU recognises this part of our country as a 'lagging region'.
If a line were to be drawn across the country from Galway to Dublin, a cancer centre of excellence simply does not exist north of that line. Is this what balanced regional development and equality in good cancer care looks like?
There are sick people travelling from the Inishowen Peninsula in Donegal to Galway on the 'cancer bus', enduring a 10 to 12-hour journey there and back for their vital life-saving treatments, at a hospital that is not fit for purpose and is seriously overcrowded.
If this happened anywhere else in the country there would be outrage and revolt. Where are our politicians in this whole unequal scenario?
The people of the west and northwest should be valued as equal citizens of our country, as referred to in the 1916 proclamation, and not as secondclass 'culchies' as is the case at the present time.
Tom Towey, Cloonacool, Co. Sligo. The spirit of Lent I HAVE a friend who has mixed feelings about Easter. For Lent, he gives up sobriety.
He starts drinking on Ash Wednesday and stops on Holy Saturday.
He has had a problem with alcohol since his school days. So, years ago, he decided to stay sober, except for Lent.
He says the pubs treat him like gold during Lent, because often he is the only one there.
Kevin Devitte, Westport, Co. Mayo.

Graphic


COMETH THE HOUR: Jack Mitchell, four, and Katie Mitchell, 10, putting the clock forward in the Irish Museum of Time

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



That's what you call a PUMPKIN!; Growing the fruit couldn't be simpler - just don't expect all your efforts to emulate this Travis Gienger 2,749lb monster
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 22,23
Length: 873 words
Byline: Martyn Cox
Body


IN October, a gardener from Minnesota used a skid-steer loader to lift a gargantuan 'Atlantic Giant' pumpkin on to a flatbed trailer and then drove 2,000 miles to the 50th World Championship Pumpkin Weigh-Off at Half Moon Bay in California.
At the hotly contested event, Travis Gienger's mega-gourd (measuring 7ft wide by 6ft long) weighed in at 2,749lb (1,247kg) to take first place and become the Guinness World Record-holder for heaviest pumpkin.
Equal to the average black rhinoceros,
Gienger's pumpkin was the result of 30 years spent growing the fruits ? and few of us would have the time, dedication, skills or inclination to emulate his feat.
But anybody can raise their own pumpkins. Seeds that are started off indoors over the next few weeks will form young shoots ready for planting outside in late spring. These will grow vigorously over summer to provide pickings in autumn.
Seeds can also be planted directly into the ground when the weather warms up, but as it takes six months from sowing to harvesting, it's best to get ahead.
Once plants are mature they'll deliver two to 12 pumpkins, depending on the variety and the extent of their fruit ? culinary types for home-growers vary from cricket ball to football-size.
At this point I should explain to new gardeners why I keep referring to pumpkins as fruits. They are technically a berry and, therefore, botanically speaking, labelled a fruit. But when it comes to using them in the kitchen, we tend to treat pumpkins as vegetables.
The gourds are a member of the cucurbitaceae family ? a large group of plants that are cultivated for their edible fruit, such as melons and cucumbers. All are native to North America and have been cultivated for thousands of years, with seeds discovered in a Mexican tomb dating to 7000BC.
Of course, it would be impossible to write about pumpkins and not mention Halloween. The tradition of carving faces began in the
United States during the 19th century with the arrival of migrants from Ireland. These folk had long etched faces on turnips to mark the pagan festival of Samhain, but the absence of the root veg meant pumpkins were used instead.
Today there are scores of different varieties split into two main groups based on the plant's habit of growth. Trailing types tend to produce larger fruit and need a lot of space for tentacle-like stems to extend to 8ft or more. Bush pumpkins are more compact and often have smaller fruit that are held closer to the centre of plants.
Whichever you choose, start seeds indoors before late April. Fill a 3in pot with seed compost, firm and level. Next, make two half-inch deep holes in the surface and pop in a seed. Cover up the holes, water gently and add a label for identification ? this is essential if you're growing several varieties.
Aim to add seeds into the compost so the long edge sits vertically. This will reduce the odds of them rotting as water won't build up on the flat surface of the seed. You can use this technique when starting off other edibles in the cucurbitaceae family ? a, no matter where you sow the seeds.
Place pots inside a heated windowsill propagator or improvise by placing a clear plastic bag over each pot, holding it in place with an elastic band. After seeds have germinated, remove pots from the protected environment and place on a light windowsill or find space on a bench inside a greenhouse.
When seedlings are a couple of inches high, pinch out the weaker one to allow the remaining shoot to flourish. Water the developing plants regularly, ensuring compost never dries out completely. Move them into slightly bigger pots whenever their roots emerge through the d r a inage holes, to ensu r e they grow vigorously .
Plants will be ready to go outside in late spring. or early summer, when there's no longer any danger from frosts. Give them a sunny spot with well-drained soil about 3ft to 5ft apart. Once plants start to grow in earnest it can be difficult to know where to apply water, so mark the centre of each plant with a small cane .
As for looking after plants, water regularly and feed every couple of weeks with high-potash fertiliser. Harvest fruits when the foliage starts to die back. Either eat immediately or store for future use. They'll last for six months in a cool, dry and frost-free place, as long as you 'cure' the fruit in a sunny spot indoors for two weeks to allow skin to harden.
FIVE SMASHING PUMPKINS 1 'BABY BEAR' The plants produce between five to eight small, globe-shaped fruit with succulent orange flesh and thick skin that makes them perfect for storing.
2 'CASPERITA' Possessing good tolerance against downy mildew disease, plants deliver small, whiteskinned fruit with pale flesh that weigh about a pound each, pictured right.
3 'GOLD SPECK' More compact than many other varieties, the bushy plants produce a handful of fruit that are small, slightly flattened and heavily ridged.
4 'ROUGE VIF D'ETAMPES' The flattened, ridged fruit of this old French variety are thought to have served as inspiration for the pumpkin coach in Charles Perrault's fairy tale Cinderella.
5 'ZOMBIE' Perfect for scaring the neighbours on Halloween, this British-bred variety bears up to three uncanny-looking fruit covered in distinctive warty growths.

Graphic


The gourds come in a variety of colours and will keep well for carving at Halloween, below. Inset left, Travis Gienger's world-record breaker

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



The great Aldi vs Lidl challenge
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: BUSINESS; Pg. 54
Length: 430 words
Byline: BILL TYSON
Body


How do Lidl and Aldi compare on price? They're seen as much the same but it's hard to tell as Lidl doesn't publish all prices online and regular comprehensive grocery price surveys are rare in Ireland.
Comparison site www.Quidu.ie is a great way to compare supermarket prices, excluding Lidl. That's why Lidl wasn't included in last week's grocery price survey, which used Quidu data.
So this week, we popped down to our local Lidl store to compare it with Aldi.
As you'd expect, Aldi and Lidl are almost 'neck and neck' when it comes to price.
Aldi edges it by a nose, coming out (EURO)3.72 cheaper on a basket of 27 basic items ranked by the cheapest available in each store.
Remarkably, 15 of the items were identically priced or within one or two cent across the two supermarket chains.
Of the remaining 12 items, Lidl is cheaper for three - bread, beans and apples - with Aldi edging out its competitor for the remaining nine www.items.UK surveys and an Irish one from last year also show Aldi has a very slight edge on price.
It's worth noting that both chains are cheaper than all others when it comes to average prices.
If you randomly picked these items in other shops, you'd pay twice or three times as much, as we showed in another survey last week.
But it's also worth noting that other supermarkets are no dearer when it comes to ownbrand pricing.
If you were to hunt down the cheapest items in Dunnes, Tesco or SuperValu, for example, you could pay much the same as in Aldi or Lidl.
It's also worth stressing that quality does matter too, especially for items such as sausages, mince and teabags - and your local butcher might be worth a visit if you want a juicy steak for dinner or a particularly nice joint for your Sunday roast.
STORE WARS  Product Aldi Lidl Product Aldi Lidl Milk 0.98 0.98 Eggs (6) 1.26 1.39 White bread 1.11 0.89 Cheddar 5.66 5.67 Rashers 5.36 6.20 Beans 0.59 0.25 Oats 0.79 0.79 Onions 1.06 1.05 Mushrooms 2.64 3.21 Apples (6 mini) 0.96 0.80 Peanut butter 4.38 4.68 Sausages 2.97 3.50 Pasta 0.98 0.98 Liquid detergent 4.71 4.99 Olive oil 4.49 5.05  Salt 0.60 0.58 Mince meat 4.19 4.19 Potatoes (rooster) 0.49 1.07 Ginger 4.40 4.40 Dark choc digestives pkt 0.74 0.74 Toilet roll 9 rolls 2ply 2.29 2.29 Butter 227g 1.85 1.85 Washing up liquid (500ml) 0.94 0.94 Chopped tomatoes (tin) 0.39 0.39 Mayonnaise 2.48 3.17 Cherry tomatoes 0.99 0.99 Black olives (jar) 0.77 0.75 TOTAL 58.07 61.79 Difference -3.72 3.72  Prices are the lowest available in store or online on 27/3/2024 and based on per kg or litre unless otherwise stated. Aldi prices from www.quidu.ie

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



The Hate Speech Bill is a charter for cancel culture
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; OPINION, COLUMN; Pg. 25
Length: 1023 words
Byline: Eithne Tynan
Body


WE MAY be getting ourselves all up in a heap about nothing. By 'we' I mean those of us who have profound reservations about the so-called Hate Speech Bill (and what a motley crew we are, but more on that in a moment). After all this fuss, I suspect it'll never happen. Incoming taoiseach Simon Harris this week pledged to see the legislation through, and showed off those placatory manners of his, to which we're all soon to become accustomed, at their best. There there, revisions, amendments, shh, it'll be fine.
The Bill sailed through the Dáil last year, where it was passed by an impressive 110 votes to 14. It's a mark of our parliamentary system that we can't tell whether that was because 110 TDs were passionately in favour of it or because they had funerals to get to and couldn't be arsed looking into it properly, although recent evidence suggests the latter.
Then it got rather bogged down in the Seanad, and it has not yet reached committee stage there. If it's to be revised and amended as Simon promises, it'll have to go back to the Dáil again after that so that more TDs can be seen to have changed their minds about it. Add in a long summer recess and a spring election and, oops, I'm sorry, your time is up.
D
ON'T put the placards away yet though, because anti-hate crime legislation has to be brought in - not only because it's needed but because Brussels is tapping its foot. We were supposed to have given legislative effect to the European Council framework on this matter by 2010.
The EU framework, though, is about hatred based on racism and xenophobia and refers only to race, colour, religion, descent or national or ethnic origin. Our own existing incitement to hatred act from 1989 does much the same, usefully adding sexual orientation and membership of the Travelling community as grounds for protection against incitement.
But Helen McEntee's Bill goes a lot further, adding to the long list of 'protected characteristics' disability, which is a good and necessary extension, and gender, which is a seriously problematic one. Note not 'sex', but 'gender'. Your sex - as in your inescapable biological destiny to be either male or female, and potentially to suffer discrimination as a result - is not a protected characteristic but your gender is.
And here's how gender is defined in the Bill - brace yourself if you haven't seen this already: '"Gender" means the gender of a person or the gender which a person expresses as the person's preferred gender or with which the person identifies and includes transgender and a gender other than those of male and female'.
That's nothing if not broad and inclusive, no? Anybody left out there? Any omnigender or twospirit folk feeling they might have been unforgivably overlooked? It's remarkable, really, that an anti-hatred Bill that has deliberately - and perplexingly - neglected to define the word 'hatred' itself has nevertheless been so very thorough about this aspect of the wording.
And you don't have to go so far as to publish material with the intention of inciting hatred against a protected group: being 'reckless'
as to whether hatred would be incited is enough; even possession of material likely to incite violence or hatred is enough, before ever you publish it. Search warrants can be issued. Computers can be seized. Jail terms can be imposed.
This is where you get to pick a team you see. Because the opponents of this Bill come in many stripes, including those who fear an erosion of freedom of speech; those who foresee thought crime and a police state; those who don't want to have to conspire in the mass delusion that is transgender ideology; those who think it might be better to talk to people than silence them; those who think 'hatred' should be properly defined before we start legislating about it; and those who object on two or more or all of those grounds.
We're all lumped in together so that you find yourself in strange company - on the same side as people like the suddenly ubiquitous Michael McDowell, and (shudder) Ronan Mullen, and (at least temporarily, till the wind changes again) Sinn Féin.
And collectively we're having our intelligence insulted over it. In his parting shot at Sinn Féin for switching sides on the Bill, outgoing Taoiseach Leo Varadkar accused the party of cowardice for 'buckling' because of 'an online campaign of misinformation'. He added that he thinks the Bill is 'misunderstood by a lot of people'.
Things being misunderstood by the great unwashed is of course the soup of the day in Leinster House since the two referendums. As they see it, the problem is not the legislation but that we don't understand the legislation. We're too busy imbibing malicious fictions on social media instead of reading up. That's us told.
SINN Féin was also accused of flipping to the right over its U-turn on the Bill. But Sinn Féin's precarious equilibrium aside, is it not very much to be regretted that support for freedom of speech has somehow become associated with the right? It has happened, presumably, because of the Trumpy types who want to defend their freedom to deride people from 's***hole countries' on Telegram. But free speech is neither a right-wing nor a left-wing principle but a fundamentally democratic one - and a unifying one. As we've seen and continue to see, both left and right are equally capable of being censorious when it serves them.
We would find out soon enough, if this Bill were to be enacted, how much freedom we would have left to say disagreeable things about people who class themselves as victims. Justice Minister Helen McEntee has perpetually tried to downplay the prospect of spurious accusations of hatred from trans rights activists, but I'm afraid she's being hopelessly overtaken by events.
What people wanted - and what was needed - was a way to protect racial and ethnic minorities from attack; what we got instead was a legislative charter for cancel culture. We can watch with interest while this Bill is gradually turned into a camel and pushed down the road out of sight, but we should keep an eye on it.
MARY CARR IS AWAY
Computers can be seized. Jail terms can be imposed

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



THE INSIDE STORY ON...; RIPLEY STYLISH THRILLER
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 31
Length: 461 words
Byline: Shivani Kochhar
Body


Is Tom Ripley the ultimate conman? Created by novelist Patricia Highsmith in 1955, the character has been portrayed on screen by actors including Dennis Hopper, John Malkovich and, most famously, Matt Damon. And of course there are the Tom Ripley rip-offs such as Saltburn's Oliver Quick. Tom is a master manipulator and murderer - yet somehow retains our fascination.
DID Hollywood Malkovich in the film (2002) - look in this new mysterious
And in this new Netflix adaptation, written and directed by Steven Zaillian (Schindler's List, The Irishman), we get to know Tom (played by Fleabag's 'Hot Priest' Andrew Scott, above) more intimately than ever before. Over eight atmospheric episodes, we see him transform from a small-time fraudster in 1960s New York to living a complex life of luxury and deceit in Italy.
Tom is hired by a wealthy businessman to bring his son Dickie Greenleaf (The Lovers' Johnny Flynn) home from Italy's Amalfi Coast, where he is living off his trust fund with girlfriend Marge (Dakota Fanning). Tom inserts himself into Dickie's life and becomes obsessed with him, slowly taking on his identity.
More like a compelling character study than an action-packed thriller, Ripley has moments of unexpected comedy, such as when Tom is embarrassed to wear a tiny pair of Speedos. 'To me, what it should feel like is what it's like to be Tom Ripley rather than what it's like to be a victim of Tom Ripley,' says Andrew.
YOU star John played RIPLEY RIPLEY's Game out for him series as a criminal
The slowpaced series looks striking as it's filmed in black and white, 'film noir'- style. 'I never saw it as some sunny colourful postcard of a story, but rather as the foreboding suspense story that it is,' says Steven Zaillian.
Ripley was filmed on a staggering 200 sets and locations, including Rome, Venice and the village of Atrani (where Dickie lives). Everything is period perfect - the production team spent years compiling photos of Italy in 1960, so there was real evidence for every prop and costume on set. In Rome, the costumes have the feel of La Dolce Vita, whereas in the poorer Atrani, people are shabbier. To mimic the show's monochrome tone, designers were restricted to black-and-white costumes.
Just as the sets and costumes all look ultra-authentic, Andrew wanted to play Tom as a believable person. 'You can do terrible things and want to do good things,' he says. 'I think that's why Tom Ripley is so fascinating. I love Tom.'
Shivani Kochhar From Thursday, Netflix
DID YOU KNOW? Hollywood star John Malkovich played Ripley in the film Ripley's Game (2002) - look out for him in this new series as a mysterious criminal character.
it's
You can do terrible things and want to do good things. I think that's why Tom Ripley is so fascinating

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



The school that Ashling built; More than 30 Irish builders travelled to The Gambia to construct cct classrooms in memory of teacher murdered while jogging
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 12,13
Length: 867 words
Byline: Nicola Byrne
Body


THREE classrooms built by Irish tradesmen in memory of murdered schoolteacher Ashling Murphy were opened at a school in Africa last week.
More than 30 Irish builders led by Tullamore man Pat Larkin spent this month at Madiana near The Gambian capital of Banjul constructing the new classrooms as well as a community shop and a playground. They also refurbished the existing classrooms.
Mr Larkin said he undertook the project in memory of the 23-year-old primary teacher, who was brutally murdered while jogging on a pathway at the Grand
Canal near Tullamore, Co. Offaly in January 2022.
Jozef Puska, 33, was found guilty of her murder in November of last year.
Mr Larkin - who runs a successful building firm in the UK where he has lived for the past 30 years - knew Ashling's father Ray as a young man. Like many people, Mr Larkin said he was deeply affected by the murder.
He told the Irish Mail on Sunday: 'I've known Ray for many years; his band came to the UK to play music at one of my "big birthdays". He's a lovely man and my heart went out to him over what happened to Ashling.
'I had been out in The Gambia on another school project and I wanted to continue with it and I approached Ray and asked if we could do this in memory of Ashling and he was delighted. The whole family was very happy and supportive.
'So the new classrooms were dedicated to Ashling as a memorial to her and her family.
'One classroom in particular - The Ashling Murphy Memorial
Classroom - features her picture, her club jersey, her county jersey, a mural of her club, Kilcormac/Killoughey and a hurl and sliotar.
'It was important for us to share Ashling's story with the community, and the children who will learn in the classroom built in her memory.'
Volunteers from across the country, including Mayo, Longford, Offaly, Westmeath, Cork, Roscommon, Wexford, Kildare, Waterford, Limerick, Tipperary, Down, Monaghan as well as Irish people living in the UK and Australia all took part in the build.
Many combined their time off work for the St Patrick's Day festivities with annual leave to be able to make the mammoth trip.
The team worked with The Gambian Department of Education to source local supplies and teach local builders during their stay.
DEDICATED: remembered at
Mr Larkin previously volunteered with the Niall Mellon Trust which built houses in South Africa's poorest townships, but when that operation ceased he took a few years off charity work.
Then during the early days of the pandemic, he, along with fellow Irishmen Christy Corroon, Nicholas Corkery and Paddy Barry, decided to fundraise for the Irish Guide Dogs for the Blind organisation in Cork. Through their combined efforts, they raised (EURO)84,000 which was enough to put eight puppies through training.
The connection with The Gambia arose when Mr Larkin was put in touch by an acquaintance with another young schoolteacher called Kumba Gaye.
The 28-year-old Gambian woman had a brain tumour and needed funds to enable her to have surgery overseas.
Mr Larkin and his fellow volunteers selffunded and fundraised to get her the treatment she required in Turkey.
'During her recovery we as a group made Kumba a promise to build a school so that she could return to teaching one day,' he told the MoS.
Ashling is school 'While the operation was successful, Kumba unfortunately lost her battle with cancer on August 22, 2021, just days before we were to travel out to build the school.'
By this point, Mr Larkin and his team had registered the charity, the United Friends for Education (UFFE).
They continued with their visit to Africa where they built a new school in her memory in a village called Giborah.
The charity shipped a container out from Ireland to the African state which contained donations from all over Ireland, from paint, to building materials and tools, toys, various school supplies, desks and chairs.
'Since our first visit in 2021, UFFE have made great connections with the Ministry for Education and the Government in Gambia, who are 100% supportive, super appreciative and on board with our mission,' Mr Larkin added.
'They have provided connections with local building companies who work with us to supply materials and local trades people for each build.
'We are really passionate about working with local trades and the local community for every build with the hope we can pass on skills in trades and construction to the locals.
'All the volunteers that go out to the projects are self-funded. Lots do various fundraising events, or are supported by businesses and donations.
'Our mission is to empower underprivileged children in Africa and around the world through quality education, fostering brighter futures and building stronger communities.'
'  Meanwhile, the Ashling Murphy Memorial Fund set up to honour and keep the teacher's memory alive made a donation of (EURO)3,000 to Tullamore Tradfest last weekend. Ashling was a talented traditional musician, and monies from the fund are being made available to music teachers to enable them to buyfiddles for students who otherwise could not afford them.
nicola.byrne@mailonsunday.ie ? The United Friends For Education can be contacted at www.uffe.ie
'The whole family was happy and supportive'

Graphic


DEDICATED: Ashling is remembered at the schoolJOB WELL DONE: The team of Irish volunteers outside the schoolMEMORY: Pupils are taught in classrooms dedicated to AshlingJOY: Schoolchildren, left, are now enjoying the new facilities at their school in Madiana TEAMWORK: Irish builders joined with local tradesmen to construct the classrooms. Materials and tools were shipped from Ireland

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



The scientists are right... I rejoice in its two-minute transformative powers
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 28
Length: 221 words
Byline: INGE VAN LOTRINGEN
Body


IT'S no surprise that make-up works as an antidepressant.
For the majority of women, a blemish-obliterating concealer or complexionbrightening lipstick is the difference between a brilliant day and a disastrous day - and that isn't proof the world has succumbed to vacuous vanity.
The very marvel of make-up is that it allows us to put on the face we want to present to the world. Feeling right in your skin means confidence - and confidence is the root of much of our achievements in life, as well as our joy.
I rejoice in the two-minute transformative power of my mascara and eyebrow pencil. It's not about trying to achieve perfection or some beauty ideal, it's about temporarily wiping the exhaustion off your face. Or projecting fierceness with bold eyeliner and innocence with rosy cheeks.
As women, we've used (and to an extent, have felt obliged to use) this tool for centuries, so we understand its power.
When beauty entrepreneur Maxine Laceby took up a degree in fine art, she went without make-up for four months as part of a 'dare to go bare' project. She suffered crashing results and her mood hit the floor to such an extent that it prompted her to begin her own line in collagen products. Proof that, for many of us, the magic of make-up is among the most powerful, yet entirely innocuous, depression-busters we have.

Graphic


FACING FACTS: Inge van Lotringen

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



THE T V HOT LIST; TV Editor Mike Mulvihill's pick of the most exciting shows across all platforms this week
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 28,29
Length: 528 words
Byline: Mike Mulvihill
Body


BEST NEW DRAMA THIS TOWN From Peaky Blinders creator Steven Knight comes this drama starring Levi Brown (right) set against the social unrest and vibrant music of the 1980s. See feature, page 6. Easter Sunday/Easter Monday, 9pm, BBC1
BEST BITTERSWEET COMEDY AVOIDANCE With his specs and hangdog manner, Romesh Ranganathan is back as the useless, conflict-averse and procrastinating Jonathan in a second series of the bittersweet family comedy. Jessica Knappett, Lisa McGrillis, Mandeep Dhillon and Kieran Logendra (all above, with Ranganathan) make up the strong supporting cast. Friday, 9.30pm, BBC1
BEST CLIMATE WARNING RISING TIDES: IRELAND'S FUTURE IN A WARMER WORLD Philip Boucher-Hayes explores how we can adapt to new wildfire seasons, learning from the experts in Spain. Travelling to the Netherlands, he learns how we can build world class coastal defences to combat the inevitable rising seas. But Philip discovers there's a limit to how much land we can defend. Wednesday, 9.35pm, RTÉ One
BEST WILDLIFE SERIES MAMMALS There are more than 6,000 species of mammals on the planet (including leopards, below), and they are on every continent, and in every ocean. Join David Attenborough as he follows the journeys of our closest relatives in the animal kingdom in a new six-part series that is, as usual, packed with stunning imagery. Tonight, 7pm, BBC1
BEST GREAT OUTDOORS TRACKS AND TRAILS Tracks and Trails returns for a new series and in this first episode, crime journalist and podcaster Nicola Tallant (pictured) hikes the challenging Boolas Loop in the Comeragh Mountains in Co. Waterford.
Friday, 7.30pm, RTÉ One
BEST FAMILY SERIES RAISED BY THE VILLAGE Fifteen-year-old Alex from north Dublin has been mitching from school and her volatile behaviour is a source of huge stress for her widowed mother Elaine. Reality bites for Alex at the Hayes family dairy farm in Tulla, Co.
Clare where early mornings and scheduled chores are a strict rule. Meanwhile, 16-year-old Calum (pictured) from Jobstown, south Dublin has dropped out of school with no plan for his future beyond gaming and watching music videos. But can a dose of hard work and community connection at the Fitzgerald family's Marlhill open farm in New Inn, Co.
Tipperary help an aimless teen to find a new zest for life?
Tonight, 6.30pm, RTÉ One
BEST CLIMATE SERIES THE END OF THE WORLD WITH BEANZ Martin undertakes an epic journey by land and sea to reach the remote island of Gometra in Scotland to meet with Roc Sandford and his family. He is joined on the island by Roz Purcell (pictured with Martin and Roc) as they learn what it really takes to live an off-grid life.
Martin travels to Navan to find out more about sustainable funeral options and is back on his home turf of Galway to see the benefits of learning how to repair your own bike.
Tuesday, 7pm, RTÉ One
BEST COOKERY SHOW MASTERCHEF Happy birthday to you! Yes, it's a special year for MasterChef as the culinary competition celebrates its 20th anniversary. John Torode and Gregg Wallace (below) will be popping the corks as they welcome a new batch of amateur chefs to the kitchen. Easter Monday, 6.30pm, Wednesday, 9pm, Friday, 7.30pm, BBC1

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



the week ahead with... Oscar Cainer
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 63
Length: 1015 words
Byline: Oscar Cainer
Body


They say the best time to change was yesterday, and the second-best time is today. April fools us by starting with Mercury retrograde, but the Solar Eclipse ensures that ongoing difficulties will soon become yesterday's news.
ARIES MAR 21 - APR 20
Inspiration isn't polite or patient. It arrives without warning, entering without so much as a knock, and acting as if it owns the place. How does it get away with behaving so outrageously? It knows it's always welcome! In April, if you want inspiration to make itself at home in your world, be expectant. The Solar Eclipse brings such a boost that, with revitalised hope, you can achieve great things. Make April a month to remember! Call 1550 511 611.
TAURUS APR 21 - MAY 21
Everything happens for a reason. The problem is that we don't always know what it is. Signals that seem clear can be misleading. Even astrologers have to be careful about how they read the planets' movements to make accurate predictions. Like everyone, we can get it wrong if we jump to conclusions. Yet in April, as long as you reflect (rather than react), all the signs point to you having an excellent month. Take full advantage of April's opportunities! Call 1550 511 611.
GEMINI MAY 22 - JUN 22
Imagine you're going on holiday. You've packed your bags, checked in, and are waiting for your flight to be called. Now? where's that book you're going to read? It's in the bag that's disappeared into the hold.
Frustrating! With your ruler retrograde, April might have that kind of start. Yet the Solar Eclipse brings the experiences you need when you're on vacation. Expect enthusiasm, thrills and fun. It's nearly April! For an inspiring forecast, call 1550 511 611.
CANCER JUN 23 - JUL 23
A new month lies ahead of you, and since every day is 'the first day of the rest of your life', you're facing an abundance of opportunities to refresh your world. If that sounds daunting, don't panic! The Solar Eclipse signals change. Your task is to accept that things are transforming, and allow the changes to unfold. If you seize the opportunities April brings, the breakthroughs will be satisfying. And lasting. Your April prediction has exciting news. Call 1550 511 611.
LEO JUL 24 - AUG 23
If you're feeling less influential than normal, April brings reassurance. The Solar Eclipse enables you to see that the loss you're experiencing is because you're awakening to a new reality. As the month progresses, this clarity will lead to a deeper understanding of what's going on. Your insight will ensure that you make excellent decisions that bring emotional (and material) rewards. Yay! You're going to enjoy April. Find out why! Call 1550 511 611.
VIRGO AUG 24 - SEP 23
There's a difference between checking somewhere out on Google Maps and travelling to the area and looking around. It's a bit like planning a dinner party and actually having people round for a meal; no matter how well you prepare, there'll be surprises to deal with. As April starts with your ruler retrograde, you might need to rethink your plans. But that's OK. You'll end up stronger and happier. For uplifting news, call your month-ahead forecast: 1550 511 611.
LIBRA SEP 24 - OCT 23
You know the feeling when you walk into a house and it's spotlessly tidy? The cushions are plumped up; the sock drawers are neatly arranged. It's easy to compare our own homes and feel we come up short. They say cleanliness is next to godliness, but also that you can't judge a book by its cover! In April, focus on how things feel not how they look. Following your heart is key to comfort and joy. April's cosmic events could transform your life! Find out how! Call 1550 511 611.
SCORPIO OCT 24 - NOV 22
Self-help gurus talk about keeping things simple.
Apparently, it's the key to an easy life. Meanwhile, kids are taught simple maths, which they're expected to use to work out ever more complicated equations. So, should you go for simple or complex this month? While you can expect the usual challenges, if you're prepared to adapt your approach each time, your achievements will be top-class. April is chock-a-block with celestial action! Call 1550 511 611.
SAGITTARIUS NOV 23 - DEC 21
We expect the Sun to rise every morning, and set each night. But suppose it decides to have a duvet day? Fortunately, that's not going to happen. Some things are always there for us. As usual, unpredictable situations will pop up in April. But the spark of sunshine within you has resources to deal with whatever comes along. Add the Solar Eclipse, and this month success is guaranteed. Enjoy! April is going to be amazing! For four minutes of insight, call 1550 511 611.
CAPRICORN DEC 22 - JAN 20
When people need help, you're at the top of their 'go-to' list. You're dealing with your 'to-do' list so competently that you hardly notice a few additional items. But do you want to spend April looking after problems other folk should be dealing with? If you enjoy extra responsibilities, go for it. But April brings opportunities with your name on them. Make sure you've got the energy and time to seize them. April's cosmic events could transform your life! Find out how! Call 1550 511 611.
AQUARIUS JAN 21 - FEB 19
Some people are philosophical and make do with whatever comes their way; some people don't seem to think much, and experience amazing good fortune. Luck defies comprehension, and the harder we try to grasp the way it works, the more it slips through our fingers. So, what mindset should you adopt in April? If you accept what life brings, and stay hopeful, your luck will be in! For news you need to hear about April, call 1550 511 611.
PISCES FEB 20 - MAR 20
When you move into a new home, you make decisions about where to put the furniture. And that's where it stays. Then, one day, you might be sitting on the sofa and realise that if you shifted things around, you'd make better use of the space. With a creative shuffle, it will be much improved. Use this technique on your life in April. Inventive (easy) ways to solve old problems will lead to a much more comfortable life. For uplifting news about April, call 1550 511 611.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



These housewives are not desperate, just dull
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 49
Length: 692 words
Body


MATTHEW BOND Mothers' Instinct Cert: 15A, 1hr 34mins ????? HHH HH Godzilla X Kong: The New Empire Cert: 12A, 1hr 55mins ????? HH HHH Kung Fu Panda 4 Cert: PG, 1hr 34mins ????? HH HHH Drift Cert: 15A, 1hr 33mins ????? HH HHH
At first glance, Mothers' Instinct looks like a stylish 1960s prequel to the once hugely popular TV show Desperate Housewives. In fact, it's a remake of a 2018
Belgian film, itself based on a 2012 novel by Barbara Abel. But as we watch Anne Hathaway and Jessica Chastain playing perfect suburban housewives, with their perfect homes, perfect husbands and perfect sons, it's the desperate ladies of Wisteria Lane that come to mind. Because, as they showed us, no life is ever as perfect as it looks.
So it duly proves here, as a tragic accident brings the happy round of shared school runs, evening cocktails and surprise birthday parties to an end. One mother is grieving, the other nursing a sense of possibly undeserved guilt; one mother has a history of mental illness, the other is possibly heading that way.
There's no doubt that Hathaway and Chastain as neighbours Celine and Alice are pretty much dream casting, and with hair, make-up and wardrobe making the most of the early 1960s setting, for a little while it looks like we might be in for the sort of sensitive exploration of grief and loss that Todd Haynes, director of both Far From Heaven and Carol, might have given us.
But slowly and with a slightly disappointing inevitability, we slip into the familiar and melodramatic territory of the psychological thriller. It's still watchable but also a shame as, while Hathaway and Chastain are just okay here and will no doubt make better films in the future, the terrific performance of Eamon Patrick O'Connell as young Theo is somewhat wasted.
Godzilla X Kong: The New Empire is a sequel to the 2021 film
Godzilla Vs Kong, apparently making it the fifth film in the so-called MonsterVerse that began with Gareth Edwards' reboot of Godzilla in 2014. This time around, the former foes - the huge hairy one who roars and the gigantic lizard with nuclear-powered breath - are on the same side. At least I think they are. Eventually… But why, I hear you ask? Good question, but answering it is so difficult. Returning director Adam Wingard has clearly set out to go back to the B-movie aesthetic of Godzilla's 1950s heyday. As a result, everything - cinematography, sound, visual effects - are all worse than most modern cinema-goers will be expecting. And you can say the same about the acting and screenplay. Monster movie buffs will probably love it, and anyone with a houseful of bloodthirsty youngsters to entertain will be grateful. But I was bored silly by a plot that seems to draw substantially on Jules Verne's Journey To The Center Of The Earth and Arthur no thrills: Anne Hathaway and 'terrific' Eamon Patrick O'Connell, left, in Mother's Instinct. Below: Kung Fu Panda 4
Conan Doyle's The Lost World without being half as good.
Accompanying parents be warned, the interminable second half features the longest monster battle you will ever, ever see.
There hasn't been a Kung Fu Panda film for eight years, but now along comes Kung Fu Panda 4, just in time for Easter and feeling distinctly like Kung Fu Panda-lite.
Out go the entire Furious Five, saving voice fees for the likes of Angelina Jolie, Seth Rogen and Jackie Chan, while in comes Awkwafina as Zhen, the crafty fox, and Viola Davis, as shape-shifting baddie of the day, The Chameleon.
But with Po, once again voiced by Jack Black, facing pressure to step down as Dragon Warrior and setting off on one last adventure, much of the humour and charm of the first two films has been lost.
In Drift, Cynthia Erivo, star of both Widows and Harriet, plays Jacqueline, who we slowly learn is a refugee from Liberia now sleeping rough on a Greek island. Flashbacks point to a long stay in a posh part of London and a privileged life as the daughter of a government minister in Liberia. Much is eventually explained but much is not, in an arthouse film where the pace is off-puttingly slow, the story underdeveloped and Erivo's performance so low key as to almost disappear.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Time to hit the diving range?; Golf courses, shops, farmers and builders hit by record rainfall
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 29
Length: 896 words
Byline: COLM MCGUIRK
Body


GOLF clubs have reported an 'unprecedented' level of closures since last October as record rainfall levels flood fairways across the country.
A survey carried out by the Club Management Association of Ireland (CMAI) on behalf of the Irish Mail on Sunday shows that over the last few months clubs have had to stay closed anywhere between two and four times more days than previous years.
'Major flooding' and waterlogged sections of courses have slowed grass growth and encouraged the spread of fusarium disease, which diminishes the quality of greens and fairways.
CMAI chief executive Michael Walsh said these 'most unusual' conditions are having a significant impact on clubs.
He told the MoS: 'A couple of clubs have had anything up to 20 days wiped out between Christmas and now.
'Courses have been flooded that have never been flooded before, and then [once water recedes] you can't really work the land because it's too sodden.'
He added it has been a 'very, very difficult' period for most golf clubs, with even some links courses - which are built on sand which drains water away more quickly - experiencing flooding for the first time.
'It's been horrific really from the golfing management point of view and from a golf club member's point of view,' said Mr Walsh, who is the former manager of Killiney Golf Club.
Even members-only clubs lose revenue when closed, through bars and restaurants being shuttered and loss of competition days, for which the entrants pay a fee.
Almost all of the respondents to the survey said they have implemented or are considering measures to protect against extra rainfall going forward, from adding more sand on courses to major drainage overhauls.
And the bad news for golf courses and many other outdoor activity based businesses is that there appears to be no let up in miserable weather in the short term.
Met Éireann has reported above-average rainfall across the winter months for almost all of the country, on the back of several 'wettest ever' months in 2023.
And according to climate models, we can expect more of the same going forward, with scientists confident the downpours of the last few months are the result of human-caused climate change.
Meanwhile, those who sell items for enjoying the great outdoors are praying for a dry spring too.
Damien Kelly, the director of www.OutdoorLiving.ie, told the MoS: 'It's been one of the wettest winters in history, so it is affecting our sales. That is very noticeable with the record rainfall.'
Furniture sales are down overall, Mr Kelly said, although more people are buying quick-drying outdoor sofas and cushions, intent on making the most of their gardens regardless of the conditions.
Despite the challenges, Mr Kelly sounded an optimistic note, saying the year 'usually balances itself out' in terms of its wet and dry spells, 'so we're not worried about the weather'.
'April can be a very dry month, so I'm very optimistic.'
Apart from ruining leisure activities, the rain has also hit farmers who need the weather to play ball to put bread on their own tables and tables around the country and beyond.
Bobby Miller, a tillage farmer who is chairman of the Irish Grain Growers group, said there were 80,000 fewer acres of winter crops sown last October and November, when farmers 'couldn't even get crops into the ground' owing to high rainfall then.
'When it comes to the current situation - March is usually our peak time to sow crops like barley and wheat, and less than 5% of the crops are gone into the ground at this stage.
'You'd be hoping or expecting 70% to 80% to be in the ground by this stage, or even 90%. And it just hasn't happened this spring,' he told the MoS.
Farmers had similar issues last year, with most crops not planted until April for the same reasons.
'There's a time window for getting crops into the ground and there comes a point where it's just not viable to plant crops. We're not there yet, but…' And it is the same for livestock farmers, who haven't been able to let animals out to graze as it would do too much damage to the saturated land ahead of peak growing months. This has resulted in a shortage of fodder among farmers, meaning they have to spend more than usual on feed.
'April and May are the key months for grass growth - that's when you save next winter's fodder,' Mr Miller explained. 'And there's a cost incurred by having to keep livestock in for so long.
'You try and budget for a four, five, six-month winter, but it's heading into seven or eight months now. It's a heavy cost to be carrying.'
Construction has also felt the dampening effect of the weather. Conor O'Connell, who is housing director at the Construction Industry Federation (CIF), also said the 'extraordinary period of rainfall' has slowed down building.
'Springtime is usually the period for housing commencements but the weather has affected and delayed production,' he said.
'Rain can have a delaying effect on construction of residential units and it also has cost implications.
'Brick laying, pipe laying, plastering outside, painting outside… these can all be interrupted as a result of poor weather.'
Mr O'Connell said it is 'probably too early to say' if inclement weather could affect housing targets for the year, but the CIF 'don't expect' that to be the case.
colm.mcguirk@dmgmedia.ie
'We can expect more of the same going forward' 'Farmers couldn't get crops into the ground'

Graphic


DAMPENER: Flooding at Cork Golf Club typifies the 'significant impact' on courses countrywideHORRIFIC: CMAI's Michael Walsh says it's been 'very difficult'

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Tipp's long wait to reach final ends after victory
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 62
Length: 304 words
Byline: Daragh Ó Conchúir
Body


TIPPERARY will end a 15-year wait to appear in a national senior final when they line out against Galway in the Very Camogie League Division 1A decider at Croke Park on April 14. Denis Kelly's charges accounted for Clare 4-19 to 0-7 at Cusack Park to confirm their qualification as table toppers on score difference, while Galway got the better of Cork by 0-14 to 0-9 at Duggan Park.
Tipp have had a number of reverses when closing in on a return to the big stage but with a youthful Clare side losing their four games to this juncture, anything but a victory for the visitors would have been a shock.
And that was how events unfolded, with first-half goals from Grace O'Brien and Karen Kennedy putting the issue to bed by the interval, at which stage the Blue and Golds held sway by 2-8 to 0-3. It was one-way traffic in the second half too, and Eimear Heffernan raised another green flag before O'Brien nabbed her second.
The result confirmed Clare's relegation to Division 1B.
Losses to Tipp meant that Galway and Cork were essentially in a winner-takes-all clash, although a draw would have been sufficient for the home team. In the end, apart from conceding the first score from a free to Amy O'Connor, the Maroons held the upper hand.
Carrie Dolan totted up a personal tally of ten points.
It was 0-8 to 0-5 at the interval and points from Dolan, Aoife Donohue and Orlaith McGrath stretched the gap.
Galway finished strongly with three points, Dolan splitting the posts either side of a Donohue effort from play.
The south-east local derby was won by Kilkenny, who outgunned Waterford by 2-10 to 0-13 at the SETU Arena.
A goal just before the short whistle from Caoimhe Keher Murtagh was a vital score and Kilkenny always had their noses in front from that juncture.
Wexford and Dublin will contest the Division 1B final on April 13.

Graphic


FOCUS: Orlaith McGrath of Galway

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Today's Previews
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 65
Length: 637 words
Byline: MICHEAL CLIFFORD ; PHILIP LANIGAN
Body


ALLIANZ FL Division 1 final Dublin v Derry Croke Park, 4.0 (TG4) Derry return to the top-tier final for the first time in 10 years, a game in which they were one of many to receive a brutish reality check from a rampant Dublin team.
A decade later the temptation is to suggest history is set to repeat itself, but it is unlikely to roll just like that.
Mainly because Derry are different and better now. A decade ago they were accidental finalists, while now their case to be the second best team in the land engages little debate, validated by the comfort in which they qualified for this.
Their only loss was to Dublin and even that came with the qualification of Mickey Harte fielding a weakened team, most notably resting Conor Glass, whose presence on the pitch opposite Brian Fenton is reason enough to get the turnstiles clicking.
There is also the sense that under Harte and Gavin Devlin, the depth of the Derry panel has been fattened with the likes of Diarmuid Baker, Donncha Gilmore, Cormac Murphy, while Lachlan Murray's performance last weekend suggests a continued easing of the burden of main strike forward Shane McGuigan.
However, the All-Ireland champions have got even better, and their depth is unrivalled.
It is easily forgotten that Dubin won the Sam Maguire last year in the absence of Seán Bugler, while Ciarán Kilkenny was struggling for a place and Niall Scully did not have one.
All three have been excellent this spring, backed up by the continued emergence of the likes of Theo Clancy, Cian Murphy and Ross McGarry, all while they await the return of their ten-All-Ireland-chasing trio of Stephen Cluxton, James McCarthy and Michael Fitzsimons.
They will be asked enough hard questions to remind Dessie Farrell that this season is not done yet but, as ever, they will answer them.
Verdict: Dublin
Division 2 final Armagh v Donegal Croke Park, 2.0 (TG4) Jim McGuinness makes his return to the Croke Park sidelines for the first time since the 2014 All-Ireland final in a game of significantly less importance.
Of all the divisional finals, this is the one which struggles most for relevancy, not only because the main prize of promotion has been achieved but it invariably features counties whose stature and ambition goes well beyond this.
So it is with both Armagh and Donegal, two teams whose stay in the second tier was never going to be anything other than brief and who, at a minimum, will be in the last eight when it matters most later this summer.
They finished level at the Athletic Grounds in the group stage - which suited both - but pushing harder here may suit Donegal's eye better, not only by virtue that they have a three-week gap to the championship but also because they will seek to maintain their unbeaten run under McGuinness.
Verdict: Donegal
ALLIANZ HL Division 2A final Carlow v Laois Dr Cullen Park, 3.0 (TG4 YouTube) Carlow won the group headto-head in impressive fashion but Laois really seem to be coming to the boil at the right time. Putting 4-20 on Kerry was one sign of that; beating a Down team who have been so competitive this spring by 11 in the semi-final another.
Paddy Purcell, Ross King and Aaron Dunphy are in flying form and bring a wealth of big-game know-how too.
Verdict: Laois
Division 3A final Mayo v Sligo MacHale Park, 2.0 Gavin Connolly's second-half dismissal for Sligo helped turn a tight group game in Mayo's favour the last time so a repeat win certainly won't be easy.
Verdict: Mayo
Division 3B final Fermanagh v Warwickshire Brewster Park, 2.00 After playing a part for Ireland in the shinty, Luca McCusker has been at the forefront of Fermanagh's campaign.
A trophy would be the perfect riposte to those who would see the county axed from National League action.
Verdict: Fermanagh nAll finals will go to extra time if necessary with a winner decided on the day

Graphic


KEY MAN: Shane McGuigan

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Tragic family will be buried this week
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 14
Length: 234 words
Byline: Debbie McCann
Body


A MOTHER and her two daughters killed in a road accident this week will be laid to rest on Wednesday.
Una Carlin Bowden, 47, and her daughters Ciara, 14, and Saoirse, 9, died after their car collided with a fuel lorry on the N17 outside Claremorris, Co. Mayo on Tuesday.
The family had lived in Gortachalla, Moycullen, Co. Galway, for several years and the girls attended school locally.
Una, Ciara and Saoirse will be buried in Una's native Donegal this week. All three will be laid to rest next to Una's late mother.
The funeral will be held in St Eunan's Church, Raphoe at 12 noon, with the burial at the old graveyard, Convoy.
The young family were travelling home from visiting Una's dad John Carlin in Raphoe when the crash occurred. David Bowden was in Ethiopia working with the United Nations at the time.
Meanwhile, the road-death toll continues to rise after a woman in her 30s died in a two-car collision at Kilsheelan, Co. Tipperary, at around 10pm on Friday.
Gardaí confirmed the victim, a passenger in one of the cars, was pronounced dead at the scene and her remains were removed to University Hospital Waterford (UHW), for a post mortem.
The male driver of the car, in his 40s, was also taken to UHW and was treated for injuries thought to be non-life-threatening.
The driver and a passenger of the second car, both males aged in their late teens, were treated at UHW for non-life-threatening injuries.

Graphic


AGONY: Left to right, Una, Ciara and Saoirse Bowden

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



TVON DEMAND; Your must-see shows this week What to watch and where to find it. Your essential guide starts here?
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 30,31
Length: 854 words
Body


Netflix / AMAZON PRIME VIDEO / O APPLE TV+ / SKY/NOW
The best of DRAMA
ALEX RIDER TEENAGE SPY RETURNS It's been a while since we've seen Anthony Horowitz's teenage spy ? series two arrived back in 2021. The new, third and final batch of episodes is based on Horowitz's fifth book and keeps up the globetrotting style, opening in Malta with Alex on the trail of deadly agency Scorpia. The Bridge's Sofia Helin (right, with Otto Farrant as Alex and Vicky McClure as Mrs Jones) joins the cast as a villain in a run that starts slowly, but soon picks up the pace when the UK comes under deadly threat. Series 3 from Friday, Amazon
SUGAR PRIVATEEYE
COLIN FARRELL STARS
MYSTERY It's hard to know what to make of this stylish, 'genrebending' noir with Colin Farrell at its centre, and that's the attraction of watching ? the series is almost as much of a mystery as the mystery its central character, the slightly supernatural LA private eye John Sugar (Farrell, above), is investigating. As to the plot of that mystery, here's what you need to know: after a case in Tokyo takes a difficult turn, Sugar is supposed to be taking some downtime, but he's hired by a big- name movie producer to look for his 25-year-old missing granddaughter. If you enjoy a stylish slow burn, this eight-parter should feel like a treat. Weekly from Friday, Apple TV+
FROM STAGE TO SCREEN
THE HOUSE OF BERNARDA ALBA FAMILY BATTLES Harriet Walter plays the domineering matriarch in a searing play from Alice Birch (Succession, Lady Macbeth) that was staged at London's National Theatre in 2023. Bernarda rules her house with a rod of iron, but her youngest, Adela (Isis Hainsworth, right), wants to break free - what will the consequences be? This fascinating, unflinching and passionately acted study of the impact of men on women ? and of women on each other ? is staged in a doll's house-like set that allows you to see everything and everyone at once. National Theatre At Home
THE BIG MOVIE PREMIERE
SCOOP REAL-LIFE THRILLER Emily Maitlis's 2019 interview with Prince Andrew about the allegations linking him to Jeffrey Epstein was a seismic moment in the relationship between royals and the media. But the wheeling and dealing that went on to arrange and air the interview were just as groundbreaking. This film tells that story, deploying a terrific cast to spectacular effect. Gillian Anderson is predictably perfect as Maitlis (left), facing off Frost/Nixon-style with a near-unrecognisable Rufus Sewell as Prince Andrew (right), but Billie Piper almost nicks the film as Sam McAlister, the brilliant Newsnight producer who arranged it all. From Friday, Netflix
DOCUMENTARY
GRISLY DELVE INTO THE PAST
t he's
ROYAL AUTOPSY INNOVATIVE HISTORY Pathologist Brett Lockyer dissects the prosthetic 'bodies' of monarchs in this innovative and sometimes gross dive into the lives of kings and queens past. As Dr Lockyer proceeds with his grisly work, Professor Alice Roberts asks questions about why they died. Series one covered Charles II and Elizabeth I, while the new, second series finds Henry IV, Mary I, George IV and Queen Anne waiting on the slab. Series 2 from Tuesday, Sky/Now
FILM TEARJERKING
ALL OF US STRANGERS EERIE BAFTA NOMINEE What if you could meet your parents as equals?
LOVE STORY
That's the idea behind Andrew Haigh's movie, which stars Irish actor Andrew Scott (see right) as a gay, lonely writer who visits his childhood home and meets his parents at the age he is now ? they died in a car crash when he was 12 and are beautifully played here by Claire Foy and Jamie Bell. They get to know each other across a series of honest, difficult and sometimes very funny encounters, each coming to terms with the past. The less said about the plot beyond that the better, but suffice to say this is a deft and moving piece of storytelling. Disney+
HOW TO DATE BILLY WALSH LIVELY SCHOOL ROMCOM How long can you afford to wait to tell someone that you've loved them forever? That's the dilemma faced by teen Archie (Sebastian Croft, above right) who's hopelessly in love with best pal Amelia (Charithra Chandran, centre). Just as he's worked up the courage to tell her, though, a new American student (Tanner Buchanan, left) arrives and Amelia has eyes for no one else? Can Archie win her back? It's fun finding out in this frothy teen romcom which has a good adult cast, too, including Lucy Punch and Nick Frost. From Friday, Amazon Prime Video
PICK OF THE WEEK LOOT BILLIONAIRE COMEDY RETURNS Bridesmaids' Maya Rudolph (above) is always a lovable on-screen presence, even when she's playing a materialistic billionaire who has no idea how to act in the real world. That's what she's doing in Apple's comedy, which is back for series two this week and follows Molly as she tries to give away her fortune in pursuit of personal growth. It's a tougher challenge than she expected, but the show is great at delivering her journey with a wickedly sharp sense of humour. Series 2 weekly from Wednesday, Apple TV+
120 The number of billions Molly is trying to give away. Her personal fortune stems from when she divorced her tech billionaire husband in series one.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Two long-awaited reports into RTÉ are delayed yet again
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 7
Length: 446 words
Byline: Nicola Byrne
Body


GOVERNMENT-commissioned reports into how RTÉ is run have been further delayed and are not expected to be published until the end of next month at the earliest, the Irish Mail on Sunday has learned.
Staff at the beleaguered national broadcaster this weekend complained that the continued delay is hampering efforts to reform the crisisplagued company.
It is now nine months since the two reports were commissioned by Media Minister Catherine Martin. Since then, several deadlines have been missed, including the latest one which expired this week.
A Government source said it will likely be the end of April before the overdue reports are finally published.
The source told the MoS: 'There is nothing imminent and there won't be. It will likely be another four weeks at least.'
The latest delays come as the new chair of the RTÉ board, Terence O'Rourke, presided over his first meeting on Thursday night.
It had been envisaged the reports would have been completed before he began his tenure as the replacement to Siún Ní Raghallaigh, who resigned amid the controversy over exit payments made to departing RTÉ executives.
After the meeting, a board spokesman said the board had no public comment to make.
One senior RTÉ staff member told the MoS: 'These reports were due to be delivered in January, then the end of February, then the end of March and now we're hearing that nothing will happen for another few weeks.
'Meanwhile, we're all wondering - what's the plan for RTÉ? What's the DG's vision? And everyone's sitting on their hands.
'Catherine Martin's handling of the Ní Raghallaigh [exit] was a fiasco. This is another one. It's a hopeless performance from her,' the staff member said.
Another staff member added: 'This is a hurdle that has to be jumped before anything can happen. The delay is inexcusable. It's rubbish. Is this the best they [Ms Martin's department] can do?
'The atmosphere at RTÉ continues to be at rock bottom. Everyone wants to turn a corner.
'Talks about how the organisation is going to be funded can't begin until these reports are in and that's affecting every single thing that happens in RTÉ.'
Ms Martin's department couldn't confirm when the reports would be published when contacted by the MoS this week. A spokesman said: 'It is expected they will be submitted to the minister in due course along with the Mazars final report, which the minister has already said will be released together with those reports.'
Asked to comment on the delays, an RTÉ spokesman said: 'RTÉ looks forward to the publication of the reports, and the publication of its new strategy thereafter, critical for the stabilisation and renewal of vital public service media in Ireland.'

Graphic


DELAY: DG Kevin Bakhurst, left; Catherine Martin, right

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



VIRGIN WANTS SLICE OF RTE'S LICENCE FEE PIE; Rival broadcaster writes to minister seeking (EURO)30m share Commercial broadcaster asks media minister for public cash to fund nd station's current affairs, sports and documentary programmes Virgin Media seeks (EURO)30M from licence fee for public service output
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 3,6,7
Length: 1437 words
Byline: John Lee
Body


RTÉ'S main rival has ramped up political pressure on the beleaguered national broadcaster by writing to the Government to seek a (EURO)30m slice of the TV licence fee pie, the Irish Mail on Sunday has learned.
Virgin Media Television has hit out at the crisis-plagued Dublin 4-based station's virtual monopoly on State media funding Turn to Page 6 ??.
? From Page 3 as the Coalition comes under pressure to unveil a new revenue model for RTÉ.
And crucially, the MoS understands that incoming Taoiseach Simon Harris is adamant that the funding regime for RTÉ will be decided by July, which will mark a year since the RTÉ crisis emerged.
The source said Mr Harris supports 'a lower licence fee' that is 'distributed among different media organisations and collected by Revenue'.
In a hard-hitting letter to Media Minister Catherine Martin, Virgin Media managing director Áine Ní Chaoindealbháin said: 'The continued funding of RTÉ by Government, despite manifest governance issues, distorts competition and fuels an unfair commercial market that is unsustainable.'
Noting that Ms Martin's department is currently reviewing 'the television licence fee model', the boss of Virgin Media Ireland, formerly TV3, warned that the station will need State funding to continue to provide public broadcasting services.
Ms Ní Chaoindealbháin wrote: 'As the only Irish linear and digital broadcaster with a Public Service Broadcasting licence and remit we believe that the full funding of Virgin Media Television's (EURO)30m Public Service Broadcasting content budget? is a viable and necessary model to follow.'
Justifying the request, the letter - seen by the MoS - states: 'As the only public service and free-to-air broadcaster in Ireland not receiving any direct financial support from the State, we wish to set out our position regarding the future funding model.
'It is important to highlight once again that public service media is more than just RTÉ and TG4. It includes Virgin Media Television, radio, newspapers and other outlets covering news and public affairs on a daily basis.'
Virgin Media's appeal for State funding comes as RTÉ continues to deal with the fallout from several controversies since the scandal involving secret payments to former Late Late Show host Ryan Tubridy broke last summer.
The controversies have blown a massive hole in the State's broadcaster's finances as the numbers paying the TV licence fee plummeted. Faced with the prospect of bankruptcy, RTÉ pleaded for further State funding in return for promised reforms, including redundancies at the station.
However, Cabinet patience over the slow pace of progress and the lack of detail provided by director general Kevin Bakhurst about his long-term plan or vision for RTÉ, is wearing thin.
Ministers this weekend said they 'strongly support' the campaign by Virgin to get 'a slice' of the licence fee funding for its public service broadcasting output. One Cabinet member said that an 'embattled and discredited' RTÉ can no longer command a virtual monopoly on State funding for media.
As previously revealed by the MoS, most Government ministers favour a redrawing of the current licence fee regime. Under the plan, favoured by key Cabinet decision makers, the annual fee would be reduced from (EURO)160 to (EURO)100.
Most within Cabinet are also in favour of ending RTÉ's virtual monopoly on State media funding.
In the plan being considered, other media organisations, including Virgin, newspapers and local radio station, would receive substantial allocations.
RTÉ rakes in almost 90% of the revenue raised from the TV licence fee.
According to its most recently published annual accounts, RTÉ took in (EURO)195.6m in licence fee revenue in 2022, on top of a further (EURO)152.1m in commercial advertising earnings. In addition, the Government provided supplementary aid of (EURO)15m the same year.
RTÉ was given further supplementary funding of (EURO)16m in 2023 and is highly likely to make further demands for another taxpayer bailout this year.
In the wake of public and political anger over ongoing controversies at Montrose there is agreement at the top of Government that RTÉ has ceded any moral right to its 90% allocation of the licence fee.
One minister told the MoS: 'RTÉ clearly has lost all authority in this area. We are only helped by Virgin's intervention at this point because, if the licence fee is to be maintained in any shape or form, it has to be along the lines of a new model that acknowledges the revolution that has happened in how people access information.
'RTÉ is now just one of a smorgasbord of media offerings, and while its corporate reputation has collapsed, the organisation still thinks it can retain exclusive access to State funding. That is not a sustainable position considering its new, damaged, reputation.'
Virgin's letter to Ms Martin also contains significant criticism of RTÉ and raised some uncomfortable issues for the minister, who has been the subject of political attacks over her failure to get to grips with the many crises that have engulfed the national broadcaster.
She accused RTÉ of 'continuing to enter into content and rights agreements without robust due diligence in place to ensure best use of public funds'.
Ms Ní Chaoindealbháin cited the example of RTÉ spending millions in public funds to pay for content available on other channels, including soaps such as EastEnders.
The Virgin boss added: 'This continuous expenditure of State funds in this way simply fuels an unfair and increasingly anti-competitive broadcasting market and should not be allowed to continue.
'It is our view that it is essential that public funds are transparently used to support public service content only, regardless of whether the recipient is a public service media organisation or a public service content provider.'
Ms Ní Chaoindealbháin said Virgin is Ireland's 'leading independent, national, commercial public service broadcaster, operating under the provisions of Sections 70 and 71 of the Broadcasting Act 2009'.
She wrote: 'For the past 25 years, Virgin Media Television has played a major role in ensuring plurality and diversity in Irish media.
'On a daily basis we keep the nation informed through trusted news and current affairs programmes, as well as high quality drama, entertainment and sport.'
Virgin Media claimed it provides more public service broadcasting than either RTÉ or TG4.
The letter goes on to state: 'We currently provide 6.5 hours of live public service broadcasting every weekday and 3.5 hours at weekends which is more than the output of RTÉ and TG4. This excludes our extensive portfolio of sports rights with significant Irish public interest that we broadcast free to air to a national audience.'
Virgin broadcasts an hour-long current affairs show, The Tonight Show presented by Claire Brock and Ciara Doherty, four nights a week, along with a full news bulletin and current affairs schedule.
Virgin Media said it supports the independent production sector through its commissions across drama, entertainment and documentaries. According to RTÉ's annual accounts, the total operating costs of RTÉ's News and Current Affairs department was (EURO)56m in 2022.
Drawing a comparison with her station's rival, Ms Ní Chaoindealbháin said: 'It is important to note that Virgin Media Television receives no direct financial support from the State for its public service broadcasting remit and our only revenue derives from commercial advertising sales.'
She cited the example of the Sound and Vision funding initiative, which facilitates the production of culturally relevant programmes for Irish audiences that would otherwise not be made, as 'a very good model to follow'.
But she added: 'The funding and remit must be significantly expanded.'
The Virgin boss warned that the station would be unable to continue providing public broadcasting services without State assistance.
Highlighting the uneven playing field that exists between the independent station and the national broadcaster, she added: 'This current level of investment is unsustainable as we are competing with an organisation that receives over (EURO)195.6m in annual State aid plus what have become annual multimillion-euro taxpayer-funded topups, without the requirement for transparency and accountability of where and how this State aid is bring spent.
'It is our position that any State/ exchequer funding (and license fee if it is to remain) should be made available to all public service media with clear measures, obligations, and transparent reporting commitments.'
john.lee@mailonsunday.ie
'RTÉ has lost all authority in this area'

Graphic


PLEA: ?ine N? Chaoindealbh?in of Virgin Media TelevisionBUY-INS: Virgin boss criticised spending public cash on the likes of EastEnders and Top GearCURRENT AFFAIRS: Presenters Claire Brock and Ciara Doherty

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



What a riot; A hot young band, anarchy on the streets, racial tensions - and Downton's Lady Mary. It's the new 80s-set series from the man behind Peaky Blinders
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 6
Length: 513 words
Byline: Tim Oglethorpe
Body


He made a star of Cillian Murphy long before his Oscarwinning role as J Robert Oppenheimer. Now Steven Knight, creator of Peaky
Blinders and its hero Tommy Shelby, is hoping to catapult some more relative unknowns to fame with his latest drama series This Town, the story of a young band formed during a period of tension in the West Midlands in 1981.
IRA sympathisers are planning terror campaigns while youths clash with police on the streets of Birmingham. Escaping from the brick-throwing and baton-charging is Dante (Levi Brown), a quiet lad who realises the poetry he writes translates perfectly into song lyrics. His cousin Bardon (Ben Rose) joins the band as guitarist and singer, and Jeannie (Eve Austin) writes the music. Bardon's mother Estella (Downton Abbey star Michelle Dockery) sings with the band as well.
Steven reckons the youngsters, who were pulled together to play the fledgling band at the heart of the six-part series, could have a future in music as well as acting. 'Their performances are amazing,' he says. 'We wanted actors who could perform credibly as musicians, but we didn't expect them to be as good as they are.'
They all had to prove they had what it takes. 'The main cast had to tape a song,' says executive producer Karen Wilson. 'Ben Rose just blew me away. He got his guitar out and I instantly knew we had a rock star in the making.'
This Town is a journey of hope for the young musicians, set against a backdrop of racial and social tension. Many of the characters were inspired by people Steven knew in the 80s, including Dante's soldier brother Gregory (Jordan Bolger). But the band itself, which plays ska music, is fictional ? and Steven is clear this is not a thinly disguised biopic of one of the bands he grew up, like The Beat or The Specials. 'It would be very different if it was a real group,' he says. 'It's not based even remotely on my own experiences. I've got brothers who are musicians, but I wasn't in a band. My parents would perform their own songs in our house and sing in pubs and clubs. This has been inspired by that experience.'
Some of the biggest names in contemporary music have written songs for the series, including Kae Tempest, Celeste and Self Esteem. 'We didn't want it to sound like Now That's What I Call Music 1981,' says director Paul Whittington. 'There's music people will recognise, such as Food For Thought by UB40, but we asked the composers to imagine they were in 1981 and come up with original music appropriate to that time.' The world created by the designers is also steeped in the 80s. 'They sourced a Fairy Liquid bottle that was around at the time,' says Michelle Dockery. 'That took me back to my childhood.'
This Town was filmed at a studio in Birmingham, and on housing estates in the area. Locals are often uncomfortable with filmmakers, but Paul was welcomed with open arms.
'We had a calling card? Peaky Blinders,' he laughs. 'When they heard This Town was a Steven Knight production they couldn't have been more helpful.'
?Tim Oglethorpe ? This Town, tonight and Easter Monday, 9pm, BBC1.

Graphic


Michelle Dockery as singer Estella (top) and Levi Brown as young poet Dante (above). Right: Cillian in Peaky Blinders

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



What could be causing a constant ache near my cheek at night?; Ask Dr Ellie THE GP WHO'S ALWAYS HERE FOR YOU
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 21
Length: 680 words
Body


FOR the past five years I've been experiencing occasional bouts of a dull, continuous ache around my right cheekbone which wakes me up in the night. But one night last week the ache spread to the side of my right eye too. I also had wavy lines in my vision. Should I be concerned?
FACIAL pain is distressing because it is impossible to ignore and, often, difficult to diagnose.
One of the very worst pain syndromes, trigeminal neuralgia, affects the face and sufferers say it feels like receiving constant electric shocks. The condition, which is often caused by pressure to the trigeminal nerve in the head, can be brought on by simply touching the face, and is debilitating.
Thankfully, this does not sound like a case of trigeminal neuralgia. However, there are many other reasons why you might be experiencing this pain.
Facial pain can be triggered by dental issues, sinus problems, certain types of migraines or headaches, as well as issues within the jaw. All of these possibilities can be explored in an assessment with a GP and, if necessary, a dentist.
Likewise, wavy lines in the eye, which we call floaters, should always be reviewed by an optician. Floaters are normally harmless and triggered by small changes to the eye's jelly, but if they arrive suddenly it can sometimes be a symptom of retinal detachment, a serious condition which if left untreated can lead to loss of sight.
An issue that has lasted five years and appears to be progressively getting worse certainly warrants a consultation with a GP.
I HAVE been taking the blood thinner warfarin to treat atrial fibrillation for 13 years.
Recently, during a hospital consultation for an unrelated issue, the doctor suggested that I should not be on it because there were better drugs available for managing the condition. Do I need to change my medication? ATRIAL Fibrillation (AF) is a condition where the rhythm of the heart is abnormal.
Rather than the heart beating regularly, in its usual pattern, it beats irregularly and can also beat very fast. This can lead to heart palpitations, chest pain and dizziness. But it can also allow blood clots to form within the heart and elsewhere, which can lead to a stroke.
Unfortunately a stroke in somebody with atrial fibrillation is usually more severe than other strokes. For this reason, people with atrial fibrillation are advised to take medications that prevent clots forming - this reduces the chance of a stroke by about twothirds. One such drug is warfarin, which has been in use for 70 years. However, there is also a medication called a direct oral anticoagulant, or DOAC, which would usually be apixaban, edoxaban or rivaroxaban. This would be taken alongside other medications which may slow down a fast heart rate or help to improve the rhythm of the heart.
Research suggests that DOACs are just as effective at preventing clots as warfarin but have a lower rate of side effects.
If somebody is diagnosed with AF and already on warfarin they may continue on it, but it is better to move to the newer type of medication. A GP can discuss the options around warfarin and the newer drugs, and explain clearly which is most appropriate. I USE an inhaler for asthma. Sometimes I start coughing and my lungs seize up altogether. I struggle to breathe, so much so it's impossible to use my inhaler. Eventually my breathing returns to normal, but it's very frightening. This happens about once a fortnight - what can I do?
ANYBODY who has asthma, even at the milder end of the spectrum, should be having regular reviews of their condition with their GP. Having these symptoms every fortnight would indicate that the asthma is not being treated properly.
There may even be another lung condition at play, such as chronic obstructive pulmonary disease - also known as COPD.
Sometimes we find that patients have been labelled as having asthma either from childhood or one historic episode, but have not been properly evaluated.
Nowadays there are tests for asthma that can be undertaken in a GP surgery.
This could be useful to confirm asthma or point to a different diagnosis.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Why Jacko's children are still trapped in a Neverland of toxic family feuds over his $1.2bn legacy
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 20,21
Length: 1870 words
Byline: BARBARA MCMAHON
Body


FIFTEEN years have passed since they stood, grief-stricken, young and vulnerable, at their father's memorial service. Since that highlycharged day, watched by the world in 2009, Michael Jackson's three children have rarely been seen in public together.Last week, though, the siblings caused quite a stir as they walked the red carpet in London for the opening night of MJ: The Musical.
But while Prince - Jackson's eldest son, 27, dressed in a dapper maroon shirt and tie - smiled easily and 25-year-old Paris was all high-cheekboned elegance in a rust-coloured dress, the singer's youngest son, Blanket, 22, looked tense and uncomfortable.
With his long dark hair tucked behind his ears, Blanket - once notoriously dangled by his father as a nine-month-old baby from a balcony and now known as Bigi - remained unsmiling, even as Michael's ever-loyal fans cheered the three youngsters on.
His solemnity was perhaps unsurprising because just like his music legend father, Bigi is at the centre of a bitter family rift.
Yet again, it seems the famously dysfunctional Jackson family, long riven by rivalries and egos, are about to set themselves against each other in an unseemly legal battle over Michael's financial legacy. On one side of this lucrative fight are the publicity-shy Bigi, supported by his siblings. On the other is Michael's mother, Bigi's grandmother and onetime legal guardian Katherine Jackson, 93, who took the children in after their father died. The children and their grandmother are reportedly going head-to-head in court in a row over a deal which saw half of Jackson's music catalogue reportedly purchased by Sony Music Group for at least $600million.
This figure was negotiated by the executors of their father's estate, who have taken the family business from being a debt-laden albatross at the time of Michael's death at 50 to a multi-billion-dollar money-making machine, of which MJ: The Musical is only one lucrative element.
Indeed, the new Sony deal values the entirety of the King of Pop's music at $1.2billion, which could be the largest valuation ever of a musician's music assets.
Katherine and Bigi were originally united against the Sony deal, believing the executors of the estate should have waited as Michael's music would only appreciate in value.
But when earlier this month a Californian judge sided with the executors, and said the deal could go ahead, a split emerged between them. Katherine wants to appeal but Bigi believes they would be better off not spending their money on a hopeless case.
'Bigi decided not to waste his resources to participate in an appeal,' his lawyers wrote in court filings. 'Nonetheless, Katherine has decided to appeal this court ruling. That decision is not for the benefit of the heirs.' What's more Katherine's side argue the estate should cover her $500,000 legal fees, while Bigi is strongly opposed.
You might be forgiven for wondering what more the aged Katherine Jackson could possibly want from the family purse.
Since Michael's death from a prescription drug overdose she has been handsomely cared for - receiving more than $55million from a family trust, as well as having considerable lifestyle perks, including a driver, personal chef and 24-hour security.
Yet the clue to the family row, according to one source who spoke to The Mail on Sunday, lies in the fact that Katherine is the only family member, apart from the three children, who receives a direct income from the global superstar's estate as a trustee.
This Jackson family source has alleged Bigi's intervention is in part because he believes Katherine is out of her depth in business matters, at the mercy of lawyers, and that some family members want to use her to wrest yet more money from the estate. 'Katherine is still letting herself be bullied by family who never got over the fact Michael didn't leave them a considerable amount in his will,' says the source.
Writer Stacy Brown, who has known the family for 25 years, agrees Bigi and his grandmother are at odds over the Sony deal. But he believes Bigi has Katherine's interests at heart. 'Bigi and his siblings want the Sony deal but Katherine believed the estate could have gotten twice as much. She didn't want them to undervalue Michael's vast catalogue, given that she and his fans believe it has far more value than any catalogue in history,' he says.
'Bigi is challenging the fees for the appeal because he believes Katherine has no chance of overturning the decision and thinks lawyers will charge a premium - perhaps $1,400 an hour.' Before Michael's death, Brown contin- ues, 'he was about $500million in debt and was losing his grip on most of his assets.
'At his death, the estate told the tax authorities that Michael was worth only $2,500. The executors have turned that into a $2billion money-making machine.'
Brown spent decades at the heart of the Jackson family, first friends with Jermaine Jackson, then the rest of the clan. He has accompanied them on tours and was the first to tell Michael's sister Rebbie her brother had died.
He once paid for Katherine's food shopping when she was short of cash after Michael fell out with her. He was also called as a witness for the prosecution in the 2005 child abuse trial against Michael. If anyone knows the depths to which the Jackson family can descend, it's him.
Brown witnessed the weirdness of Michael first-hand, too. Once, in 1997, he stayed at the Neverland estate and says Michael made all guests sign waivers to let him eavesdrop on phone calls, videotape comings and goings and spy on those in the grounds.
'Jackson siblings warned me to cover my bedroom and bathroom walls with sheets because you likely were being filmed, even if you were naked,' he said.
Brown, who has since become estranged from Jackson family members, says: 'The estate will continue to provide for Katherine until she dies. Mostly because they rarely got along and there was always a rift, Michael didn't leave his brothers anything. He didn't leave his sisters anything either, nor his father.'
Against such a tumultuous family backdrop, it's heartening to see how supportive Michael's three children are of each other.
The eternally smiley Prince, whose godparents are actor Macaulay Culkin and the late Elizabeth Taylor, has a business administration degree and cofounded a charity Heal Los Angeles, supporting young people.
After dabbling in acting, he founded a film production firm called King's Son. He has said of his closeness to his siblings: 'You have a bond with them because nobody else really understands how you grew up. But they 100 per cent understand you and it's a very raw, unfiltered relationship. Especially when there's a lot of people who may not have best intentions for you.
'It's very easy to get caught up in a lot of fake personalities, so it's only made us stronger as siblings to have that very real relationship with each other, that we know is always love.' Paris, who was 11 when her father died, previously said she wanted to stay out of the spotlight and be a 'psychologist or a nurse at a psychiatric ward' but has since gone on to act, sing and model. She has also spoken of attempting suicide 'multiple times' by the age of 15.
Bigi, in contrast, is averse to public attention, not doing interviews and with no social media accounts. Home is a $2.6million LA mansion with 24/7 security.
He's making his way in the film industry, with his short movie, Rochelles, released this year. The trio's childhood was eccentric: home-schooled, they were constantly stalked by paparazzi and only seen in public in masks.
As for their mothers, after years of upset, Paris and Prince are thought to have a good relationship with theirs: nurse Debbie Rowe, who offered to have Jackson's children, delivering Prince in 1997 and Paris a year later.
Bigi was born via an unknown surrogate: 'I used a surrogate and my sperm cells,' Michael said. 'She doesn't know me and I don't know her. I didn't care what race she was so long as she was healthy and her vision was good. And her intellect - I wanted to know how intelligent she is.'
What next for Michael's children? Brown says: 'Michael's will gives complete control to his children once they are 33. With the job done by the executors, it's not yet known what the kids will decide - they could elect to keep them on to run the business of Michael Jackson.'
You could argue this latest family row couldn't have come at a worse time for the estate, which is at a crux moment. After significant worries about whether Michael would be 'cancelled' after notorious abuse allegations which saw him charged with ten counts of child molestation in 2005, his musical genius appears to have prevailed.
His songs are still played on radio worldwide and, as well as the Sony deal and new musical, next year sees the release of a new film biopic, Michael.
Much of this commercial success is down to the executors, attorney John Branca and music executive John McClain.
But all is not quite settled when it comes to money. Jackson's probate case is still open, meaning the trusts set up for the star's three children and his mother have not yet been funded.
'Several issues remain to be resolved,' says a legal source. 'There is an unsettled tax dispute involving more than $700million in unpaid taxes and penalties.'
Another concern is the revived lawsuits being brought by two men, Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who alleged in the 2019 documentary Leaving Neverland that Jackson abused them for years when they were boys.
Robson, now a 40-year-old choreographer, met Jackson when aged five and appeared in three of his music videos. He alleges Jackson molested him for seven years. Safechuck, 45, says he was nine when he met Jackson while filming a Pepsi advert. He says the star lavished gifts on him and went on to sexually abuse him.
Both men had lawsuits dismissed in 2013 and 2014 but a new California law that temporarily broadened the scope of sexual abuse cases has allowed the appeals court to restore them.
The Jackson estate has denied the men's claims and Michael's brother Marlon says of the accusations: 'It's about the money.'
Steve Knopper, author of the 2015 book MJ; The Genius Of Michael Jackson, says any trial would revive memories of previous allegations that Michael abused children.
Accusations that the singer abused three boys in 1993 saw Michael, who denied any wrongdoing, reach a $20million civil settlement with the 'primary alleged victim' and his family when the boy decided not to testify.
'There may be the possibility of a settlement, the way Michael settled in 1993, as another drawn-out public trial would be damaging to all the work the estate has done to get Michael's assets back on track,' Knopper says.
Despite the undoubted financial success of the executors, Brown says family members have mixed feelings about how the estate has been run for the past 15 years.
So the dysfunction in the family continues. 'There were lots of rifts and lots of egos,' Brown says.
One can only hope the next generation of Jacksons continue to love and support each other - unlike their predecessors.
Nobody else understands how we grew up... so you have a bond There was always a rift, Michael left his brothers nothing

Graphic


STILL CLOSE: Prince, Paris and Blanket in London for the musical's opening night and, right, as children in Los Angeles in 2012

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Young mum was given the all-clear from rare breast cancer... only to get different type in her other breast weeks later
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 20
Length: 929 words
Byline: Pat Hagan
Body


AFTER nearly 18 months of gruelling breast cancer treatment, Jess Parsons finally got the news she hoped for late last year ? her tumour was gone.
'It was an incredibly emotional moment,' says the 38-year-old who works in human resources. 'I was crying bucketloads. It had been touch-and-go, a year-and-ahalf of not knowing if I would see my two children grow up, go to university or get married.'
But just five weeks later, in early January, Jess, was given devastating news. She had developed cancer again, this time in her other breast. What's more, it was a completely different cancer and unrelated to her first diagnosis.
Jane Murphy, senior clinical nurse specialist at Breast Cancer Now in the UK, says: 'Getting breast cancer before the age of 50 is uncommon in itself, so to get a diagnosis twice in such a short time is extremely rare. I have never seen a case like this.'
Not only was the event a medical anomaly, it was also a crushing blow to Jess and her family, who had only just celebrated her clean bill of health and begun to plan for a cancer-free future.
'It was awful,' says Jess. 'I thought there must be some mistake. Even my surgeon couldn't comprehend how I had got cancer again so soon and that it was nothing to do with the first tumour. My husband, Matt, was shocked. Nobody could believe what was happening.'
Breast cancer is the most common type of cancer in women in Ireland, excluding skin cancer. Huge advances in treatment in the past decade mean nine out of ten are still alive five years after being diagnosed.
However, survival rates tend to be lower if the tumour ? known as the primary cancer ? has migrated to other parts of the body, such as the other breast, lungs, liver or brain. This is known as a secondary cancer, and is not the same as developing a new type of cancer.
Some research suggests that people who have previously had cancer have a heightened risk of developing a second primary tumour at some point later in life, but cases where this occurs within months are almost unheard of.
Jess ? who has an eight-yearold son, Stanley, and a two-yearold daughter, Ines ? was only 36 in 2022 when she discovered a lump in her right breast while nursing newborn Ines. She raised it with her GP but, at the time, was not worried that the lump could be cancer. 'I thought it was probably a blocked milk duct or a cyst ? I was way too young for it to be cancer,' she says.
But a biopsy confirmed that not only did Jess have breast cancer, but it was a very rare type of tumour. Called metaplastic squamous cell carcinoma, the disease accounts for less than two per cent of breast cancer cases. The causes are largely unknown. 'It's so rare that I got scared they might not know how to treat it,' Jess admits.
What makes Jess's case even more remarkable is that she has no family history of breast cancer, which is a key factor that determines the likelihood of cancer occurring. Subsequent DNA testing also revealed no obvious genetic mutations that increased Jess's risk of the disease.
What followed was a tough treatment regime of chemotherapy, radiotherapy and immunotherapy. Jess also had a mastectomy. By the time the tumour was removed, it had grown to about 7.5cm ? roughly the size of a peach.
'I found the chemotherapy really tough. I managed to avoid losing too much of my hair but the fatigue was crippling. I'd be talking to Matt on the sofa one second and zonked out the next. It was so bad I couldn't be left alone with Ines, who was a baby at the time.'
A CT scan in November brought the news Jess had longed for: the cancer was gone. 'It felt like I had been suffocating for 18 months and I could breathe again,' she says.
She was so relieved she almost didn't attend her annual breast cancer screening on her remaining left breast a few weeks later.
As people who experience breast cancer early in life are deemed at risk of recurrence, they are invited for an X-ray to screen for it, called a mammogram, every year after their treatment until they reach 50. Women aged 50 to 69 are offered a Breast Check screening every two years.
Younger women are not offered mammograms as their risk of developing the disease is low, but are encouraged to regularly check their breasts for lumps.
Jess changed her mind about not attending the screening after a cancer nurse explained that a mammogram can often spot cancer cells missed by a CT scan. The decision may have saved her life.
'A week or so later I got a letter from the breast screening service to say it had highlighted something suspicious in my left breast that needed investigating,' she says. 'I started hyperventilating. It was a really tough moment.'
Jess underwent another biopsy, and in January was given the gutwrenching news that she had breast cancer for a second time.
The new tumour is different from the first ? a ductal carcinoma in situ, a very early form of the disease which affects milk ducts. Jess has now undergone a second mastectomy and is about to embark on chemotherapy. 'I'm still in a state of shock but also hopeful as it has been caught early,' she says.
'Anyone who's had breast cancer in one of their breasts has a slightly higher risk of developing a new primary breast cancer,' says Sally Kum, associate director of nursing and health information at Breast Cancer Now.
'That's why it's vital that they continue to check their breasts and get anything unusual checked.'
Jess agrees: 'I'm so glad I had my mammogram. I'd urge all women who get the chance to do so and anyone too young for screening to check their breasts regularly.'
? See www.BreastCheck.ie

Graphic


Jess Parsons, with daughter Ines, is now having chemo for a second breast cancer

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



'A semi-pro GAA looks inevitable to me'
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 58
Length: 108 words
Body


WITH his life experience, Paul McGinley is the obvious person to ask about GAA amateurism. So is he surprised that Gaelic Games have stayed amateur, given that they are an outlier in this modern world where professional sport dominates the skyline?
'Look, it's to be admired, but I think again it has a limited shelf life,' he says. 'I think it will probably veer more towards semi-pro. I think that's inevitable.
'Yeah, if they can keep the amateur status, keep the guys giving that commitment - brilliant. But I wouldn't be surprised to see it veering more towards being more semi-pro, more generous with expenses, things like that, in years to come.'

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



'I'd love to see Ireland [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 78
Length: 14 words
Body


'to 'I'd love to see Ireland on the offensive today' PAULA FITZPATRICK Go to Pages 68-69

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



'VICTIMS DESERVE JUSTICE'; Deputy First Minister backs judicial process as PSNI warns against social media speculation
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Northern Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 88 words
Byline: David Young
Body


DEPUTY First Minister Emma Little-Pengelly says victims' rights must 'always' come first after Jeffrey Donaldson was charged with sex crimes.
Mr Donaldson, 61, quit as DUP leader on Friday before being suspended by his party after being charged with 'non-recent sexual offences'. Ms Little-Pengelly said she was 'shocked' but insisted 'victims must always have the best opportunity for justice'. Meanwhile the PSNI has warned that online commentary 'likely to lead to the identification of victims' is a crime.
FULL STORY Page 4 ??.

Graphic


SHOCKED: Deputy First Minister Emma Little-Pengelly

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



'We're here to add value [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 78
Length: 13 words
Body


'We're here to add value to what they are good at' MICKEY HARTE Go to Pages 64-65

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



A Little Princess 2.15pm Family [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 46
Length: 14 words
Body


A Little Princess 2.15pm Family drama: Liesel Matthews and Vanessa Lee Chester star
RTÉ2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



A Matter Of Life And [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 58,59
Length: 15 words
Body


A Matter Of Life And Death 1pm Love story: David Niven and Kim Hunter star in the fantasy
BBc2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



A real red flag opera
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 47
Length: 142 words
Body


Elsewhere, an opera by Michael Gallen, is as far from pantomime as you can get with its themes of revolutionary freedom and mental illness, set during the 1918-19 flu pandemic.
It's based on the true story of the Monaghan Asylum Soviet of 1919 when staff at the asylum barricaded the hospital gates and declared themselves an independent Soviet commune.
The strikers overcame sectarian divides to demand conditions and equal pay for men and women.
Central to it are the visions of Celine, a patient who, decades later, remains 'locked in' to the moment of the Soviet, believing herself to be its leader as she interacts with the charismatic 'Inspector of Lunatics' treading the borders between fantasy and incarceration. ? Elsewhere runs at Dublin's O'Reilly Theatre (April 8 and 9) before touring to Monaghan, Cork and Galway.
See www.onceoffproductions.com

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Anton & Giovanni's Adventures in [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 38,39
Length: 15 words
Body


Anton & Giovanni's Adventures In Spain 8pm Top trio: Anton and Giovanni meet Gorka Márquez
BBc1

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Apocalypse Now 10pm I love [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 34,35
Length: 15 words
Body


Apocalypse Now 10pm I love the smell of napalm: Martin Sheen stars in the Vietnam War drama
BBc2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Are you protected against measles?; Ask Dr Ellie THE GP WHO'S ALWAYS HERE FOR YOU
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 21
Length: 135 words
Body


The Health Protection Surveillance Centre (HPSC) said this week that there have been nine confirmed cases of measles in Ireland, and doctors are treating one outbreak where the measles infection was shared.
Ten other cases were under investigation as probable or possible, the HPSC said.
The HSE is opening walk-in clinics around the country offering the MMR vaccine as a catchup programme. The clinics are open for children aged five years and older, healthcare workers, people born in Ireland on or after 1 January 1978 and people born outside of Ireland and at risk of measles infection. You'll need to bring your PPSN and a form of photo identity to the clinic.
Third-level institutions have also been running clinics for young people who missed out on the vaccine as children. See www.hse.ie for more information.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Avoidance 9.30pm Shock: Jonathan (Romesh [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 54,55
Length: 14 words
Body


Avoidance 9.30pm Shock: Jonathan (Romesh Ranganathan) discovers Claire's big secret
BBc1

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Beat The Chasers 8pm Highstakes: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 42
Length: 16 words
Body


Beat The Chasers 8pm Highstakes: Contestants from across the UK take on a team of Chasers
VIRGINTWO

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Beauty And The Beast 2.40pm [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 34,35
Length: 15 words
Body


Beauty And The Beast 2.40pm Love story: A bookish woman becomes the prisoner of a monster
BBc1

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Bees sting United with late leveller
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: SPORT; Pg. 78
Length: 8 words
Body


Ajer cancels out Mount's strike Report: Page 74-75

Graphic


DESPAIR: Mason Mount reacts at the full-time whistle

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Blankety Blank 7.10pm Filling in [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 58,59
Length: 14 words
Body


Blankety Blank 7.10pm Filling in the blanks: Bradley Walsh hosts the comedy quiz show
BBc1

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Bradley Walsh: The Laugh's On [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 38
Length: 16 words
Body


Bradley Walsh: The Laugh's On Me 10pm Life story: The TV star looks back at his own life
VIRGIN ONE

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



BRAIN TRAIN
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 40
Length: 148 words
Body


BRAIN TRAIN
Run along our mental arithmetic train track to see how far you can get - and how long you take to get there! There are four station stops, A, B, C and D. You can start at A, B, or C and stop at B, C or D. From your chosen starting point, drive through the instructions to your destination. Write your answer at each stop, then start again with the first number after the station. Answers on today's solutions panel on page 42.
.
-
a cat's ..
START= -
+16 x 5 -77 +389 36 3 A to B= 288 x 27 lives
STATION A
STATION B ..
.
-
-
.
IX 12 fortnight +180 +348 x 8 days in 267
B toC= x 26 -
33 -
(Roman)
RATINGS: Good - from A to B in 30 seconds. Very good - B to C in 30 seconds or A to C in 50 seconds. Excellent - C to D in 30 seconds, B to D in 50 seconds or A to D in 75 seconds. Outstanding - A to D in 60 seconds.
STATION C xdays in ..
.
xXIV - 276 (Roman) 22 -
386 0.6 -
-
+38
C to D= a week -256
STATION D

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Celebrity Catchphrase 8pm Game show: [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 46
Length: 15 words
Body


Celebrity Catchphrase 8pm Game show: With Georgia Taylor, Nikki Fox and Robert Rinder
VIRGINTWO

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



CHESS Here all White's pieces are [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 41
Length: 33 words
Body


chess
Here all White's pieces are superior to Black's, so it's no surprise that White has a devastating combination available. Can you see it?
Our answer on the solutions panel.
8 7 6 5 4 3 2 1 abcde f gh

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



CORRECTIONS & CLARIFICATIONS
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 4
Length: 134 words
Body


THE Irish Mail on Sunday strives for complete accuracy in every article but it is inevitable when working against deadlines that mistakes are sometimes made and misunderstandings arise. We have always been ready to publish corrections and we do our utmost to ensure this happens quickly and prominently. If you feel that any of our coverage is incorrect or incomplete, please email:
corrections@mailonsunday.ie Letters for publication should still be sent to: letters@mailonsunday.ie ? This publication supports the work of the Press Council of Ireland and the Office of the Press Ombudsman, and our staff operate within the Code of Practice for journalists in Ireland. You can obtain a copy of the Code, or contact the Council, at www.presscouncil.ie, Lo-call 1800 208 080, or email: info@presscouncil.ie

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Creed 9.30pm Following in the [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 42
Length: 14 words
Body


Creed 9.30pm Following in the footsteps: Michael B Jordan stars in the boxing drama
RTÉ2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



don't forget the fantastic four-page [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: FEATURES; Pg. 42
Length: 11 words
Body


don't forget the fantastic four-page puzzle pullout every day in the

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Don't Go 10.30pm Back from [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 58
Length: 15 words
Body


Don't Go 10.30pm Back from the dead: Melissa George and Stephen Dorff star in the mystery
RTÉ2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Dubliner Marie-Louise wins Gladiators
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 33
Length: 156 words
Byline: Colm McGuirk
Body


DUBLINER Marie-Louise Nicholson became the first champion of the relaunched Gladiators last night.
The 28-year-old fitness trainer powered through The Eliminator to beat Sheffield firefighter Bronte Jones in the final of the BBC reboot of the '90s prime-time classic.
Marie-Louise had gained a twosecond head start on her opponent, who was competing in her home town, thanks to a strong showing in earlier event The Edge.
And she made those seconds count by dominating the final obstacle course to power home ahead of Ms Jones.
'Bronte was on my tail the whole time - what a competitor to go up against,' Marie-Louise said in a gracious victory speech.
'She was so close at the end there.
It was a photo finish. I think we're both winners in my eyes.'
Marie-Louise is based in London where she is a cross-fit trainer.
The BBC announced this week that a second series will be made this summer. The show originally aired on UTV from 1992 to 2000.

Graphic


GRACIOUS: Nicholson

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



First Dates Ireland 10.35pm Love [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 38
Length: 14 words
Body


First Dates Ireland 10.35pm Love is in the air: A look back at memorable match-ups
RTÉ2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



FREE INSIDE 8-page children's pullout [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 3
Length: 24 words
Body


FREE INSIDE 8-page children's pullout 40 Awesome Dinosaur Facts plus Family Quiz, Puzzles & Games starts on page 35 keep the kids off their devices

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



FREE INSIDE 8-page children's pullout Dinosaur [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 16 words
Body


FREE INSIDE 8-page children's pullout
Dinosaur facts ? Family quiz ? Puzzles & Games starts on page 35

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



free MAGAZINE DON'T MISS NEXT [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 15
Length: 14 words
Body


CHAMPIONSHIPS free MAGAZINE DON'T MISS NEXT THURSDAY'S 32 PAGE GLOSSY
THE BOYS OF SUMMER

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Fried Green Tomatoes 2.55pm The [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 34
Length: 15 words
Body


Fried Green Tomatoes 2.55pm The secret of life: Kathy Bates and Jessica Tandy star
VIRGINTHREE

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



FUNDING ALONE WON'T FIX CARE
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; Pg. 22
Length: 138 words
Body


THE figures at the heart of the
State's obligation to pay for care for the most vulnerable in society, children in care, are astounding.
The annual cost is (EURO)350m, which breaks down at (EURO)330,000 or more per year per child, and, in homes run privately, the figure can come to almost (EURO)7,000 per week.
If this money guaranteed that at-risk children in the care of the State were receiving all necessary supports required to overcome a difficult start in life, the figures would be justified. However, as is clear from repeated horror stories, many children in care are repeatedly failed by the services that have been set up to protect them.
It must be queried if the increase in expenditure is merely a crude attempt to throw money at a problem, rather than tackling underlying issues within the State's social care system.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Gambian school built in Ashling's [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: NEWS; FRONT PAGE; Pg. 3
Length: 16 words
Body


Gambian school built in Ashling's memory Slain teacher inspires Irish builders in Africa PAGES 12-13

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



GARDEN GURU
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 22
Length: 197 words
Body


Q
My rhododendron was looking fine but the leaves have curled at the edges. What do you think is wrong with it?
Graham Croft
A
Rhododendrons often broadcast problems by a change in the appearance of their leaves. The foliage will sometimes curl in summer due to drought, while flagging foliage in winter is a sign that the ground (or compost) is too wet. I suspect that the leaves of your plant have curled to protect themselves from cold winds by reducing the amount of exposed surface area. As the weather becomes warmer, the leaves should revert to their normal appearance.
Q
¦ I was given a hippeastrum bulb in a pot last year, which flowered over winter. Now it's finished, should I throw it away?
Cathy Rigby
A
¦ It's possible to keep plants going, but they do need attention. Allow the flowering stalk to die back naturally and then pull it away from the bulb. The foliage will continue to grow so keep it watered and feed weekly with general-purpose plant food. If the leaves flop, gather them up and secure to a small cane with twine. In early autumn the leaves will turn yellow and die back. Once flowering shoots appear, allow the compost to completely dry out before watering again.

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Gordon, Gino & Fred: Viva [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 42
Length: 15 words
Body


Gordon, Gino & Fred: Viva Espana! 10pm Culinary adventure: The trio head to Galicia
VIRGIN ONE

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Great British Railway Journeys 6.30pm [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 42,43
Length: 13 words
Body


Great British Railway Journeys 6.30pm On track: Exploring Derby and Nottingham
BBc2

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document



Heartbeat 7.55pm Gruesome: Gina is [...]
Mail on Sunday (London)
March 31, 2024 Sunday
Edition 1, Ireland


Copyright 2024 Associated Newspapers Ltd. All Rights Reserved


Section: MAGAZINE;FEATURES; Pg. 46
Length: 15 words
Body


Heartbeat 7.55pm Gruesome: Gina is shocked to discover a severed hand in a dustbin
VIRGINTHREE

Load-Date: March 31, 2024


End of Document
